20110288
Chemische_Fabrik_Kalk
Chemische Fabrik Kalk (CFK) (lit. Chemical Factory Kalk) was a German chemicals company based in Kalk, a city district of Cologne. The company was founded in 1858 as Chemische Fabrik Vorster & Grneberg, Cln by Julius Vorster and Julius Grneberg and was renamed to Chemische Fabrik Kalk GmbH in 1892. At times the company was the second-largest German producer of soda ash and was with almost 2400 employees one of the largest employers in Cologne. For decades the chimneys and the water tower of the factory dominated the skyline of Cologne-Kalk.In 1960 the company was acquired by the Salzdetfurth AG, which was later renamed into Kali und Salz (nowadays K+S) and became a subsidiary of BASF. All production facilities of the former Chemische Fabrik Kalk were closed in 1993, and the name Chemische Fabrik Kalk since then exists only as the name of a wholesale subsidiary of K+S. The factory was demolished and after the decontamination of the premises the new Cologne police departments headquarters and the Kln Arcaden shopping mall were built on the former factory premises.HistoryChemiewerk Vorster & Grneberg (1858&ndash;1891)On November 1, 1858 the merchant Julius Vorster and the chemist and pharmacist Julius Grneberg, who was a doctoral student at that time, founded the Chemische Fabrik Vorster & Grneberg, Cln. Vorster, who had owned a chemical factory before, contributed 15,000 Thaler and Grneberg contributed 5,000 Thaler.() As a location for the new factory they chose what was then the small village of Kalk (incorporated into Cologne in 1910) on the right bank of the Rhine. After purchasing the premises of the former iron foundry Biber & Berger construction began and three months later, in February 1859 production started. The factory produced nitrate and as a byproduct carbonate (also known as soda ash). Potassium nitrate was used in food preservation and in the production of black powder. The nitrate was produced from Russian potash and nitratine. From 1859 to 1864 production of potassium nitrate increased from  to . In the first year the factory employeed ten workers.()(, Vorster & Grneberg Chemische Fabriken in Kalk, Stafurt und Leopoldshall (1858&ndash;1877))thumb|250px|left|Chemische Fabrik Kalk in 1859.As the new company flourished several adjacent lots were purchased in 1860 to expand the production facilities and to maintain the regional market leadership in potassium nitrate. With prices for Russian potash increasing, the factory began to use a by-product of the sugar production from beet. In 1860 the factory also began to produce chloride, which was crystallized from rock salt.(To secure a supply of rock salt the factory founders Vorster and Grneberg acquired an mine in Stafurt near Magdeburg.(, Die Stafurter Abraumsalze (1858&ndash;1862)) The area was known for its deposits of a salt, a compound of chloride and chloride named carnallite after its discoverer, the Prussian mining engineer Rudolf von Carnall.() The new salt mine Vorster & Grneberg was rich in deposits of carnallite. Grneberg developed a new chemical process to produce potassium chloride from carnallite.() Initially the carnallite was transported from Stafurt to Kalk where it was dissolved in a current of stream and after cooling down the carnallite crystallized to obtain potassium chloride. To reduce transport costs the two founders decided to build two potassium chloride factories in Stafurt and Leopoldshall where they had acquired a second salt mine.(In 1860 Grneberg finished his doctoral studies and received a Ph.D. from the of Leipzig.() His research was in the field of chemistry, in particular mineral fertilizers.(, Die mineralische Dngung in der Landwirtschaft (1861)) In 1864 the factory began the production of the fertilizer superphosphate, produced from phosphorite from a newly acquired mine in Nassau an der Lahn. One year later the production of the fertilizer sulfate begins. In 1866 the factory begins to use the process to produce potassium carbonate from sodium chloride.( During the Exposition in Philadelphia in 1876, the company was awarded a gold medal for having first manufactured Potash and Potash salts, according to Leblancs process, on a manufacturing scale , and for the purity of the products exhibited.()The company continued to expand, with a factory producing ammonium sulfate opening in 1865 in Raderberg near Cologne (incorporated into Cologne in 1888). This factory produced the ammonium sulfate from ammonia and acid, the latter a waste product of the production of town gas. As the new factory was highly profitable, Vorster & Grneberg openend new ammonium sulfate factories in Cologne (incorporated into Cologne in 1888), Dsseldorf, Essen, Dortmund, Hamburg, Leipzig and Petersburg and an chloride factory in Moscow.()thumb|350px|right|Chemische Fabrik Kalk in 1892.In 1867 the company incurred financial losses from a bad investment in the United Kingdom and declining demand for its products. In the same year Julius Vorster Jr., the son of the founder Julius Vorster, became involved in the management of the company. On his recommendation the company began to produce sulfate in order to reduce the losses. Magnesium sulfate was primarily intended for the export to the United Kingdom, where it was used as a drying agent in the textile industry. The new product and an improving market for nitrate helped the company to overcome the financial crisis in 1870. In 1871 the potassium chloride factory in Stafurt was closed. On October 1, 1875 the second son of Vorster, the chemist Fritz Vorster joined the company as technical director. After the death of the founder Julius Vorster on October 10, 1876, the new owners converted the company into a partnership (Kommanditgesellschaft).()In 1878 Carl Scheibler became the head of the fertilizer department. Scheibler introduced an inexpensive fertilizer known as Thomas phospate. This fertilizer was based on Thomas slag, named after Gilchrist Thomas. This new, inexpensive fertilizer allowed even poor farmers to fertilize their fields.() At the same time municipalities began to use the waste products of the production of town gas for themselves or were selling them for profits, forcing Vorster & Grneberg to gradually close their ammonium sulfate factories at other locations over the next fifteen years. In contrast, the factory in Kalk continued its expansion with new production facilities for sulfuric acid and acid opening in 1881. In 1885 Carl Scheibler founded his own company, Dngerfabrik C. Scheibler & Co,  with the participation of the owners of Vorster & Grneberg. This company produced Thomas phospate and other fertilizers in domestic and international production facilities.()Chemische Fabrik Kalk GmbH (1892&ndash;1945)On May 24, 1892 the Vorster & Grneberg Kommanditgesellschaft was renamed into Chemische Fabrik Kalk GmbH (CFK) and converted into a company with liability (GmbH).() It was one of the first limited liabilities companies in the German Empire as the law on companies with limited liabilities was adopted only one month earlier. On June 7, 1894 the last surviving founder Hermann Julius Grneberg dies. His son Richard Grneberg succeeds him and joins the management board of the company.( After 1900 the production of potassium carbonate ceased due to competitive pressure. Instead, the company began to produce sodium carbonate using the process. In 1902 the Dngerfabrik C. Scheibler & Co. was incorporated, and a year later the last remaining factory in the Staburg region, the potassium chloride factory in Leopolshall was sold. To guarantee the water supply in the main factory in Kalk a water tower with an integrted chimney and a height of  was built. This water tower should dominate the skyline of Kalk for the next one hundred years.()thumb|350px|left|Chemische Fabrik Kalk in 1908.At the fiftieth anniversary of the founding of the company on November 1, 1908 the Chemische Fabrik Kalk produced the following chemicals: hydroxide, ammonium chloride, ammonia, hydroxide, sulfate, nitric acid, acid, sulfuric acid, sodium carbonate and various fertilizers. Apart from the main factory in Kalk the company operated an ammonia factory in Cologne-Nippes and fertilizer factories in Cologne-Ehrenfeld and Euskirchen. The company was also one of the owners of the coal istillation plant Ammonium GmbH in Weitmar near Bochum and held interests in domestic and international Thomas steel mills producing slag. Total production of all chemicals combined was . In 1908 the company employed more than 1200 workers.()With the outbreak of War I employment fell to 70 workers and parts of production were shut down, as the company was not producing essential chemicals for the war economy. Management then concentrated on the production of saltpeter, a raw material for explosives. Due to the importance of the chemical the workfore increased to 504 employees in December 1914. In 1916 an explosives research laboratory was created, and a short time afterwards the first explosive agent was developed. Despite the lack of workers the company also expanded into the new market for animal food by treating straw with sodium hydroxide.()After the end of the war the of Versailles forced Chemische Werke Kalk to end the production of explosives and close the research laboratory. In the 1920s demand for fertilizers slowly increased, but was accompanied by an increase in prices for raw materials. To mitigate the effect of the price increases the company began to produce a fertilizer based on nitrate and carbonate, two by-products of the production of other fertilizers. In 1930 Scheiblers Kampdnger (Kamp standing for Kalk-Ammon-Phospor, i.e. lime-ammonium-phosphorus and Dnger being the German word for fertilizer) was introduced, a two-component fertilizer that was readily accepted by the market.() The company management at this time considered moving the factory from Kalk to Godorf in Rodenkirchen as the high population density made expansion of the factory difficult. Ultimately this plan was not implemented.()After the Hitlers rise to power in 1933 the company gradually began to concentrate on raw materials for the production of explosives. Since 1937 women were employed as workers. After the outbreak of War II, with the maleworkforce in military service, women were conscripted for work at the company. Since 1940 Chemische Fabrik Kalk used approximately 460 forced laborers from Poland and later the Soviet Union.() The factory was heavily damaged during the bombing raids which started in 1942. In 1943 the sulfuric acid plant was completely destroyed, a year later almost all of the production came to a standstill. On March 6, 1945 the grandson of the founder, Fritz Vorster Jr. closed the factory after 80 percent of the production facilities had been destroyed. At this time the company had only 100 employees.()()Acquisition by Salzdetfurth AG and factory closing (1945&ndash;1993)In August 1945, only three months after the end of the war the Chemische Fabrik Kalk began to produce burnt lime for the purpose of bartering. Workers returning from war captivity cannibalized some sections of the plant to repair other sections. Some equipment and tools that were removed from the factory before the bombing raids were returned. In March 1946 the production of ammonium sulfate resumed. In 1947 large parts of the factory were rebuilt and in the summer of 1948 production of susperphospate in September 1948 production of Kampdnger resumed. As potash was added to the Kampdnger it was sold as KAMPKA-Dnger (the ending KA standing for Kalisalz, the German word for potash).() In 1950 the production of the company had reached the old pre-war production level and the company had a market share of 20 percent of the German market for sodium carbonate, although it decreased to 13 percent one year later. During this time the management again considered a move of the factory from Kalk to Godorf, but after a study concluded that a moving the factory would be more costly than staying in Kalk the already purchased land in Godorf was sold.() In 1952 the Salzdetfurth AG acquired a 25 percent share of Chemische Fabrik Kalk and increased the share to 75 percent in 1957.()thumb|400px|right|The former water tower of Chemische Fabrik Kalk in 2007At the centennial anniversary of the founding of the company on November 1, 1958 the company employed 1820 workers and 549 salaried professionals.( A new production facility for phosphates was opened in 1960. In the same year the factory produced  of KAMPKA fertilizer and  of sodium carbonate.() In 1960 the Salzdetfurth AG acquired the remaining 25 percent of Chemische Fabrik Kalk. After the takeover the Salzdetfurth AG began to modernize the production facilities and build for example a new,  tall chimney that helped alleviate the odor pollution from sulfurous exhaust fumes. In the mid 1960s the fillings and loading plants were converted to fully automated operation. Despite these modernizations the factory equipment, in particular the sodium carbonate production facilities were outdated. The company also lacked new products that would have allowed the company to enter new markets.()In 1971 the Salzdetfurth AG merged with the BASF subsidiary Wintershall and the Burbach-Kaliwerke AG. One year later the Salzdetfurth AG and Burbach-Kaliwerke AG and the sodium carbonate production facilities of Wintershall were merged into the new Kali und Salz AG. Under the new ownership Chemische Fabrik Kalk expanded into the production of flower and garden fertilizers. In 1974 the factory had 1800 employees, had a revenue of 400 million DM and was active in the production of sodium carbonate, chloride, chemicals, phosphate for animal feed and fertilizers.()In the early 1980s the factory tried to enter new markets with the production of bromine, but closed production after a fire destroyed the production facility only two weeks after completion in 1985. Due to increasing competition in the market for fertilizers and the lack of new products, company revenue fell from 570 million DM in 1985 to 370 million DM. The company posted increasing financial losses, partly due to its locational disadvantage as all raw materials and all final goods had to be transported by truck from the factory to Colognes Rhine harbor. Another disadvantage was the location of the factory in a densely populated residential area and a decreasing acceptance of the pollution caused by the factory. Without operating profits a relocation of the factory was not feasible, and thus, without any prospects, the fertilizer production was shut down in 1989. Employment fell from 1400 employees in 1985 to 830 in 1990, with the factory only producing sodium carbonate, calcium chloride and phosphate for animal feed. Although losses were reduced to almost zero in 1990, the financial situation deteriorated in 1992 when the prices for sodium carbonate fell.() The fall in prices was partly due to the lifting of anti-dumping on sodium carbonate imports from the American Natural Soda Ash Corporation (ANSAC) by the European Commission. Another factor in the worsening financial situation was an antitrust fine of US$1.38 million imposed by the European commission for participating in a sodium carbonate cartel together with Solvay and Chemical Industries.() Company revenue fell to 225 million DM and losses increased to 9.6 million DM. On December 23, 1993 all remaining production was shut down and all remaining 700 workers were laid off.() Since then Chemische Fabrik Kalk GmbH is the name of a wholesale distributor of chemicals and subsidiary of K+S AG (named Kali und Salz AG until 1999). Company revenue in 2007 was 7.86 million Euro, down from 10.07 million Euro in 2004.(Demolition and redevelopment of the factory site (1993&ndash;today)thumb|150px|left|The new Cologne police department headquarters.After the factory was closed all production facilities and factory buildings on the almost  large premises were demolished. A small laboratory building and the water tower which had been listed as a historic landmark were preserved. The former office buildings on the southern side of the factory premises were sold. Equipment was sold to other factories, in for example Poland and Brazil. In October 1994 the tall chimney was blasted. The last building demolished was the fertilizer factory building dating from 1894 which is torn down in March 2001. As the premises were heavily contaminated with sulfur and heavy metals they had to be decontaminated from 1996 to 2001. New streets and an access road to the Zoobrcke, a Rhine bridge were build. In 2003 the new Cologne police department headquarters were opened. In 2005 the Kln Arcaden shopping mall openend, with the parking garage build around the historic water tower. Plans to open a Chemische Fabrik Kalk museum in the water tower have not been realized. In April 2009 the science center Odysseum will open, which will be the largest science center in Germany. Other planned projects include residential and office buildings, retail space and an urban park. The former factory site is today known under the official name Cityforum Kalk, or abbreviated CFK.()()ReferencesBibliography* * * * * * * * * External links*  Official webpage of the successor company*  Webpage on the founder Herman Julius GrnebergFabrik Kalk
20119431
Fundacin_de_Conservacin_Jocotoco
Fundacin de Conservacin Jocotoco (Jocotoco Conservation Foundation) is an Ecuadorian non-governmental environmental organization(http://www.fjocotoco.org Fundacin de Conservacin Jocotoco).  Fundacin Jocotoco was founded in 1998 when a group of conservationists came together to purchase the type locality of the newly discovered Antpitta (Grallaria ridgelyi). S. Ridgely and others discovered the striking new bird species in wet upper subtropical forest in southeastern Ecuador (ca. 2,500 m elevation) (Krabbe, N. Agro, D.J., Rice, N.H., Jacome, M., Navarrete, L. & Sornoza M., F. 1999. A new species of antpitta (Formicariidae: Grallaria) from the southern Ecuadorian Andes. Auk 116: 882-890. ).  That the species had evaded detection for so long suggested it must have a tiny range.  Indeed, over 10 years since its discovery, Jocotoco Antpittas known range remains very small.(http://www.birdlife.org/datazone/species/index.html?actionSpcHTMDetails.asp&sid9830&m0 Birdlife Species Factsheet Jocotoco Antpitta) Land clearance for cattle ranching and gold mining are currently the two most significant threats to the species(Heinz, M., V. Schmidt, and M. Schaefer. 2005. New distributional record for the Jocotoco Antpitta (Grallaria ridgelyi) in south Ecuador. Cotinga 23:2426. pdf full text). Fundacin Jocotoco established Biological Reserve to protect the habitat of the highly localized and threatened antpitta.  The reserve now protects > 2870 hectares of forest and an associated 380+ species of birds and numerous range-restricted plants, amphibians, mammals, and invertebrates.(Harris, J. B. C., D. Tirira, P. lvarez, and V. Mendoza. 2008. Altitudinal range extension for Cebus albifrons (Primates: Cebidae) in southern Ecuador. Neotropical Primates 15:22-24 pdf full text)(Harris, J. B. C., R. L. Carpio A., M. K. Chambers, and H. F. Greeney. 2008. Altitudinal and geographical range extension for Bicoloured Antvireo Dysithamnus occidentalis punctitectus in south-east Ecuador, with notes on its nesting ecology. Cotinga 30: 63-65. )(Breure, A. S. H., and F. J. Borrero. 2008. An annotated checklist of the land snail family Orthalicidae (Gastropoda: Pulmonata: Orthalicoidea) in Ecuador, with notes on the distribution of the mainland species. Zootaxa 1768:140)(http://www.fjocotoco.org)Using Tapichalaca as a successful example, Fundacin Jocotoco has greatly expanded its efforts and the organization now administers eight reserves across Ecuador.  The reserves are strategically located in hotpots of avian diversity, threat, and endemism.  The tropical Andes offer a rare opportunity for species conservation with small reserves because the region is an intersection of these three types of biodiversity hotspot(Orme, C. D. L., R. G. Davies, M. Burgess, F. Eigenbrod, N. Pickup, V. A. Olson, A. J. Webster, T. S. Ding, P. C. Rasmussen, R. S. Ridgely, A. J. Stattersfield, P. M. Bennett, T. M. Blackburn, K. J. Gaston, and I. P. F. Owens. 2005. Global hotspots of species richness are not congruent with endemism or threat. Nature 436:1016-1019.). In total, Fundacin Jocotocos reserves protect approximately 800 species birds on just ~14000 hectares of land. The organization is primarily funded by Land Trust-US, Land Trust (UK), and donations from individuals.  Current Fundacin Jocotoco reserves and some focal bird species:*Tapichalaca, wet lower subtropical forest up to pramo on east slope of Andes. Antpitta, Parakeet, Parakeet, Antpitta, Antvireo, Saltator, Scythebill*Ro Canand, wet Choc lowlands of the northwest. Dacnis, Ground-Cuckoo, Curassow, Tanager*Buenaventura, wet upper foot hill forest on west slope of Andes. One of only a few localities for Oro Parakeet, and Oro Tapaculo.  Other species of interest include Umbrellabird, Attila, and Manakin. *Yanacocha, upper temperate forest on Volcn Pichincha. Puffleg (one of the few remaining world localities for this critically endangered species), Snipe, Thornbill*Narupa, wet foothill forest on the east slope of the Andes. Jacamar, Sabrewing, many other foothill species*Jorupe, Tumbesian dry forest. Foliage-gleaner, Foliage-gleaner, Spinetail, Antbird*Utuana, temperate forest on slopes above interandean valley. Hemispingus, Starfrontlet, Tit-Tyrant*Yunguilla, woodland south of Cuenca.  Only world locality for the Critically Endangered Brush-FinchFundacin Jocotoco and its funding bodies support an active research program that seeks to gather critical baseline natural history information on the endangered birds protected in the reserves.  Results of these studies will facilitate more effective conservation of the threatened species. Recent projects include:* Radio telemetry and natural history observations of Jocotoco Antpitta at Tapichalaca* Reproductive montoring of Pale-headed Brush-Finch at Yungilla and El Oro Parakeet at Buenaventura* Documenting reproductive biology and identifying critical breeding habitat of Woodstar in coastal Ecuador(Harris, J. B. C., A. greda, M. E. Juia, and B. P. Freymann. Plumage, distribution, and conservation status of the endemic Esmeraldas Woodstar (Chaetocercus berlepschi) of western Ecuador. Wilson Journal of Ornithology in press.)See Fundacin Jocotocos website for more information on:* Reserves and the species they protect * Current projects* Ways to donate* Funding partners* Current staff and board membersReferences
20138763
Texas_Renaissance_Festival
 website     http://www.texrenfest.com/The Texas Renaissance Festival is located in Plantersville, Texas.The Texas Renaissance Festival started in 1974 on the location of an old strip mining site.()The festival features over 500 costumed performers and 17 performance stages.In Nov 2010 the festival received 45,000 festivalgoers every weekend, and staffed 30 off duty officers to patrol the grounds. This large festival hosts over 400 stalls were attendees can buy anything from a tankard of ale to a pair of elf ears. The Texas Renaissance Festival is the Nations largest, most acclaimed Renaissance theme park.  Open to the public every Saturday, Sunday, and Thanksgiving Friday, October 8th through November 27th, and to students for School Days, Tuesday and Wednesday, November 1st and 2nd.The enchanted 55 acre village comes to life as all of Europe comes to pay homage to the King and Queen with Eight Themed Weekends.  Hundreds of costumed performers are showcased in over 200 daily performances.  Visitors meander along shaded cobblestone walkways visiting over 340 shoppes overflowing with unique arts and crafts of offering delicious foods and beverages.  All ages will be amused by the games of skill and human-powered rides.  Revel in the sights, sounds, smells, tastes and beauty of this authentically recreated 16th Century British village with lush landscaped grounds and vines.  A perfect day ends as behold the burst of Royal Fireworks held above the Festivals lake. -Texas Renfest official website () See also * fair* of Renaissance fairs* Reenactment* Jousting* for Creative Anachronism* of open air and living history museums in the United States  References  External links Official website
20164349
Brunner_Mine
Brunner Mine was on the West Coast of New Zealand.__NOTOC__The Brunner Mine was a coal mine on the West Coast of the South Island in Zealand.The Brunner Mine was one of several mines situated on the banks of the River, at an area known as Coal Gorge between the townships of Stillwater and Taylorville. The town of Brunner (formerly Brunnerton) is nearby. Coal was discovered on the West Coast by Nelson surveyor Brunner during the most arduous of his journeys in search of more agricultural land.() The coal was of extremely high quality and it did not take long before it attracted interest. And, of course, The West Coast had the added attraction of gold mining and it seems that the employment opportunity offered by coal mining was in the difficult economic times not one to be turned down.(Brunner Mine disasterIn March 1896 an explosion deep in the mine killed all 65 miners inside, and was labelled the worst mining disaster in New Zealands history. It seemed most likely that the explosion was caused by firedamp, a common hazard in coal mines, where a pocket of methane gas is accidentally ignited and explodes.Current siteToday all that visibly remains of the mine and its related industry are the remains of the old coke ovens on the north side of the river, as well as the memorial at that location listing the names of the miners killed. Not to mention the graves in Stillwater cemetery, including one mass grave containing the bodies of 33 of the miners killed. The entrance to the mine has long been engulfed by the bush, as have any trace of the bustling industry that once existed on that spot. The chimney on the south bank between the road and railway line has often been associated with the Brunner Mine, but was actually part of the Mine on the south side of the river.See also*in New Zealand*River MineReferencesExternal links*Historic Brunner Mine at the Department of Conservation*Brunner Mine Industrial Site at the Places Trust
20186595
Lusignan_Massacre
The Lusignan Massacre refers to the murder of eleven residents of Lusignan, Coast Demarara, Guyana, they were murdered by the criminal gang led by Fineman Rawlins. Rawlins and many of the other suspected gang members were later killed by Guyanese security forces. This massacre was part of a series of murders that appeared to have begun with the murder of Prison Officer Troy Williams during the Day Prison break on February 23, 2003() . Events On the morning of Saturday, January 26, 2008, gunmen stormed into the small village of Lusignan, Guyana and ruthlessly murdered eleven persons, including five children. Five families were affected by the massacre.A group of heavily armed gunmen entered Track A Lusignan about 02:00 am, and invaded the homes of five Lusignan families. The onslaught, which lasted about 20 minutes, penetrated the quiet of the morning with heavy gunfire as the marauding gang mercilessly killed eleven persons. The dead are: Clarence Thomas, 48; Vanessa Thomas, 12; Ron Thomas, 11; Mohandan Goordat, 32; Seegopaul Harilall, 10; Seegobin Harilall, 4; Dhanwajie Ramsingh, 52; Seecharran Rooplall, 56; Raywattie Ramsingh, 11; Shazam Mohammed, 22; and Shaleem Baksh, 52. Several of the children who were murdered were found dead while still in their beds. Survivors of the attack are Arjune Bhim, 11,Roberto Thomas and Howard Thomas. Both Roberto and Howard, who sustained life-threatening gunshot wounds, have undergone successful recoveries() . Aftermath of the Massacre As the country slipped into nationwide mourning, East Coast residents held protests along the East Coast corridor, where they burned tires and damaged state infrastructure. Residents reported that they made several attempts to contact the Vigilance Police Station during the siege. However, the police did not respond promptly, and arrived at the scenes of the crime well after the gunmen had escaped. As such, angry residents staged protests to vent their disappointment with the countrys fractured national security. Residents were also incensed when government officials visited Lusignan. The fugitive Rondell Fineman Rawlins has claimed responsibility for the massacre. Mastermind and Motive The former soldier, Rondell Fineman Rawlins, who has claimed responsibility of the Lusignan massacre, was initially wanted for the April 2006 assassination of Agriculture Minister Sawh. Rawlins girlfriend, 19-year-old Tenisha Morgan, vanished on January 18, 2008 while on her way to a city hospital to deliver her baby. Rawlins believed that his girlfriend was kidnapped by law enforcement officials in an effort to force Rawlins to turn himself in. The Joint Services has repeatedly denied these claims. Rawlins telephoned the Criminal Investigations Department (CID) a few days after her disappearance, and warned them to turn over his girlfriend to him or face the consequences. His voice was positively identified by police ranks.Following the Lusignan Massacre, a male person who claimed to be Rawlins contacted the local newspaper Kaieteur News by phone. He claimed responsibility for the Lusignan killings, but declared that he was not the mastermind behind the slaying of the Minister for Agriculture in 2006. Rawlins further warned that he will create history in Guyana through a repeat mass killing if his girlfriend is not returned to him alive and well. This threat was realized less than one month after the Lusignan Massacre, when another bloodbath was executed in the mining town of Bartica. In that incident, 13 persons were ruthlessly murdered, including three policemen, while seven persons sustained multiple gunshot wounds to the body . Operation Restore Order  Two days after the Lusignan Massacre, the Joint Services launched Operation Restore Order, headed by the Commissioner of Police (ag) Henry Greene. The operation was launched so as to capture and disable criminal gangs, and restore law and order to the country. All sea, land and air resources were mobilized in an effort to capture the killers. On Wednesday, 30th January 2008, members of the Joint Services were engaged in a shootout in Buxton, which resulted in the death of two armed men. About ten gunmen shot at and threw grenades at the ranks in the vicinity of Pond Dam, Buxton. The two dead were identified as Vibert Leroy Harris aka Bolo, of Friendship, East Coast Demerara, and Troy St. John aka John Eye. St. John is believed to be Rawlins second in command. During Operation Restore Order, the Joint Services cleared a section of the backlands of Buxton so as to disable the criminals from escaping into those fields. They discovered the skeletal remains of one man who went missing in 2007. The Joint Services also recovered several AK-47 rifles, hundreds of rounds for various weapons, and military fatigues, among other items. These items were discovered through raids in Buxton. The operation has been widely extended to other towns and villages in Guyana following the second massacre at Bartica massacre, where the town was under siege for approximately one hour. Condemnation of the Attack The Lusignan massacre has been condemned by many factions of the Guyanese community as well as various international bodies. All political parties and religious bodies unreservedly condemned the Lusignan massacre and called for an end to the brutal crimes.The ruling Peoples Progressive Party (PPP) issued a statement in which they strongly condemned the brutal and cold blooded murder of the 11 persons at Lusignan, and said the attack on Police Headquarters which preceded the slayings was a well coordinated and centrally directed terrorist attack.  Controversy Various controversies have surrounded the motives of the Lusignan massacre, and the national response to the capture of the criminals.1.	President of Guyana Jagdeo refused to hold consultations on the countrys crime situation with main opposition leader Mr. Robert Corbin. The president declared that he would not discuss the matter unless the opposition leader admitted that the beleaguered community of Buxton is a safe-haven for criminals. The opposition leader has said that he will not single out Buxton, as criminals can also be found all over the country. The President did later meet with all national stakeholders, parliamentary political parties and religious bodies on Wednesday 20th February, 2008, following the second massacre in Bartica.2.	As part of Operation Restore Order, the Joint Services conducted various search exercises in the homes of Buxtonians. Many residents complained that their household items were unnecessarily damaged beyond repair. There were also claims of unnecessary force used during the detainment of suspects from the village. The Joint Services subsequently said that all items damaged during the search exercises will be replaced or compensated for.3.	Operation Restore Order also saw the clearing of the Buxton backlands, a move which greatly affected the livelihood of Buxton farmers. The cash crop farms were cleared so as to prevent criminals from using the backlands to make good their escape. The government of Guyana subsequently set up a compensation desk in order to assess claims of destroyed farms, and supply adequate monetary compensation for all losses.4.	Tenisha Morgan, who was heavily pregnant at the time of her disappearance, allegedly contacted her mother, Waple Morgan, while still missing. Her mother reportedly said she received a phone call from the young woman, who said she did not know where she was, but she was walking along a dam. She also reportedly said that the baby, who is a girl, is sick, and they have no food. A massive search was launched for the missing woman and her baby, but neither was found. Police investigations shortly after found that there were inconsistencies with Waple Morgans report, and that she had changed her story as to how she came to receive the phone call. This has cast doubt on her reliability; nonetheless, the police continue to search for the missing pair. Rawlins deathIn 2008, gang leader Rondell Rawlins was killed by police.See also*of massacres in GuyanaReferencesExternal links* News reports and information on the Lusignan Massacre
20212507
Boston_Strategies_International
Boston Strategies|Boston Strategies International provides custom global industry research, cost, risk and pricing analysis, and strategy consulting, helping executives to make critical decisions that involve investment and risk. Boston Strategies International is known for its global chain economic analysis. Originally founded in 1998 as Boston Logistics Group, the company was renamed to Boston Strategies International in May 2008.Practice areas*Strategy Consulting (Capital Investment Analysis, Entry & Exit Strategies, and Acquisitions, Development, Policy Planning, Risk Mitigation Strategies, Chain Strategies, Technology Strategies)*Cost, Risk and Pricing Analysis (Chemicals & Plastics, Compressors, Contract Manufacturing, Design & Testing, Drilling, Electrical, Electronics, Hardware, Heat Transfer, Instrumentation, Iron & Steel, Metals, Mill Rolls, MRO, Paper & Packaging, Parts & Equipment, Pipe Fittings, Transmission, Professional Services, Pumps, Transportation, Turbines, Valves, Vessels)*Global Industry Research (Agri-Bulks, Chemicals, Coal, Cotton, Crude Petroleum, Distribution and Wholesaling, Energy Distribution and Utilities, Logistics, Maintenance and Repair, Minerals and Mining, Gas, Ores, Paper, Pulp and Related Products, Printing and Publishing, Rubber, Scrap Metal, Transportation, Wood Products)Clients*Energy and Natural Resources (metals and mining, oil and gas, petrochemicals, pulp and paper, utilities)*Global Infrastructure (integrated transports, leasing and lending institutions, railroads and holding companies, ports and terminals, telecommunications)*High-Value Manufacturing (aerospace and defense, heavy rotating equipment, power generation systems, steel and aluminum milling, transport equipment)OfficesBoston, Dubai, ShanghaiPublicationsThe firms staff guide thought in the profession through their leadership in supply chain associations, such as ISM, APICS, and CSCMP, as well as their publications in Supply Chain Management Review, Supply Chain Quarterly, Purchasing Magazine, and World Trade Magazine.*The Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU)(The Economist Intelligence Unit)**Foresight 2020**Courting the Consumer**Business 2010**The New Face of Purchasing**Personalization**Innovation**Unleashing the Power of Customer Data**Ready, Willing and Enabled**RFID Comes of Age**US Department of Transportation (USDOT)**Investing in the US: The Transportation Challenge**Guide to Large-Scale Freight Investments*Logistics Digest Magazine(Logistics Digest Magazine)**Intermodal Integration  Responding to Market Needs**RFID Solutions**Air Express Solutions**Paperless Management Solutions**The Elusive Global Transportation System**Fleet Management Solutions**Logistics Outsourcing  Its Not About Reducing Costs**Visibility and the Role of Government in Container Security**Best Solutions in Supply Chain Management*APICS Magazine(APICS Magazine)**Global Logistics  Ups and Downs**Can Western Manufacturers Beat the Competition?*Logistics Management Magazine(Logistics Management Magazine)**2008 Mid-Year Rate Outlook Update**2008 Logistics Rate Outlook*PARCEL Magazine(PARCEL Magazine)**How Long Will the East-West Trade Imbalance Last?**Perfecting Your Supply Chain**Going Global  The Key is People*Supply Chain Management Review(Supply Chain Management Review)**The Art of High-Cost Country Sourcing*World Trade Magazine(World Trade Magazine)**The Shanghai Connection**Variable Energy Costs and Strategic Sourcing*Ground Handling International(Ground Handling International)**RFID  The Solution to Better Baggage Handling*Purchasing Magazine(Purchasing Magazine)**Chemicals Markets Getting More Complex**Measuring Sourcing Performance: Whats the Mystery?**Mitigating High Raw Material Prices**Focus on the Right Suppliers**Mega-Sourcing  Do You Have the Skills?**The New Economics of Partnering*Governance, Risk and Compliance Handbook(Governance, Risk and Compliance Handbook)Ownership and managementBoston Strategies International is privately held, and was founded by David Jacoby in 1998, who serves as its President.Supply chain awardsBoston Strategies International acknowledges leaders in supply chain management each year through its objective, quantitative, and non-remunerative Supply Chain Award process. The 2008 winners were: *Fuel (WOQOD)  Overall Supply Chain Excellence (Qatar Fuel Wins Supply Chain Excellence Award, October 2008)*Beretta  Cost Leadership(Beretta Wins Cost Leadership Award, October 2008)*Automotive  Supply Chain Reliability(Futuris Automotive Wins Supply Chain Reliability Award, October 2008)*Netflix  Customer Intimacy(Netflix Wins Supply Chain Customer Intimacy Award, October 2008)ReferencesExternal links* 
20220245
Bard_Ventures
Bard Ventures Ltd. () is a Canadian-based mining company and is listed on the Venture Exchange. It has mineral properties in Columbia and is headquartered in Vancouver.  The main focus is on molybdenum.The primary mining focus is the Lone Pine Molybdenum Project (molybdenum drilling program underway), and the Wasi Creek Zinc Lead Silver Project, both located in northern B.C. Canada.Other companies in the molybdenum industry are Thompson Creek Metals Company Inc., General Moly, Inc. and Roca Mines Inc.HistoryThe Lone Pine property has seen extensive historical exploration. A of Mines and Resources (Canada) annual report from 1914 was the first mention of workings on the property, detailing a shaft intersection of a narrow silver-lead-zinc-copper-gold bearing quartz vein. Various surface workings continued in the 1920s as additional veins were discovered.Numerous companies from 1959 to 1971 conducted a variety of exploration over the property, however, it wasnt until 1976 that molybdenum mineralization was being sought after as a primary commodity. Between 1976 and 1992 continued exploration resulted in moderate molybdenum mineralization on the property.The Lone Pine Property consists of seven mineral claims covering 1051 hectares, which are approximately 15 kilometers north-northwest of Houston, BC, and are situated in the Omineca Mining Division. The Property area extends over several molybdenum showings including Quartz Breccia, Alaskite Zone, Mineral Hill and Granby.The Alaskite Zone is aptly named for the white, fine to medium grained quartz feldspar porphyry intrusive that was recognized and mapped in outcrop in 1967 as alaskite. The alaskite intrusive is the main focus of the Lone Pine Property drilling and has been interpreted as being the most favorable lithology for molybdenum mineralization. The alaskite intrusive to date continues to be drilled to the northwest of its original outcropping occurrence, BD-07-01 area, with exploration advancement to the northwest ongoing.Mining operations and communityBard Ventures drilling program for the Lone Pine Property provides employment for the surrounding communities of British Columbia and Houston. Commercial production will not interfere with the local communities as the property has access to an existing infrastructure and is located less than one kilometre off Highway 16 that connects Prince Rupert to Prince George in central BC.The main power grid connecting the area transects the property along Highway 16. In addition, a power sub station occurs within two kilometres of the property, opening the potential for simple, low-cost power for the project. Surface rights in the area are controlled by a few (less than five) local residents that have thus far been cooperative with the exploration efforts. Also transacting the property is a natural gas pipeline. Natural gas is an important component used to drive energy for a Mo roaster facility, should the project ever warrant the development of one.Demand for molybdenumAccording to the International Molybdenum Association , demand from the manufacturing of tools, steel, steel and alloy steel accounts for about 80% of total molybdenum consumption. Demand for molybdenum has also increased because of its use as a reducer of sulfur in oil. One of the applications pertinent in current market conditions is the use of molybdenum in the pipework for the offshore oil and gas industry. High growth in the energy sector has contributed to the growth in global demand of molybdenum, due to increased demand for the metal for new and replacement pipelines.However, an analyst from Fundamental Research Corp. says: The recent decline in energy prices and global steel consumption will put downward pressure on molybdenum demand growth.ReferencesJunior Mining Weekly, July 16, 2008, Canaccord Adams http://agoracom.com/agoraimages/miningweekly16July2008.pdfExternal links* Bard Ventures Corporate Web Site* International Molybdenum Association* Current Price of Molybdenum Chart
20227466
Mara_Elena
 footnotes               Mara Elena is a Chilean city and commune in Province, Region. According to the 2002 census, the commune population was 7,530 and has an area of .( History Maria Elena is named after Mary Ellen Comdon, wife of the first saltpeter refinery office (oficina salitre) manager, Elias Cappelens. Originally, the name of the office was Coya Norte. Situated on land purchased from the Treasury in 1924, the plant was inaugurated in 1926 with the nitrate extraction system patented by the Guggenheim Brothers, which replaced the Shanks system. Its layout was made on the basis of the of the United Kingdom. Together with the former refinery at Pedro de Valdivia built in 1931, they were the largest saltpeter refineries with a combined output of over one million tons per year.In 1965 both were taken over by the state, through Qumica y Minera (SQM or Chemistry and Mining Society, which was privatized in 1980. This privatization explains why most peoples land and buildings are owned by SQM and not the Chilean state.In 1996, it became the only active mining community in the country after the closure of the saltpeter office at Pedro de Valdivia. After the closure of the latter office, many workers and their families were relocated to Maria Elena.On November 14, 2007, the 7.7 Mw Tocopilla earthquake with an epicenter  north of Maria Elena, devastated the area. Almost all the towns old houses collapsed or were rendered uninhabitable, and the local hospital almost completely collapsed with no loss of life or injuries( )DemographicsAccording to the 2002 census of the National Statistics Institute Mara Elena had 7,530 inhabitants; of these, 7,412 (98.4%) lived in areas and 118 (1.6%) in areas. At that time, there were 4,298 men and 3,232 women. By 2002, the population had fallen 44.9% (124,130 persons) since the 1992 census of 13,660.(The commune of Mara Elena is composed of six census districts.Source: INE 2007 report, Territorial division of Chile()AdministrationAs a commune, Mara Elena is a third-level division of Chile administered by a council, headed by an alcalde who is directly elected every four years. The 2008-2012 alcalde is Jorge Godoy Bolvarn (PS), and the council has the following members:((* Carlos Hidalgo Marfull* Nelson Avendao Vliz* Jaqueline Godoy Soto* Jorge Ramirez Plaza* Carlos Ardiles Aceituno* Andrs Concha F.Within the divisions of Chile, Mara Elena is represented in the Chamber of Deputies by Marcos Espinosa (PRSD) and Felipe Ward (UDI) as part of the 3rd electoral district, (together with Tocopilla, Calama, Ollage and Pedro de Atacama). The commune is represented in the Senate by Carlos Cantero Ojeda (Ind.) and Antonio Gmez (PRSD) as part of the 2nd senatorial constituency (Antofagasta Region).ReferencesExternal links*  Municipality of Mara ElenaElenaElena (Chile)ElenaElenaElenaElena()
20250538
Big_Coal:_The_Dirty_Secret_Behind_Americas_Energy_Future
Big Coal: The Dirty Secret Behind Americas Energy Future is a book by Goodell which claims that coal mining is one of Americas largest and most influential industries.  Goodell suggests that coal mining is deadly and environmentally destructive.(Big Coal: The Dirty Secret Behind Americas Energy Future)(Black Cloud)(Big Coal: The Dirty Secret Behind Americas Energy Future)See also*the Future: Coal in America*of books about coal mining*Mountain Top RemovalReferencesExternal links*Black Cloud, book review in New York Times Book Review by S. Powell, June 25, 2006*Books, Articles, Movies, and Websites about Mountaintop Removal Coal Mining
20260551
Keys_Desert_Queen_Ranch
 refnum75000174()The Keys Ranch is the prime example of early settlement in the Tree National Park area. Bill Keys was the areas leading character, and his ranch is a symbol of the resourcefulness of early settlers. The ranch is an extensive complex of small frame buildings built between 1910 and Keys death in 1969. Keys pursued both ranching and mining to make a living in the desert.()William F. Keys was born at Nebraska in 1879. After working as a ranch hand and smelter worker, he was a deputy sheriff in County, Arizona. During a time in Valley, he befriended Valley Scotty, becoming involved in a swindle that resulted in the so-called Battle of Wingate Pass. He arrived in the Palms, California area in 1910. In the area that became Joshua Tree National Park, he became acquainted with local outlaw and cattle rustler Jim McHaney, taking care of him in declining health. Keys eventually took over McHaneys properties after McHaneys death, gradually expanding what became the Desert Queen, its name borrowed from the nearby Queen Mine.(publisherNational Park Service)Keys married Francis M. Lawton in 1918, and they had seven children together, three of whom died and were buried at the ranch. During a dispute over the Street Mill, Keys shot and killed Worth Bagley.  Keys was convicted of murder and went to San Quentin Prison, where Keys educated himself in the library.  Keys was paroled in 1950 and was pardoned in 1956 through the efforts of Stanley Gardner, author of the Mason novels.(Mining equipment at the ranch includes an arrastra and a mill for ore processing. Other buildings include an adobe barn, a schoolhouse, a tack shed, machine shed, cemetery and a variety of houses and cabins.(Park rangers provide guided walking tours of the ranch from October through May.  Tours are limited in size and should be booked in advance.GalleryFile:Desert_Queen_Ranch_-_school_house_1.jpg|School houseFile:Desert_Queen_Ranch_-_school_house_2.jpg|School houseFile:Keys Ranch guest house.jpg|Guest houseFile:Desert_Queen_Ranch_-_gold_mill.jpg|Oxen pulled mill used to crash ore to during gold extraction File:Desert_Queen_Ranch_-_Closed_Area_sign.jpg|Closed area no trespassing signFile:Desert_Queen_Ranch_-_crane.jpg|Flood control wall and crane used to build itFile:Desert_Queen_Ranch_-_Fordson_1.jpg|Fordson tractor detailFile:Desert_Queen_Ranch_-_Fordson_2.jpg|Fordson tractor attached to the circular sawFile:Desert_Queen_Ranch_-_Willys_Jeep.jpg|Willys JeepSee also*Camp, Jim McHaneys outlaw camp*Street Mill*Barker DamReferencesExternal links* Keys Ranch Guided Walking Tour - official site at Tree National Park* Keys Ranch: Where Time Stood Still - National Park Service historic lesson article* Desert USA article about Keys Desert Queen Ranch
20270643
Worthy_S._Streator
military_data5   Dr. Worthy Stevens Streator (October 16, 1816 &ndash; March 6, 1902) was an American physician, railroad developer, industrialist and entrepreneur after whom the city of Illinois is named.  He was instrumental in the creation of the and Great Western Railway in Ohio, was president of the and Ohio Railroad (B&O) and financed the first large-scale coal mine operation in Northern Illinois in 1866. He served as an Ohio State Senator in 1869, and was the first mayor of Cleveland, Ohio(.  He was an influential in the development of many civic institutions in his home city of Ohio.  He co-founded the Christian Standard magazine, he was an original endower of Case Institute of Technology and was a principal in the creation of the James A. Garfield Monument; the first true mausoleum created in the United States in honor of President A. Garfield.  He was a pallbearer at President Garfields funeral in 1881.BackgroundBorn in Hamilton, Madison County, New York on October 16, 1816,() Streators lineage traces back to the 15th century in Kent, England.() His great-grandfather, Dr. John Streator served in the Revolutionary War as a private in the County, Massachusetts Militia.()() At age eighteen he entered medical school and upon graduation moved to Ohio in 1838. In 1839 he married Sarah Wakeley Sterling, of Lyman, New York. They had five children; Helen Gertrude (born May 20, 1842), Sterling Rush (born December 31, 1845), Henry Doolittle (born August 26, 1851), Edward H. (born August 20, 1855) and Harold Arthur (born August 5, 1861).() By 1850, Streator moved to Ohio and retired from medicine.()RailroadsOnce in Cleveland and removed from the practice of medicine, Streator embarked on his second career in developing railroads. With his partner, Henry Doolittle, their firm built the Greenville and Medina Railroad.  In 1853 they contracted for the construction of the  Atlantic and Great Western Railroad in Ohio. Work continued on this and other ancillary lines of the railroad until completion in 1861, when he sold his unfinished contracts upon the death of Doolittle.(In 1862 he began plans for the Oil Creek Railroad, which would bring newly discovered oil from the Oil Creek fields in western Pennsylvania to the town of Pennsylvania. This highly coveted railroad was a great financial success for Dr. Streator. The publics interest in the oil fields was so great that crowds gathered to view the oil being loaded onto the railcars.( By 1866, Streator sold his interest in the Oil Creek line to the York Central Railroad.  He then began construction of a new line from Corry to New York Centrals and Erie Railroad line in New York.(Vermilion Coal CompanyUpon completion of the Corry to Brocton railroad line, Streator suspended his involvement in rails and began a third career developing coal mines on the Vermilion River in North-Central Illinois. While it is unclear as to whether Streator or his cousin, Col. Ralph Plumb learned first of the vast, untapped coal fields on the banks of the Vermilion River, Streator gathered other investors and formed the Vermilion Coal Company in 1866 with Streator as its President and Plumb as the Business Manager. Plumb and Streator invited Streators friend, then Ohio Congressman, A. Garfield to sign on as an investor. In return, Garfield was expected to work with C. Schenck, then the president of the American Central railroad, in getting the railroad to bend their lines to the coal mine in the area known as Hardscrabble in County, Illinois.  Eventually the plan did not work. The Vermilion Company then made arrangements with the Fox River line for their needed rail service.() The company purchased  of land and dispatched Col. Plumb to begin work. Plumb surveyed  the area for the incoming Fox River Line, platted the land for the new town and commenced to build a total of eight mine shafts.()Plumb needed laborers for his mines, but the Vermilion Coal Company was unable to afford European employment agents. Instead, it alerted steamship offices of the new job opportunities and convinced local railroads to carry notices of Vermilion Coals promise. Scottish, English, Welsh, German and Irish immigrants came to the area first, followed later by scores of mostly Slovaks. Czechs, Austrians and Hungarians came in lesser numbers.()The coal operation was an immediate success due to the increasing appetite for coal in the United States. In 1870, the Dwight Division of the and Alton Railroad was commenced.  The Chicago, Pekin and Southwestern rail line came next and was followed by the Chicago and Paducah railroad. This increase in rail construction gave the region unparalleled advantages in shipping. By 1877, the Vermilion Coal Company employed 1,2000 miners.Streator, IllinoisImage:Streator IL Downtown1.jpg|thumb|right|Illinois.Image:Streator IL Streator Public Library1.jpg|thumb|right|The Streator Public Library, a Carnegie library listed on the Register of Historic Places.In 1868 the newly developed town that was created in conjunction with the mines was incorporated as Illinois, named in honor of Dr. Streator. Colonel Ralph Plumb served as the new citys first mayor. Worthy Streator, himself, never visited the city named for him.()The success of the local mining operations and the introduction of the new glass making industry allowed for improvements in the living conditions and personal wealth of its miners and laborers.In his 1877 History of LaSalle County, author H.F. Kett states: Perhaps no city...in Illinois, outside of  the great city of Chicago, presents an instance of such rapid and substantial growth as the city of Streator. From a single small grocery house... the locality has grown to be a city of 6,000 prosperous and intelligent people. Churches, school-houses, large, substantial business houses and handsome residences, with elegant grounds and surroundings, now beautify the waste of ten years ago, while the hum of machinery and thronged streets are unmistakable evidences of business importance and prosperity.(Streator continued to flourish for much of the 20th century. Ultimately the demand for coal was replaced with the new demand for oil.  Many of the mines closed in the 1920s, with the last of the mines finally shutting down in 1958.() Since then, growth has stagnated, but Streator remains a viable manufacturing town with a glass bottle and a heavy equipment industry in addition to retail and agriculture.Political lifeWith the success of the Vermilion Coal Company in Streator, Illinois, Dr. Streator turned his attention back to his home in Cleveland and specifically toward politics.  In 1869 he was elected to the State Senate representing Cuyahoga Countys 20th senate district. In 1872 he left the senate after one term and was named by then Ohio Governor (and later U.S. President) B. Hayes as trustee of the Ohio Agricultural College.  He served as a presidential elector for the Ohio 20th district in 1874 and voted for Hayes.  In 1879, Hayes appointed Streator as Collector of Internal Revenue for the Northern District of Ohio.  He was re-appointed by Presidents Garfield and A. Arthur.()Cleveland civic lifeMansion.jpg|thumb|right|Worthy Streators mansion was located on Millionaires Row.Throughout his life Dr. Streator maintained close ties with the civic and business leaders in Cleveland and Ohio.  He was involved with his church, the Disciples Church. He was a long-time resident of a grand mansion on  on Millionaires Row along Euclid Avenue in Cleveland.  His neighbors included the first American billionaire, D. Rockefeller.(In 1865, Dr. Streator along with A. Garfield and J.P. Robison organized the Christian Standard publishing company.  Its periodical, Christian Standard became one of the leading independent religious magazines in the church.() In 1887, Streator was instrumental in founding the Disciples Union of Cleveland.(After the death of Dr. Streators friend, Leonard Case in 1880, Streator along with other Cleveland leaders enacted Cases plan to create a first-class research institute in Cleveland.  The initial endowment by the group, led by the estate of Leonard Case created what was later to become the Western Reserve University.(By 1886, Dr. Streator returned to business, when he partnered with William Halsey Doan in creating the firm of W.H. Doan & Company.  They began selling crude oil on commission, shipping it from the oil fields of northwestern Pennsylvania to Cleveland.(James A. GarfieldDr. Streator had a long association with President A. Garfield.  Streator offered Garfield a partnership in the Vermilion Coal Company in 1866.  Garfield partnered with Streator in creating the Christian Standard publishing company.  Garfield appointed Streator to political positions.Garfield represented Ohio in the U.S. House of Representatives from 1863 until his election as President in 1881.  Garfield was in office for only four months, when he was shot and fatally wounded on July 2, 1881.  Garfield died from complications of his wounds on September 19, 1881. The funeral held on September 26, 1881 was a majestic, solemn affair.  An estimated one hundred thousand visitors came to Cleveland for the service and two-hundred and fifty thousand people lined the streets to view the five-mile procession which concluded at Clevelands View Cemetery.  Dr. Worthy Streator was one of twelve friends and colleagues who took their place alongside Garfields funeral car to serve as pall-bearers.(A year after Garfields death, Dr. Streator became a principal member of an association created to build the Garfield Monument, in honor of their friend. Construction of the  graystone mausoleum began in 1885. It contained a chapel in its center which hold the crypt of President Garfield and his wife, Lucretia.  The monument was dedicated by Presidents B. Hayes and Harrison on May 29, 1890.Death and legacyDr. Streator died at age 85 on March 3, 1902 in Cleveland, Ohio. He was buried at View Cemetery.()Dr. Streator is known primarily for the city of Streator, Illinois.  In Cleveland, there was a street named Streator Avenue for many years, and currently there is a Streator Court.  Streator Park, in Ohio houses the headquarters of the citys Parks and Recreation Department on land donated by Dr. Streators estate. It is located at the corner of Long & Streator Streets.()The Parks Department building was, until 1957, the Lorain Public Library.ReferencesFurther reading* * * * * * 
20285842
Mountain_Top_Removal_(film)
Mountain Top Removal is a 2007 film directed by Michael OConnell.  The film explores how removal mining in Virginia has affected local communities. Filmed over a two-year period, Mountain Top Removal features community advocates, such as Ed Wiley, Larry Gibson, Bonds, Gunnoe, and Mountain Justice Summer volunteers, in their efforts to oppose the destruction of Southern Appalachias natural landscape. The film includes commentary from Goodell, author of Coal: The Dirty Secret Behind Americas Energy Future, geologists Dr. William Schlesinger and Dr. Peter Taft, and also Bill Raney, President of the Virginia Coal Association.( Mountain Top Removal)(Michael OConnells Mountain Top Removal raised awareness of coal mining practices) The film won the Reel Current Award  (presented by Gore) at the 2008 Film Festival.(2008 Nashville Film Festival Award Winners)(Mountaintop Removal) Mountain Top Removal also received a Jury award at the 2008 Wild and Scenic Film Festival, Audience award at the 2008 Hole Film Festival and was screened at The Lincoln Center on Earth Day April 22 2008. The film is currently being distributed nationwide on PBS through NETA. The films soundtrack includes music by Jim Lauderdale, Donna the Buffalo,John Specker and Sarah Hawker.See also*the Future: Coal in AmericaReferences(External links*Books, Articles, Movies, and Websites about Mountaintop Removal Coal Mining* Pennies of Promise
20306321
Yukon_School_of_Visual_Arts
The Yukon School of Visual Arts (commonly referred to by its acronym, YSOVA) is Canadas most northern accredited art school.  It is located in City, Yukon, Canada at the fork of the Yukon and Klondike Rivers.  SOVA offers the foundational year for a of Fine Arts (BFA) and a of Design (BDes). The school combines an experiential, integrated curriculum that is studio-based  with liberal studies courses.  Successful students continue their degrees at their choice of four partnering art schools across Canada, including the College of Art and Design in Toronto, the Carr Institute of Art and Design in Vancouver, the College of Art and Design in Calgary and the Scotia College of Art and Design University in Halifax.YSOVA is a partnership between the Dawson City Arts Society, College and Trondek Hwechin. Each founding organisation has equal representation on the governing council. Yukon School of Visual Arts changed its name from KIAC School of Visual Arts in the Fall of 2010 to avoid confusion between the school and the community arts organisation KIAC. Locationthumb|Tombstone Mountains in MarchYSOVA is located in Dawson City, an extremely remote location with a rich history.  Home to the Han people for millennia, at the turn of the 20th Century Dawson City became the centre of the Klondike Goldrush and was suddenly the largest city north of San Francisco and west of Winnipeg at the time.  Today, the town is home to many national historic sites, a self-governing First Nation, an active mining industry, and a diverse international community.  During the summer months, tourism reaches a peak of 60,000 annual visitors, providing a major source of revenue for the town.   The border of Alaska is only a few kilometres away to the west, and the Tombstone Mountains are only 45 minutes north along the Dempster Highway enroute to the Beaufort Sea.Curriculumthumb|Video conferencing with TorontoThe curriculum includes studio classes in 2D, 3D, and 4D (new media), as well as liberal arts classes in English and Visual Culture Studies.  The design of the curriculum and the intimacy of the school creates an integrated curriculum with themes and issues crossing over from course to course.FacilitiesThe school is located in a  historic building in downtown Dawson City. This two-story structure was custom designed specifically for the needs of the foundation year program with studio facilities, a lecture room, a media lab, indoor/outdoor common areas, woodshop, a library and digital resource centre, a student gallery and an art supplies store.  Laptop computers and a digital still camera are assigned to each student for use in both their academic and studio coursework, and wireless internet is available throughout the facility.KIAC & YSOVAThe Klondike Institute for Arts and Culture (KIAC) is a community-based arts centre offering a rotating schedule of workshops, screenings, festivals, exhibitions, and non-accredited courses.  YSOVA is a post-secondary institution offering accredited courses and articulation agreements with colleges and universities across Canada.Closely associated, but different organisations, YSOVA and KIAC mutually support resident artists, special events, and facilities.KIAC is located on 2nd and Princess in the ODD Fellows Hall. YSOVA is located on 3rd and Queen.Over The WireOver the Wire is a project series that creates an exchange between an established artist and the Yukon School of Visual Arts.  Celebrating the extreme remoteness of the school, the project mediates the geographical distance by fostering a correspondenceboth literally and aestheticallybetween the artist and the students.  Each semester, a set of instructions created by a distant Artist is delivered to the students in order to produce a new work.  The students in turn interpret the instructions and create the work locally for exhibition.  In addition to the exhibition of the work, each project is archived by a publication or multiple that is distributed in return across the country.Over the Wire artists:* Hecker: Sonic Palimpsests.  (multiple: Audio CD).* Boyle: Anthropomorphic Mother.  (multiple: Book).* Hill: The Highcoo of Synaesthesia.  (multiple: DVD).* Baxter&: Sense of Place Guide.* Weiner: A Translation from One Language to Another.* Simparch + Deborah Stratman: Habitual Suspects.* Center for Land Use Interpretation: Dawson City: Mining the Intepretive Realm of the Klondike.Over the Wire is a pedagogical art project created by SOVA faculty member Stankievech.Art in Dawson Citythumb|right|Kippenberger at the Dawson City METRO_Net Subway StationDawson City--for its extreme geographical location--has a vibrant and international art scene.Art and artistsThe German artist Kippenberger constructed the second METRO-Net subway entrance in Dawson City in 1995, connecting an island in Greece, Documenta in Kassel, Germany, and the German Pavilon in Venice, Italy. The Dawson station was dismantled and sold to an American institution  in the fall of 2008.  A Wake for the death of the artwork which included the Mayor beatifying Martin Kippenberger as the Patron Saint of the Arts for Dawson City was held in January 2009 ( A Wake for St. Kippenbergers Metro-Net)The KIAC Artist in Residence program hosts two artists in the historic Macaulay house year-round with a constantly changing roster from around the world.The ODD Gallery is a not-for-profit gallery exhibiting Canadian and international artists, including the long running series The Natural and the Manufactured.See also*education in YukonNotesExternal links* Festivals*Dawson City Riverside Arts Festival*Dawson City International Short Film Festival* Dawson City Music Festival
20333892
Hailstone,_Utah
Hailstone, Utah was a town in Wasatch County. It was submerged in 1995 by the waters of Reservoir along with Utah.Hailstone was located at the junction of US-40 and US-189, seven miles north of Heber.Originally known as Elkhorn, Hailstone was homesteaded in 1864 by William Paret Hailstone, Ann Davis Hailstone, and others. The town was a base for mining, ranching, and logging.()References* 
20354320
Independent_Socialist_Workers_Party
The Independent Socialist Party () was a party in Czechoslovakia. The party was founded in March 1923.(Collegium Carolinum (Munich, Germany), and Karl Bosl. Die erste Tschechoslowakische Republik als multinationaler Parteienstaat: Vortrge d. Tagungen d. Collegium Carolinum in Bad Wiessee vom 24.-27. November 1977 u. vom 20.-23. April 1978. Mnchen: Oldenbourg, 1979. p. 131) The party included a number of former anarchists, who had joined the Socialist Party in 1918. They had however been expelled from the Czechoslovak Socialist Party in 1923, as they opposed the Defense of the Republic Act.(Institute of Marxism-Leninism of the CPCz CC, Institute of Marxism-Leninism of the CPS CC. An Outline of the History of the CPCz. Prague: Orbis Press Agency, 1980. p. 123) In the Czechoslovak National Assembly, the Independent Socialists formed a joint parliamentary group (Association) together with the Radical Social Democratic Party of V. Brodeck. The two groups were set to merge, but Brodecks group decided to merge with the Czechoslovak Social Democratic Workers Party. The Independent Socialist Party took the name Independent Socialist Workers Party () at a congress in June 1924.(Kowalski, Werner. Geschichte der sozialistischen arbeiter-internationale: 1923 - 19. Berlin: Dt. Verl. d. Wissenschaften, 1985. p. 331)Leading figures of the Independent Socialist Workers Party included Bohuslav Vrbensk, Theodor Bartoek and Luisa Landov-tychov.(The third congress of the Party of Czechoslovakia, held in September 1925, approved the merger of the Independent Socialist Workers Party into the CPCz. Through the merger between the two parties, a large number of mining workers from Most district joined the CPCz.(The party was a member of the and Socialist International between 1923 and 1933.(Kowalski, Werner. Geschichte der sozialistischen arbeiter-internationale: 1923 - 19. Berlin: Dt. Verl. d. Wissenschaften, 1985.)Referencessocialistick strana dlnick
20381740
Bremner_Historic_Mining_District
 refnum00000659The Bremner Historic Mining District is a mining camp in Elias National Park and Preserve in Alaska. It is named after Bremner, who in 1884-1885 was the first non-native person to live in the area and who prospected for gold along the River. Located just to the north of the River, it was the scene of an important placer gold discovery in 1902, and played a key role in the history of the River Basin. Only a few miners struck it rich, but the resulting demand for materials and supplies helped establish regional transportation networks, encouraged supporting industries, and hastened the exploration and settlement of the entire region. While small-scale placer mining continued for over forty years, lode development was largely confined to the period between 1934 and 1941, the districts most significant era.()The Bremner Historic Mining District embodies its period of twentieth-century mining, illustrating both its mining process and its evolutionary sequence. Unusually complete, it retains virtually all of its historic components, including an important placer site, a camp, four discrete lode mines, a mill, and an associated transportation network.(The Golconda Mining Company site, which contains a campsite, an elaborate ditch, and extensive piles of hand-stacked cobble, provides an example of an early placer mining system. The Goldconda complex includes two airstrips dating to the 1930s.(publisherNational Park Service)The Yellow Band mining camp is one of the regions most complete, not only containing the typical housing and office facilities, but a sophisticated hydroelectric system. This camp is also significant for its association with C. Baldwin, a distinguished regional explorer, surveyor, and mining engineer.(Ghost Towns and Mines, accessed June 24, 1011.) While working for the U.S. Geodetic Survey, Baldwin completed the first American marine survey of Kodiak and the Islands in 1909. From 1910-13, he served as a field officer with the U.S.-Canadian International Boundary Survey. Over the years, Baldwin worked locally as a consulting engineer, where, among other activities, he advised the Copper Company and the River and Northwestern Railway. Baldwin began prospecting in the Bremner District in the early 1930s, and from 1936 to 1940, was president of the Yellow Band Mining Company. He acquired the Bremner Gold Mining Company holdings in 1939.(Lucky Girl, Grand Prize, Sheriff, and Yellow Band Mines are examples of remote underground mining operations. With each containing a variety of buildings and structures. While Lucky Girl mill is now ruinous due to repeated avalanche strikes, its operating machinery remains intact and in most cases in situ.(In addition to Baldwin, the Bremner district is associated with aviator Merle Mudhole Smith, who started flying supplies for the Cordova Air Service in the 1930s, and who became stuck on the upper Golconda strip .  Smith operated Cordova Air Service until 1968, when it merged with Airlines.(See also*Alaska, a Historic Landmark mining townReferences
20381757
Battle_of_Philippeville
The Battle of Philippeville was part of the War between France and Algerian rebels, primarily the National Liberation Front (FLN) The battle took place on August 20, 1955 and centered on the Algerian town of Philippeville, though the FLN also made attacks on surrounding areas.PreludeThe Algerian War had begun on November 1, 1954 when the first major attack of the FLN was launched, consisting of scores of scores of spectacular attacks.(Aussaresses, Paul Gen.. The Battle of the Casbah. Enigma Books, 2006, p.1. ISBN 1929631308) The conflict began to escalate, as evidenced by the remarks of then-Minister of the Interior, Mitterrand: I will not agree to negotiate with the enemies of the homeland. The only negotiation is war!(Aussaresses, p. 2) The French adopted an increasingly aggressive policy in Algeria, and in early March 1955, the French government of Prime Minister Pierre Mendes-France was replaced by that of Faure.To help combat the insurgency, Aussaresses was dispatched to restart the intelligence unit from scratch, which had been disbanded during peacetime.(Aussaresses, p. 11) Aussaresses set up the unit and started to collect intelligence and establish a network of informants and field agents.The battleAussaresses was surprised by a set of attacks the FLN launched on June 18, 1955, which his intelligence unit had not heard anything about beforehand. After this, a more proactive policy was adopted, which resulted in the discovery of the FLNs plan to launch a massive frontal assault on August 20 at noon, with the primary objective of taking Philippeville. The FLN was not powerful enough to capture a large city, such as the capital at Algiers, but Philippeville was a mid-sized town and an important port city.In the days before the attack, FLN commandos took up positions in cellars within the town, while several thousand more fellagha prepared to attack the French forces in Philippeville , which numbered about 400.(Aussaresses, p. 35) The French quietly prepared for the anticipated attack, not even acting against the commandos who they knew were there, for fear that the FLN would realize the French had discovered their plan.Action first broke out during the hour before attack, when the deputy police commissioner in charge of public safety, Superintendent Filiberti, took four men outside of town to make an unrelated arrest. The four men were pinned down by about 500 fellagha, but eventually able to fall back around a half hour before the attack began. The main attack began around noon, and the fellagha, under the influence of narcotics,(Aussaresses, p. 44) attacked without any regard to their safety. They did not expect the French to see the attack coming, and were surprised when the French had set up positions to defend the city, as well as defend against the commandos which emerged from the cellars. There were 134 fellagha killed in the streets of Philippeville, and several hundred more wounded; the French citizens killed were 71 and the FLN also killed 52 Muslims, many of whom were prominent politicians. (Adam Shatz, The Torture of Algiers, NY Review of Books, volume 49, number 18, 21 November 2002.)While the main assault was going on, there were also side actions in the countryside around Constantine. One was an attack on El-Halia, a sulphur-mining community where 130 Europeans had lived with about 2,000 Algerian Muslims in peace. The Muslims were encouraged to rise up against the Europeans after the FLN told them there would be no risk, because Egyptian and American troops were landing that day to expel the French from Algeria..(Aussaresses, p. 49) Led by the FLN, babies were chopped into pieces and smashed against walls, while women were raped, disemboweled and decapitated.(Aussaresses, pp. 47-48) The men were off working in the mines when the fellagha attacked. Their weapons were locked up because the person in charge of the key had gone to the beach, but were later relieved by 200 fresh recruits, supported by two T-6 trainer aircraft.Three hours later, French troops arrived, flying military planes overhead and raining bullets onto the town of El Halia indiscriminately. (Gisle Halimi, Milk for the Orange Tree, page 114.)References(
20410615
Wyoming_Highway_256
next_route258Wyoming Highway 256 is a road in Wyoming, just east of Casper known as Cole Creek Road. Route descriptionWyoming Highway 256 begins its south end at an intersection with US 20/US 26/US 87 (Glenrock Highway) and the northern terminus of WY 253 in Evansville.( The roadway that continues south of US 20/US 26/US 87 is Highway 253 (Hat Six Road).() Highway 256 travels north for  northeast towards the mining areas north of the Ednass Kimball Wilkins State Park which is located on US 20/US 26/US 87.(aaroads.com - Wyoming Routes 200-299) The designation of WYO 256 ends and the roadway continues as Natrona CR 701 (Cole Creek Road).((WYO 256/CR 701) Major intersections notesSouthern Terminus of WYO 255notesNorthern Terminus of WYO 256References*Official 2003 State Highway Map of Wyoming External links *Wyoming State Routes 200-299*WYO 256 - US 20/US 26/US 87/WYO 253 to Natrona CR 701
20439887
Alister_Murdoch
laterworkAir Marshal Sir Alister Murray Murdoch KBE, CB (9 December 1912 &ndash; 29 November 1984) was a senior commander in the Australian Air Force (RAAF). He served as Chief of the Air Staff (CAS) from 1965 to 1969. Joining the Air Force in 1930, Murdoch trained as a seaplane pilot, and participated in an Antarctic rescue mission for lost explorers in 1935. During World War II, he commanded 221 Squadron RAF in Europe and the Middle East, and later occupied senior positions on the staff of RAAF formations in the South West Pacific. His post-war appointments included Commandant of RAAF College from 1952 to 1953, Officer Commanding (AOC) Training Command from 1953 to 1955, Deputy Chief of the Air Staff from 1958 to 1959, and AOC Operational Command from 1962 to 1965.As AOC Training Command in 1954, Murdoch headed a programme to determine aircraft purchases for the RAAF; his recommendations included the C-130 Hercules transport, considered one of the most important acquisitions in the Air Forces history. His term as CAS coincided with increased commitment to the War, and he came into conflict with Army commanders over the employment of helicopters in battle. He was also involved in assessing the readiness of the Dynamics F-111C for RAAF service. Appointed a of the Order of the Bath in 1960, and Knighted in 1966, Murdoch was the fourth in a series of CASs who had been cadets at the Military College, Duntroon. He retired from the Air Force in December 1969, and died in 1984.Early careerAlister Murdoch was born on 9 December 1912 in Elsternwick, Victoria, the son of engineer Thomas Murdoch and his wife Kathleen. A lieutenant in the Commonwealth Military Forces at the time of Alisters birth, the elder Murdoch later served in both World Wars and rose to the rank of brigadier.(Herington, Air War Against Germany and Italy, p. 152)() Educated at Grammar School, Alister entered the Military College, Duntroon, in 1929, following his elder brother Ian (later a major general).(Dennis et al., The Oxford Companion to Australian Military History, p. 412)(Stephens; Isaacs, High Fliers, pp. 143&ndash;146) Alister was one of four cadets sponsored that year by the Australian Air Force (RAAF), which did not at that stage have its own officer training college. Budgetary constraints imposed during the Depression necessitated the transfer of these cadets out of Duntroon midway through their four-year course.(Coulthard-Clark, The Third Brother, pp. 196197)(Moore, Duntroon, pp. 6465) Although offered positions in the Public Service or nominations for short-term commissions with the Air Force, all were determined to serve with the RAAF and were more than pleased with the prospect of entering their chosen service early.(Enlisting in the Air Force on 10 December 1930, Murdoch completed his pilot training the following year.((Murdoch, Alister Murray at World War 2 Nominal Roll. Retrieved on 22 April 2011.) He was commissioned in 1932 and later qualified as a flying instructor and seaplane pilot, undertaking navy cooperation and patrol operations.(( In December 1935, Officer Murdoch was selected to join an RAAF rescue mission for explorer Ellsworth and his pilot, Hollick-Kenyon, who were presumed lost while journeying across the Antarctic. Flying a de Havilland Gipsy Moth, Murdoch located Hollick-Kenyon near the of Whales.(Wilson, The Brotherhood of Airmen, p. 44) Hollick-Kenyon led the search party to Ellsworth, who protested that he was not lost and did not need rescuing.(Air Power Development Centre, The RAAF in Antartica) Murdoch was posted to England in 1936&ndash;37 to undertake a course in long navigation at Manston and serve on attachment with No. 114 Squadron.((Coulthard-Clark, Air Marshals of the RAAF, p. 7)  Returning to Australia, he married Florence Miller on 27 December 1937; the couple had a daughter.((Draper, Whos Who in Australia 1983, p. 631)  Murdoch spent the next two years on the staff of the Directorate of Operations and Intelligence at Air Force Headquarters, Melbourne.(( In June 1938, he helped inaugurate RAAF instruction in long navigation, with a nine-month course in the discipline.(Coulthard-Clark, The Third Brother, p. 207)World War IIthumb|left|upright|Murdoch preparing to embark overseas, June 1941|altInformal half portrait of man in dark military uniform with forage capRanked leader at the outbreak of World War II, Murdoch took charge of No. 1 Air Observer School at Cootamundra, New South Wales, from April 1940 until mid-1941.((  Following this posting he was promoted to wing commander and sent to the European Theatre. In August 1941, he became Officer of 221 Squadron RAF,(( a Coastal Command unit flying Wellingtons on reconnaissance and anti-submarine patrols out of Iceland during the Battle of the Atlantic. The next year, Murdoch accompanied the squadron to the Middle East, where it carried out anti-submarine and maritime strike operations.((221 Squadron at Royal Air Force. Retrieved on 8 November 2008.) He also served as Staff Officer Operations with No. 235 Wing RAF. Back in London in July 1942, Murdoch was assigned to Operations Headquarters, where he assisted in planning the Raid before returning to Australia in 1943.(Promoted to captain, Murdoch was appointed Senior Air Staff Officer (SASO) at Eastern Area Command, Sydney, in July 1943.( In January 1944, he became SASO at North Western Area Command, which controlled thirteen Australian, British, Dutch, and American squadrons from its headquarters in Darwin, Northern Territory.((Odgers, Air War Against Japan, pp. 215&ndash;216) Murdoch planned many of the commands bombing and mining operations in the South West Pacific Theatre,( and was in despatches for his distinguished service in the role.(Recommendation: Mention in Dispatches at War Memorial. Retrieved on 22 April 2011.)() He was posted as SASO to the First Tactical Air Force (No. 1 TAF) in April 1945, replacing Group Captain William Gibson after the latters dismissal in the wake of the Mutiny, when the threatened resignations of eight of the RAAFs leading fighter aces caused a crisis in the formations leadership.(Odgers, Air War Against Japan, pp. 444&ndash;450)(Odgers, Air War Against Japan, p. 459) Delegated responsibility for operational aspects by No. 1 TAFs new Officer Commanding, Air Commodore Scherger, Murdoch received much of the credit for the excellent planning of the RAAFs role in Operation Oboe Six, the invasion of Labuan.((Waters, Oboe, p. 199) He accompanied Scherger ashore on the afternoon of the landings on 10 June 1945.(Odgers, Air War Against Japan, pp. 470&ndash;471) Murdoch also earned praise for his staff work during Operation Oboe Two, the Battle of Balikpapan, in July.((Post-war careerRise to Chief of the Air StaffMurdoch was appointed a of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) on 25 June 1946 for conspicuous service in operations against the Japanese during World War II.() One of a small coterie of officers earmarked for top positions in the post-war Air Force, he was Director of Personnel Services during 1946&ndash;47 before attending the Imperial Defence College, London, in 1948. Returning to Australia, he served as Director of Air Staff Policy and Plans at Air Force Headquarters between 1949 and 1952.(( In February 1951, he led a team to the Middle East, where the possibility of Australia contributing a garrison force to the region was first raised. Two years later, No. 78 Wing was deployed to Malta to fulfil this role, operating leased RAF Havilland Vampire jet fighters.(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 202&ndash;203) Murdoch became Commandant of RAAF College in June 1952, gaining promotion to commodore. In December 1953, he was raised to acting vice marshal and appointed Officer Commanding (AOC) Southern Area, shortly to be re-formed as Training Command.((thumb|left|260px|Australian-built Vampire T35; sixty-nine were delivered to the RAAF following Murdochs recommendation for a jet trainer in 1954|altSingle-engined, twin-tailboom military jet in flightIn 1954, Murdoch led a mission to examine potential new fighter, bomber, transport and training aircraft for the RAAF, following a shift in defence funding towards the Air Force.(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 38&ndash;39) He advocated the F-104 Starfighter as a replacement for the Sabre, two years before the Sabre entered squadron service with the RAAF,(Stephens, Going Solo, p. 354) as well as nuclear-capable British bomber strike aircraft to augment Australias Canberra jet bombers, and C-130 Hercules transports to replace the C-47 Dakota. While his proposals for V bombers and the F-104 were not taken up, the Australian government acquired the C-130 in 1958. Described as second only to the Dynamics F-111 as the most significant purchase by the RAAF, the Hercules gave the Air Force its first strategic airlift capability, which in years to come would provide a lifeline for Australian forces deployed to Malaya, Vietnam, and other parts of the South East Asia.(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 416&ndash;18) Murdoch also recommended the locally built Vampire as a jet trainer for No. 1 Applied Flying Training School; sixty-nine were later delivered as T35s by the Havilland factory in Bankstown, New South Wales.(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 160&ndash;161)Murdoch was seconded to the Department of Defence in January 1956 as Deputy Secretary (Military). By February 1958, he had been made a substantive air vice marshal and was appointed Deputy Chief of the Air Staff. In October 1959, Murdoch was posted to London as Head of the Australian Joint Services Staff,( and appointed a of the Order of the Bath (CB) in the 1960 Year Honours.() He returned to Australia in June 1962, when he became AOC Operational Command.( His tenure in the position coincided with the deployment of the first RAAF aircraft to Vietnam, seven DHC-4 Caribous, commencing in August 1964.(Stephens, The Royal Australian Air Force, pp. 259&ndash;260) Murdoch was promoted marshal and appointed Chief of the Air Staff (CAS) on 1 June 1965, succeeding Air Marshal Sir Valston Hancock.(Stephens, Going Solo, p. 278) He was the last of a quartet of army-trained CASs; from 1954 to 1969 inclusive, every RAAF chiefJohn McCauley, Scherger, Hancock, and Murdochhad been a cadet at the Royal Military College, Duntroon, prior to serving with the Air Force.(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 320&ndash;321) With this pedigree, Murdoch was described by Air Chief Marshal Scherger as the last of the professionals.( The new CAS was raised to Commander of the Order of the British Empire (KBE) in the 1966 Birthday Honours.()Chief of the Air Staff and VietnamAir Marshal Murdoch led the RAAF through the build-up of Australias commitment to the Vietnam War beginning in the mid-1960s. He clashed with the Chief of the General Staff (CGS), Lieutenant General Sir John Wilton, over the latters recommendation in mid-1965 to deploy two UH-1 Iroquois helicopters to Vietnam. Wilton believed that both services would benefit from gaining familiarisation with air/ground operations in the region before large-scale commitment of Australian forces. Murdoch dismissed the idea on resourcing grounds, despite the fact that two-thirds of the RAAFs UH-1 complement had been purchased for the express purpose of army cooperation.(Stephens, The Royal Australian Air Force, pp. 264&ndash;268) He further contended that helicopter operations in Malaysia had afforded the RAAF sufficient experience in the type of conditions they might face in Vietnam, though Australias senior UH-1 pilot at the time considered that the former theatre offered little if any hostile opposition, and there was none of the insertion and extraction of SAS patrols which was to become such an important part of the RAAFs Vietnam operations.(Stephens, Power Plus Attitude, p. 131) Air Commodore Eaton, as Director-General of Operational Requirements, advised Murdoch that if the Air Force did not more fully satisfy the ground support requirements of the Army, then the Army itself would seek to take control of this sphere of operations, undermining the RAAFs position as the main provider of Australias air power.(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 317&ndash;318) Murdochs reluctance to deploy the helicopters was eventually overridden by the Australian government, and No. 9 Squadrons UH-1s were in action in Vietnam less than a year later. When Murdoch visited the combat zone himself in August 1966, he was informed by Brigadier O.D. Jackson that the squadron was not performing the role the Army expected of it.(Wiltons successor as CGS, Lieutenant General Sir Thomas Daly, urged Murdoch to procure specialised helicopter gunships such as the AH-1 HueyCobra for Vietnam, to support the more vulnerable troop-carrying slicks. Murdoch largely ignored the suggestion, telling his staff to treat the Armys recommendation with a lesser priority than anything we now have on our shopping list. His preference was for V/STOL fixed-wing aircraft like the Jump Jet, which he thought would open a new era in close support aircraft.(Stephens, Going Solo, p. 299) In the event, the Federal government earmarked eleven AH-1G HueyCobras for purchase in 1971, though the deal never went ahead due to Australias withdrawal from South East Asia.(Coulthard-Clark, The RAAF in Vietnam, pp. 182&ndash;183)(Parnell; Lynch, Australia Air Force Since 1911, p. 176) Murdochs failure to appreciate the need for cooperation with land forces has been blamed for fostering long-running enmity between the services, which twenty years later would contribute to the governments decision to transfer the RAAFs battlefield helicopters to the Army.(( Air Force historian Alan Stephens contended that despite Murdochs competence and good mind, his comprehension of air power in its fullest sense and handling of inter-service politics were respectively inadequate and disastrous ... A generation of lieutenant-colonels and majors had come to believe that the RAAF did not care about army support, and they were to carry that belief into the 1970s and beyond.(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 321&ndash;322) Murdoch also opposed sending Canberra jet bombers to Vietnam on what were later described in the official post-war history of the RAAF as misleading grounds that the type was unsuitable for low-level strike and close support; however their deployment went ahead in April 1967.(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 300&ndash;301)In 1963, Australia had selected the F-111 swing-wing bomber as a replacement for the Canberra.(Stephens, The Royal Australian Air Force, pp. 285&ndash;288) Murdoch attended the much-anticipated official hand-over ceremony for the aircraft on 4 September 1968 at Fort Worth, Texas, with Defence Minister Sir Allen Fairhall, various US dignitaries, and RAAF F-111 crews. Within eight days a US Navy F-111B crashed, followed by a USAF F-111A twelve days later, creating a public relations disaster,(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 380&ndash;381) and contributing to the types entry into RAAF service being delayed until 1973. In late 1969, Murdoch accompanied Secretary of Defence Sir Henry Bland to the United States to gain assurance of an adequate safe life for the F-111s swing-wing mechanism, amid the Australian government giving serious consideration to abandoning the programme.(Stephens, Going Solo, pp. 381&ndash;389)Later lifeMurdoch retired from the military on 31 December 1969 after completing his term as CAS, which the government had extended for an additional twelve months beyond its original three years.(() He was succeeded by Air Marshal Hannah, whom Murdoch had earlier recommended for the position of Commander Australian Forces Vietnam (the role went to an Army officer, as had been previous practice).(Coulthard-Clark, The RAAF in Vietnam, pp. 79&ndash;80) In 1971, Murdoch joined the board of directors of Meggitt Limited, an oilseed-crushing firm that was chaired by World War II fighter ace Barr.((Dornan, Nicky Barr, pp. 273&ndash;274) Murdoch continued to exercise his interest in Australias defence after he left the Air Force, joining in 1975 a group of pundits, including retired Air Vice Marshal Ian McLachlan, who promoted the addition of weaponry to the countrys arsenal. He followed a number of sports, including horse racing.( A resident of Church Point, New South Wales, Sir Alister Murdoch died on 29 November 1984.(( Notes  References * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * 
20465786
Czechoslovak_Trade_Union_Association
Czechoslovak Trade Union Association (), abbreviated to OS, was a trade union center, founded in 1897 in what was then the Empire. With the break-up of the empire, the OS emerged as the major trade union force in Czechoslovakia up to the World War.Organizational historyFoundationOdborov sdruen eskoslovansk (Czechoslav Trade Union Association) was founded in Prague on January 31, 1897. The OS represented a desire on the part of Czech trade unionists to build a Czech trade union movement separate from the Imperial Trade Union Commission (the Vienna Commission), the culmination of two years of complaints by Czech trade unionists that the Vienna Commission was neglecting the Czech labour movement.(Kevin McDermott, The Czech Red Unions, 1918-1929: A Study of Their Relations with the Communist Party and the Moscow Internationals. Boulder, CO: East European Monographs, 1988; pp. 4-6.) The formation of OS did not, however, represent a total break with the Vienna Commission; several OS unions retained affiliations with the Vienna Commission. The founding congress was attended by 108 delegates, representing 90 trade union organizations, who met in the metalworkers assembly hall in Karln. Fourteen trade union organizations not represented at the congress also supported the OSs formation. Rouar was elected its secretary. The new organization was linked to the Czechoslav Social Democratic Workers Party.(McDermott, The Czech Red Unions, 1918-1929, pp. 6-7.)Competition between Prague and Vienna centresThe OS and the Vienna Commission had a complicated and vacillating relationship for several years. In 1902, the OS accepted that the Vienna Commission would be the sole representative of the trade union movement in the Austrian Empire to the international strike fund of the Secretariat of National Trade Union Centres. Aside from this concession, however, the OS demanded autonomy for the ethnic Czech trade union movement. Yet over the next three years, several OS member unions, including its strongest one, the Union of Metalworkers, joined the Vienna Commission.(In 1904 Rouar was replaced as the secretary by Steiner. Under Steiners leadership, relations with the Vienna Commission worsened. In advance of the 1905 Amsterdam congress of the International Secretariat of National Trade Union Centres, the OS sought recognition as a separate trade union centre. The congress allowed an OS representative was allowed to attend as a guest but rejected the OSs bid for recognition.(McDermott, The Czech Red Unions, 1918-1929, pg. 8.)The tensions between OS and the Vienna Commission peaked in 1905 and 1906. The Vienna Commission argued that the Czech autonomism was a minority standpoint within the labour movement, while the OS became more vocal. The OS began a process of regaining some unions that had been lost to the Vienna Commission from 1902 to1905. In early 1906 the Union of Shoemakers rejoined.(McDermott, The Czech Red Unions, 1918-1929, pp. 10-11.)Growth of OSIn 1909 the Union of Metalworkers rejoined OS. The following year unions organizing chemical workers, leatherworkers, miners and tailors followed suit. In 1910 Tayerl succeeded Steiner. The Vienna Commission became increasingly frustrated as the OS expanded its sphere of influence. By 1911 the OS had established a considerable following in Moravia and Silesia. This development marked a definite break with the Vienna Commission. Nevertheless, the Vienna Commission unions continued to encompass the majority of ethnic Czech workers in those regions.(McDermott, The Czech Red Unions, 1918-1929, pp. 11-14.)WarThe outbreak of the World War in 1914 was a heavy blow to the organizational growth of the OS. Many union activists were drafted and sent to the battlefields. Prices of essential commodities rose, making the bargaining position of workers weaker. By the end of the year the OS had lost almost half of its membership. Several local structures were closed down and several OS publications were discontinued. Repressive measures were enacted by the government in order to forestall strikes in the strategically important mining and industrial sectors. Strikers or protesters could be punished with jail or being sent to the front.(McDermott, The Czech Red Unions, 1918-1929, pp. 18-19.)By 1917 the tide turned. Inequalities in wage increases between ethnic German and ethnic Czech workers angered the Czech working class. In the scope of a year, the OS membership tripled, although membership levels still lagged behind the prewar level. Recruitment was particularly strong in heavy industries. The influx posed some organizational challenges for OS and coincided with a shift from craft unionism to mass industrial unionism.(McDermott, The Czech Red Unions, 1918-1929, pg. 20.)Independence and the unity of the labour movementBetween April and October 1918, OS negotiated a possible merger with the National Socialist obec dlnick (OD). The negotiations ended unsuccessfully because the OD insisted that unions should subordinate themselves to political parties.(McDermott, The Czech Red Unions, 1918-1929, pg. 35.)In October 1918 the OS changed its name to Odborov sdruen eskoslovensk (Czechoslovak Trade Union Association). Discussions between OS and Slovak Social Democratic trade unions began in December 1918. On February 2, 1919, a Regional Trade Union Council of OS was formed in Slovakia, with a secretariat in Ruomberok. Later a secretariat was set ut in Bratislava. In March 1919 OS started a Slovak-language publication, Priekopnik (Pioneer). By this time OS had a membership of 30 000 workers in Slovakia.(McDermott, The Czech Red Unions, 1918-1929, pp. 22, 35, and 36.)Also, by February 1919, the Vienna Commission union organization that were now within the boundaries of the independent Czechoslovak Republic merged into OS. Likewise OS branches in areas that were now parts of Austria had already joined Austrian unions.(Footnotessdruen eskoslovansksdruen eskoslovensk
20489559
Rush_Historic_District
 refnum87000105The Rush Historic District is a zinc mining region of the Mountains in Arkansas. Now located within National River, the district includes ruins dating from 1880 to 1940. The area was an important part of what became known as the Arkansas Lead and Zinc District, and played a role in the development of railroads and modern infrastructure in the area.During World War I the Rush Creek mines were the center of the zinc industry in Arkansas. Ten mining companies operated 13 developed mines within the district, more than in any other mining district within the North Arkansas District.The buildings, structures, and ruins at Rush are the last visible remains of historic zinc mining activity in Arkansas. Of the other mining districts which once stretched across northern Arkansas, only limited debris now marks those sites. Rush is the only area left to retain not only the mines, but also buildings, structures, and ruins pertaining to mining and community life. The Rush Historic District exists today within the same environment and setting as it did during its periods of historic significance. Nearly as isolated today as it was historically, it has been little touched by time. The ghost town, mines, and waste piles visible on the bluffs immediately set the flavor of the district as an abandoned mountain mining community. The buildings, structures, ruins, and sites in the district exist in the same relationships as they did during the mining era.()See also*Buffalo River State Park Historic District*Buffalo Valley Historic District*Farm Historic DistrictReferences
20507900
The_Complete_Book_of_Dwarves
The Complete Book of Dwarves is a supplemental rulebook for the 2nd edition of the & Dragons fantasy game, published in 1991 by Inc.(PHBR6: The Complete Book of Dwarves at RPGnet. Retrieved on December 2, 2008.)(The Complete Book of Dwarves (1st printing) at the Advanced Dungeons & Dragons Archive. Retrieved on December 2, 2008.) It contains a variety of information useful to playing dwarf characters in the game, including information on strongholds,(Dwarven Strongholds at candlekeep. Retrieved on December 2, 2008.) dwarven subraces,( character kits,( role-playing, mining, and more. The book was later reprinted in November, 1993,(Bambra, Jim. The Complete Book of Dwarves (Inc., 1993). ISBN 1-56076-110-5.)(The Complete Book of Dwarves (2nd printing) at the Advanced Dungeons & Dragons Archive. Retrieved on December 2, 2008.) with a slightly different cover.ContentsThe Complete Book of Dwarves contains an introduction, 11 chapters, and a number of character sheets designed for use by players with dwarf characters.The Creation of DwarvesThe books first chapter discusses the creation of dwarves in the Dungeons & Dragons world and dwarven myths regarding the creation of the world, as well as information on the dwarven afterlife.(The Dwarf SubracesThis chapter describes the six main subraces of dwarves: hill dwarves, mountain dwarves, deep dwarves, sundered dwarves, duergar (also known as gray dwarves), and dwarves.( This chapter does not contain information on the statistics for the various subraces, focusing instead on the thematic differences between the subraces.(Your Life as a DwarfThe third chapter of the book examines dwarven culture and lifestyle, including information on their clans, view of the world, emotions, diet, marriage, and life cycle.(Character CreationThis chapter contains information on how to create dwarf characters, including statistics for the various subraces and rules regarding maximum levels, ability score modifiers, movement, and age.(ProficienciesThe fifth chapter has rules on new and expanded proficiencies, with an eye towards their use by dwarves.(Dwarf KitsThe longest chapter in the book, this section describes 24 character kits designed for dwarf characters, allowing players to further customize their characters.(Role Playing and PersonalitiesThe seventh chapter describes various personalities which can help players roleplay dwarf characters. Personalities include The Grumbler, The Optimist, and The Phobic.(MiningChapter eight contains rules on mining, including how to survey the land, what products can be mined, and how much gold can be earned by mining.(EquipmentThis chapter includes new equipment, such as smelters, battleaxes, and machines.(Dwarf StrongholdsThe books tenth chapter discusses dwarven strongholds, including the various types of strongholds, their government, resources they have access to, and relationships with other races.(Designing Dwarf CampaignsThe final chapter is for Masters creating a dwarf-based campaign, containing guidelines such as what dwarf subraces to use, dwarven mythology, campaign environments, and rules on how to create new character kits.(Design SheetsThe Complete Book of Dwarves also contains design sheets, for use designing new dwarf strongholds and kits, and sheets, designed for dwarves of each class.(See also*of StoneReferences
20528413
Electoral_district_of_Queenstown
The Electoral district of Queenstown was a single-member electoral district of the House of Assembly. It was based in the mining town of Queenstown in the West Coast region of Tasmania. Created out of part of the Lyell seat ahead of the 1903 state election, it had historically been part of Montagu (18941900) and Electoral district of Cumberland (18561894).The Queenstown seat was abolished when the Tasmanian parliament adopted the Hare-Clark electoral model in 1909. Its final member, Watkins, who won a by-election on 19 November 1906 at the age of 22, successfully stood for the multi-member seat of Darwin (now known as Braddon) and retained political office for 25 years.Members for QueenstownReferences* * * Parliament of Tasmania (2006). The Parliament of Tasmania from 1956
20541157
List_of_canals_in_Oregon_(M-Z)
of canals in Oregon and List of canals in Oregon (M-Z) contains all canals identified by the USGS in the state of Oregon.  The USGS defines a canal as a manmade waterway used by watercraft or for drainage, irrigation, mining, or water power (ditch, lateral).
20555890
Trail,_British_Columbia
footnotes               Trail is a city in the Kootenay region of the Interior of Columbia, Canada.GeographyTrail has an area of . The city is located on both banks of the River, approximately 10 km north of the States border. This section of the Columbia River valley is located between the Mountains to the west and the Mountains to the east. The Columbia flows directly north-south from Castlegar, turns east near downtown Trail, and then meets the States border at Waneta and the Pend dOreille River.thumb|left|Trail Bridge crosses Columbia River in Trail BCSummer climate in Trail is generally hot and dry with moderately cool nights. Temperatures often exceed 35 C during summer afternoons, average 29 C. Thunderstorms are common during the late-Spring and Summer season, often moving into the valley from the south. The fall months brings dense river fog, especially during the overnight and morning hours, as a cold air inversion lingers above the relatively warm river surface. Winters are mild to cold with periods of moderate snowfall. Nearby villages such as Warfield and Fruitvale often receive greater amounts of snow due to higher elevation.The Monashee Mountains are the first major mountain range east the Coastal Mountains to intercept moisture laden westerly flow from the Ocean. As a result, areas west of Trail, including the Christina Range, Rossland Range, the city of Rossland, and the Blueberry-Paulson section of the Highway (Highway 3) receive greater amounts of winter precipitation, mostly in the form of heavy snow. Vegetation in the Trail area, although fairly lush, is noticeably drier than other areas with a more westerly aspect.DemographicsAccording to Canada, Trails population was 7,320 during the 2001 Census.(Canada (2001 Census). Trail Community Profile)The city is also noted for its large Italian community. There are 1,385 people in Trail with Italian ancestry (18.9%).(Selected Ethnic Origins1, for Census Subdivisions (Municipalities) With 5,000-plus Population - 20% Sample Data)*Caucasian: 91%*Aboriginal: 4% (290 people)Visible minorities*Chinese: 2% (120 people)*South Asian: 1.2% (100 people)*Black: 1.8% (155 people)Education and employmentTrail is the location of the head office of the Boundary Regional District, which is one of the citys employers.Trail is part of District 20 Kootenay-Columbia and schools in the town include:*Elementary School*Lloyd Crowe Secondary School*L Webster Elementary School*Alternate Program*Learning CentreSchool districtThe school district in the Greater Trail area is focused on improving the district and schools and has a focused, well organized improvement plans in place. The strategies selected to achieve the goals are a blend of research, best practice, and innovative thinking. The district has implemented numerous strategies to support schools in improving student learning. Most schools have comprehensive, innovative and research-based strategies to meet the goals.In 2007, the J. Lloyd Crowe Secondary School Replacement program started the construction of  a new facility in Trail to replace the existing school that was built in the late 1950s.  The new facility opened in September 2009.EducationTrails statistics differ sharply from that of the province in the percentage of the population aged 4564 with a trades certificate or diploma: Trail26%, compared to BC14%. This is directly attributable to Cominco and the diversified mining and metals companys presence in the area. The percentage of this age group with a university level education is also very different: Trail12%, compared to BC22%.  The general picture is a working population heavily geared to the trades and historically very reliant on Teck Cominco for employment.Economic situationEmploying approximately 1,800 people, Teck Cominco is the regions largest employer. The average age of an employee at Comincos Trail operation is 47. It is anticipated that within 15 years Comincos Trail operation will have a completely new and different labour force. A younger and perhaps more technical labour force will most likely replace those that are retiring. The big picture for the area is one of an aging population which brings about ongoing employment opportunities in the area. This is evidence based on the improved housing sales in the years between 2005 to 2007, making the Greater Trail area a target destination for people looking for better quality of life in a smaller community setting.The City of Trail is also home to the largest hospital in the Kootenay region.AttractionsTrail Memorial Centre & Sports Hall of MemoriesThe Trail Memorial Centre currently plays host to the Trail & District Public Library, the Trail Smoke Eaters hockey team, the Trail Museum, and the Sports Hall of Memories, in addition to many local sports facilities. This historic landmark, located at 1051 Victoria Street, was home to two world championship Smoke Eaters teams.thumb|Trail Memorial Centre|left|Trail Memorial Centre arena before seating upgradeThe Trail Memorial Centre is a hub of civic activity year-round, and has been a focal point of the community since its inception.River Activities and Music in the Park at Gyro Park in TrailLocated at 1090 Charles Lakes Drive in East Trail on the route to Sunningdale, Gyro Park is the home to Music in the Park during the summer. Listen to the melodic tunes under the gazebo in Gyro Park, where visitors enjoy live music Thursdays in July and August. During long hot summer days, Gyro Park is extremely popular with locals and visitors to the area who enjoy a day at the beach.thumb|right|Navigating the Onions and currents of the Columbia River at Gyro ParkThe Onions and other popular river currents that wind between the rocks on the East banks of the Columbia River, are a popular summer magnet for river activity. Often, throughout the summer, an abundance of avid swimmers and rapid paddlers with a deep respect of the Columbia River dare to navigate the frosty swift waters to ride the waves, such as the local favorite Onions river current at Gyro Park beach.Teck Cominco Interpretive CentreTrail is home to the largest non-ferrous lead and zinc smelter in the world and visitors can learn more about the areas largest employer by taking the 2.5 hour industrial tour of the Cominco smelter which can be arranged in the Teck Cominco interpretive centre through the Trail & District Chamber of Commerce office located above the Bank, in the heart of downtown Trail. This centre is the starting point for the free tours beginning at 10 am, Monday to Friday during the summer; by appointment from September to May. Learn about the plants operations in the mini-science centre featuring hands-on exhibits for the whole family.View video presentations and displays which exhibit sophisticated environmental monitoring systems installed in the Trail area by Teck Cominco. Other presentations illustrate the history of Comincos Trail smelting operations and provide information on career opportunities in the industry.The Historic GulchIn the early 1900s a large influx of Italian immigrants lent a distinctive character to The Gulch which is located at the entrance to Trail accessed by the Schofield Highway which drops down the long grade down from the city of Rossland and the village of Warfield and sub-division of Annabel onto Rossland Avenue.thumb|Monument on the Gulch|left|The Historic Gulch in Trail BCThis neighbourhood which runs the length of Rossland Avenue is known as the Gulch. Originally called the Dublin Gulch in the very early days, it eventually became known as The Gulch as it filled up with Italians who chose not to live on the original Trail townsite. The Gulch starts as throat of Trail Creek narrows between the high, sandy slope of Smelter Hill on its left bank and the West Trail bank where early pioneer houses were built by immigrants as the purchased properties along the west bank steep terrain.In the early pioneer days, industrious Chinese launderers and cooks spent time gardening in the defile of the Gulch and few of these immigrants ever acquired rights to own land in the Gulch and these gardens were gradually displaced by Italian and other European working families who terraced their properties into level plots. Despite the steep terrain, these immigrant families planted vegetable gardens reminiscent of the old country, fed by plenty of water from Trail Creek and the hot summer sun.The Gulch is home to shops and the Terra Nova hotel, located at the entrance to Trails central business district at the foot of Rossland Avenue.Famous natives and Home of Championsthumb|left|Home of Champions Monument outside Kootenay Savings Credit UnionThe Greater Trail Area is known as the Home of Champions, in recognition of those who reside in the area, or are from the area, and have excelled in their chosen field of endeavour.In 1995, Savings Credit Union was seeking a project that would represent their commitment and appreciation to the Greater Trail community. The Credit Union decided to sponsor the construction of a monument which was constructed in the summer of 1996 outside their offices in Trails downtown that would honour the Champions of the Greater Trail area in Sports, Industry and Lifestyle.A society was formed to establish criteria for selection of the persons to be honoured on the monument. The monument was constructed in the summer of 1996 and forty-three champions were selected to be honoured at the inaugural dedication ceremony which took place on September 28, 1996. To date, eighty-nine individuals and organizations have been honoured with a place on the Home of Champions monument.(Trail Historical Society)The Home of Champions monument project is an ongoing one, managed by the City of Trail. Additional persons will be honoured regularly for their special contribution to the social, cultural, economic and educational fabric of the community.Notable people from the Greater Trail area*Horcoff, current NHL player and captain of the Edmonton Oilers.*dAquino, Chief executive and president of the Canadian Council of Chief Executives CCCE, and one of the private-sector architects of the American Free Trade Agreement*Bay, current MLB player for the New York Mets*Bay, Canadian National Softball Team and National Pro Fastpitch pitcher*Deadmarsh, former NHL player, won Stanley cup in 1996 with the Colorado Avalanche*Drake, former NHL player, won Cup in 2008 with the Red Wings*Ferraro, former NHL player for the Islanders, Rangers, Whalers, Thrashers, Kings, Blues*Freschi, architect for Expo 86*Georgetti, current President of the Canadian Labour Congress*Hampton Gray, one of the last Canadians to die in WWII and the last Canadian recipient of the Victoria Cross*Tom Harrison, former MLB pitcher for the Kansas City As, now the Oakland Athletics*Jackman, current NHL player for the St. Louis Blues*Kobluk, of Chad Mitchell Trio*Kromm, former NHL player*Lee-Gartner, Canadian Olympic Womens Ski Team, Downhill Olympic Gold Medal 1992*Maniago, former NHL player for the Leafs, Canadiens, Rangers, North Stars, Canucks*Matteucci, former NHL player for the Wild*McCarthy, current NHL player for the Blackhawks, Canucks, Thrashers*McEwan, President and CEO of Sobeys*Moller, President of the BCTCS*Popoff, heavy metal music journalist*Tambellini, former NHL player & current GM of the Edmonton OilersTrail smelter arbitrationIn 1927, a smelter in Trail was polluting, via smoke deposition, to farmlands south of the border in the States.  The US initially agreed to bring the issue before the Joint Commission.  A 1931 report the IJC recommended Canada compensate the United States for a sum of $350,000 to the farmers, the US rejected the offer.  In 1935 the two countries agreed to arbitration, in which Canada again offered to compensate the US $350,000 for all damages caused before 1932.  In April 1938, after extensive expert assessments, the tribunal acknowledged that the smelter had caused damage after 1932.  Then in 1941, it held that no State has the right to use or permit the use of its territory in such a manner as to cause injury by fumes in or to the territory of another or the properties or persons therein, when the case is of serious consequence and the injury is establish by clear and convincing evidence. (Bratspies, Rebbecca M., Russell A. Miller. Transboundary Harm in International Law. Cambridge University Press, 2010.)  This case, known commonly as the Trail smelter arbitration, is a landmark in environmental law,(A. Parrish, Trail Smelter Deja Vu: Extraterritoriality, International Environmental Law, and the Search for Solutions to Canada-U.S. Transboundary Water Pollution Disputes, (2005) 85 B.U. L. Rev. 363) as it helped to establish the polluter pays principle for transnational pollution issues.(http://www.law.uidaho.edu/default.aspx?pid66516.)Manhattan ProjectAs part of its contribution to the Project, Canada built and operated a 6 T/a electrolytic water plant at Trail, which started operation in 1943.()()ReferencesExternal links* City of Trail Official Site* Trail Chamber Of Commerce* Trail Transit* Trail Daily Times* Trail Rossland News(British Columbia)(Columbia Britnica)(Colombie-Britannique)(Kanada)(Colmbia Britnica)British Columbiafi:Trail(British Columbia)
20565085
Ardon_Bess
Ardon Bess is a Canadian actor best known for appearing in a Moment commercial about the 1958 mining disaster portraying survivor Maurice Ruddick. He has also appeared in other films and television roles including Park Boys, She Move, the Lead, Ladies Man, Fu: The Legend Continues, Prom Night, of Kensington, and Jewel. He earned a Award nomination for Best Performance by an Actor in a Featured Supporting Role in a Dramatic Program or Mini-Series for his role in One Heart Broken Into Song.External links* 
20588227
Open_pit_mines
#REDIRECT mining
20605161
Atchison_Storage_Facility
Most people who visit Jackson Park in Kansas do not realize that they are standing on top of one of the largest single floor government bunker complexes in the world.  The Atchison Storage Facility, commonly known as the Atchison Caves lies  below the park under the limestone bluffs that line the River Valley.  The bunker complex has served the United States for more than 60 years as a secure storage facility from War II to the present day.HistoryIn 1886, George W. Kerford began to quarry limestone from the large bluffs 2 miles (3.2 km) south of downtown Atchison, Kansas.  Initially, the company produced riprap for the Burlington and Quincy Railroad, one of several railroads that traveled through the area.  The Kerford Quarry Companys operations at the site resulted in a series of large caverns supported by  pillars of unmined rock.  The mines in the quarry grew to encompass more than  of underground space.World War IIDuring the Second World War, the United States War Food Administration was tasked with collecting and storing reserve farm products to support the war effort.  A businessman in Atchison suggested to them that the Kerford Mines would be an ideal facility to store perishables due to the constant temperature and humidity in the caverns.  In July 1944, the Kerford Quarry Company stopped their mining operations and began to lease the facility to the government for the sum of US$20,000 each year.(1. The Atchison Storage Facility by Thomas J. Slattery).  The government immediately began renovations, spending nearly $2 million to create a refrigerated storage facility where the temperature would be maintained at 32 degrees.  The War Food Administration stored perishables including meat, fruits, vegetables, dairy products and eggs in the facility.  By 1949, reports indicate that the Atchison Storage Facility held nearly 9,000 tons of eggs, 20,000 tons of prunes, 1,000 tons of raisins and nearly 50 tons of milk.The Cold WarIn the years leading up to World War II, the Army Ordnance Department suffered from a shortage of the specialized production machine tools.  These highly specialized tools were necessary to make the increasingly complex weapons used in modern battles.  In the drawdown following the war, the Army began to stockpile these tools to be held in reserve status to be used in the event of another national mobilization.  The Atchison Storage Facility, with its constant temperature, low humidity and protection from the building threat of nuclear weapons,(2. An Evaluation of the Shelter Potential in Mines, Caves and Tunnels  U.S. Department of Defense 11 Jun 1965).   was chosen to be part of the Ordnance Corps Production Equipment Readiness Program.  The tools were held in a state of readiness, to be shipped nationwide to manufacturers in the event of a national emergency.  In 1952, the facility was renamed the United States Storage Facility- Atchison Caves.  The Army converted two of the largest mines (more than  of underground space) into storage areas with the installation of cinderblock walls, concrete floors, electrical lighting, sump pumps, air handling equipment and an extensive dehumidification system.  To facilitate moving the large machine tools in and out of the storage facility a truck receiving dock was built near the entrance, a railroad spur and dock were constructed and dock facilities for barges were established on the Missouri River. In addition, a shop to refurbish and maintain the machine tools was established at the facility.  At its peak, a private contractor was responsible for maintaining more than 5,000 machine tools in the reserve facility.In 1977, the facility was transferred to the Defense Logistics Agency and it was renamed as the Atchison Storage Facility.  It was later used to store surplus parachutes (more than 8,500), medical supplies and important defense department documents, plans and computer files.The facility todayThe Atchison Strategic Storage Facility is still owned by the United States Government, now operated by the Army Reserves 88th Regional Support Command in Fort McCoy, WI.  Recent Defense Department documents list the facilitys use as storage and training.  They list the size of the facility as  aboveground and  belowground.  Some hazardous materials have been identified at a former landfill at the site and groundwater monitoring is being conducted in cooperation with the State of Kansas.(Department of the Army Incident Action Plan- Atchison Caves)(89th RRC Facilities)References
20618868
Goldfields_region_of_Victoria
right|thumb|Nerrena Fossickers in Nerrena Creek outside BallaratThe Goldfields region of Victoria is a region commonly used but typically defined in both geography and geography (in particular tourism).(http://www.goldfields.org.au/)DescriptionIt takes in a specific area of Central Victoria, the major cities of Ballarat and Bendigo as well as smaller centres including Victoria, Castlemaine and Maryborough.  It extends as far north as Inglewood and St Arnaud.  It encroaches on the Western District near Ararat.  Other significant towns include Maldon, Creswick, Clunes, Avoca and Buninyong.  Although the region has a strong association with the gold rush there are, however, significant towns associated with the gold rush and gold mining located outside of this region - notable examples include Walhalla, Warrandyte, Chiltern and Beechworth.  The goldfields region is more strongly linked to the impact than Gold Rush than the discovery of gold in Victoria.  As a result of the gold rush, the region contains many old buildings, some celebrated examples of architecture and some which are now derelict and some towns and many of the towns were far larger during the boom times than they are now.  The region contains a significant number of heritage registered buildings.  Major tourism icons include Hill, Stockade site and the Talking Tram.  The region is also associated with the of Australian rules football, particularly as the home of Wills, some of the earliest known clubs and games, the origin of the indigenous tradition of marngrook and Irish immigrant pastime of caid in Australia.Demographically, the population of the region is approximately 244,900(Victorian Population Bulletin 2006, Dept. of Sustainability & Environment)  The region has a well defined road tourist route.  The area retains a significant mining industry and remains a popular for fossicking.The Goldfields region is also associated as a growing region with a large number of established vineyards and popular wineries.  An important ecosystem associated with the region is the forest, now much fragmented and cleared but still important for the conservation of many birds and other animals.GalleryImage:Ballarat lydiard sturt.jpg|Corner Sturt and Lydiard Streets, BallaratImage:Bendigo talking tram.jpg|Pall Mall, BendigoFile:Ballarat-sovereign hill.jpg|Sovereign Hill open air museum, a large tourist attraction in BallaratImage:MaldonStreetscape.JPG|Maldons famous historic streetscapesReferences  
20632723
William_Scott_Ament
William Scott Ament (Chinese Name:  Mei Wei Liang)(http://www.errchina.com/pdf/5_From_Morrison_to_Stuart.pdf; http://ricci.rt.usfca.edu/biography/view.aspx?biographyID203) (born 14 September 1851; died 6 January 1909 in Francisco, California) was a missionary to China for the Board of Commissioners for Foreign Missions (ABCFM) from 1877, and was known as the Father of Christian Endeavor in China.(Porter, 353.) Ament became prominent as a result of his reported heroism during the Boxer Uprising and controversial in its aftermath because of the personal attacks on him by American writer Twain for his collection of punitive indemnities from north China villages.(The Rev. Dr. William S. Ament, The New York Times (8 January 1909).http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9F02E0DD1539E733A2575AC0A9679C946897D6CF)Biographical detailsWilliam Scott Ament was born of Dutch and French Huguenot stock on 14 September 1851 in Michigan, the eldest son of Winfield Scott Ament (born ca. 1811-1865),(Egbert Family History. Section F: Related Families: Pierre Perrine Family; http://freepages.family.rootsweb.ancestry.com/~emty/Section_F_Pierre_Perrine_Family.html; Shiawassee, MI 1850 Federal Census, INDEX File 1 of 5, http://ftp.us-census.org/pub/usgenweb/census/mi/shiawassee/1850/indx-a-c.txt (accessed 2 April 2009).) an ironworker, and Emily Hammond Ament (born 3 May 1818; married 4 September 1848; died April 1908 in Oberlin, Ohio),(Shiawassee County, Michigan Dibean Marriage Index; http://files.usgwarchives.net/mi/shiawassee/vitals/marriages/dbn-nov-a-am-2006.txt) and the younger brother of Claribel Ament Leggat (born c. 1850 in Owosso, Michigan; died 1881 in Montana).(Claribel was married to John Leggat (1832-1902), an investor in mining, and mother of Alexander J. Leggat (1876-1961), a mining engineer in Butte, Montana. She died giving birth to her daughter, also named Claribel Ament Leggat; http://montanahistorywiki.pbwiki.com/Mining-in-Montana (accessed 2 April 2009); Porter, 14; Florence Bentz Penfield, The Genealogy of the Descendants of Samuel Penfield (Harris Press, ca. 1964): 157; http://www.penfield.fm/genealogy/wc01/wc01_144.html; Porter, 68; Alexander Leggat Collection, 1864-1964; http://www.lib.montana.edu/collect/spcoll/findaid/0781.html (accessed 2 April 2009).)Spiritual backgroundAt the age of twelve, Will Ament became a member of the Congregational church (now the Owosso First Congregational Church Church of Christ) at Michigan, which had been organised on 18 January 1853.(A Brief History (22 May 2008); http://www.fccucc.com/index.php?Itemid62&id47&optioncom_content&viewarticle (accessed 1 April 2009).) About the time of his fathers death, when he was 14, Ament had a deeper spiritual experience as a result of a religious revival in his home church.(Porter, 21.) While studying at Oberlin Academy, Ament underwent a new and deep spiritual impulse and transferred his church membership to the Second Congregational Church at Oberlin, Ohio.(Porter, 22; Members of Charles G. Finneys Congregational Church formed the Second Congregational Church in Oberlin in 1860. They met in the College Chapel until the Second Congregational Church was completed in 1870. The building could hold 1605 people. In 1920, the First and Second Congregational Churches were reunited. The steeple was removed in 1929 and the building served as Wright Zoology Laboratory until 1959, when it was razed. The Conservatory of Music now occupies the site. http://omp.ohiolink.edu/OMP/NewDetails?oid585595&fieldnameplace&results9&sortthedate&searchstatus1&hits55&searchmark0&searchstringOberlin+(Ohio)&searchtypekw&formatcat&count30 (accessed 1 April 2009).) According to Porter, From that time on he was hearty, aggressive and fearless in meeting those who opposed Christianity, and made the service of Christ the chief thing of life.(Porter, 22.)EducationAment attended the High School, and upon graduation enrolled in the Oberlin Academy in Ohio, a preparatory school, in the fall of 1867.(SEVENTY-FIFTH ANNIVERSARY General Catalogue of Oberlin College 1833-1908: Including an Account of the Principal Events in the History of the College, with Illustrations of the College Buildings. (Oberlin, OH: Oberlin College, 1 April 1909):19.) Two years later he enrolled at College.( Ament was the second boy to go from here Owosso to college and the first to graduate.( While at Oberlin College, Ament was influenced by the example of Oberlins recently retired president, revivalist Grandison Finney. Ament had to work his way through college. While studying at Oberlin College, Ament became the supervisor (principal) of the Richfield Central high school at Ohio(Porter, 28; Akron Beacon Journal (29 November 1873):4 (column 3); http://ascpl.lib.oh.us/internetresources/sc/ABJSub/1873.pdf (accessed 1 April 2009).) (since the early 1950s, Revere High School).(http://www.revere.k12.oh.us/history.aspx (accessed 1 April 2009).)After graduation from Oberlin College in 1873,(Peking Congregationalists, The New York Times (7 July 1900): 6) Ament attended the Union Theological Seminary in New York for three years from 1873.(Prentiss, George Lewis, The Union Theological Seminary in the City of New York : historical and biographical sketches of its first fifty years (New York : Anson D.F. Randolph, 1889):110.;http://www.archive.org/download/uniontheological00prenrich/uniontheological00prenrich.pdf (accessed 2 April 2009); In Memoriam William Scott Ament, 1851-1909: Memorial Addresses, Tungchou, 1909, 47pp. http://www.columbia.edu/cu/lweb/img/assets/6398/MRL6_CorbettSmith_FA.pdf)(David Shavit, The United States in Asia, 6-7.) While at Union Seminary, Ament taught at nights, and later was a tutor to the son of a rich man.(Porter, 29.) On Sundays, he taught a class of boys in the mission school on the corner of Elizabeth and Broome Streets.(Porter, 29-30.) In 1876 Ament transferred to Theological Seminary, where he graduated in the early summer of 1877 with a of Divinity (B.D.) degree.((In Memoriam William Scott Ament, 1851-1909: Memorial Addresses, Tungchou, 1909, 47pp. http://www.columbia.edu/cu/lweb/img/assets/6398/MRL6_CorbettSmith_FA.pdf)Call to missionary serviceAs Aments education advanced, his heart settled itself upon China as his field of service.(Mission Studies: Womans Work in Foreign Lands 29-30 (Womans Board of Missions of the Interior of the Congregational Church, 1911): 253.)  While studying at Andover, Ament formally applied to the ABCFM for appointment to foreign missionary service under their auspices on 4 November 1876. In 1877, Ament and his wife, Mary, were appointed as missionaries to China by the Board of Commissioners for Foreign Missions (ABCFM).Marriage and ordination (1877)On 23 August 1877, Ament married Mary Alice Penfield (born 4 July 1856 in Oberlin, Ohio; died April 1928 in Ohio), an 1875 Bachelor of Arts graduate in literature of Oberlin College,(Oberlin Catalogue:757; http://www.archive.org/download/generalcatalogue00oberrich/generalcatalogue00oberrich.pdf) and the daughter of Professor Charles Henry Penfield (born 7 January 1826 at New York; died 11 May 1891 at Ohio),(http://www.penfield.fm/genealogy/wc01/wc01_143.html (accessed 2 April 2009).) who had taught Greek and Latin at Oberlin College (18461870),(Oberlin Catalogue (1909):168; http://www.archive.org/download/generalcatalogue00oberrich/generalcatalogue00oberrich.pdf) and his first wife, Margaret Gertrude Wyett (born 14 December 1824 in England; married 25 April 1850; died 15 April 1861 at Oberlin, Ohio);(http://www.penfield.fm/genealogy/wc01/wc01_143.html (accessed 2 April 2009); Oberlin Catalogue (1909):184; http://www.archive.org/download/generalcatalogue00oberrich/generalcatalogue00oberrich.pdf; Porter, 34; Archie Crouch, Christianity in China, 646; Florence Bentz Penfield, The Genealogy of the Descendants of Samuel Penfield: With a Supplement of Dr. Levi Buckingham Line, and the Gridley, Dwight, Burlingham, Dewey, and Pyncheon Collateral Lines (Harris Press, 1963):157; http://www.penfield.fm/genealogy/wc01/wc01_144.html; Dictionary of American Biography 1:241; Thornton Bigelow Penfield and Sarah Ingraham Penfield, Letters from Jamaica: 1858-1866, ed. Charles G. Gosselink (Silver Bay, NY: Boat House Books, 2005):16, 30.http://www.penfield.fm/jamaica/jamaica.pdf)Ament was ordained as a missionary in the Owosso church on 5 September 1877 under the direction of pastor Rev. Lucius O. Lee, who eventually resigned in 1880 to go to Turkey, and who later became President of the Central Turkey TheologicalSeminary at Mara, Turkey.((Porter, 11, 34.)(A Brief History, 22 May 2008; The New York Times (20 April 1909):2; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?_r1&res9A07E7DA1539E733A25753C2A9629C946897D6CF (accessed 2 April 2009); FAMINE IS ACUTE IN MASSACRE ZONE, The New York Times (6 May 1909): 6; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9E03E0D61131E733A25755C0A9639C946897D6CF (accessed 2 April 2009).)Ministry (1877-1909)First missionary term in China (1877-1885)The Aments departed for China from California on 17 October 1877 on the steamer China. After an eleven week journey, they eventually arrived in Peking (now Beijing), China.(Porter, 36, 39.)Paotingfu (1878-1880)Ament served as a Congregational missionary at the North China Mission in Paotingfu (now Baoding), the then capital of Zhili province, China, (about 137 kilometres south of Beijing) from 1877 to 1880.(Porter, 37.) At that time there was about 100,000 residents, of whom 22,000 were beggars. Severe famine in the region resulted in their focus on famine relief.(POrter, 40-41.)While serving in Paotingfu, the Aments had their first child, Margaret (born November 1879), who died just after her birth.(http://www.penfield.fm/genealogy/wc08/wc08_484.html; Porter, 53-54.)Peking (1880-1885)Due to Marys continued illness, the Aments transferred to Beijing in 1880, where they served until late 1885.( Additionally, Ament was the editor of the North China News,(Twain, p.1031, n. 458.7) and The North China Church Times.(Lodwick, Chinese Recorder, 7.)During their first term in Beijing, the Aments had another two children: Philip Wyett Ament (born 21 October 1882; died 27 June 1883 in Beijing);(http://www.penfield.fm/genealogy/wc02/wc02_343.html; Porter, 75-76.) and Emily Hammond Ament (born 24 August 1884 in China).(http://www.penfield.fm/genealogy/wc02/wc02_344.html)Christian Endeavour Unions of ChinaAment became one of the founders and president of The Peoples Society of Christian Endeavour, known as the Christian Endeavour Unions of China (CEC).((Martha Emily Parmelee Rose, The Western Reserve of Ohio and Some of Its Pioneers, Places and Womens Clubs. National American Woman Suffrage Association Collection (Library of Congress) (Euclid Print. Co., 1914): 132.) Ament believed passionately in the importance of Christian Endeavour: Without doubt Christian Endeavor will have a large share in bringing the new life to awakened China.(William Scott Ament, quoted in The Christian Endeavor Manual: A Text-book on the History, Theory, Principles, and Practice of the Society, with Complete Bibliography and Several Appendixes, page 222, by Francis Edward Clark. United Society of Christian Endeavor, 1903.) In 1900 Ament was elected President of the North China Christian Endeavor Union.(Porter, 180.)First furlough: ministry in Ohio (1885-1888)Due to the severe illness of Aments mother, Emily Hammond Ament, Ament accepted the call to pastor a 250 member Congregational church in Ohio (about 30 kilometres from Ohio) so that he could care for her. During his three years there, he built up a strong church.((Womans Board of Missions of the Interior, Mission Studies: Womans Work in Foreign Lands 29-30 (1911-1912):253. Published by Womans Board of Missions of the Interior of the Congregational Church, 1911; Porter, 90.) While in Ohio, Ament became the president of the Ohio Christian Endeavor Union,(William Shaw, The Evolution of an Endeavorer: An Autobiography. (Christian Endeavor World, 1924):228.)In 1887 the Aments had their fourth (and final) child, William Sheffield Ament (born 25 July 1887 in Ohio; died 1951), their only child to survive childhood.(http://www.penfield.fm/genealogy/wc01/wc01_145.html; Dictionary of American Biography 1:241.) Will, Jr. would become a professor of English at College, California,(http://www.scrippscollege.edu/academics/academic-awards.php) and the co-author of Oxcart to Airplane (Powell, 1929), the only general history of California transportation.(James J. Rawls and Richard J. Orsi, A Golden State: Mining and Economic Development in Gold Rush California (California History Sesquicentennial Series, 2) (University of California Press, 1999):269.)Second missionary term in China (1888-1897)In August 1888, Ament and his family returned to Beijing to resume their missionary duties.((DAB 1:241.)Death of Emily AmentAt 9.30am on Monday, 27 February 1893, the Aments daughter, Emily died in Beijing of diphtheria at the age of eight and a half. after a weeks illness.(http://www.penfield.fm/genealogy/wc02/wc02_344.html; Porter, 116, 118.) Funds were donated to establish on Fifth Street, Beijing, near the Congregational Churchs North Chapel, the Emily Ament Memorial School for the education of Chinese girls.(Porter, 116, 122.) By late 1899, the school was re-located to Sixth Street.(Porter, 164.)Editor North China NewsDuring 1893 Ament became the editor of the North China News, a Chinese monthly newspaper, with an initial circulation in excess of 550 copies per month.(Porter, 124.)Among Aments other duties were being the ABCFM mission treasurer; postmaster for both the ABCFM and Presbyterian Mission; manager of the mission book room; manager of the Bible book store; and pastoral care of three congregations. In addition, he continued to serve as an evangelist.(Porter, 124-125.) From October 1894, Ament became superintendent of the boys school, as well as the preacher at the Beijing South Chapel.(Porter, 128.)In 1896, Ament presented a paper entitled The Spiritual Needs of Native Christians, in which he decried mere numerical addition of church members, indicating that The one thing to be arrived at is a spiritual Church in China.(Ament, Spiritual Needs, in The Evangelisation of China, 44; Porter, 135.)Second furlough (1897-1898)From spring 1897 Ament spent part of the year on furlough in Owosso, Michigan and was active in his home church, the Owosso First Congregational Church, and was responsible for re-invigorating the missionary focus of that church.( During summer 1897 he preached daily at the Owosso Y.M.C.A..(Porter, 143.)Third missionary term in China (1898-1901)On 4 September 1898, Ament left his wife and son, Willie, in Owosso to care for his mother, and his deceased sisters daughter.(Porter, 144, 205.) Ament returned to Beijing on 8 October 1898, to confront increased anti-foreign opposition as a consequence of the overthrow of the Chinese emperor in a detat.(Porter, 145.)In 1898, Ament had a paper The Religions of China published in The Student Missionary Appeal: Addresses at the Third International Convention of the Volunteer Movement for Foreign Missions, in which he indicated: Some one has said that you cannot tell the truth about the Chinese without lying. They are the most irreligious people on the face of the earth.(The Student Missionary Appeal: Addresses at the Third International Convention of the Student Volunteer Movement for Foreign Missions (Student volunteer movement for foreign missions, 1898): 336ff.)In December 1898, Ament was notified that College, his mater, had decided to award him an honorary of Divinity (D.D.) degree.(Porter, 153.)By the end of 1900, Ament had been responsible for planting 17 of the 22 churches associated with the Peking branch of the China ABCFM mission.(Porter, 211.)The Boxer Uprising and its aftermath (1900)Ament was captured by Boxers while on an expedition with another missionary about 100 kilometres from Beijing, however was able to escape unharmed.(Letters from China, The New York Times (22 June 1900):2; http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9E0CE4D9153DE433A25751C2A9609C946197D6CF; Escaped from Boxers, The New York Times (15 July 1900):2.) During the Uprising of 1900, on Thursday 7 June 1900, Ament requested a military escort from H. Conger, the United States Minister to China, to allow the evacuation of the besieged ABCFM missionaries in Tungchow (now the Tongzhou District of Beijing) (located 21 kilometres south-east of Beijing). As Conger refused to provide the escort as he believed he needed all his troops in Beijing, Ament himself travelled alone and unarmed to Tungchow by train with 16 carts, and facilitated the successful evacuation of 24 members of the missionary community and a number of Chinese helpers.(Richard OConnor, The Spirit Soldiers: A Historical Narrative of the Boxer Rebellion (Putnam, 1973): 64; Bessie Smith Ewing, Diary (Saturday 9 June 1900), in Death Throes of a Dynasty, 73; Robert Kennaway Douglas and Jeremiah Whipple Jenks, China (P.F. Collier & son, 1913):300.) The Tungchow missionaries succeeded in getting up to Peking, with their wives and families, on the 8th June, thanks to the pluck and energy of Mr. Ament.(Robert Hart, These from the Land of Sinim.: Essays on the Chinese Question (Chapman & Hall, 1901): 15.)During the subsequent attack on the Methodist missionary compound by the Boxers in Beijing, Ament was reportedly the last missionary to leave the compound on the afternoon of Wednesday, 13 June 1900.(The Rev. Dr. William S. Ament, New York Times (9 January 1909); Cry From Missionaries, New York Times (12 June 1900); Bessie Smith Ewing, Diary, Thursday, 14 June 1900, In Death Throes, 77-79.) A week after the evacuation of the Methodist compound, Ament, despite increased Boxer activity, returned to the Methodist compound to assess the possibility of retrieving goods left behind after their evacuation. Ament then organised twenty other missionaries and 60 Chinese to return to the compound to remove as many stores as possible which contributed greatly to their preservation during the siege. This aid to which so many were indebted was the result of Mr. Aments investigation.(A Missionary Observer, letter to the Editor 9 March 1901; Mission Spirit in China, The New York Times (12 March 1901).) During the subsequent fifty-five day siege, Ament sheltered in the British Legation in the Legation Quarter, where he had responsibility for looking after confiscated goods.(Arnold Henry Savage Landor, China and the Allies, Volume 2 (London: William Heinemann, 1901), 72.)While Ament through his own personal initiative was able to rescue the ABCFM missionaries at Tungchow, there was still significant loss of lives. Thirteen ABCFM adult missionaries and five children were killed by the Boxers.(of the Martyred Protestant Missionaries during the Boxer Crisis of 1900#American Board of Commissioners for Foreign Missions) Included were Miss Mary Susan Morrill (born 1863 in Maine) and Miss Annie Allender Gould, were among the eleven foreign missionaries, four children, and about fifty Chinese Christians killed in Baoding from 30 June 1900.(Paul Hattaway, Chinas Christian Martyrs (Oxford, UK and Grand Rapids, MI: Monarch, 2007):196-210) Additionally, there was much damage to ABCFM property. The ABCFM Mission compound was razed, as was the Emily Ament Memorial School (named in honour of Aments daughter) on Sixth Street, Peking.(Luella Miner, Chinas Book of Martyrs: A Record of Heroic Martyrdoms and Marvelous Deliverances of Chinese Christians During the Summer of 1900, (Jennings and Pye, 1903): 240; Robert Hart; John King Fairbank; Katherine Frost Bruner; Elizabeth MacLeod Matheson; and James Duncan Campbell, The I. G. in Peking: Letters of Robert Hart, Chinese Maritime Customs, 1868-1907 (Belknap Press of Harvard University Press, 1975): 879.) Ament estimated that by the end of July 1900 that losses for the ABCFM Peking station was about $71,000 gold.(Porter, 189.)From 13 September 1900, Ament, and an assistant, Reverend Elwood Gardner Tewksbury (born 1865, Newbury, Massachusetts),(H. Brackney, Elwood Gardner Tewksbury, Biographical Dictionary of Chinese Christianity, http://www.bdcconline.net/en/stories/t/tewksbury-elwood-gardner.php) accompanied by the U.S. Cavalry, searched the areas adjacent to Beijing for Boxers, collecting indemnities for Christians who had been killed by the Boxers, and ordering the burning of some homes and even executing suspected Boxers.(Oggel, Mark Twain Encyclopedia 23.) Ament had been chosen as the one who would be honorable and just to all.(Martha Emily Parmelee Rose, The Western Reserve of Ohio and Some of Its Pioneers, Places and Womens Clubs, National American Woman Suffrage Association Collection (Library of Congress) (Euclid Print. Co., 1914): 133.)Indemnities controversy (1901)In 1901 Ament became embroiled in a controversy regarding his activities (and those of other Christian missionaries, including the Roman Catholic Favier) subsequent to the Boxer Rebellion. In the wars aftermath came a war of words. Missionary triumphalism clashed with the sarcastic sallies of Mark Twain, who lampooned the apologias for looting given by American missionary William Scott Ament.(Bickers & Tiedemann, Boxers, xv.) An interview that Wilbur Chamberlin of the New York Sun conducted with Ament elevated the missionary question into a clbre.Mark Twains critiqueTwain, was an outspoken critic of American involvement in the Philippines and China,(Maverick Marvin Harris, China, 142, in The Mark Twain Encyclopedia.) and one of the mammoth figures in anti-imperialism, and certainly the foremost anti-imperialist literary figure.(Philip Sheldon Foner, Mark Twain: Social Critic: Social Critic (International Publishers, 1958): 280; Everett H. Emerson, Mark Twain: A Literary Life (University of Pennsylvania Press, 2000):257.) Twain decided to use the Sun article as the basis of a sustained attack on both the missionary enterprise and its imperialist tendencies. According to Foner, Twain used the conduct of Ament to drive home the point that the missionary movement served as a front for imperialism.(Philip Sheldon Foner, Mark Twain: Social Critic: Social Critic (International Publishers, 1958): 280.) Twain especially targeted Ament in this article. According to Susan Harris:the Person Sitting in Darkness, which Mark Twain published in the North American Review in 1901, attacks Western imperialism as it was manifesting itself in South Africa, China, Cuba, and the Philippines. It names its villains  William McKinley, Chamberlain, the Kaiser, the Czar  and their instruments, especially the Reverend William Ament, a Congregationalist minister who was affiliated with the American Board of Commissioners for Foreign Missions.(Harris; Albert Bigelow Paine, Mark Twain: A Biography, Chapter 214)After the publication of To the Person Sitting in Darkness in The North American Review for February, 1901, as the opening article, there was a huge controversy. This article created a national sensation as well as a savage debate between Twain and the American Board of Foreign Missions.(J.C.B. Kinch, Europe and Elsewhere, The Mark Twain Encyclopedia, 261.)Ament was subsequently attacked in The New York Times;,(http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9A06EFDF103DEE32A25756C0A9649C946097D6CF A Missionary Arrested, The New York Times (5 February 1900):5; Our Missionaries in China, New York Times (7 February 1901):8; Missionaries Indemnities, New York Times (31 March 1901)) by Ames Mitchell, the editor of Life magazine;(J.A. Mitchell, Life 37 (1901): 184.) by Fletcher Lummis, editor of The Land of Sunshine;(Charles Fletcher Lummis, The Land of Sunshine 14 (F.A. Pattee, 1901): 237.) and by The Party of America.(Daniel De Leon, Mark Twain on Missionaries. Daily People 1:303 (29 April 1901):1. online: http://www.slp.org/pdf/de_leon/eds1901/apr29b_1901.pdf) Ament was further attacked in the Eighth series of Ethical Addresses (1901).(, Frederic Harrison, The Religion of Duty, Ethical Addresses, Volume 8. American Ethical Union. (S. Burns Weston, 1901):92-93. In the same publication, however, referring to Ament: The truth of the matter is, that the missionary has been made the scapegoat by conspiring and corrupt native officials, and by immoral foreigners now in China and their ignorant brethren here in the United States.(35))Ament was defended both by missionaries and the proponents of imperialism. Their reaction was swift and predictable. They charged Twain with treason. Twains caustic indictment generated, in turn, a defensive apologetics on the part of the American Board of Commissioners for Foreign Missions. Both Judson Smith (born 28 June 1837 in Massachusetts; died 29 June 1906 in Massachusetts), who had been one of Aments professors at Oberlin College,(General Council of the Congregational and Christian Churches of the United States, The Year Book of the Congregational Christian Churches of the United States of America (General Council of the Congregational and Christian Churches of the United States Executive Committee, 1907):38; Daniel Coit Gilman; Harry Thurston Peck; and Frank Moore Colby, eds. The New International Encyclopeia Volume 18 (Dodd, Mead and company, 1909):261.) the corresponding secretary of Aments sponsoring mission (18841906), The Board of Commissioners for Foreign Missions (ABCFM); and Reid (independent missionary, formerly a member of the American Presbyterian mission) claimed that missionary looting was high ethics, and added that American missionaries had only looted to provide money for the relief of Chinese Christians.(Bickers & Tiedemann, Boxers, 104; Albert Bigelow Paine, Mark Twain: A Biography, Chapter 214) Smith demanded an apology from Twain.(The Mark Twain Encyclopedia, 23.) Replying in a letter to the New York Tribune, Twain insisted that Ament had arraigned himself.(Philip Sheldon Foner, Mark Twain: Social Critic: Social Critic (International Publishers, 1958): 280; The Mark Twain Encyclopedia, 23.)At the end of January 1901 fourteen members of the North China Mission of the ABCFM endorsed the actions of Ament and Tewksbury.(Action of Missionaries Indorsed, The New York Times (22 March 1901): 6.) On 21 March 1901, the Missionary Association demanded Twain retract the statements he made attacking Ament.(Howard Culbertson, Missions History: It Happened Today; Demand That Twain Retract, The New York Times (22 March 1901):16; Quoted in Porter, 236.) After Aments death in January 1909, Judson Smiths successor, Dr. James Levi Barton (18551936)(David M. Stowe, James Levi Barton, in The Biographical Dictionary of Christian Missions, 46. Ed. Grand Rapids, MI: Eerdmans, 1999. Gerald H. Anderson.) also defended him and his actions.(J.L. Barton, A Loss to Both China and America, The Congregationalist (1909); quoted in Porter, 365.)Ament was not just defended by his colleagues or other Christian organisations. He was defended in an editorial in the Boston Journal;(A Humorist Astray, Boston Journal; quoted in Porter, 236-237.), by prominent New York lawyer, and future United States Secretary of State, Stimson;(The Missionaries: They Will Still Go On. Letter to the Editor of the New York Times, from Henry Stimson, 21 March 1901, published New York Times (24 March 1901);) byHurd Conger (March 7, 1843  May 18, 1907), the United States Minister to China (18981905);(The Missionaries Defended: Interviews in Japan with Minister Conger and Dr. Ament: Goods Sold to Succor Native Christians. Kobe Herald (24 April 1901). Reprinted in The New York Times (25 April 1901):2. http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9A04E5DD1030E132A25756C2A9629C946097D6CF; A History of the Precious Metals from the Earliest Times to the Present, 358; Edwin Conger, quoted in Porter, 242.); by Colonel Sir Maxwell MacDonald (18521915), the chief British diplomat in Beijing during the Uprising, and the commander of the defence of the besieged foreign legations;(Sir Claude MacDonald, quoted in Porter, 244.) and by Harvey Denby (18301904), the former United States Minister to China (18851898)(Charles Denby, China and Her People, 217-218.)When Ament became aware of the criticism of his activities and the subsequent controversy, he was affected adversely.(Miss N.N. Russell, quoted in Porter 210.) Ament admitted the strain in a letter to his wife on Sunday, 27 January 1901: I am doing what I do not recall that I ever did before, remaining at home deliberately and missing all the services. I need the rest and felt that it was imperative. You see there is no let up for me. It is a constant strain from morning till night.(Porter, 221.)On 17 February 1901, the New York Times issued a retraction after receiving a different account of Aments actions from Dr Judson Smith of the ABCFM, based on Aments letter of 13 November 1900 to Smith. The Times reported that in Aments own letter he indicated the compensation for the losses of the converts obtained by him had been by appealing to the sense of justice among the villages where our people had lived. The Times concluded: It seems that we have been led into doing an injustice to him....In that case we have to express our sincere regret.(Editorial, The New York Times (17 February 1901)) In March the New York Sun printed an interview with Ament that indicated that the indemnity was not thirteen times the loss, but only one and one-third of the loss.(Twain indicated that he could not comment for publication, but would respond in the April edition of The North American Review. His representative indicated: He hopes that both the Peking Missionary Association and the American Board of Foreign Missions will like it, but he has his doubts.(Demand That Twain Retract, The New York Times (22 March 1901):16) In response to an open letter from the ABCFM demanding an apology, Twain penned To My Missionary Critics, which offered no apologies, although it ended by acknowledging that missionaries no doubt mean well. The essay, originally entitled The Case of Rev. Dr. Ament, Missionary, was published in the North American Review in April 1901.(Emerson, 258.) Twain explored the delicate moral difference between a demand thirteen times as great as it should be and a demand that was only one and a third times the correct amount. As Paine explains, The point had been made by the board that it was the Chinese custom to make the inhabitants of a village responsible for individual crimes; and custom, likewise, to collect a third in excess of the damage, such surplus having been applied to the support of widows and orphans of the slain converts.(Albert Bigelow Paine, Mark Twain: A Biography, Chapter 214)Ament arrestedIn February 1901 Ament and two British subjects were arrested by German and French troops near Tungchow, and charged with trying to extort money from the Chinese villagers.(J.A, Mitchell, Life (1901): 154.) While the two British subjects were released, Ament was held pending an appeal to United States Minister Conger.(A Missionary Arrested, The New York Times (5 February 1900):5) Ament was subsequently released at the direction of the German military commander, Count von Waldersee.(Mr. Ament Still in Custody: But a Dispatch to London Says Count von Waldersee Has Ordered His Release. New York Times (6 February 1901):6.http://query.nytimes.com/gst/abstract.html?res9A0DE7DE103DEE32A25755C0A9649C946097D6CF; Porter, 221.) Chamberlin indicated that the French and Germans, under pressure from the Americans, released him, insisting that he was never under arrest.(Chamberlin, Ordered, 253-254.)On 15 March 1901, Ament accused German soldiers with plundering the city of Man-Ming, a hundred kilometres from Beijing. Ament said that they ransacked and desecrated a Christian chapel and despoiled the women of their trinkets, even tearing the rings out of their ears and ill-treating them in other ways. The Germans replied by charging the missionaries themselves with partaking of the plunder.(A History of the Precious Metals from the Earliest Times to the Present, 355.)Third furlough (1901-1902)Ament left Beijing on 26 March 1901 to return to the United States to make his case, clear his name and defend the reputation of the other missionaries.(The Current Encyclopedia: A Monthly Record of Human Progress. Volume 1. (Modern Research Society, 1901):37.) On 1 April 1901, Ament, refusing to be a scapegoat in the affair, cabled the following to the ABCFM:Nothing has been done except after consultation with colleagues and the full approval of the United States Minister. I will secure a certificate from Mr. H. Conger to that effect.(William Ament, cable to ABCFM, 1 April 1901, in The Open Court: Devoted to the Science of Religion, the Religion of Science, and the Extension of the Religious Parliament Idea by Paul Carus (The Open Court Pub. Co., 1901):329.)Ament arrived back in the United States on 25 April 1901.( On the same day, The New York Times reprinted an interview with Ament and H. Conger, the United States Minister to China (18981905), originally conducted in Japan on 6 April 1901 while both men were en route to the United States. Conger defended the actions of Ament, indicating confiscated goods had been sold to ensure the survival of Chinese Christians.(The Missionaries Defended: Interviews in Japan with Minister Conger and Dr. Ament: Goods Sold to Succor Native Christians. Kobe Herald (24 April 1901). Reprinted in The New York Times (25 April 1901):2. http://query.nytimes.com/mem/archive-free/pdf?res9A04E5DD1030E132A25756C2A9629C946097D6CF) Conger indicated that the missionaries only appropriated their property for justifiable ends.(A History of the Precious Metals from the Earliest Times to the Present, 358.)In May 1901 Ament responded to his critics during an extended visit to the United States of America in 1901.(Dr. Ament Answers Critics, The New York Times (10 May 1901)) In response to the criticisms of Twain and others, Ament denied that the missionaries forced the Chinese to accept Christianity, and that We treat their beliefs kindly, try to extract the good, and never interfere with their customs, except where they interfere with Christianity.(New York Times (10 May 1901))On 16 May 1901, Ament addressing guests at the third annual Asiatic Society of America dinner in New York, again defended himself and his fellow missionaries:The missionaries in China, of whom I am proud to be one, represent a class of American citizens whose work in the Orient have been purposefully misrepresented....The missionaries words have been twisted, wring interpretations made. The persistency of work like this can only justify the feeling that the root of this un-American warfare is due, not so much to what is seen or known of the deeds of missionaries, but the opposition to Christianity itself. The purpose was fixed before China was reached at all, and this murderous spirit stops not at injustice to individuals.(The Asiastic Society Honors Mr. Conger)By the end of May 1901 ABCFM Board secretary Dr Judson Smith silenced Ament, as he believed further comments were damaging Ament and his colleagues. Smith attempted a final defence of Ament and the other missionaries in May in an essay entitled The Missionaries and Their Critics.(See Judson Smith, The Missionaries and their Critics, North American Review 172 (May 1901); Oggel, 23.)Twain was unrepentant, referring to Christian pirates like Ament and professional hypocrites and liars like Rev. Judson Smith of the American Board....Whenever you ask people to support them missions Joe, do bar China. Their presence there is forbidden by the Bible and by every sentiment of humanity - and fair dealing. And they have done vast mischief there. I would bar no other country.(Mark Twain, quoted in William E. Phipps, Mark Twains Religion (Mercer University Press, 2003): 212.)Fourth missionary term in China (1902-1908)In 1902, Ament and his family returned to Beijing, where he resumed his responsibilities as the pastor the South Chapel of the Congregational Church; and as a trustee of the board of the Episcopal Churchs Peking University (later re-named University).(Porter, 364; http://sarawakiana.blogspot.com/2008/09/my-father-went-to-yen-ching-university.html)By 1902, North China was reported as being pacified. Fellow ABCFM missionary, Howard Spilman Galt (18721948) reported: Everything seems to be remarkably quiet in the field where Dr. Ament took the first steps in reconstructing the work just a year ago. In no place could we discover any but the friendliest feelings toward him. Especially did the officials speak well of him.(North China Seems Pacified, The New York Times (22 March 1902):9; David Shavit, Galt, Howard Spilman in The United States in Asia: A Historical Dictionary, 182.)Advocate of Christian unityAment was an ardent advocate for the federation among Christian forces in China, and supported the comity principle, whereby mission groups would be assigned their own areas for evangelisation to avoid direct competition with other agencies. In 1907 Ament, as Chairman on the Committee on Church Union and Comity, presented a paper to the Centenary Missionary Conference held at Shanghai.(Porter, 369.) Missionary college, Rev. J.P. Jones, ABCFM missionary to India, wrote:His broad Catholic spirit made him a leader among his peers in China in the advocacy of comity and federation among theChristian forces of that great land of China. The missionary body wisely chose him as the chairman of the Committee on Christian Union, of the Shanghai Conference. Few know how thoroughly and eagerly he studied this fundamental question, but we all know how eloquently and convincingly he advocated the cause of union in his report at the great conference. And Christian union in that far-off land will owe more to his sagacity and eager advocacy than any one can now realize.(Dr. J.P. Jones, Madura Mission, India Letter (January 1909); quoted in Porter, 358.)IllnessFrom late July 1908, Ament underwent a series of four operations in the seaside town of Pei Tai Ho (now Beidaihe), Hebei to relieve a serious septic medical condition. He was able to return to Beijing in October, but by 8 November he had developed severe pressure on his brain, necessitating the decision to repatriate him to the United States. The Aments left Beijing on 24 November 1908, and departed China for the final time from Shanghai on 1 December 1908 on the Maru. After transiting Japan, they arrived in San Francisco on Day in 1908. Ament was transferred to the Lane Hospital, but his condition was deemed inoperable.(Porter, 342-347.)DeathDespite being a man of unusual physical endurance, ...after thirty-six years of service and much intense strain,(Mission Studies 29-30:253.) Ament died at the Lane Hospital in  Francisco, California on 6 January 1909, at the age of 57, with both his wife, and son, Will, with him.(( Medical authorities determined that : An abscess of the brain, resulting from septic conditions, was the source of the later symptoms and disabilities.(Porter, 347.)Ament was buried in Owosso, Michigan on Tuesday, 12 January 1909 after a funeral conducted in his home church, the First Congregational Church.(Porter, 349.) Memorial services were held for Ament on Sunday, 17 January 1909 at Owosso, Michigan; Medina, Ohio; and at the Dwight Place Congregational Church, Haven, Connecticut. A final memorial service was held on Sunday 14 February 1909 at the Teng Shih Kou (now Deng Shi Kou) Congregational Church in Beijing,(William Scott Ament: Addresses Given at the Memorial Services Held at Teng Shih Kou Congregational Church, Peking, China, Sunday, February Fourteenth, Nineteen Hundred Nine. North China Union College Press, 1909.) with the Chinese language service at 2.00pm, and the English language service at 4.30pm.(Porter, 349, 351-352.)Evaluation of Ament and his ministryMissionary colleague Charles Ewing in a letter dated 2 January 1899, provided an evaluation of Ament and his ministry:Dr. Ament was the preacher yesterday and held his audience well throughout his rather extended discourse. ... I suppose there can be little doubt that Dr. Ament is the best Chinese language preacher in the city. The people like to hear him. And then, he is exceedingly good in personal work, taking an interest in men individually and winning them. This kind of pastoral work is just as invaluable here as it is at home. ... In every way, it is a great advantage to have the senior member of the station Peking back on the field and at work again. And then, Dr. Ament is a great worker. How he gets through with so much work, I dont know. I was always said that he could do two mens work....(Charles Ewing to Judson Smith, 2 January 1899, Peking, Death Throes of a Dynasty, 58-59.)A colleague called Ament the ideal missionary in recognition of his dedication, courage, proficiency and expertise in China and the Chinese language, and leadership of his flock of Chinese Christians.(Thompson, Larry Clinton, William Scott Ament and the Boxer Rebellion. Jefferson, NC: McFarland, 2009, 3) After his death, the Michigan newspaper indicated that Ament was easily the most useful man Owosso ever produced.( A street in Owosso was named in his honour.(http://maps.google.com.au/maps?qAment%20Street%20Owosso&oeutf-8&rlsorg.mozilla:en-US:official&clientfirefox-a&um1&ieUTF-8&saN&hlen&tabwl) Ament is regarded as one of the former residents of Owosso who have made national and international impacts on society.(http://seeowosso.com/community/bios-2/ (accessed 1 April 2009).)In a letter to Myra Smith on 27 February 1909, not long after Aments death, Charles Ewing, one of Aments colleagues, wrote:I have just been writing today to Will Ament. You must know of the death of his father Dr. William Ament, on January 6. I wanted to give Will a new view on the largeness and strength of his father. He is the best evangelistic worker and the most successful organizer that we have ever had in the Mission. His loss will be felt seriously, both by the work and by the workers personally. But he had done his work so thoroly sic and well that no other station could lose its leading worker and be left so strong as Peking. After many years of most faithful, earnest, painstaking labor, he had just succeeded in getting everything into such shape that, as he faced death, it was not with the sense of duties left undone, but in the calm assurance that now at last he could be spared.(Charles Ewing to Myra Smith, 27 February 1909, Hsiku, Tientsin, China; Death Throes of a Dynasty, 208.)In 1935 William E. Griffis indicated:For the missionaries and diplomatists there were rescue, food, and certain indemnity; but what of the native Christians exiled from their homes and fields, of which only vestiges remained? Where was even food to come from? In such a crisis, brave men, like the American Dr. Ament, went out into the open country. According to justice and immemorial custom in China, he compelled the village elders, who had connived at, or encouraged the Boxers, to furnish supplies of food. From the confiscated property in Peking, money was obtained to support the native Christians until they could be sent home. This action was misunderstood and maligned at home by a popular author. He caught a Tartar in attacking Dr. Ament, who showed the true facts.(William E. Griffis, Chinas Story: In Myth, Legend, And Annals. Rev. ed. (Boston and New York: Houghton Mifflin, 1935): 270-271.http://www.mainlesson.com/display.php?authorgriffis&bookchina&storyallies)According to a 2009 book by Larry Thompson, Aments resourceful heroism was tarnished by hubris and looting. Once publicly criticized by Mark Twain, Ament grew notorious in the controversy surrounding foreign missionaries in China.(Thompson, 3)ReferencesWritings of William Scott AmentArticles* The Ancient Coinage of China. The American Journal of Archaeology and of the History of the Fine Arts 4:3 (September 1888):284-290.* A Bishops Loot, Independent 53 (1901):2217-2218.* The Charges against Missionaries, Independent 53 (1901): 1051-52.* The Chinese Settlement once more. Independent (12 September 1901):2147.* Chinese Temperance Legislation. Journal of the North China Branch of the Royal Asiatic Society of Great Britain and Ireland 20 (1885): 254. Shanghai: Shanghai Literary and Scientific Society. Kelly & Walsh, 1885.* Marco Polo in Cambaluc: A Comparison of Foreign and Native Accounts. Peking Oriental Society Journal 3:2 (1892):97-122.* A Periodical Literature for China.* Romanism in China. The Chinese Recorder 14 (JanuaryFebruary 1883): 47-55.* The Chinese Recorder 24 (July 1893): 343-344.* The Spiritual Needs of Native Christians, 44ff. In The Evangelisation of China: Addresses Delivered at Five Conferences of Christian Workers, Held During August, September and October, 1896, at Chefoo, Peking, Shanghai, Foochow and Hankow. Edited by David Willard Lyon. Published by The Tientsin Press, pub. by the National Committee of the College Young Mens Christian Association of China, 1897.Books* Comity and Federation. Published by Centenary Missionary Conference, 1906.* The Giant Awakened. n.p., n.d.Sources and Further ReadingArticlesContemporaneous (1877-1910)* Barton, James L. An Appreciation of Dr. Ament. Missionary Herald (February 1909).* Bellamy, Francis Rufus. Article in New Outlook. Outlook Publishing Company, Inc., 1901. See pages 377-388 for Ament.* Chautauqua Institution. The Chautauquan 34 (1902):13. Chautauqua Literary and Scientific Circle, 1902.* Fibre & Fabric: A Record of American Textile Industries in the Cotton and Woolen Trade 33 (1901). Details arrest of Ament.* The Giant Awakened, Gleanings in Bee Culture 37 (1909):23ff. Published by A. I. Root Co., 1909. Article on Ament with reference to his pastorate in Medina, Ohio.* Gilman, Daniel Coit; Harry Thurston Peck; and Frank Moore Colby. William Scott Ament, 435. In The New International Encyclopaedia. Dodd, Mead and Company, 1902.* Mitchell, John Ames, ed. Life. Vol. 37 (1901). Page 298.* Reid, Gilbert. The Ethics of the Last War, Forum 32 (1902):446-55.* Reid, Gilbert. The Ethics of Loot, Forum 31 (1901):581-86.* Reid, Gilbert. North-China Herald, (27 March 1901):602-3.* Smith, Arthur Henderson. North-China Herald (19 June 1901):1193-94.* Smith, Judson. The Missionaries and their Critics, North American Review 172 (May 1901):724-733.* Smith, Judson. North-China Herald (3 April 1901):660-61.* Smylie, James H. The Preacher: Mark Twain and Slaying Christians. Theology Today (January 2001). http://findarticles.com/p/articles/mi_qa3664/is_200101/ai_n8943851/pg_1?tagartBody;col1* Twain, Mark. To My Missionary Critics. The North American Review 172 (April 1901):520. On-line: http://www.antiimperialist.com/templates/Flat/img/pdf2/ToMissCritics.pdf* Twain, Mark. To the Person Sitting in Darkness. The North American Review 172 (February 1901):161. On-line: http://www.antiimperialist.com/templates/Flat/img/pdf2/PersonSittinginDarkness.pdf* The Future of China. Oberlin Review (10 October 1901): 40-41. http://www.library.yale.edu/div/colleges/oberlin/news/FutureOfChina.html* United States War Dept. Report of the Lieutenant-General Commanding the Army, in Seven Parts: Military Operations in China. 1900. See page 138 for reference to Ament.* Wilder, G.D. Wm. Scott Ament, Chinese Recorder (May 1909):276-81.Recent* Gibson, William M. Mark Twain and Howells: Anti-Imperialists. The New England Quarterly (December 1947): 435ff.* Hunt, Michael H. The Forgotten Occupation: Peking, 1900-1901. The Pacific Historical Review 48:4 (November 1979):501-529.* Kinch, J.C.B. Europe and Elsewhere, in The Mark Twain Encyclopedia. Page 261.* King, H.H. The Boxer Indemnity: Nothing but Bad Modern Asian Studies 40:3 (2006):663-689.* Maier-Katkin, Birgit and Daniel Maier-Katkin. At the Heart of Darkness: Crimes Against Humanity and the Banality of Evil. Human Rights Quarterly 26:3 (August 2004):584-604.* Newman, Rhoda. Mark Twain, Internationalist: Travel writer and diplomat wannabe waxes satirically on envoys, imperialism. Foreign Service Journal (February 1996):18-23; http://www.twainweb.net/filelist/intl01.html.* Scully, Eileen P. Taking the Low Road to Sino-American Relations: Open Door Expansionists and the Two China Markets. The Journal of American History 82:1 (June 1995):62-83.* Titta, R. Mark Twain and the Onset of the Imperialist Period. The Internationalist (SeptemberOctober 1997). http://www.internationalist.org/marktwain3.htmlBooksContemporaneous (1877-1950)* American Council of Learned Societies Devoted to Humanistic Studies, Dictionary of American Biography. Volume 1. New York: Charles Scribners Sons, 1964. See page 241 for article on Ament.* Barton, James L. The Missionary and His Critics. New York, NY: Fleming H. Revell Company, 1906.* Chamberlin, Georgia Louise, ed. Ordered to China: Letters of Wilbur J. Chamberlin Written from China While Under Commission from the New York Sun During the Boxer Uprising of 1900 and the International Complications which Followed. F. A. Stokes company, 1903. http://ia311215.us.archive.org/2/items/orderedtochinale00cham/orderedtochinale00cham.pdf Chamberlin sent the initial despatch that fueled the Indemnity Controversy between Twain and Ament.* Clark, Francis Edward. Memories of Many Men in Many Lands: An Autobiography. United Society of Christian Endeavor, 1922.* Conger, Sarah Pike. Letters from China: With Particular Reference to the Empress Dowager and the Women of China. A.C. McClurg & Co., 1910.* Cromer, Jeremiah C. William S. Ament: An Ideal Missionary. Pamphlet, Envelope Series 12, no. 2 (July 1909).* Denby, Charles. China and Her People: Being the Observations, Reminiscences, and Conclusions of an American Diplomat. L.C. Page & company, 1905. Denby defends Aments role in collecting indemnities after the Boxer Uprising. See pages 217-218.* Griffis, William Elliot. Chinas Story: In Myth, Legend, And Annals. Rev. ed. Boston and New York: Houghton Mifflin, 1935.* Ketler, Isaac Conrad. The Tragedy of Paotingfu: An Authentic Story of the Lives, Services and Sacrifices of the Presbyterian, Congregational and China Inland Missionaries who Suffered Martyrdom at Paotingfu, China, June 30 and July 1, 1900. Revell, 1902.* Latourette, Kenneth Scott. A History of Christian Missions in China. The Macmillan company, 1929.* Lumis, Charles Fletcher. The Land of Sunshine. Vol. 14. F.A. Pattee, 1901. Page 237.* McIntosh, Gilbert. Is There Anything in It?: Some After-crisis Vindications. Morgan & Scott, 1902. Pages 4856.* Memoriam William Scott Ament, 1851-1909: Memorial Addresses, Tungchou, 1909, 47pp. http://www.columbia.edu/cu/lweb/img/assets/6398/MRL6_CorbettSmith_FA.pdf* Miner, Luella. Chinas Book of Martyrs: A Record of Heroic Martyrdoms and Marvelous Deliverances of Chinese Christians During the Summer of 1900. Jennings and Pye, 1903. Pages 79, 243.* Oberlin College. Annual Reports. (September 1908-October 1909):384-385.* Paine, Albert Bigelow. Mark Twain: A Biography: The Personal and Literary Life of Samuel Langhorne Clemens. Mark Twain and the Missionaries. Chapter CCXIV. http://ebooks.adelaide.edu.au/t/twain/mark/paine/chapter214.html* Porter, Henry Dwight. William Scott Ament: Missionary of the American Board to China. Revell, 1911. On-line:http://www.archive.org/download/williamscottamen00port/williamscottamen00port.pdf* Rose, Martha Emily Parmelee. The Western Reserve of Ohio and Some of Its Pioneers, Places and Womens Clubs, National American Woman Suffrage Association Collection. Euclid Print. Co., 1914. See page 133.* Russell, Nellie Naomi. Gleanings from Chinese Folklore: With some of her stories of life in China, to which are added memorial sketches of the author from associates and friends.. Comp. Mary Harriet Porter. Chicago: Fleming H. Revell, 1915. Page 34.* Shaw, William. The Evolution of an Endeavorer: An Autobiography. Boston: Christian Endeavor World, 1924. See pages 227-228, 319-320.* Twain, Mark. Mark Twain: Collected Tales, Sketches, Speeches, and Essays: Volume 2: 1891-1910. Library of America, 1992.* William Scott Ament: Addresses Given at the Memorial Services Held at Teng Shih Kou Congregational Church, Peking, China, Sunday, February Fourteenth, Nineteen Hundred Nine. North China Union College Press, 1909.Recent* Bickers, Robert A. and R. G. Tiedemann. The Boxers, China, and the World. Rowman & Littlefield, 2007. ISBN 0-7425-5395-7, 9780742553958.* Deane, Hugh. Good Deeds & Gunboats: Two Centuries of American-Chinese Encounters. China Books & Periodicals, 1990. See page 66 for the Ament-Twain controversy.* Edwards, Dwight Woodbridge. Yenching University. United Board for Christian Higher Education in Asia, 1959. Pages 13, 34.* Ewing, Charles Edward; and Bessie Smith Ewing. Death Throes of a Dynasty: Letters and Diaries of Charles and Bessie Ewing, Missionaries to China. Ed. E. G. Ruoff. Kent State University Press, 1990.* Foner, Philip Sheldon. Mark Twain: Social Critic. International Publishers, 1958. See page 280.* Geismar, Maxwell David. Mark Twain: An American Prophet. Houghton Mifflin, 1970. See 207-209 for analysis of Twains attack on Ament.* Changsheng .  From Morrison to Stuart: Critical Reviews on Protestant Missionaries in China.  Shanghai Renmin Chubanshe, 1985. Includes Ament.* Harris, Susan K. Mark Twain and Americas Christian Mission Abroad, In A Companion to Mark Twain, eds. Peter Messent and Louis J. Budd. Blackwell, 2005. ISBN 978-1-4051-2379-2.* Hunter, Jane. The Gospel of Gentility: Americam Women Missionaries in Turn-of-the-Century China. Yale University Press, 1984.* Lodwick, Kathleen, ed. The Chinese Recorder Index: A Guide to Christian Missions in Asia, 1867-1941. Rowman & Littlefield, 1986. See index on page 7 for extensive list of articles by both William & Mary Ament.* Lutz, Jesse Gregory. China and the Christian Colleges, 1850-1950. Cornell University Press, 1971.* Miller, Stuart Creighton. Ends and Means: Missionary Justification of Force in Nineteenth Century China, The Missionary Enterprise in China and America, ed. J.K. Fairbank (Cambridge, MA: Harvard University Press, 1974):249-282.* Oggel, L. Terry. American Board of Foreign Missions, p. 23. In The Mark Twain Encyclopedia, edited by J. R. LeMaster; James Darrell Wilson; and Christie Graves Hamric. Taylor & Francis, .* Preston, Diana. Besieged in Peking: The Story of the 1900 Boxer Rising. Constable, 1999. Page 69.* Preston, Diana. The Boxer Rebellion: The Dramatic Story of Chinas War on Foreigners that Shook the World in the Summer of 1900. Walker, 2000; See page 395. Berkley Books, 2001. See page 291 for a description of missionary looting.* Shavit, David. The United States in Asia: A Historical Dictionary. Greenwood, 1990. See pages 67 for an article on Ament.* Strong, William Ellsworth. The Story of the American Board: An Account of the First Hundred Years of the American Board for Foreign Missions. Arno Press, 1969.* Thompson, Larry Clinton. William Scott Ament and the Boxer Rebellion: Heroism, Hubris and the Ideal Missionary. McFarland & Company, March 2009.Dissertations and Theses* Wong, Lai Hang. Protestant Missionary Concepts Of and Revolutions in China, 1895-1911. A Dissertation. Presented to the Faculty of Arts in partial fulfillment of the requirements for the Master of Arts, University of Hong Kong, 1976.zh:
20649175
Electoral_districts_in_Sri_Lanka
The 1978 Constitution of Lanka provides for the election of members of Parliament from 22 multi-member districts through the representation electoral system.All but two of the electoral districts are conterminous with their namesake administrative district. The two exceptions are Jaffna (which covers the administrative districts of Jaffna and Kilinochchi) and Vanni (which covers the administrative districts of Mannar, Mullaitivu and Vavuniya). The first general election which used these electoral districts was in 1989.Constitutional provisionAccording to the constitution the Parliament should consist of 225 seats (members):()* 36 seats were allocated to the nine provinces, four each (section 96(4)).() A delimitation commission would apportion the four seats between the electoral districts in each province.(* 160 seats were allocated to the electoral districts (section 98).() An election commission would apportion the seats annually based on the number of registered electors.* 29 seats were reserved for the national list (section 99A).()Delimitation commissionThe constitution required the establishment of a delimitation commission for the delimitation of the electoral districts and apportion the 36 provincial seats.()( The constitution limited the number of electoral districts to between 20 and 25.(The Delimitation Commission was appointed on 29 November 1978. Its decision was published on 15 January 1981. The country was divided into 22 electoral districts. 21 of the 22 electoral districts were conterminous with their namesake administrative district. The other electoral district - Vanni - consisted of the administrative districts of Mannar, Mullaitivu and Vavuniya. The 36 provincial seats were apportioned as follows:* Central Province - Kandy 1; Matale 1; Nuwara Eliya 2.* Eastern Province - Ampara 2; Batticaloa 1; Trincomalee 1.* Northern Province - Jaffna 1, Vanni 3.* North Central Province - Anuradhapura 2, Polonnaruwa 2.* North Western Province - Kurunegala 2, Puttalam 2.* Sabaragamuwa Province - Kegalla 2; Ratnapura 2.* Southern Province - Galle 1, Matara 1; Hambantota 2.* Uva Province - Badulla 2; Monaragala 2.* Western Province - Colombo 2; Gampaha 1; Kalutara 1.Kilinochchi Administrative District was created from southern Jaffna Administrative District in February 1984. Consequently Jaffna Electoral District now consists of administrative districts (Jaffna and Kilinochchi).Jaffna seats controversyThe annual updating of the register in Sri Lanka is done by house-to-house enumeration. The civil war prevented house-to-house enumeration from taking place in most of the Northern Province from the mid-1980s onwards. For these areas the Department of Elections instead took the previous years register and added anyone who had since turned 18. The civil war resulted in significant population displacement and emigration from the Northern Province. Two of the biggest displacements occurred in 1995 and 2008. Virtually the entire population of the peninsula fled to the Vanni in 1995 to escape the military onslaught by the Lankan military as they tried to recapture the peninsula from the rebel Tigers of Tamil Eelam. Most of the population of the Vanni were displaced in 2008 as they fled the military onslaught by the Sri Lankan military to recapture the Vanni from the LTTE. Hundreds of thousands fled abroad from the Northern Province during the civil war. Tens of thousands also fled to other parts of Sri Lanka outside the conflict zone, particularly to the capital Colombo.As a consequence of all this the electoral register for the Northern Province was overstated for many years. The civil war ended in May 2009 and in 2010 the first house-to-house enumeration in around 25 years took place in most of the Northern Province. The result of the enumeration was that about 300,000 electors were deleted from the electoral register for the Northern Province. Consequently the total number of parliamentary seats allocated to Jaffna Electoral District, one of the two electoral districts that make up the Northern Province, was reduced from 10 (2009) to 6 (2010). The number of parliamentary seats allocated to Electoral District, the other electoral district in the Northern Province, remained unchanged at 6.Jaffna Electoral Districts problems were exacerbated by the decision of the 1978 Delimitation Commission to allocate it only one of the four provincial seats - the other three provincial seats were allocated to Vanni Electoral District even though at that time Jaffna had more than four times the number of electors than Vanni. This decision meant that 30 years later Jaffna has the same number of total seats (six) as Vanni despite having more than twice the number of electors. Jaffna now also has one fewer seat than Electoral District, Electoral District and Eliya Electoral District despite having more electors. It has two fewer seats than Electoral District despite having only 25,000 fewer electors.The decision by the Department of Elections to reduce Jaffnas seats has drawn much criticism, particularly by opposition parties.()() They point out that although there are only a small number of people still in IDP camps, tens of thousands had not returned to their homes and were living with relatives due to the existence of High Security Zones and ongoing de-mining. It is not known if all of these people were registered to vote. For most people in the Northern Province rebuilding their lives after the devastating civil war was far more important than registering to vote. Many also hadnt any form of identification to register as they had lost their official documents during the frequent displacements. As result the electoral register for Jaffna Electoral District was now likely to be understated. It is also not known if those who had fled to other parts of Sri Lanka like Colombo were registered to vote in those areas. The government and the Department of Elections have rejected the criticism, saying that they were only doing what the constitution required them to do.()()  Number of seats per electoral districtCurrentNumber of seats per electoral district according to the 2010 electoral register published on 18 July 2011.HistoricHistorical allocation of seats.()()References
20674450
Arakkuparamba
 Arakkuparamba  is a village in district in the state of Kerala, India.()As the name denotes, the place was once famous for mining iron ore. Arakkuparamba and Aliparamba are neighbouring places. The ore mined from Arakkuparamba was converted into iron plates and rods at Aliparamba. Ore melting technology was known to the ancient inhabitants. Ayirumada (or iron ore mining places) can still be seen there. This place was under the control of Chera Kings and was under the Nedunganad Principality. The Zamoothiri of Calicut defeated Nedungadees of Nedunganad and brought this place under their control. Remnants of ancient temples are seen at different places. With the help of local people, these temples are being renovated.Famous Brandan, a member  of Parayipetty Panthirukulam believed to be a member of  Narayanathumana. Karuthedath Mana is another famous Namboodiri Illam.   Thottathodi  is another famous Nair tharavaadu.  A member of this family Mr. Raman nair constructed the first school at Arakkuparamba.Demographics India census, Arakkuparamba had a population of 14784 with 7188 males and 7596 females.(References
20685599
Detroit_Diesel_110
The Detroit Diesel Series 110, with 110 cubic inches displacement per cylinder, was introduced in 1945 as more-powerful alternative to the existing 71 engines. It was used in a variety of applications, including construction equipment and power generation. The most popular use was in the Budd RDC self-powered rail car. It was also heavily used in Euclid construction machinery. In 1951 a marine version was also introduced. Overview The Detroit Diesel Series 110 is a cycle engine series, available in six cylinder inline configuration (in keeping with the standard Detroit Diesel practice at the time, engines were referred to using a concatenation of the number of cylinders and the displacement, so this was a model 6-110). It was introduced as the second mass-market product of the Detroit Diesel Engine Division of General Motors in 1945.The 6-110 series engines utilize uniflow scavenging, where a blower mounted to the exterior of the engine provides intake air through cored passages in the engine block and ports in the cylinder walls at slightly greater than atmospheric pressure. The engine exhausts through push-rod operated poppet valves in the cylinder head, with either two or four valves per cylinder. Unit fuel injection is employed, one injector per cylinder, with no high fuel pressure outside of the injector body. The injectors are cycled from the same camshaft responsible for opening the exhaust valves.As a two stroke cycle Diesel engine cannot naturally aspirate, or draw in its own intake air, the blower is necessary to provide air in an amount sufficient both for scavenging of exhaust gasses from the cylinder and to support combustion. Initial versions of the 6-110 engine used a centrifugal-type supercharger. This was very practical for fixed-speed applications such as marine or generator service, but proved a failure in automotive applications. The engine was developed on the dyno and was never operated above rated RPM. The first application was in Euclid mining trucks, where the drivers income depends on how fast he drives the empty truck back down into the pit. The centrifugal blower ran about 10 times engine speed. Exceeding that RPM was fatal, and in a truck a single missed downshift could mean a failed engine.(Wheels of Time (Antique Truck Historical Society, www.aths.org), Jan/Feb 2004 Pg. 17) For that reason a Roots type blower was made available as an option after about 1952.   Later high performance versions were available with turbochargers.The initial Series 71 engines from Detroit Diesel were produced in 1-, 2-, 3-, 4- and 6- cylinder versions. The most powerful version, the 6-71, displaced 426 cubic inches and produced  at 1800 rpm. While these engines with their low cost and relatively light were highly successful, there was also great demand for higher horsepower, especially for non-highway applications such as power generation and construction equipment.Since inline engines of more than 6 cylinders tend to have substantial technical problems, and since GM was not to perfect V-block engine technology for another decade, they took two divergent approaches to achieving higher horsepower. One was to couple together multiple 6-71 engines in twin (side-by-side), tandem (fore-and-aft) and the incredible Quad (four 6-71s all driving a single shaft). While these did produce high horsepower and even added some redundancy, they were mechanically complex and relatively expensive.The alternative approach was to design a new engine and increase the displacement from the existing 71 cubic inches to 110 cubic inches, or roughly a 50% increase. This resulted in the model 6-110 or 660 cubic inches total displacement. While the basic engine components (block, crankshaft, pistons, etc.) were all new, many of the additional components (injectors, governors, accessories, marine gears) were simply shared with the Series 71 engines. Since the 6-110 was designed from the outset for heavy-duty high-horsepower applications, it was never produced in a four cylinder version (that would have displaced 440 cubic inches, very close to the 426 ci displaced by the 6-71).The introduction of the V-71 series in 1957 effectively doomed the 6-110, as both the 8-71 (568 cubic inch displacement) and 12-71 (852 cubic inch displacement) offered higher horsepower in a more compact form factor. However the high torque and great reliability of the 6-110 was still valued for heavy-duty applications.The Series 110 was last produced in 1965, after which the manufacturing rights were purchased by the W. W. Williams Distribution Company, which continues to provide parts for these engines. Specifications The 6-110 was a remarkably flexible engine. The same basic block was available in both clockwise and counterclockwise rotation, and the exhaust manifold was also available on either the left or right side. A turbocharged model was on the market by 1958, boosting the power to 349 HP at 2000 RPM.All 6-110 engines were designated a Unit Model Number 62200, with 62200 RA designating starboard rotation and 62200 LA designating port rotation.Other specifications include: Advertising Quoting from an introductory ad (Yachting Magazine, January 1951):Heres the newest member of the General Motors Diesel family - the brawny 6-110 engine that develops 275 horsepower. It is 50% more powerful thn the famous 6-cylinder GM 71 engine that powers so many of Americas fine yachts, tugs and fishing vessels -- yet it weighs less than 15 pounds per horsepower, including the famous GM hydraulic reverse gear.References
20699603
John_Wheeler_Leavitt
File:MrsJohnWheelerLeavitt1.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Mrs. John Wheeler Leavitt Grandmother of Philadelphia artist Beaux, knitting, 1885My grandparents were both of Puritan New England stock, English entirely. Their ancestors had been early settlers in the northern and western part of Connecticut. My grandfather, John Wheeler Leavitt, came from the township of Washington; my grandmother, whose name was Cecilia Kent, from Suffield.&ndash;  American painter Cecilia Beaux, Background with Figures: Autobiography of Cecilia Beaux, Houghton Mifflin Company, 1930John Wheeler Leavitt  (1790&ndash;1870) was a prominent York City businessman, founder of J. W. & R. Leavitt Company, eventually declared insolvent, and grandfather of American society portrait painter Beaux, who frequently painted members of the family.(Among the many portraits that Cecilia Beaux painted of Leavitt family members were her New England Woman (Mrs. Jedediah H. Richards, ne Julia Leavitt), and portraits of her grandmother Leavitt, Sarah Allibone Leavitt as well as Beauxs cousin, Wellford Leavitt.http://tfaoi.org/aa/3aa/3aa276.htm) Leavitt ran the family-owned trading partnership, and was one of the most prominent businessmen of his age until financial reverses caused the bankruptcy of the firm. In spite of the financial reverses, Leavitt and his wife went on to help raise their granddaughter painter Beaux after her mother died shortly after she was born and her French father fled back to France. John Wheeler Leavitt was born July 3, 1790, at Connecticut, the son of Samuel Leavitt and Lydia Wheeler Leavitt. John W. Leavitts father Samuel came from a branch of a Massachusetts family which had settled in Connecticut in the eighteenth century,(John Wheeler Leavitts father Samuel was the son of David Leavitt, whose own father had moved from Massachusetts to the Connecticut frontier early in the eighteenth century.) and Samuel later served as representative to the General Assembly from Washington.(History of Ancient Woodbury, Connecticut, From the First Indian Deed in 1659 to 1854, William Cothren, Published by Bronson Brothers, Waterbury, Conn., 1854) On August 22, 1820, Samuels merchant son John Wheeler Leavitt married Cecilia Kent, who was from an old Connecticut, family, with whom the Leavitts had extensively intermarried.(Family History of Samuel Kent, Suffield Historical Society) (Todays Kent Memorial Library in Suffield is named for the family.)John Wheeler Leavitt moved to New York City at a young age, where he entered into business with his brother Rufus in the firm they called J. W. & R. Leavitt. Operating primarily as traders, sometimes with first cousin David Leavitt, the pair bought and sold nearly everything, including real estate in Illinois and Georgia.(Georgia and the Southeast Historical News, usgennet.org) Leavitt made an early splash, serving as one of the founders of the Life Insurance Company.(History of New York City, Vol. II, Benson John Lossing, The Perine Engraving and Publishing Company, New York, 1884) As early as 1828, Leavitt was named a co-founder and initial sponsor of the Mercantile Library of New York City, which was co-founded by Jacob Astor, Tappan, and a handful of other powerful early Manhattan businessmen.(Hunts Merchants Magazine, The Merchants Magazine and Commercial Review, Vol. IV, Freeman Hunt, New York, 1841) Leavitt also served as director of several early New York City banking firms, including Bank of America.(A Century of Banking in New York, 1822&ndash;1922, Henry Wysham Lanier, The Gilliss Press, New York City, 1922)(The New York Annual Register For the Year of Our Lord 1837, Edwin Williams, Published by G. & C. Carvill & Co., New York, 1837)Leavitt also served as president of the New York City Board of Trade in 1841 (Report of the Committee of Arrangements of the Common Council of the City of New York ) In 1836, the prominent New York businessman served on the executive committee of the Temperance Society.(The Christian Philanthropist, or Harbinger of the Millennium) Heavily involved in charitable work, Leavitt also served as a director of the New York Institution for the Instruction of the Deaf and Dumb.(Observations on the Education of the Deaf and Dumb, Office of North American Review, Boston, Printed by J. H. Low, 1834) He also served on the boards of the Prison Discipline Society, the American Education Society, the New York Hospital Society, the Central American Education Society, the New York Temperance Society and other charitable organizations, and as an elder of the Avenue Presbyterian Church on Manhattans Avenue. John Wheeler Leavitt also served with other prominent New York merchants and educators on the board of the New York Atheneum, an institution which eventually led to the founding of New York University(History of the New York Society Library, Austin Baxter Keep, Printed for the Trustees by The De Vinne Press, New York, 1908), and was a founding trustee of the Clinton Hall Association.(The founding trustees of Clinton Hall, located at Nassau and Beekman Streets in a hall constructed for the Association were Hone, Tappan, William W. Woolsey, John Haggerty, Francis Olmstead, John A. Stevens and John W. Leavitt. Leavitt served as the Associations first treasurer.http://books.google.com/books?idRj5NAAAAMAAJ&q%22john+w.+leavitt%22+david&dq%22john+w.+leavitt%22+david&lr&eiW1BGSb6XDZeOkATcyJXODg&pgis1) Leavitt and his brother Rufus also served as life members of the Colonization Society, an attempt by early American abolitionists to subsidize a colony in Africa where America could export its free black citizens.(The African Repository and Colonial Journal, American Colonization Society, Vol. XXV, 1849, Printed by C. Alexander, Washington, D.C., 1849)In 1836 and 1837, Leavitt served as a Director of the York and Erie Railroad.(Between the Ocean and the Lakes: The Story of Erie, Edward Harold Mott, Ticker Publishing Co., New York, 1908) Among the host of other companies Leavitt was involved with were the Central Railroad (Documents from Utah Central show Leavitt living at 48 W. Ninth Street in New York City) Leavitt had become a fixture on the Manhattan economic scene, and his presence on committees was noted by early New York mayor Hone.(The Diary of Philip Hone, 1828&ndash;1851, Vol. I, Philip Hone, Bayard Tuckerman (ed.), Dodd, Mead & Company, New York, 1889) (Leavitt had been one of Hones earliest and most prominent supporters in his successful mayoral candidacy).(The Magazine of American History with Notes and Queries, Vol. XXIII, John Austin Stevens, Printed by J. J. Little & Co., New York, 1890) In 1837 Leavitt was member of a committee devoted to receiving Senator Webster in York City following his resignation from the Senate.(Speeches and Forensic Arguments By Daniel Webster, Vol. III, Tappan, Whittemore, and Mason, Boston, Mass., 1848)Merchant Leavitt had reached the apogee of the Manhattan social whirl, with American furniture maker Phyfe producing furniture for the successful businessman.(Winter Antique Show Bows in for 51st Year, R. Scudder Smith, Antiques and the Arts Online)(One Duncan Phyfe piece, an ebonized and gilt bronze-mounted rosewood secretaire, described by experts as one of the ten finest pieces of American furniture made in the first half of the nineteenth century, escaped the clutches of Leavitts creditors and eventually descended to artist granddaughter Beaux, who left it in turn to her beloved nephew Cecil Drinker, a University physician.) By 1850 New York newspapers were heralding the upcoming marriage of the daughter of the prosperous Connecticut-born merchant to the scion of a French-family-owned silk-manufacturing firm.(Jean-Adolphe Beaux was from a family of French Huguenots long engaged in the silk business.http://www.tfaoi.com/aa/3aa/3aa283.htm) In that year John Wheeler Leavitts daughter Cecilia Kent Leavitt was married to Mr Adolph Beaux of the house of J. P. Beaux & Co., Naples in a society wedding at the Fifth Avenue Presbyterian Church.(NYC Marriage Notices, 1843&ndash;1856, The New York Society Library)But the following years brought disaster to the socially prominent families of both Leavitt and Beaux. In 1855 John W. Leavitts daughter Cecilia died 12 days after giving birth to her daughter Cecilia Beaux, who was then sent with a sister to grandparents John Wheeler and Cecilia (Kent) Leavitts New York home. By the time of Cecilia Beauxs mothers death, Leavitt and his wife were living in austere circumstances, following the collapse of his once-thriving business. The origins of the collapse of Leavitts business interests are not recorded, but the aftermath was stunning. Countless suits were filed against John Wheeler Leavitt and his brother Rufus by creditors anxious to reclaim what was left of their funds. Some of the suits, recorded in The New-York Legal Observer, even hinted at fraud as the once-highflying partnership of the two Leavitt brothers collapsed.(The New-York Legal Observer Containing Reports of Cases, Vol. IX, Samuel Owen (ed.), Printed by Angell, Engel and Hewitt, New York, 1851)On top of the business reversals of the Leavitt family firm, Jean Adolph Beauxs business interests collapsed in the years following the birth of his daughter. The French businessman returned to his native country, with only one visit back to Philadelphia in 16 years to see the family he left behind.But in spite of the collapse of the family firm, grandparents John Wheeler and Cecilia Kent Leavitt took in the two children,(Jean Adolph Beaux and his wife Cecilia Leavitt had three daughters, one of whom died in infancy.) and proved instrumental in raising them through the years. Cecilia Beaux later painted her Suffield-born grandmother several times, and called her crucial to her development as an artist.(Portrait of Mrs. John Wheeler Leavitt, 1855, Cecilia Beaux, Westmoreland Museum of American Art, Greensburg, Pennsylvania, ExplorePAhistory.com)Especially attached to her grandmother Cecilia Kent Leavitt, writes art historian Tara Tappert in her Cecilia Beaux and the Art of Portraiture, Beaux regarded her as the strongest and most beneficent influence in her life.(Cecilia Beaux and the Art of Portraiture, p. 16. Tara Leigh Tappert, National Portrait Gallery (Smithsonian Institution), Westmoreland Museum of Art, Published for the National Portrait Gallery by the Smithsonian Institution Press, 1995, ISBN 1560986581, 9781560986584) In the wake of the devastation that struck the family, it was Cecilia Kent Leavitt who provided an emotional bulwark for her grandchildren. Beaux recalled later that her grandmother stressed a pragmatic approach to life, in which everything undertaken must be completed, conquered. The unsettled years during the Civil War were particularly difficult, as Beauxs absent father provided little emotional or financial support, and her Leavitt grandparents had lost much of their wealth and prominence.For many years, portraitist Beaux and her cousin Emma Leavitt shared a Philadelphia studio, a bond encouraged by Beauxs Leavitt grandmother.(Painting Professionals: Women Artists & the Development of Modern American Art, 1870&ndash;1930, Kirsten Swinth, Published by University of North Carolina Press, 2001, ISBN 0807849715, 9780807849712) The shared studio was not the only Leavitt bond that eased Cecilia Beauxs passage as an artist: her aunt Eliza Leavitt was her first painting teacher, and Philadelphia history painter and cousin Catherine Drinker contributed to the young Beauxs education.(Paintings and Sculpture in the Collection of the National Academy of Design, David Bernard Dearinger, John Davis, National Academy of Design, Published by Hudson Hills, 2004, ISBN 1555950299, 9781555950293)John Wheeler Leavitt is buried within Vault 39 of York Marble Cemetery, a resting place he purchased in 1830, when times were good.(New York Marble Cemetery Early Vault Owners, marblecemetery.org) The cemetery, built on the northern edge of Manhattans development, was a favored resting place for New Yorks leading professional and merchant families. Leavitt died in New York City on July 17, 1870. His wife Cecilia, who proved so crucial in the development of her artist granddaughter, died on May 9, 1892.thumb|left|200px|American portrait artist Cecilia Beaux, ca. 1888. Raised by grandfather John Wheeler Leavitt and wife Cecilia (Kent) LeavittJohn Wheeler Leavitt and his wife had eight children, five of them girls. Leavitt was the great-grandfather of College Professor Henry S. Drinker.(Henry Drinker Papers, Haverford College Library)(Noted biographer and writer Drinker Bowen was the niece of Cecilia Beaux.http://www.aaa.si.edu/collections/collection/beauceci.htm) John Wheeler Leavitts youngest daughter Emily Austin Leavitt had married William Foster Biddle, a Philadelphia civil and mining engineer who proved adept at looking after his nieces.(Whos Who in Pennsylvania, A Biographical Dictionary of Contemporaries, Second Edition, John W. Leonard (ed.), L. R. Hamersly & Company, New York, 1908) Leavitts son John Wheeler Leavitt Jr. graduated from University in York City in 1845.(Catalogue of the Officers and Graduates of Columbia University from the Foundation of Kings College in 1754, Printed for the University, New York, 1904) John Wheeler Leavitt Jr. was christened at Fifth Avenue Presbyterian Church in Manhattan in 1831. He later married Catherine Churchill, daughter of New York businessman William Churchill and his wife Cornelia. Catherine (Churchill) Leavitt is interred in the Leavitt family vault in New York Marble Cemetery.ReferencesExternal links* Portrait of Mrs. John Wheeler Leavitt, 1855, Cecilia Beaux, Westmoreland Museum of American Art, Greensburg, Pennsylvania, ExplorePAhistory.com* Sita and Sarita, Portrait of Sarah Allibone Leavitt, Cecilia Beaux, Americans in Paris: 1860&ndash;1900, Americans in Paris, The Metropolitan Museum, New York, Muse dOrsay, Paris* Les Derniers Jours dEnfance, Cecilia Beaux, Portrait of John Wheeler Leavitts granddaughter and great-grandson, Pennsylvania Academy of Fine Arts, Gift of Cecilia Saltonstall Drinker, ExplorePAhistory.com* New England Woman (Mrs. Jedediah H. Richards ne Julia Leavitt), Cecilia Beaux, 1895, About.com* The Last Days of Infancy, Cecilia Beaux, 1883&ndash;1885, About.com* Cecilia Kent Leavitt, Peter A. Juley & Son Collection, Photograph Archives, Smithsonian American Art Archives* Cecilia Leavitt Kent with Boys, The Book of Wolves, Peter A. Juley & Son, Black-and-white study print, Photograph Archives, Smithsonian American Art Archives* Cecilia Beaux Papers, Smithsonian Archives of American ArtFurther reading* Aimee Ernesta and Eliza Cecilia: Two Sisters, Two Choices, Tara Leigh Tappert, The Pennsylvania Magazine of History and Biography, July 2000, pp.249-291* Cecilia Beaux Correspondence, Leavitt Family, Smithsonian Archives of American ArtSee also*Beaux *David Leavitt *York Marble Cemetery
20724793
Broughton,_Wrexham
250px|right|thumb|Moss ValleyBroughton () is a local government community, the lowest tier of local government, part of County Borough in Wales. It has an area of 469 hectares and had a population of 6,498 in the 2001 census. HistoryBroughton was recorded in the reign of Henry VII as one of the townships of the manor of Eglwysegle (a name preserved in the area known as Eglwyseg near Llangollen), part of the lordship of Bromfield. The Wrexham historian Neobard Palmer noted:Three villages Broughton are situated in that part of Wales which was settled by Englishmen. They appear in Domesday as Brochetune or Broctune, which can hardly mean anything else than Brook-town. The brook which may have given the Bromfield Broughton its name is now almost always dry, but Rhyd Broughton (or Broughton ford) preserves the memory of it.(Palmer, A. N. and Owen, E. A History of Ancient Tenures of Land in North Wales and the Marches, 2nd ed, 1910, p.245)Under the ecclesiastical administration the township of Broughton was part of the parish of Wrexham, and later of Brymbo. Population changes led to it being made a parish in its own right in 1909.(Broughton, St Pauls, GENUKI)The corresponding parish of Broughton, which was ultimately based on the boundaries of the ancient township, became the community of Broughton under the terms of the Government Act 1972. It today contains the villages of Moss, Broughton, Brynteg, Broughton, Southsea and Caego. The majority of the villages  date from the 19th century, when the area became heavily industrialised through mining and its proximity to the Steelworks; most of the mines were located in the area known as Moss Valley, along with a number in Pentre Broughton near Brymbo such as the Brynmally and Pwll Cadi collieries.Most of the areas coal mines had closed by the 1930s and the Moss Valley has now been reclaimed as a park. Continuing development has urbanised much of the rest of the communitys area, with some agricultural land remaining in the south and east.References* Davies, John; Nigel Jenkins, Menna Baines & Peredur I. Lynch (2008) The Welsh Academy Encyclopaedia of Wales, University of Wales Press, Cardiff.External links*Broughton community websiteWrecsam
20737846
Ivittuut
coordinates_region      GLIvittuut (old spelling: Ivigtt) is an abandoned mining town in the Sermersooq municipality in southwestern Greenland. It holds the record for Greenlands highest recorded temperature of .(meteorologyclimate.com) The lowest recorded temperature was . The name of the settlement means the grassy place in Greenlandic.(Sermersooq Municipality) The town has a 5 kilometer road that connects it to Kangilinnguit. Ivittuut is also the only town in Greenland to have roads leading to another town. History Ivittuut stands at the site of the Norse Middle Settlement, which is sometimes considered part of the Settlement. This was the smallest of the three settlements, including about 20 farms, and less is known about it than about either of the others, as no written records survive. Consequently, no names are known for any of the settlements farmsteads.  It was probably established latest, and abandoned soonest, of the three.In 1806, cryolite was found in the area, with mining operations starting in 1865. The mineral deposits were exhausted by 1987,(arsukfjorden.gl   frames required) and the town lost its economic base. It was abandoned soon after.See also* of Greenland* Settlement* Settlement References ast:Ivittuutda:Ivittuutde:Ivittuutes:Ivittuutfr:Ivittuutis:Ivittuutit:Ivittuutkl:Ivittuutnl:Ivittuutno:Ivittuutpl:Ivittuutro:Ivittuutru:sl:Ivigtutfi:Ivittuutsv:Ivittuutuk:
20760585
August_Heckscher
 footnotes  August Heckscher (August 26, 1848 - April 26, 1941) was a capitalist and philanthropist. BiographyBorn in Germany, Heckscher emigrated to the United States in 1867. He initially worked in his cousin Heckschers coal mining operation as a laborer, studying English at night. Several years later he formed a partnership with his cousin under the name of Heckscher & Company. The firm was eventually sold to the Railroad. Heckscher then turned to zinc mining and organized the and Iron Company, becoming vice-president and general manager. In 1897, it was consolidated with other zinc and iron companies into the Jersey Zinc Company with Heckscher serving as the general manager.Heckscher eventually became a multimillionaire and a philanthropist. He started Heckscher Foundation for Children and created playgrounds in lower Manhattan and in Park. The Heckscher Playground in Central Park is the parks largest playground. He created Heckscher Park in the town of Huntington and created the Museum of Art. He married Anna P. Atkins (?-1924) in 1881.() In 1930 he married Henry Curtiss at Croton-on-Hudson. She was the widow of Burr Curtiss, of G. Spalding Bros. and she was 27 years younger than Heckscher.()()  August Heckscher died on April 26, 1941 in Lake, Florida.()() August Heckscher died on April 27, 1941 and left his widow $10,000 and all his estate.() She died on July 11, 1941.( No legatee could be found that was named in her will and the court declared an earlier copy of the will as valid.()LegacyHeckshers grandson Heckscher II (19131997), served as President Kennedys Special Consultant on the Arts, the first House cultural advisor, 196263, as well Mayor Lindsays Parks Commissioner, 1967, amongst other highlights in a wide-ranging career and life.()References
20774057
History_of_cities_in_Canada
Over the last 14,000 years, the territory that is now called Canada has evolved from a place without human habitation, to one characterized by a relatively small number of medium- to large-sized cities.  Canadas cities are strung like beads on a chain, across the continent from east to west, close to Canadas border with the United States, and are home to most of Canadas 33,000,000 inhabitants.determinism is the idea that favourable geographic features are an essential determinant of human behaviour.  Favourable factors could influence the success of a city; examples include a benign climate, proximity to transportation corridors, usable groundwater, rain, a stable and flat or gently undulating terrain for construction, a benevolent hinterland, and proximity to markets.  However, a geographically attractive location alone is not enough for a city to flourish. Favourable human factors, including economics, technology, social conditions, and politics are also necessary for the establishment and growth of cities.Villages and towns - 14,000 BC &ndash; 1850Settlements and villages 14,000BC &ndash; 1600Canadas first people did not build cities. Those who arrived 14,000 years ago were without knowledge of cities, having never seen a city or lived in one. They were few in number compared to the size of the new continent and most lived a nomadic subsistence lifestyle, following the migration of animal herds that provided food. However they were influenced by geographic factors in the selection of locations for the temporary settlements and villages that they established and inhabited on a cyclical seasonal basis. Many of these would later serve as sites for Canadian cities that would be founded thousands of years later.Settlements, villages and towns 1600&ndash;1850The arrival of the Europeans provided the basis for the founding of cities in Canada. Many of the new arrivals, both French and English, were from cities and brought with them the experience and knowledge of city life. They also brought with them the technology required for city building. This included techniques for the construction of permanent buildings, transportation and communication facilities and the means of producing food for concentrated groups of people.However cities were slow to grow in this new world. Those who arrived did so within a colonial and mercantile context that emphasized the exploitation of the colony for economic purposes at a minimum of Imperial expense. Cities being expensive to create and administer, their growth was slow during the colonial period. It was also a period of conflict between England and France, (rival colonial powers until 1763) and between Britain and the USA from that date until the mid-nineteenth century. This turmoil discouraged the development of cities.The townsThe rise of St. Johns (1605), Quebec (1608), Montreal (1642), Halifax (1749), Saint John (1785) and Sherbrooke (1793) were notable during these years. They were established on the east coast of Canada in locations that were easily accessible to ships sailing from Europe, with the exception of Sherbrooke, which was established inland, by United Empire Loyalists. Of these cities, Montreal would become the most prominent.Montreal - 1642:The area now known as Montreal has been a place of human habitation by Canadas native peoples for the last 8000 years . The first European, Cartier, reached the site in 1535, however it was only in 1639 that the first permanent white settlement was established by Frenchman Jerome Le Royer, leading to the establishment of Ville Marie, a Roman Catholic mission, in 1642.After a series of brutal attacks by the Iroquois, defending their territory, the arrival of new colonists in 1653 ensured the future of the city. The settlement became a fur trading centre but endured continuous raids by warring Iroquois until the Great Peace of 1701 guaranteed its safety.After the Treaty of Paris in 1763, all the French territory in North America, including Ville Marie, became part of British North America. The town was subjected to invasion and a brief occupation by American forces in 1775, but they were subsequently routed and Montreal retaken by the British, with Canadian and Indian help.The arrival of British immigrants and the establishment of the West Company, fur trading rival to the Bay Company, with headquarters in Ville Marie, ushered in an era of growth and prosperity. The Eagle Foundry of Montreal built the ccommodation, Canadas first steam powered vessel. The opening of the Lachine Canal in 1825 reinforced the location as a port. Coal gas street lighting was introduced in 1838.The City of Montreal was established in 1832 with 27,000 inhabitants. During the period of its primarily European history, Montreal initially had a Francophone majority but Anglophone immigration tipped the balance by about 1830. From 1844 to 1849 Montreal served as the capital of the United Province of Canada.()The rise of the city - 1850&ndash;1920Factors for growthCanadas first cities appeared during these years. Fueled by the arrival of white, Christian immigrants from Europe, drawn by the hope for a better life in the new world, and a high domestic birth rate, they served as outposts of civilization in a land that was still mostly wild and inhospitable. In 1851 Canadas population stood at 2.4 million. By 1861 it had grown a third, to 3.2 million and by 1871 to 3.7 million.Economic forces were also at play. The repeal of the Laws in Britain in 1846 provided a symbolic end to the era of mercantilism and ushered in the era of capitalism. Private investment, mostly from Britain, provided the foundation for a nascent industrial structure based on transportation (the steam train), construction, electricity, public works, heavy manufacturing, consumer and industrial services and related financial institutions.The introduction of a number of technological innovations also supported city growth, including the telegraph, water and sewer systems, the telephone, transit, the light, the skyscraper, heating and the techniques of light and heavy manufacturing. These new transportation and communications technologies also led to the creation of a new nter-urban network of cities which contributed to their growth based on mutual interaction.The fading fear of attack by the USA provided a peaceful context for urban growth and the movement away from colonialism towards democracy gave urban dwellers the power to influence the shape of their cities.The construction of universities and cultural facilities in cities put a more human face on the harsh environment.The North America Act, an act of the British Parliament, which established an independent and democratic Canada in 1867, reflected the rural character of the country at that time. Of a population of 3,600,000 almost 2,900,000 were rural dwellers while 700,000 lived in cities. The political forces at play involved both federal and provincial powers. Therefore the BNA Act provided areas of exclusive jurisdiction for federal and provincial governments. Because cities were not predominant, the allocation of taxing powers for the financing of their growth, was left in the hands of the provinces. This would have important negative consequences a century later.The Pacific Railway, created to realize the dream of Prime Minister A. Macdonald for a transcontinental nation, was almost solely responsible for the emergence of the cities of western Canada during these years.In Quebec, the Roman Catholic Church worked to maintain the rural nature of Quebec society, in the belief that this would help preserve the Catholic nature of the population and reinforce the Churchs strength. One notable example of this policy was seen in the church sponsored attempt to colonize the rural Abitibi region of the province by farmers in the early twentieth century. The project failed because the region was only marginally suited to agriculture. This policy served to militate against urban growth in that province.Furthermore the nature of immigration limited the growth of cities in Quebec. Most immigrants to Canada during these years were English- speaking and preferred to settle in large cities, including Montreal with an existing English speaking population. On the other hand there were few French-speaking immigrants and the mostly French-speaking cities elsewhere in the province, including Quebec City and Trois-Rivires could not rely on this source for growth.Emigration too had a negative effect on the growth of cities in Quebec. Around 1900, economic conditions in Quebec were very difficult and about 1,000,000 French-speaking Canadians left the province looking for work in the textile mills of New England.By 1901, cities had grown to a point where the Union of Canadian Municipalities was formed to represent their interests.Changing structures &ndash; high rise cores and suburbsDuring these years the structures of cities evolved rapidly. In 1850 the city was essentially all downtown. The main buildings, serving residential, commercial and industrial functions, were made of wood or stone, mostly four to five stories tall and self supporting. Streets were of dirt or occasionally cobblestone and strewn with garbage and human excrement. Animals wandered about and horses were everywhere, solo, with rider or pulling wagons or carriages. In larger cities public transit was provided by horse cars on rails. Gas lights provided illumination at night. The force of life was provided by muscle power, animal or human.This changed rapidly. The introduction of the self-supporting steel framed building in the 1880s led to the construction of skyscrapers of six floors and more. The introduction of electricity and telephones was marked by the installation of hundreds of telephone and hydro poles along city streets, supporting electric and telephone cables. Electric street lighting replaced gas lights. The construction of water and sewer systems eliminated human waste from the urban living space. The introduction of municipal garbage collection reduced the presence of garbage.In the latter part of the century, the rise of the new class created a demand for housing beyond the city core. This was met by private contractors building individual homes on single lots in newly created suburbs, adjacent to the downtown core. transport was provided by the extension of the new electric powered streetcar to the suburbs. The downtown core began to lose its residential vocation and became a space increasingly devoted to commerce, industry and to a lesser extent, public life.In the new century the introduction of the car began to make its own dramatic mark. By 1920, the horse was gone, most cities had paved roads in the downtown core and main paved roads served the rising numbers of cars in the suburbs. At this point the Canadian city came to resemble what we see today.The citiesDominance of MontrealThe rise of Montreal as Canadas metropolis was the most important feature of urban development during these years. In 1851 the population stood at 57,000, but grew to 90,000 by 1861, becoming in the process Canadas largest city. It would hold this position for more than one hundred years before being surpassed by Toronto.Transportation made Montreal. Situated at the head of the S. Lawrence River, it became Canadas major port and rail centre. Ships from overseas arrived bringing goods and immigrants. First the Line Royal Mail Steamers in 1854 followed by Canadian Pacific Steamship Lines in 1903 operated trans Atlantic passenger liners to Britain. Shippers from the Great Lakes system, notably Steamship Lines Inc. brought grain for export.The great Western Railway from Montreal to Windsor went into operation in 1854 carrying passengers and goods into the hinterland, followed by the Grand Trunk Railway from Montreal to Sarnia in 1860. The Pacific Railway (CPR) one of the great railway companies of the world, established its headquarters there. The huge Angus Shops (1904) and Locomotive Works (1901) formed the heart of Canadas heavy industrial capability, building steam engines and rolling stock for the railways. Car and Foundry manufactured street cars.Other major manufacturing industries, grew along the Canal (1825), including Sugar, Darling and Brady, soap manufacturers, the St. Lawrence Glass Company, the Canadian Rubber Company, Laing Packing and Provisions (1852) and Belding Paul & Co. silk manufacturers provided consumer and industrial goods. The Imperial Tobacco Company (1912) became Canadas largest manufacturer of cigarettes. Morgans, Canadas first department store, opened its doors in 1845. The Montreal Telegraph Company, began offering service in 1847 and Canadian Marconi Company (CMC Electronics) was formed in Montreal in 1903.Financing for this activity was provided by the banks of St. James Street (Jacques Street) which became the heart of Canadas financial sector anchored by the of Montreal (1817) and the Stock Exchange, founded in 1872.Canadas first skyscraper, the eight-storey New York Life Insurance Company Building, was built in 1889. The elegant Queens Hotel opened for business in 1893. In 1875 in Montreal, a McGill student, J. Creighton, established the basic rules for hockey as we know it today. The worlds first facility dedicated to hockey, the Arena, was built in Montreal in 1898.Engineering works included a steam-powered municipal water system in operation by 1857 and the massive Bridge (Montreal) built in 1859. The Montreal City Passenger Railway Company began offering horse-car service in 1861 and converted to electric powered streetcars in 1891. In 1884 the Royal Electric Company began providing electricity to the city.During the First World War, Montreal became a major producer of munitions. Among other things, cordite was manufactured at Beloeil, Quebec, by Canadian Explosives Limited and at Nobel, Quebec, by British Cordite Limited.Montreals place as the largest French-speaking city in North America, as well as the home of a substantial Roman Catholic population, was reinforced by the establishment of Basilica (Montreal), the initial construction of which was completed in 1830. French language newspapers including Presse (Canadian newspaper) in 1884 and Devoir in 1910 and the Monument National theatre stood as pillars of cultural life. University, founded in 1821, and the Star (1869) and Gazette (1785, originally a French language publication) newspapers stood as testaments to the vitality of the English-speaking community.The Square Mile, a residential area on the south slope of Mount Royal, became the home of Canadas wealthiest citizens, including Dow, Redpath, Notman, McGill, Molson, Sir Simpson (administrator) and Hugh Allan.By 1921 the city had 618,000 inhabitants.(Hopeful beginnings eastToronto, with a population of 30,000 in 1851, and Bytown (renamed Ottawa in 1855) with a population of 8,000, would become respectively the future economic and political capitals of Canada.Toronto (1834)As was the case with many Canadian cities, the place now known as Toronto was inhabited for thousands of years before the arrival of Europeans, by a number of tribes including the Cayugas, Mohawks, Neutral-Erie, Oneidas, Senecas and Wendat.Between 1750 and 1759 the French operated a trading post, Fort Rouille, in the area where the National Exhibition is now located. The British purchased  of land from the native peoples in 1787 and Governor Graves Simcoe chose the site for the capital (which he named York) of the newly created Canada. Concerned with military transportation to protect the new colony from US attack, he built roads west to what is now Windsor, east towards Montreal, and north, the present day Street.York was attacked and burned to the ground by the American Army in 1813 and the British, in retaliation, attacked and burned the House in Washington to the ground in 1814. Another US attack that same year was defeated. The town was renamed Toronto in 1834 and Lyon Mackenzie served as the first mayor.The growth of Toronto in the latter part of the century was rapid, with the population passing from 30,000 in 1851 to 56,000 in 1871, to 86,400 by 1881 and to 181,000 by 1891. In part this was due to Irish immigration resulting from the Irish Famine between 1845 and 1849. The presence of the Roman Catholic Irish among Protestants led to racial tension, culminating in the Julibee Riots of 1875.Torontos rise to prominence was initiated by the arrival of the train and telegraph. The railways connected Toronto to a wide hinterland. The Great Western Railway, from Montreal to Toronto to Windsor, was completed in 1854 and the Trunk Railway, from Montreal to Toronto to Sarnia, in 1869. Along with the railways came the telegraph. Toronto was the first Canadian city to get service when it was introduced by the Toronto, Hamilton and Niagara Electro-Magnetic Telegraph Co. in 1846.Industrial mass production, in this case of clothing, became part of Torontos fabric. Livingstone and Johnston, (later W.R. Johnston & Company), founded in Toronto in 1868, was the first in Canada to cut cloth and sew together the component pieces. It used the newly introduced sewing machine as part of a continuous operation. William E. Davies established Canadas first large-scale hog slaughterhouse in Toronto in 1874.Toronto became the home of the first plastics produced in Canada. The Rathburn Company of Toronto began to produce wood distillates including wood alcohol and calcium acetate, used to make acetic acid or acetone, in 1897. The Standard Chemical Company of Toronto, established in 1897, initiated the production of acetic acid in 1899 and formaldehyde, from the oxidation of wood alcohol, in 1909. This latter product was an essential element in the production of the fully synthetic, phenol-formaldehyde plastic (Bakelite).Heavy manufacturing took hold in nearby cities. General Electric Canada, founded by Thomas Edison in nearby Peterborough in 1892, contributed to heavy manufacturing techniques through the fabrication of large generators and motors, which were used to supply the rapidly growing Canadian market for electrical generating equipment. Similar heavy electrical products were manufactured by Westinghouse Canada, established in Hamilton, Ontario, in 1897. Steel mills were established there as well.Public services improved city life. A steam-powered municipal pumping station was in service in Toronto by 1841, the same year that coal gas street lighting was introduced. Horsecar service began in Toronto in 1861. It was operated by the Toronto Street Railways until 1892, when it was replaced by electric streetcar service. The Toronto Power House and the Power Commission of Ontario began offering electricity to that city and the province in 1906.The growth of the city could be seen in the construction of skyscrapers. The first self-supporting steel-framed skyscraper in Canada was the Robert Simpson Department Store at the corner of Yonge and Queen with six floors and electric elevators, built in 1895. This was followed by the Traders Bank of Canada, (15 floors, Yonge Street, 1905), the Canadian Pacific Building, (16 floors, 1913), the Royal Bank, (20 floors, 1915), the Royal York Hotel, 1929, and the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce, in 1931. Canadas first escalator was installed in 1904 at Eatons Department Store on Queen Street.The beginnings of the rise of Toronto as the cultural capital of Canada were seen in the establishment in 1827 of what would become the of Toronto and the founding of The Globe (later the and Mail)in 1844. Book publishing also took root. Publishers of note included Musson Book Company, 1894, G.N. Morang, 1897, McLeod & Allen, 1901, the University of Toronto Press, 1901, Oxford University Press, 1904, John C. Winston, 1904, Macmillan Company of Canada Ltd., 1905, McClelland and Goodchild, 1906, (later McClelland and Stewart), Cassell and Company Limited, 1907, J.M. Dent and Sons, 1913 and Thomas Nelson and Sons Limited, 1913. Performing arts space was expanded with the completion of the Grand Opera House, in 1874, Hall in 1894 and the Alexandra Theatre in 1907. The National Exhibition, established in 1878 became a prominent feature of city and Canadian life.With continued growth the city began to expand at the periphery and newly created adjacent towns were annexed. They included West Toronto, East Toronto, Parkdale and Brockton Village.()New Southern Ontario cities - the essence of CanadaSt. Catharines(1821), London(1826), Hamilton(1846), Oshawa(1850), Kitchener(1854) and Windsor(1854) founded in the mid-nineteenth century would eventually form the core of the most densely populated and heavily industrialized region of Canada.Hopeful beginnings westFor the most part, creations of the CPR, Winnipeg(1873), Calgary(1876), Regina(1882), Saskatoon(1883), Vancouver(1886) and Edmonton(1904) were strung like beads on a chain across Canada, linked by the new transcontinental railway. Victoria(1849) had earlier colonial origins. Vancouver would quickly become the most important.Vancouver(1886)Evidence indicates that native peoples, notably the Coast Salish, inhabited the area that became Vancouver for about 10,000 years before the arrival of the white man. The first Europeans to explore the area included Spanish Captain Jos Mara Narvez in 1791 and British Captain Vancouver in 1792. During his exploration Vancouver met with another Spanish expedition in the command of Dionisio Alcal Galiano and Cayetano Valds y Flores. Simon Fraser was the first white man to reach the area overland, which he did in 1808. However, native resistance to the presence of settlement was strong and it was not until 1862 that the first white settlement, the McCleery Farm, was established in what is now known as the Southlands district of Vancouver.A year later, Moodyville was established on the north shore of Inlet as home to lumbering activity and a sawmill. Stamps Mill (1867) was established on the south shore of the Inlet in what is now downtown Vancouver. The quality of Vancouver lumber quickly gained a worldwide reputation and was used to provide masts for the Navy and in the construction of the of Heavenly Peace in the City, Beijing.A saloon built a mile to the west of Stamps Mill soon became an area of settlement eventually known as Gastown. It was named in honour of the talkative saloon owner Gassy John Deighton. The area was surveyed by the British colonial administrators and formally renamed Granville in 1871. The construction of the first federal penitentiary in Westminster in 1878, bore witness to the lawlessness of the region.The CPR made Vancouver. Van Horne, President of the CPR, chose the area as the western terminus for the transcontinental railway and renamed it Vancouver in 1886. Along with the railway came transcontinental telegraph service, also operated by Canadian Pacific. Park was established by the new city council and a disastrous fire destroyed the city that same year. A new city quickly arose from the ashes complete with a modern water system, the cities first sewer system in 1886, electricity in 1887 and streetcar services.In 1891, the newly formed Canadian Pacific Steamship Lines began offering trans-Pacific steamship service from Vancouver with three large steel-hulled ships, the Empress  liners: India, China and Japan.In 1902, Canadian Pacific completed a trans-Pacific cable telegraph, linking Vancouver with Australia and New Zealand. This reinforced Vancouvers position as a Pacific transportation and communication gateway.The population of the city mushroomed passing from about 5,000 in 1886 to 42,000 in 1900 and it became, in the process, Canadas third largest City. The appearance of the skyscraper provided visual evidence of growth, the first being the Dominion Building, (13 floors), in 1910, followed by the World (Sun) Tower, (17 floors), in 1912.Vancouver society was especially turbulent during these years. The First War saw two general strikes and the city was hit by depression in the 1890s, 1919, 1923 and 1929. Racism was also present. The presence of a large number of Chinese in Vancouver, located there as a result of immigration to work on the CPR, lead to serious anti-Chinese rioting organized in part by the Exclusion League in 1907. In 1914, 376 prospective Punjabi immigrants arriving aboard the ship Komataga Maru were refused entry into Canada on a technicality, the enforcement of which was racially inspired. They were forced to return to India.After the first war working class neighbourhoods including Mount Pleasant, South Vancouver and Grandview-Woodland began to appear. The CPR established Grey for development as an exclusive neighbourhood in 1908. Shaughnessy Heights was also established for the well heeled.The founding of the of British Columbia in 1915 represented a significant development in the cultural field.()Holding their ownDuring this period, the centre of Canada quickly shifted west and south leaving St. Johns, Halifax, Saint John, Quebec and Sherbrooke far from the centre but still close enough, through marine and rail connections, for them to retain residual economic and demographic weight.The City Dominant - 1920- presentIntroductionUntil 1921 Canada was a largely rural nation. However by that date the balance had shifted. Of Canadas population of 8,787,000 people, roughly 4,300,000, or 50 percent lived in cities. This was the result of internal urban population growth, the steady influx of the rural population into the cities and the arrival of immigrants, most of whom settled in cities. This shift was permanent and the urban percentage of the population continued to increase for the remainder of the twentieth century. Over 85 percent of Canadas citizens were urban dwellers in 2008.The production of wealth also became concentrated in cities during this period. Rural production (fishing, forestry, agriculture, mining), was outstripped by urban manufacturing and the service sectors. In 2008, about 90 percent of Canadas economy was urban based.The Golden Age 1920- 1970A harmonious balanceDuring this period there was a balance in the factors that contributed to city growth. The increase in population was supported by a number of elements including private investment for commerce and industry, which provided jobs and money for consumer spending and public investment in education and infrastructure including, roads, public transit, electric, water and sewer systems. Canadas mostly white, Christian population also provided a homogeneity of values that created a calm and harmonious context for growth.City growth was somewhat stunted during the depression years of the thirties but experienced industrial growth during the hot house years of War II and the boom associated with pent-up consumer demand in the post war years. This boom was accompanied and fueled be immigration, mostly from Europe.The establishment of the Dominion Conference of Mayors in 1935 was symptomatic of growth of Canadian cities during these years. In 1937, this organization fused with the Union of Canadian Municipalities to become the Canadian Federation of Mayors and Municipalities. This organization was renamed the of Canadian Municipalities in 1976.The cities Metropolis : Montreal at its peak Montreal had a population of 618,000 in 1921, which grew to 1.2 million in 1971.The twenties saw many changes in the city and the introduction of new technologies continued to have a prominent impact. The introduction of the car in large numbers began to transform the nature of the city. The worlds first commercial radio station, XWA began broadcasting in 1920. A huge mooring mast for dirigibles was constructed in St. Hubert in anticipation of trans-Atlantic lighter-that-air passenger service, but only one craft, the R-100, visited in 1930 and the service never developed. However Montreal became the eastern hub of the Trans-Canada Airway in 1939.Film production became a part of the city activity. Associated Screen News of Canada in Montreal produced two notable newsreel series, Kinograms in the twenties and Canadian Cameo from 1932 to 1953. The making of documentary films grew tremendously during World War II with the creation of the Film Board of Canada, in Montreal, in 1939. By 1945 it was one of the major film production studios in the world with a staff of nearly 800 and over 500 films to its credit including the very popular, The World in Action and Canada Carries On, series of monthly propaganda films. Other developments in the cultural field included the founding of de Montral in 1919 and the Symphony Orchestra in 1934. The Forum, built in 1924 became the home ice rink of the fabled Montreal Canadiens hockey team.Dr. Penfield, with a grant from the US Foundation founded the Neurological Institute at the Royal Victoria Hospital (Montreal), in 1934 to study and treat epilepsy and other neurological diseases. Research into the design of nuclear weapons was conducted at the Montreal Laboratory of the Research Council of Canada during WWII.In the post-war years Canada formalized its wartime shortwave radio broadcasting activities with the creation of Canada International. In 1945, this international radio broadcasting service was established with production facilities in Montreal and a huge shortwave transmitter site at Sackville, New Brunswick. Television was introduced to Canada by CBC, first in the French language by CBFT in Montreal on 6 September 1952. Radio-Canada established extensive production facilities for French-language programming, especially in the field of television drama. In the early seventies TVA also established a dynamic presence in this field.The Norgate Shopping Centre, Saint-Laurent, Quebec (1949) and the Dorval Shopping Centre, Dorval, Quebec (1950), were the first shopping centres built in Canada. In 1951 the first St. Hubert BBQ restaurant opened its doors on St-Hubert street in Montreal.The completion of the Lawrence Seaway, in 1959, the Highway, in 1962, Autoroutes 20 and 40 in Quebec and Highway 401, in Ontario, in 1968 strengthened Montreals connection with other Canadian cities and with the continent. The construction of the Subway, in 1966 and Underground Montreal in the mid-sixties eased pedestrian movement in the downtown core and the suburbs. The World Fair, 67 brought Montreal to the attention of the world as never before. Ronde (amusement park) became Canadas largest amusement park when it opened in 1967 as part of Expo 67.Canadas first heart transplant was performed on 31 May 1968, by Dr. Pierre Godin the Chief Surgeon at the Heart Institute, on patient Albert Murphy of Chomedy, Quebec a 59 year old retired butcher suffering from degenerative heart disease. The operation took place about six months after the worlds first, by Dr. Christian Barnard.A number of important skyscrapers were built in the sixties including, Ville Marie (Royal Bank), 1962, the Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce Tower, 1962, the Edifice Trust Royal (C.I.L. House), 1962 and the Htel Chteau Champlain, in 1967.Cultural institutions such at La Presse and Devoir newspapers and the beautiful des Arts (1963) performing arts theatre, symbolized the vigour of the French language in the city as did the development of a very vibrant popular music and theatre scene in the sixties and seventies with noted performers including Charlebois, Forestier, Dufresne, Dubois, Rene Claude and Pelletier to name but a handful among dozens. Further intellectual growth was symbolized by the founding of the du Qubec in 1968.The Forum was home to the iconic Canadiens hockey team which won five Stanley Cup victories in a row from 1955 to 1960 becoming in the process the most successful professional sports team in history up to that time. The star player of the team Richard gained a reputation that lives to this day.However all was not well with the city. The rise of the automobile put an end to streetcar manufacturing in the city. The conversion of the railways from steam to diesel in the fifties resulted in the closure of Montreals huge locomotive manufacturing facilities. Political turmoil caused by the mailbox bombings of the separatist FLQ in the sixties put a chill into the public and worlds perception of the city. The construction of the Boulevard Metropolitaine in the sixties, although it improved traffic low, divided the city along an east west axis. The massive trench of the new north south six-lane Boulevard Decaire divided the city east from west.However the most dramatic event of all, the election of the separatist Qubcois to power in Quebec City in 1976, resulted in the subsequent exodus of hundreds of thousands of English-speaking Montrealers fearing persecution, to cities elsewhere in Canada.( Toronto and Southern Ontario cities - waiting in the wings These cities experienced strong growth during this period that would see them gain national prominence in the latter part of the century.Toronto: Toronto gained considerable industrial, cultural and demographic strength during the fifty year period from 1920 to 1970.The industrial strength of Toronto area was reinforced with the establishment in 1918 of an auto production plant by General Motors in nearby Oshawa, where it produced Buicks, Oldsmobiles and Oaklands and by Studebaker Canada Ltd. which produced cars in Hamilton from 1946 to 1966. Steel for the production of these cars came from the nearby mills of Stelco and Dofasco in Hamilton and gasoline, from refineries in Sarnia. The familiar, Canadian Tire, began operations there in 1922 and has become one of Canadas largest retailers. The Trans-Canada Airway was extended to Toronto in 1939.The founding of what would become the Symphony Orchestra in 1922 and the establishment of the CBC radio English-language radio network headquarters with its associated production facilities in the city in 1936 were signal cultural events.Notable landmarks of the period featured the Royal York Hotel, built in 1929 and Leaf Gardens home to the fabled Toronto Maple Leafs hockey team, completed in 1931. Important public works included the massive R.C. Harris Filtration Plant, in 1926 and the Elizabeth Way, completed in 1939.During the Second World War Toronto became an important centre for the production of weapons including the warplanes manufactured by Havilland Canada and Canada. Military vehicles were produced by General Motors in Oshawa. The Connaught Laboratories (Sanofi-Aventis) at the University of Toronto produced penicillin for wartime use.Industrial capacity gained further strength with the establishment in the fifties, by the Ford Motor Company of Canada of a production plant in Oakville, which would eventually become a suburb of Toronto. The signing of the Auto Pact with the US in 1965 created massive investment in auto production facilities in Toronto and southern Ontario.The University of Toronto Computer Centre, established in 1947, developed Canadas first operational computer the University of Toronto Electronic Computer (UTEC) in 1951. This was followed by the purchase of FERUT (Ferranti University of Toronto) computer, by the Computer Centre in 1952.The CBC owned and operated CBLT-TV, Canadas first English-language television station, with related production facilities, went on the air there on 8 September 1952. The first private television broadcaster, CFTO, began operation in 1961.Toronto was home to the construction of a number of advanced aircraft in the post-war years including the Canada Jetliner, the CF-100 jet interceptor and the fabled Avro Arrow. However the expense of the latter endeavour in the absence of a significant market forced the AVRO into bankruptcy in 1959.Electric energy projects in the sixties and seventies included the Lakeview Generating Station, completed in Mississauga, in 1962 and the Generating Station (largest coal fired plant in North America), in Nanticoke, Ontario, in 1978. In 1971 electricity produced from nuclear power became commercially available to Torontonians and other Ontarians from the large (ultimately 8-unit) Pickering station near Toronto, Ontario.The field of transportation saw the completion of a number of significant works both local and national. Local works included the Subway, in 1954 and the Transit rail system in 1967. The PATH system built in the sixties, allowed pedestrians to move about the downtown core using underground passages. National projects with Toronto as a hub or important destination included the Trans-Canada Gas Pipeline, 1959, the St. Lawrence Seaway, 1959, the Trans-Canada Highway, completed in 1962, and Highway 401 completed in 1968.The Sunnybrook Plaza (1951) and York Mills, (1952), became the first shopping centres in the region. Skyscrapers of note included the Toronto Dominion Bank Tower in 1967, The Simpson Tower, 1968, the Royal Trust Tower, 1969.By 1971 Toronto had a population of 2,630,000.( The rising east and west Ottawa, Calgary, Edmonton and Vancouver would experience sustained growth but not enough to make them the metropolis.Vancouver: In 1921 Vancouver had a population of 232,000.The opening of the Canal in 1914 solidified Vancouvers place as Canadas largest western city and the third largest in the country, a place that it holds to this day. The canal made it possible for ships to carry cargo from Vancouver directly to ports in Europe. Freight rates that favoured the use of eastern Canadian ports over Vancouver were eliminated in the twenties and port growth boomed. The Vancouver Harbour Commission was established in 1913 and the shipping activity centred around the Ballentyne Pier, built in 1923, which at the time was the most modern in the Empire.The rise of the automobile lead to the construction of new bridges over Creek including: the Street Bridge, (1889 rebuilt 1954), the Street Bridge, 1932, and the Street Bridge, (1912 rebuilt 1984). Auto traffic to North Vancouver was facilitated with the construction of the first Second Narrows Bridge in 1925 and by the completion of the Gate Bridge, in 1938, across the First Narrows.Crime was a prominent feature of city life. Vancouver mayor D. Taylor practiced an open town policy that sought to manage activities such as prostitution, bootlegging and gambling, by restricting them to racially oriented areas including Chinatown, Japantown, and Hogans Alley. He was defeated in 1934 by Mayor McGeer who promised to clean up the city.In 1931 the population of Vancouver stood at 347,000. In the twenties and thirties Vancouver became the western anchor of a number of national communication and transportation networks. These included the CNR National Radio Network, 1927, Canadian Radio Broadcasting Commission Radio Network, 1932, the Telephone System, 1932, the Broadcasting Corporation Radio Network, 1936 and the Trans Canada Airway in 1938.Cultural life received a boost with the establishment of the Symphony Orchestra in 1919 and the opening of the (Vancouver) theatre in 1927.By 1941 the population had grown to 394,000. During World War II, the air base at Boundary Bay became an important centre for the training of heavy bomber crews. The city also featured prominently in the construction of ships for the war effort. Fear of an invasion by Japanese naval forces lead to Canadian citizens of Japanese ancestry being sent to camps in the BC interior 1942. Many of these citizens were from Vancouver.In 1951 the population stood at 562,000 and further technologies became available. The Park Royal Shopping Centre, in West Vancouver, became the first in the city in 1950 and Stadium, was built to host the 1954 Empire Games. Vancouver became the western anchor of the new CBC national television network in 1958 and the western hub of the newly completed Highway in 1962. The giant Ferry Terminal, was built in 1959 for passenger and vehicle ferry service to southern Vancouver Island and the nearby Bank Superport coal terminal was finished in the late sixties. A second, Second Narrows Bridge was built in 1960 and the W.A.C.Bennett Dam, was completed in 1967.The establishment of the Elizabeth Theatre in 1959 and of Fraser University in 1965, enriched city cultural life. Canadas first purpose-built auto racing track, the Westwood Motorsport Park was built in nearby Coquitlam, that same year. The first McDonalds restaurant outside the United States was opened in Richmond in 1967.By 1971 Vancouver had a population of 1,000,000.( Dashed hopes St. Johns, Halifax, Saint John, Quebec, Sherbrooke, Winnipeg, Regina and Saskatoon, because of their locations, were not able to develop the weight to become anything more than minor cities.City in decline - 1970&ndash;presentTrouble in the cityCanadas population stood at 21 million in 1971 and has grown to 33 million in 2008. City expansion has continued throughout this period.However, Canadian cities have experienced a number of serious problems due largely to the fact that the increase in population has not been supported as it was earlier in the century. While private inventment has largely continued apace during these years, public expenditures have not been able to match the increasing demand for public services, including, education, health, welfare, public transport and roads and other infrastructure. This is because the constitution, created 100 years before, was developed for a rural country and did not provide adequate taxing mechanisms for the municipal generation of revenue. Constitutionally, cities were creatures of the province. Entrenched resistance to change, especially at the provincial level, that would see more taxing power transferred to the cities, has prevented effective action to remedy this problem.Furthermore the social harmony and cohesion of values that characterized the golden age have also been eroded by the changing values of the indigenous increasingly secular, individualistic and materialistic population as well as the arrival of immigrants whose diverse views often conflict with those of their adopted country. Pollution, from industry and car exhaust has become a serious problem.In Quebec the rise of Separatism in the sixties and in particular the election of the Parti Qubcois as government in 1976, have had a negative effect on the size of the Anglophone population of the province with attendant results on the growth of cities, especially Montreal.Importantly, the Auto Pact of 1965 and investments by the Big Three US car makers, Motors, Ford and Chrysler have served to stimulate the growth of the cities of southern Ontario in much the same way that the CPR fuelled the growth of the cities of western Canada 60 years before.Changing structures &ndash; urban sprawl and downtown decayThis era has been marked by sprawl. Population growth has been limited mostly to the suburbs and city boundaries have stretched far into what had been countryside mere decades earlier. With the extension of suburbia the provision of public services has become increasingly expensive as water systems, sewer systems and other structures have radiated from the city core.Of particular note is the construction of superhighways throughout the sixties and seventies. These massive corridors while designed to move increasing volumes of auto traffic also served to physically divide cities. In Toronto 401 divides the city north/south, the Valley Parkway(1966), east/west and the Expressway(1966) separates the city core from Lake Ontario. In Montreal, the Metropolitaine divides the city north/south and Boulevard Decarie, east/west. The (Ottawa) in Ottawa divides the city north/south. The presence of cars has become so dominant that a casual observer seeing a city for the first time would assume that the primary inhabitant was the auto.The displacement of the weight of the residential population from the city centre has begun to remove to market for downtown services and the downtown cores have begun to deteriorate. The construction of huge  centres in suburbia has accelerated this process. In 2008 the Federation of Canadian Municipalities estimated that it would take $123 billion to restore and repair aging urban infrastructure across Canada.Although there is deterioration in infrastructure it is important to note that the kind of slums that characterize many cities in the third world and the cores of many US cities, do not exist in Canada.The cities The New Metropolis : Toronto and the Golden Horseshoe During the seventies the population of Toronto surpassed that of Montreal. In 1971 the populations of the respective Census Metropolitan Areas (CMAs) for Toronto and Montreal stood at 2.7 million and 2.6 million. By 1981 Toronto had surpassed Montreal with a population of 3 million versus 2.8 million for Montreal. In 2009 there are 5.5 million people in the Toronto area.Factors for the growth of Toronto over Montreal included strong immigration, increasingly by people of Asian and Negroid backgrounds, the increasing size of the auto industry in Southern Ontario, due to the signing of the Auto Pact with the US in 1965, a calmer political environment (Quebec experienced two referenda on separation during these years, one in 1980 and the other in 1995), lower personal income taxes than in Quebec and a more benign linguistic/educational environment.Improved transportation facilities aided growth. Station (Toronto) provided a hub for passenger rail service in the busy Windsor Quebec corridor and a focus for the subway service. Highway 401 provided an artery for automobile traffic east and west. Pearson International Airport became Canadas largest and a massive new terminal building was recently completed.During this period, three of Canadas largest banks became headquartered in Toronto: the Bank of Canada, the Bank and the Imperial Bank of Commerce. These along with the Manulife Financial Corporation, Life Financial Inc. and Stock Exchange form the financial district, the financial heart of Canada. Toronto also became the corporate capital of Canada with the majority of Canadian companies having their head offices there. Notable examples include: Weston Ltd., Corp, International Inc., Wal-Mart Canada Corporation and Brookfield Asset Management Inc.Toronto strengthened its position as the cultural centre of English-speaking Canada during these years. The and Mail and the Post, two of Canadas most important newspapers have their head offices there. The new CBC Broadcasting Centre was completed in 1993 and became the corporations control facility for English language broadcasting in Canada. Also in 1993 Ryerson Polytechnical Institute gained full university status and became, Polytechnic University. Thomson Hall became the home of the Symphony Orchestra in 1982. This along with the newly constructed of Wales Theatre and the venerable Alexandra Theatre now form the heart of the theatre district. Cultural institutions including the Gallery of Ontario and the Ontario Museum have recently had their buildings renovated. The Seasons Centre became the new home of the Opera Company and Ballet of Canada when completed in 2006. The Film Festival, established in 1976, has become after Cannes, the most important in the world and now sports a new headquarters, the Lightbox, opened in 2010. Film production has received a boost with the newly completed, Toronto Studios, in the east end on the waterfront. Toronto has also been home to the Hall of Fame (1943), since 1961.The changing high-rise downtown core provided visual evidence of growth. New skyscrapers included, the Royal Trust Tower, 1969, First Canadian Place, 1975, the CN Tower, 1975, Royal Bank Plaza, South Tower, 1977, the First Bank Tower, 1979, Scotia Plaza, 1988, the Sky Dome, 1989, the BCE PlaceCanada Trust Tower, 1990 and the Bay Wellington Tower, 1990.Recently constructed skyscrapers include: One King Street West, 2005, West 1, 2005, Harbourview Estates 2, 2005, Residences of College Park 1, Toronto, 2006, Quantum 2 (Minto Midtown), 2008, the Bay Adelaide Centre West, 2009, the RBC Centre, 2009, Success, 2009 and Montage, 2009. Canadas largest theme park, Wonderland opened in 1981.Public administration was streamlined when the governments of Toronto and its five adjacent municipalities Etobicoke, North York, East York, York, and Scarborough were fused to form a megacity in 1998. The political heart of the City, Phillips Square is framed by City Hall, while the popular heart is focused on the new Square with its fountains and multiple large screen video panels, located on Yonge Street at the north end of the Eaton Centre. Toronto, a suburb established in 1909 continues to be home to some of Canadas richest and most famous citizens.However Toronto faces problems common to large North American cities, ranging from pollution, to urban sprawl, to the deterioration of infrastructure, racial tension and inequality, increasing levels of violent crime, heavy traffic congestion, poverty and lack of public housing.More importantly, recent economic developments have had a considerable negative impact on Toronto and the region. In 2007 the Canadian dollar reached par with the US dollar causing a decline in the export of the regions manufactured products because of their relative increase in price. Furthermore the increase in the cost of oil and gas created an additional cost burden for these same manufacturers resulting in a substantial loss of manufacturing jobs due to plant cutbacks and closures. The simultaneous decline of the North American auto industry with its many factories in the region, due to an increasing inability to compete with Asian auto manufacturers was accelerated by the increasing price of gasoline, which discouraged consumers from purchasing new cars.This collision of multiple negative factors has hit the manufacturing and technological base of the regions prosperity very dramatically in recent years. The road to continued prosperity for Toronto lies in increased competitiveness through technological and managerial innovation. Heavyweights Montreal, population 3,500,000 and Vancouver, population 2,000,000 have become poles of attraction based on manufacturing and transportation.Montreal - Stagnation: The population of Montreal, a city with an attractive geographical location, has declined over the last thirty years, because of negative economic, social and political, and fiscal factors.(Lorne Gunter: Quebecs subsidized world of wonder, National Post, 23 February 2011) The weight of the Canadian economy has shifted south and west over the last three decades. This has been to the benefit of Toronto, which grew in part because of the Auto Pact signed in 1965 and Calgary, which has grown since the eighties because of oil. But the shift has been to the detriment of Montreal.Demographically the birth rate in Canada has fallen below replacement rate during this period. Other cities in Canada have relied on immigration for growth but this option has not been available to Montreal for political reasons. Because of the prominence of Quebec separatism, immigrants who speak English or who want to speak English have avoided Montreal for a fear of persecution by the French-speaking majority and settled in other large Canadian cities. Furthermore the province of Quebec in spite of vigorous efforts has been unable to attract French-speaking immigrants in significant numbers from other parts of the world.The separatist threat has resulted in a net loss of mostly English-speakers from Montreal during these years and has put a chill into foreign investment.Since the seventies the government of Quebec has responded positively to a growing public demand for social programmes, which by the end of the century were some of the most generous in Canada. In order to finance these programmes, personal income tax in Quebec became the highest in Canada and remains so. This high level of tax has served to further discourage the net immigration to Montreal, from other provinces and from other countries.In an attempt to counteract these negative factors the government of Quebec also instructed its provincial crown electric utility, Hydro-Qubec, with headquarters in Montreal, to offer electricity to both domestic and industrial clients at below market rates. This did not overcome the negative weight of the factors mentioned above. It has on the contrary led to stunning levels of corporate debt, for which all Quebecers, including Montrealers, will be responsible through higher taxes and possibly at some point, higher hydro rates.The population of the Island of Montreal has evolved as follows during this period: (1971), 1,959,000, 1981 ( five years after the election of a separatist government), 1,760,000, (1991), 1,775,000, (2001), 1,812,000.In spite of these factors the economy of Montreal was transformed in the latter part of the century. The heavy manufacturing of the earlier years was replaced by the high value added output of the aviation and pharmaceutical sectors. Notable companies in the former include, Bombardier, Bell Textron, Pratt & Whitney and CAE. The latter sector included Merck Frost and Phizer. Montreal also remains home to a large number of corporate head offices including those of Corporation of Canada, the of Montreal, Inc., Couche-Tard Inc., Hydro-Qubec, Ace Aviation Holdings (Canada), Ultramar Ltd. and Inc..The downtown core did experience some significant construction including, the Tour du 1000 de la Gauchetire in 1991, Tour IBM-Marathon in 1992 and the Molson Centre, the new home of the Montreal Canadiens, in 1996.The period began optimistically with the construction of the massive Mirabel Airport to the northwest of the city in 1975. However this soon turned to disappointment, embarrassment and financial catastrophe as the new huge facility failed to attract traffic and became a sleepy industrial airport at the end of the century. This failure is both a symbol and a practical reflection of Montreals decline during these years. The 1976 Olympics produced mixed results. They did focus the attention of the world on the city and were a sporting success. However the stadium was not finished on time and city of Montreal and the province were left with massive debts that were only paid off early in the new millennium.The French language cultural output of the city has flourished over the last thirty years, a fact which in some ways disguises a deeper malaise. Large volumes of French language television drama for the Radio Canada, TVA and TQS networks are produced weekly. There is a flourishing domestic and foreign film production industry. Special events including the International Jazz Festival (1980), the Grand Prix and for Laughs (1983), have gained international fame. The greatest export of Montreal on the international scene is surely the du Soleil, with several permanent shows around the world.Organized crime has changed over the decades. Run mainly by Canadian families of Italian origin, these groups were pushed aside in the eighties by biker gangs. The Outlaws originally gained control of the illegal drug trade and prostitution but in the nineties a brutal turf war saw them replaced by the Hells Angels.The future of the city is not bright.(, The Globe and Mail, Montreal:Canadas Broken City?, Saturday, 19 July 2010, P. A4,) Demographics portray a community with an aging French-language majority, that has no replacement. Infrastructure is also showing its age with the citys several bridges, many highway overpasses and other transportation structures including the locks of the St. Lawrence Seaway needing renovation (the seaway is a federal infrastructure and has very little to do with Quebec ports which get the vast majority of their traffic from overseas). Financing the renovation of infrastructure through the increase of taxes is difficult in view of the long standing high tax rates in the province and the high level of government debt including the debt of public corporations (Hydro-Qubec). Essentially the province has run down the state of public assets to finance the public demand for extravagant social services. An attempt to streamline public administration through the amalgamation of the islands multiple municipal governments early in the new century ended in confusion, with some cities becoming part of a new unified structure and some opting out. Finally, all this is coloured by the ongoing and unhelpful subtext of separation.Vancouver: Since 1970 Vancouver has grown dramatically with the help of immigration from Asia. Throughout the period, immigrants from South Asia have arrived in large numbers and tended to settle in the south east suburbs, notably in places like Surrey. Their presence has created some controversy because of the fact that they tend to buy normal sized suburban homes on normal sized suburban lots, tear them down and build monster houses to replace the ones that were demolished. Immigration from Hong Kong increased substantially during the nineties as 1999, the date for the return of that city to Chinese jurisdiction, approached. These arrivals tended to settle downtown, to the point where that area is sometimes referred to as Hong Couver.The skyline of the city has reflected this growth with new structures including: the Royal Centre, 1972, Harbour Centre, 1976, the Scotia Tower, 1977, BC Place, 1983, home of the CFL BC Lions, Canada Place, 1986 and GM Place, 1995 home of the NHL Vancouver Canucks. The 62 floor mixed use Shangri-La, the tallest building in the city will open in 2009.Tourism has increased noticeably with the city having become the starting point for major cruise ship lines operating trips north through the Inside Passage.The worlds fair of 1986, Expo86, focused the attention of the world on Vancouver. The fair was sited at the east end of False Creek which, in the post World War Two years, had become an industrial slum. In the early eighties the land was reclaimed and used as the site for the construction of the facilities for the fair. At the same time a subway was built to facilitate the movement of pedestrians around the city.After the fair ended the land on the north side of the creek was used for the construction of luxury apartment and condominium towers. More recently the land on the south side of the creek has been used for the construction of the athletes village for the 2010 Winter Olympics. However in late 2008 there was controversy over the fact that the developer had gone bankrupt and the government of British Columbia has been forced to cover the bad debts.While most Canadian cities are characterized by the presence of freeways through part of the downtown core, Vancouver is the exception for the city has, to this point managed to keep roads of this type out of the city centre. However all is not well with the road system and there has been severe crowding on the Lions Gate Bridge and on the Second Narrow Bridge for almost two decades.A blight of a different type however characterizes the downtown area known as East Hastings. Arguably Canadas worst slum its flop houses are home to vagrants, drug addicts, pushers and prostitutes. Since 2007 there has been a gradual attempt to eliminate the problem through the process of gentrification.As of 2009, Vancouver has a population of 2,000,000. Contenders Oil and national politics as well as high-tech have made Edmonton, Calgary and Ottawa, all cities with populations of one 1,000,000, significant national urban centres. Regional powers Geography has destined Winnipeg, Quebec City, Sherbrooke and Halifax to roles as regional service centres. Dying on the vine St Johns, Saint John, Regina and Saskatoon, again because of location, have not been able to develop economic or demographic weight and for the most part have become stagnant. Northern cities Whitehorse(1898), and Yellowknife(1935), are small cities, and will remain so because of very unfavourable geographic locations, which include huge distances from markets, barren hinterlands, with the exception of some mineral wealth and glacial climates.ReferencesBibliography* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * See also*of Canada* of Toronto* of Montreal*of Ottawa* of Vancouver* of Quebec City* of Winnipeg
20811873
Strand_Life_Sciences
Strand Life Sciences, formerly Strand Genomics, is a Bangalore, India-based silico technology company. Strand focuses in mining, modeling, chemistry, engineering, bioinformatics, and research biology to develop software and services for life sciences research. Strand also offers custom solutions based on its intellectual property. In August 2007, Strand and Technologies, Inc. entered an agreement in which Strand develops and supports Agilents GeneSpring(http://www.agilent.com/about/newsroom/presrel/2007/20aug-ca07049.html) software. In October 2010, Strand and Agilent renewed the agreement(http://www.agilent.com/about/newsroom/presrel/2010/04oct-ca10065.html) for Strand to expand the scope of Agilents GeneSpring across multiple life sciences disciplines.HistoryStrand Life Sciences was founded in October 2000 by Professors Chandru, Ramesh Hariharan, Manohar, and V. Vinay. It was registered as Strand Genomics, but was later renamed to Strand Life Sciences as it dealt with various other aspects of life sciences.SoftwareAvadisAvadis is a comprehensive data mining and visualization platform. It combines the power of scalable algorithms and dynamic interactive visualization. The platform was customized for various scientific domains like expression, sequencing, pre-clinical research, chemistry and healthcare.SarchitectSarchitect is a platform for modeling and predicting drug-relevant properties of molecules silico.ArrayAssistArrayAssist was developed for Stratagene, Inc., based on the Avadis platform. The production was stopped after Stratagene was acquired by Technologies, Inc. in 2007.GeneSpringGeneSpring GX (version 9.0.0 onwards), GeneSpring Workgroup (version 7.0.0 onwards), and Mass Profiler Pro are developed by Strands R&D division in Bangalore.Avadis NGS Avadis NGS is a software platform for sequencing data analysis. It can import pre-aligned read sequences from sequencing platforms like Illumina, ABI, and Life Sciences and supports fragment, paired-end and mate-pair library types. Aligned reads in SAM, BAM, BED or Eland formats can be imported into the tool.Avadis NGS also allows users to perform quality control on the imported data and filter reads before the main analysis is performed. Version 1.1 of the tool supports three experiment types: ChIP-Seq, RNA-Seq, and DNA-Seq. Gene, transcript, SNP, homology, ontology (GO), and other annotations needed for analysis can be downloaded directly from the Avadis NGS website.: The ChIP-Seq analysis workflow allows users to identify enriched regions using three different peak finding algorithms - a simple sliding window based approach, MACS, and PICS. Depending on the design, these regions could be factor binding sites, methylation sites, etc. Motifs present in the identified binding sites can be discovered using a parallel implementation of the GADEM algorithm. Entity lists containing the genes in the neighborhood of the binding regions can be created and used in downstream gene ontology, GSEA, pathway analysis.: The RNA-Seq experiment workflow allows users to measure expression levels of known genes and transcripts. It also allows discovery of novel exons, genes and splice junction. The Browser in Avadis NGS enables users to validate the predictions by allowing viewing of the results in the context of annotations from multiple sources such as NCBI, the Genome Browser, and Ensembl. Statistical tests, specifically designed to handling count based data, can be used for differential gene expression and alternative splicing analysis. A special Gene View visualization presents consolidated information about a gene and helps in the verifications of predictions.: The DNA-Seq experiment workflow has links for SNP and variation detection algorithms. The SNP prediction step finds homozygous and heterozygous SNPs and identifies overlaps with the provided dbSNP annotations. SNPs falling in genic regions are further analyzed and their effect on transcripts is described (similar to the Ensembl SNP Effect Prediction web-service). The variation analysis algorithms identify homozygous and heterozygous indels, inversions and translocation events.Visualization tools, namely Genome Browser, Gene View, and Variant Support View, are a key aspect of the software. Other visualizations available with tool are plot, MvA plot, profile plot, histogram, map, and whisker plot, and diagram. Aided with visualizations, users a pictorial feel for statistical trends in the data.: Genome Browser in Avadis NGS is an interface to visualize data, results, and annotations associated with the genome in one place. Annotation data, such as cytobands, genes, transcripts, etc., as well as results from the analyses, such as Peak regions, SNPs, Gene Fusions, etc. can be superimposed. Users can drag and drop data into the browser and also perform search operations. To navigate in the Genome Browser, users can scroll, pan, and zoom. Users may also color, filter, and label data points of interest. : Gene View is used to visualize individual genes and their transcripts. Users can see read coverage for known, as well as novel, exon partitions. Avadis NGS also provides access to organism-specific interaction databases containing relations between proteins, small molecules, enzymes, complexes, biological processes, molecular functions, and gene families. The two million interactions present in these databases can also be augmented by importing pathways in BioPAX format from Reactome, Cancer Cell Map, etc. Gene lists generated by analysis steps can be used as the starting point for many pathway analysis operations.Accolades* Strand is a Herring Asia 100 Private Company for the years 2005(http://www.indecommglobal.com/downloads/RH_sep_05_05.pdf) and 2010(http://www.herring100.com/rha2010/winners/2010winners.html).* Deloitte Fast 50 India and Fast 500 Asia in 2009 and 2010.* Strand Life Sciences named as NASSCOM IT Innovator 2006 by NASSCOM(http://www.nasscom.in/Nasscom/templates/NormalPage.aspx?id50719). It is one amongst seven Indian companies to be recognized by NASSCOM as IT Innovators in 2007.* Strand Life Sciences named as Technology Pioneer 2007 by the Economic Forum(http://www.weforum.org/en/Communities/Technology%20Pioneers/SelectedTechPioneers/TechnologyPioneers2007/index.htm).* Strand has received the & Sullivan Excellence in Technology Award 2005(http://www.frost.com/prod/servlet/press-release.pag?docid44422323) for its technology platform Avadis.* 2003 Strand was nominated as a technology pioneer by the Economic Forum for the year 2002.* Genome Technology Magazine nominated Strand as the top five most important companies in the category Company of the Year 2002. References External links*Strand Life Sciences*Strand Scientific Intelligence*Avadis NGS*QSAR World
20818094
Michael_Posner_(lawyer)
religion  Michael H. Posner (born November 19, 1950 in Chicago, Illinois) is an American lawyer, the Founding Executive Director and later the President of Rights First (formerly the Lawyers Committee for Human Rights), and the current Assistant Secretary of State for Democracy, Human Rights, and Labor (DRL) of the States. Early years Posner received a B.A. from the of Michigan. He received his J.D. from the of California, Berkeley Law School (Hall). He is a member of the California Bar (inactive)(State Bar of California Membership Records) and the Illinois Bar.(Illinois Supreme Court Attorney Registration) After graduating, Posner spent a year documenting atrocities committed in Uganda. His work in Geneva for the United Nations earned him esteem as a human-rights advocate.(Who Runs Government Biography | Michael Posner) Human Rights First In 1978, Posner was recruited by Shestack and James Silkenat to become the founding executive director of the Lawyers Committee for International Human Rights, a non-profit, nonpartisan international human rights organization with offices in New York and Washington, D.C. that works on a range of domestic and international human rights issues. He focused on refugee protection, advancing a rights-based approach to national security and combating discrimination.(Who Runs Government Biography | Michael Posner) The organization was renamed to the Lawyers Committee for Human Rights and, in 2003, renamed again to Human Rights First. In his role, Posner built the organization from a staff of two, a few volunteers and a budget of $55,000 to its current staff of 60 and an annual budget of almost $9 million.(Human Rights First 2007 Annual Report) At Human Rights First, he facilitated the growth of the largest and most successful pro bono legal assistance program in the United States for asylum seekers. Today Human Rights First represents more than 1,000 clients from 85 countries, with an average success rate of over 90 percent. In 1980, Posner played a key role in proposing and campaigning for the first U.S. law providing for political asylum, which became part of the Act of 1980.Torture Victim Protection ActPosner has also focused efforts to strengthen systems of accountability in countries where human rights violations occur, especially for crimes like torture, genocide, crimes against humanity, and war crimes. He proposed, drafted, and campaigned for the Victim Protection Act (TVPA), which was adopted by Congress and signed into law in 1992.(Testimony Before the U.S. Senate, Committee on the Judiciary, Subcommittee on Immigration and Refugee Affairs, 22 June 1990 http://www.loc.gov/law/find/hearings/pdf/00011262831.pdf)WITNESSAlso in 1992, Posner helped musician/activist Gabriel found (human rights group), an organization that uses video and online technologies to shed light on human rights violations around the world. In its first few years, WITNESS was based at Human Rights First. WITNESS has since received numerous awards for their work including, the National Academy of TV Arts & Sciences Humanitarian Award and the New York Times Company Nonprofit Excellence award (WITNESS Awards)Role in the International Justice System and the International Criminal Court (ICC)Posner has continuously fought for strengthened systems of international justice. He played an instrumental advocacy role in setting up the ad hoc criminal tribunals for the former Yugoslavia (established 1993) and Rwanda (established 1994) and the International Criminal Court (established 2002). In 1998, Posner led the Human Rights First delegation to the Rome conference at which the statute of the International Criminal Court (ICC) was adopted.McCain Amendment / End Torture Now CampaignHuman Rights First launched its End Torture Now Campaign in 2004. Michael Posner and Human Rights First led the advocacy efforts in support of the McCain Amendment which bans U.S. soldiers and officials from engaging in cruel, inhuman, or degrading treatment. The amendment won broad bipartisan congressional support and was signed into law in December 2005.(Michael Posner | Human Rights First)Academic careerPosner lectured at Law School from 1981 to 1984, and has been a visiting lecturer at Law School since 1984.Other organizationsAs a member of the White House Apparel Industry Partnership Task Force, Posner helped found the Labor Association (FLA) in 1997, a multi-stakeholder initiative between apparel and footwear companies, universities and non-governmental organizations aimed at protecting the rights of workers in the apparel industrys global supply chain. He sits on the FLAs board of directors. Since 2006, Posner has worked on another multi-stakeholder initiative called the Network Initiative (GNI), which was launched in October 2008. He also serves on the board of the F. Kennedy Memorial Center for Human Rights.Human rights advocacyPosner has testified dozens of times before the U.S. Congress on a wide range of human rights topics including the protection of refugees, anti-Semitism,(Testimony Before the U.S. Senate, Committee on Foreign Relations, Subcommittee on European Affairs, 8 April 2004 http://www.humanrightsfirst.org/discrimination/antisemitism/AntiSem_test_final41204.pdf) human rights within the business community(Testimony Before the U.S. House of Representatives, Human Rights Caucus, 8 February 2006 http://www.humanrightsfirst.info/pdf/06216-hrf-mp-test-chrc-brief.pdf) and human rights violations in the Philippines,(Testimony Before the U.S. Senate, Committee on Foreign Relations, 18 September 1984 http://books.google.com/books?idK0g1AAAAIAAJ&qmichael+posner&pgis1) China,(Testimony Before the U.S. House of Representatives, Committee on International Relations, 20 January 1999 http://books.google.com/books?idL5N7P2jE9v8C&pgPA35&dqmike+posner+china) Northern Ireland,(Testimony Before the U.S. House of Representatives, Committee on International Relations, Subcommittee on International Operations and Human Rights, 24 June 1997 http://books.google.com/books?idJ9DZwVmLPFAC&pgPA19&dqmike+posner+northern+ireland) Uganda,(Testimony Before the U.S. Senate, Committee on Foreign Relations, Subcommittee on Foreign Economic Policy, February 1978 http://books.google.com/books?idAEMHGQAACAAJ&dqmike+posner+uganda) El Salvador and many other countries. He is a frequent public commentator on these and other issues, regularly speaking at conferences and events in the U.S. and abroad. His opinion essays have appeared in publications including the Globe,(The Rule of Law, Boston Globe, 18 July 2006) Post(A Dangerous Continuum, Jerusalem Post, 26 December 2007) Post,( Another chance for Egypt to commit to transparency, Washington Post, 18 December 2010) and Herald Tribune.(Anti-Semitism in Europe, International Herald Tribune, 5 May 2004)Obama administrationOn July 7, 2009, President Obama announced his intent to nominate Posner to serve in the State Department as Secretary of State for Democracy, Human Rights, and Labor.(July 7, 2009, White House Press Release) He was named to the position on September 23, 2009.(http://www.humanrights-geneva.info/US-names-new-human-rights-chief,6663) Posner and Hongju Koh represent the U.S. to the Nations Human Rights CouncilConfirmationIn his statement as the nominee for Assistant Secretary of State Bureau of Democracy, Human Rights and Labor before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee on July 28, 2009, Posner affirmed that s}ince the late 1970s, I often have looked to the U.S. government as a key ally in the struggle to protect human rights around the world. As a non-governmental advocate, I have witnessed and often benefited from the incredible power and moral authority of the United States to lead on these important but often complicated issues. The U.S. Governments potential to provide leadership on human rights democracy and the rule of law is part of what Secretary Clinton has referred to as the smart power.(Michael H Posner Testimony before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee) Posner later recalled the personal lessons of the Holocaust that helped shape his vocation as a human rights advocate. Posner was raised with a consciousness of the horrors of the Holocaust and internalized two important lessons. The first is that governments that fall into the hands of dictators and demagogues are capable of unspeakable brutality and horror. The second, more hopeful lesson is that courageous people can and often do stand up to oppression and it is our duty to help them.(Michael H Posner Testimony before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee) During his testimony, Posner gave a brief synopsis of his previous involvement with the U.S. government in their mutual effort to promote and protect human rights. His first appearance before the Senate was in 1978 when Posner testified before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee regarding the trade sanctions against Idi Amins Uganda.  Posner commented that this was the first of many instances where I have seen and been part of efforts to harness the political, diplomatic and economic power of the United States Government as a force for good..(Michael H Posner Testimony before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee) Congress passed a total ban on trade with Uganda and the people regained control of their country within the year. He went on to describe other shared successes including the work we did with Andrei Sakharov and other dissidents in the former Soviet Union, especially through the Helsinki process. I experienced it in the 1980s when President Reagan stood behind Philippine peoples power and ensured a successful transition of power from Marcos to Aquino. I saw it in Northern Ireland where George Mitchell and the Clinton Administration provided a roadmap for peace through the Good Friday Agreement. And I witnessed it as the Bush Administration, working closely with Congressional leaders like Senators Cardin and Voinovich and Congressman Chris Smith, took a leading role in challenging European anti-Semitism and other racial and religious persecution through the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe.(Michael H Posner Testimony before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee) Posner closed with an affirmation that the promotion of democracy and human rights here, and around the world, helps define us  and who we are as a people.(Michael H Posner Testimony before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee) Posners confirmation by the 111th Congress was welcomed by the international human rights community. Amnesty International USA Executive Director Larry Cox issued the following statement: Michael has been a brilliant advocate on behalf of protecting the rights and dignity of people the world over. At this time of great opportunity to advance the rights of those whose freedoms are denied, it is invaluable to have an advocate of Michaels accomplishment in this role, said Cox. Amnesty International looks forward to continuing to work with now-Secretary Posner on crucial issues concerning the global protection of human rights for all people..(Amnesty International Public Statement | Support for Michael Posner)At his Swearing-in Ceremony at the State Department, Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton commented that as soon as confirmation was completed, literally, he was on a plane, going to lead the first ever U.S. delegation to the UN Human Rights Council. Our team there under Mikes leadership not only made significant progress on womens rights and human security issues, but co-sponsored a successful resolution with Egypt upholding freedom of expression and freedom of religion. And Mike went on to Warsaw to present the Obama Administrations proposal for advancing the Human Dimension of the Helsinki process. I think I only talked to him two times during that period, because I had great confidence that he would indeed be successful as we rejoined the Human Rights Council and it exceeded our expectations.(Remarks at Swearing-in Ceremony | Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton)U.S.-China Human Rights DialogueIn May 2010, Posner was a key negotiator in a U.S.-China Human Rights Dialogue in D.C. On May 14, Posner gave the press conference after the event, where he described the U.S. approach to the meeting as, Part of a mature relationship is that you have an open discussion where you not only raise the other guys problems, but you raise your own. To that end, he said the American side had brought up the United States treatment of Americans, as well as Arizonas recently-passed Our Law Enforcement and Safe Neighborhoods Act, which Posner said had been brought up early and often, as a troubling trend in our society.(Briefing on the U.S.-China Human Rights Dialogue (transcript), Michael H. Posner, May 14, 2010)Posners comments proved controversial in the United States. Arizonas two senators, Republicans Kyl and McCain, wrote an open letter to Posner that stated, To compare in any way the lawful and democratic act of the government of the state of Arizona with the arbitrary abuses of the unelected Communist Party is inappropriate and offensive, and called for a retraction and apology.(US senators blast Arizona-China rights comparison, France-Presse, May 18, 2010) The conservative  York Post called the comments misguided equivalence and despicable, citing Chinas treatment of its own Muslim population, the Uyghurs, as well as its policy of sending back refugees who arrive from Korea, where certain, agonizing death awaits them.(Maligning America -- again, editorial, New York Post, May 18, 2010)The State Department defended Posners actions. Spokesman P.J. Crowley disputed the notion Posner was apologizing to China when he was actually standing up for America by demonstrating how debate works in a civil society. Crowley also reiterated the Obama administrations concerns about the Arizona law, stating, There is, as many have said, real concerns about -- that this Arizona law will inevitably devolve into racial profiling. That would be a fundamental challenge to human rights around the world.()Internet FreedomAs Assistant Secretary of State, Posner has played a leading role in implementing Secretary Clintons vision for Internet freedom. http://www.state.gov/secretary/rm/2011/02/156619.htm In testimony before the Senate Judiciary Human Rights and the Law Subcommittee in March 2010, Posner said, the defense of a free, open and interconnected Internet is in our national and global interests and is important for commerce, for diplomatic and political relations, and for building sustainable democratic societies. http://judiciary.senate.gov/pdf/3-2-10%20Posner%20testimony.pdf Posner frequently speaks on the topic of Internet freedom and the role of the Internet in advancing human rights and helping people build sustainable democracies. http://geneva.usmission.gov/2011/03/08/internet-freedom_hrc/Under Posners leadership, the Bureau of Democracy, Human Rights, and Labor has played a leading role in supporting democratic activists in their use of new technologies, particularly in the Middle East.  Posner led efforts described as uncharacteristically cool http://realtwister.blogspot.com/2011/04/us-develops-panic-button-app-for-pro.html to fund millions of dollars in technology development meant to aid pro-democracy activists around the world.  In describing a panic button designed to allow pro-democracy campaigners wipe out their phones address books and emit emergency signals to other activists, Posner said, Were operating like venture capitalists. We are looking for the most innovative people who are going to tailor their technology and their expertise to the particular community of people were trying to protect. http://www.reuters.com/article/2011/03/25/us-rights-usa-technology-idUSTRE72O6DH20110325  Digital activists commended Posners bureau in this approach in an open letter to Congress in March 2011, saying, The State Department, and particularly the Bureau of Democracy, Human Rights and Labor (DRL), has taken significant interest in supporting technologies that enhance Internet freedom, and reached out to leading organizations in a collaborative and open approach. http://mobileactive.tumblr.comStrategic DialoguesPosner has participated in a number of strategic dialogues since joining the State Department.  Both Clinton and Posner have placed great emphasis on building partnerships beyond the state, and giving civil society a stronger voice in shaping the political decision-making process.  In her July 2010 speech in Krakow Poland, Secretary Clinton said, markets and politics usually receive more attention.  But civil society is every bit as important.  And it undergirds both democratic governance and broad-based prosperity.  http://www.state.gov/secretary/rm/2010/07/143952.htm In February 2010, Posner and Clinton launched a Strategic Dialogue with Civil Society, an endeavor to help streamline and strengthen dialogue with non-governmental organizations and other members of civil society.  Clinton and Posner engaged in a town hall style discussion with over fifty civil society representatives, domestically and internationally.In the summer of 2010, Posner participated in the U.S.-Russia Civil Society Working Group of the Bilateral Commission, which focused on prisons and migration, as well as the Civil Society to Civil Society Summit, where Secretary Clinton told participants we need creative, committed, courageous organizations like you and yours to find innovative solutions, to expose corruption, to give voice to the voiceless, to hold governments accountable to their citizens, to keep people informed and engaged on the issues that matter most to them.  http://www.humanrights.gov/2010/12/09/remarks-at-the-u-s-russia-civil-society-to-civil-society-summitEconomic and Social RightsPosner has been a vocal proponent of the Obama Administrations integrated approach to human rights and the inexorable relationship between national security and economic, social, and political rights.  On March 24th, Posner delivered a keynote address, The Four Freedoms Turn 70:  Ensuring Economic, Political, and National Security in the 21st Century, at the American Society of International Law.  The speech took place on the anniversary of Franklin Delano Roosevelts famous Four Freedom speech.  Posners speech re-examined the Four Freedoms, or moral cornerstones, and discussed the important intersection between political and economic rights, which he said are inexorably linked.  According to Posner, Human dignity has a political component and an economic component.  Posner highlighted the turmoil in the Middle East as evidence that the shaping of U.S. national security must include the promotion of human rights and fundamental freedoms, and that only if the two are interlinked will peaceful societies flourish economically, socially, and politically.  The unrest in the Middle East, according to Posner, once again demonstrates the fallacy of trying to divide Americas hard strategic interests from our soft interests, including our commitment to human rights.  Posner stated, The recent protests demonstrate the centrality of human rights to those interests and the links among civil, political, economic and social rights.http://www.uspolicy.be/headline/assistant-secretary-posner-%E2%80%9Cfour-freedoms-21st-century%E2%80%9DVoluntary PrinciplesSince March 2010, Posner has been involved in the Voluntary Principles on Security and Human Rights.  Established in 2000, the Voluntary Principlesan initiative by governments, NGOs, and companiesprovides guidance to extractives companies on maintaining the safety and security of their operations within a framework that ensures respect for human rights and fundamental freedoms.  The Voluntary Principles are the only human rights guidelines designed specifically for oil, gas, and mining companies. On March 22nd and 23rd, 2011 Posner chaired the 11th annual Voluntary Principles on Security and Human Rights Plenary Meeting in Washington, a multi-stakeholder forum where human rights issues in the extractives sector, particularly in areas of conflict and civil strife, were addressed.  Posner also participated in the March 2010 VPs Plenary in London.  The United States is a founding member of the VPs and 2011 marked the 11th anniversary of the Principles.  Currently there are seven member governments to the VPs18 companies, nine NGOs, and three observers. Human Rights ReportsPosner has been actively engaged in reporting on global human rights situations through the State Departments annual Human Rights Reports, submitted to Congress by the Department of State in compliance with Sections 116(d) and 502B(b) of the Foreign Assistance Act of 1961 (FAA), as amended.  The report offers a comprehensive record of human rights situations of over 180 countries worldwide, and uses information from nongovernmental and international organizations, U.S. embassies and consulates and government officials, and other sources.  According to Posner, Itsthe single most comprehensive report on human rights produced by anybody in the world194 countries, 2,200,000 words, 7,000 pages.  At the most recent Human Rights Report roll-out in April 2011, Posner highlighted three trends identified in the 2010 report1) Ongoing conflicts that continue to disproportionately affect vulnerable populations; 2) Greater access to connective technologies that has helped to both promote human rights, but also has given governments greater energy in curtailing freedom of expression; and 3) the use and misuse of national security legislation and emergency legislation to apply broad curtailments on basic civil liberties.  http://www.state.gov/g/drl/rls/rm/2010/138263.htmUniversal Periodic ReviewPosner has been a proponent of the Universal Periodic Review (URR), established by the UN General Assembly in 2006 as a process through which the human rights records of the United Nations 192 Member States is reviewed and assessed.  In August 2010, Posner traveled to Geneva as part of the U.S. delegation submitting the United States first report through the UPR to the UN High Commissioner for Human Rights.  Speaking of the UPR at a press conference at the Foreign Press Center in April 2011, Posner stated, We are very open to the notion that people in this country have not only a right but are well open to be critical of what we do, and we engage them in that criticism.  http://fpc.state.gov/160395.htmInternational Religious FreedomSince being sworn in as Assistant Secretary, Posner has engaged on a number of fronts promoting religious freedom, particularly in the Middle East and South Central Asia.  Following the release of the 2009 International Religious Freedom Report, Posner discussed religious freedom issues in the Middle East before the House Foreign Affairs Committee Subcommittee on the Middle East and South Asia.  Said Posner, Religion is a global phenomenon and all nations, including the United States, wrestle with how best to accommodate their religious diversity.  We are convinced that the freedom to profess, practice, and promote ones religion is a basic human right, a social good, a source of stability, and a key component of international security.http://www.state.gov/g/drl/rls/rm/2009/132167.htm Posner has engaged on international religious freedom issues in meetings with Egyptian Coptic Christians, Chinese religious freedom advocates, Vietnamese, Pakistani and Afghan officials, and others since being sworn in as Assistant Secretary. Honorary degrees and awards Posner has received honorary degrees from the of Pennsylvania Law School, the of Hartford and the of the Holy Cross. He is also the recipient of the Fellows Award for distinguished service, Young Lawyers of the American Bar Association (1990); the Distinguished Service Award, Boalt Hall Alumni Association (1993); the Wolfgang Friedmann Memorial Award for outstanding contributions to the field of international law, Columbia University Journal of Transnational Law (1993); the Dr. Jean Mayer Global Citizenship Award, Institute for Global Leadership at Tufts University (2006); and the Builders of the New New York Award, New York Immigration Coalition (2007).ReferencesExternal links*Voices on Antisemitism Interview with Michael Posner from the US Holocaust Memorial Museum*GE Expert Perspectives, Practical Human Rights Practices, 2007-2008 http://www.ge.com/citizenship/news_features/perspectives_posner.jsp*Human Rights in China Interview with Mike Posner, Bringing Together Business and Human Rights, 2008 http://hrichina.org/public/PDFs/CRF.1.2008/CRF-2008-1_Together.pdf*The Aspen Institute, Human Rights in the Information Age, 7 July 2006 http://fora.tv/2006/07/07/Human_Rights_in_the_Information_Age*Carnegie Council, Ending Torture and Secret Detention in Americas Name, 12 May 2005 http://www.cceia.org/resources/transcripts/5165.html*ABA Human Rights Magazine, The Effort to End Sweatshops, Vol. 24, No. 4, Fall 1997 http://www.abanet.org/irr/hr/fall97/posner.htmlzh:
20826332
Pudo
Pudo is a town in West Region in northern Ghana near the border with Faso. Mining In historical times, the Pudo area has been a significant source of ironware.(http://books.google.com.au/books?idDRc4AAAAIAAJ&pgPA91&lpgPA91&dqpudo+ghana&sourcebl&ots88fI9dEG7K&sigNDwsCAUAlA6COOSihLUuU4oZ8TE&hlen&eiT2DVSfjGNJiNkAXfo4HQBA&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum10)Pudo is near significant unexploited iron ore deposits.(http://www.reuters.com/article/reutersEdge/idUSTRE49C1YB20081013) See also * ore in Africa References 
20842698
Florence_and_Cripple_Creek_Railroad
The Florence and Cripple Creek Railroad (F&CC) was a  (narrow gauge) railroad running northward from junctions with the & Rio Grande Railroad at the mill towns of Florence and later moved to City, CO, on the banks of the River, up steep and narrow Canyon to the Creek Mining District, west of Peak. Started in 1893, it was the first railroad to reach the new, booming mining district from the outside world; as a result it earned substantial profits in its first years. The railroad hauled people and goods into the mining district, and ore concentrates from the mines south for milling in Florence or transfer to the D&RG for milling in CO. The F&CCs first main terminal was located in Victor, the second city of the district; but its branch lines served many of the largest mines within the area.Ultimately, the F&CC began to struggle financially as other competing railroads, built to the  gauge, Midland Terminal and Colorado Springs & Cripple Creek District Railroads entered the district from Springs from the north or east. In addition, floods washed out significant sections of the F&CC mainline in the narrows of Phantom Canyon several times. By the early 1900s, the railroad was in serious financial trouble and merged with other railroads of the area under the Cripple Creek Central holding company. A final, large flash flood destroyed enough of the F&CCs right-of-way to convince its new owners it was financially unwise to spend money rebuilding it; and the line was abandoned and scrapped. The F&CCs well-kept motive power, eight 2-8-0 Consolidation freight engines, and four 4-6-0 Ten-Wheelers passenger engines, were quickly sold to other area narrow gauge railroads. An F&CC subsidiary, the Circle Railroad, which operated narrow gauge commuter routes within the district itself, continued to operate for several more years after its parents abandonment. See also * Creek and Victor Narrow Gauge Railroad References * Ferrell, M. H. (1969?). The Cripple Creek Road.* Feitz, Leland, Cripple Creek Railroads, 1968, Golden Bell Press* Cafky, Morris(1949?) Rails Around Gold Hill.Further readingExternal links* THE FLORENCE AND CRIPPLE CREEK RAILROAD from The Cripple Creek Times New Year 1903 (including postcard views)* The History of the Florence & Cripple Creek Railroadand Cripple Creek Railroad
20854811
Alberta_Oil_Sands_Technology_and_Research_Authority
The Alberta Oil Sands Technology and Research Authority (AOSTRA) was an Alberta crown corporation to promote the development and use of new technology for sands and crude oil production, and enhanced recovery of conventional oil. It was funded by the Alberta Heritage Savings Trust Fund. Its head office and information center were located in Edmonton and a second office in Calgary, Canada.()HistoryAOSTRA was formed in 1974 for promotion of the development of new technologies for oil sands and heavy-oil production.()() In 1979 its mandate was expanded also to the conventional crude oil technologies.( In 1984, AOSTRA initiated the Underground Test Facility as an in-situ SAGD bitumen recovery facility.(In 1986, the Alberta Department of Energy took over AOSTRAs role in developing oil sands technology, and on 1 August 2000, AOSTRA was reorganized into the newly established Energy Research Institute, and rebranded again to the name of InnovatesEnergy and Environment Solutions with an expanded role to include other energy-related research areas such as wind, solar, fuel cells, clean coal and biomass.(()OperationsAOSTRA operated primarily through projects, the costs of which were shared with industries. The resultant technology is available to any user at fair market value. AOSTRA also supported research at Canadian universities and research institutions by providing grants to inventors, funding the operation of a technical information system, promoting international co-operation in oil sands development, and providing scholarships and fellowships for educational assistance.( One of the main targets of AOSTRA finding of suitable technologies for that part of the Oil Sands that could not be recovered using surface mining technologies.()TechnologiesMost notable technologies developed with assistance of AOSTRA include of Steam Assisted Gravity Drainage (SAGD), OSLO Cold Water Extraction (OCWE) and Alberta Taciuk Process (ATP).(()()()( )References
20872294
Bench_(geology)
In geomorphology, geography and geology, a bench or benchland is a long, relatively narrow strip of relatively level or gently inclined land that is bounded by distinctly steeper slopes above and below it. Benches can be of different origins and created by very different geomorphic processes.(Jackson, J.A., 1997, Glossary of Geology. American Geological Institute. Alexandria, Virginia.)Image:BenchCrossSection.tif|thumb|right|500px| Hypothetical cross-section of a river valley showing different types of benches. They include structural benches (sb) formed by the differential erosion of shale beds overlying limestone beds. Also, they include benches in the form of narrow strath terraces (st), fill terraces (ft), and cut terraces (ct) underlain by fluvial sediments.First, the differential erosion of rocks or sediments of varying hardness and resistance to erosion can create benches. Earth scientists called such benches structural benches. Second, other benches are narrow terraces created by the abandonment of a floodplain by a river or stream and entrenchment of the river valley into it. Finally, a bench is also the name of a narrow flat area often seen at the base of a sea cliff that was created by waves or other physical or chemical erosion near the shoreline. These benches are typically referred to as either coastal benches, wave-cut benches, or platforms.( Bryan, W. B., and R. S. Stephens, 1993, Coastal bench formation at Hanauma Bay, Oahu, Hawaii. Geological Society of America Bulletin. v. 105, no. 3, p. 377-386.)(Huggett, J.L., 2007, Fundamentals of Geomorphology. Routledge. New York, NewYork. ISBN 9780415390842)In mining, a bench is a narrow, strip of land cut into the side of an open-pit mine. These step-like zones are created along the walls of an open-pit mine for access and mining.(See also*Landform*terrace*(geology)References(()
20878605
William_Embry_Wrather
 footnotes William Embry Wrather (January 20, 1883 - November 28, 1963) was an American geologist. He was born on a farm near Brandenburg in County, Kentucky on January 20, 1883. He died in his home in Washington, DC on Thursday, November 28, 1963. He was the only son of Richard Anselm and Glovy Washington (Munford) Wrather. Wrather moved to Chicago at the age of 14 to live with relatives and to attend South Chicago High School. Wrather entered the of Chicago in 1902 and received his ph.B. in Geology in 1907. During the summer of 1907, Wrather was a field assistant on a Geological Survey party in the mountains of western Montana. Wrather worked temporarily in clerical positions before going to work for Guffey Petroleum from 1908-1916. On December 30, 1910, he married his high school sweetheart, Alice Mildred Dolling in Chicago, Illinois. In 1916, Wrather resigned to search for new oil fields. In 1918 his efforts contributed to the identification of the Desdemona field in County, Texas. Wrathers interest in the Desdemona field amounted to three quarters of a million dollars.Wrather then moved to Dallas an opened an office as a consulting geologist. On the recommendation of the National Research Council, Wrather was appointed United States delegate to successive International Geological Congresses in Spain, South Africa, Russia, the Netherlands, and Algeria. Wrather was a founding member of the American Association of Petroleum Geologists. He served as Secretary-Treasurer in 1918 and as Chairman of the Research Committee from 1923 to 1933. He was a member of the Scientific Advisory Committee for the Chicago Worlds Fair in 1933. He also served as President of the Texas State Historical Association for seven years.In 1940, Wrather was selected General Chairman for the Dallas annual meeting of the Association for the Advancement of Science, of which he became a member in 1917 and a Fellow in 1925. In 1943, he was appointed Treasurer of the Association and he served in that capacity of 11 years. Wrather was also a First Vice President of the Society of America and a President (1934) of the of Economic Geologists. He served as president of the Institute of Mining, Metallurgical, and Petroleum Engineers in 1948. In 1951, he was chosen to be a Life Trustee of the Geographic Society.In 1942, Wrather came to Washington, DC is be Assistant Chief of the Foreign Economic Administration for Metals and Minerals. In 1943, upon the retirement of Curran Mendenhall, the National Academy of Sciences recommended Wrather as a potential candidate for appointment and he was selected to be the Director of the Geological Survey.USGS careerIn 1943, as the Federal Government began planning for the postwar era, Director Curran Mendenhall, who had served 2 years beyond then mandatory retirement age by Presidential exemption, was succeeded by William Embry Wrather. For most of his life, Wrather, a graduate of the of Chicago who had been a Survey field assistant in 1907, had been an eminently successful consulting petroleum geologist, but when he was named Director he was Associate Chief of the Metals and Minerals Division of the Board of Economic Warfare. In the fall of 1943, Wrather was a member of the small mission sent by the Petroleum Administrator for War, M. Ickes, to appraise the petroleum resources of the Middle East, and Brennan Nolan, a geologist in the Metals Section who had played a leading role in the strategic-minerals program, became Acting Director. In January 1956, after Director Wrather retired because of illness and age, Assistant Director Brennan Nolan became the Geological Surveys seventh Director.(USGS History)Awards and honors* Honorary Membership - American Association of Petroleum Geologists (1943)* Alumni Medal - Chicago University (1943)* Honorary Doctorate - Southern Methodist University (1945)* Honorary Doctorate - Colorado School of Mines (1947)* Honorary Doctorate - University of Kentucky (1950)* Anthony F. Lucas Award - American Institute of Mining and Metallurgical Engineers (1950)* Honorary Doctorate - Montana School of Mines (1952)* John Fritz Medal - American Society of Civil Engineers, et al. (1954)* Distinguished Service Award - US Department of the Interior (1954)* Sidney Powers Memorial Award - American Association of Petroleum Geologists (1956)Publications* Wrather, William Embry The Vinton, Louisiana, oil field Bulletin of the American Association of Petroleum Geologists, vol.5, no.2, pp.339340, Mar 1921* Wrather, William Embry Supposed igneous rock from Wichita County, Texas, wells Bulletin of the American Association of Petroleum Geologists, vol.5, no.4, pp.512515, Jul 1921* Wrather, William Embry Dinosaur tracks in Hamilton County, Texas Journal of Geology, vol.30, no.5, pp.354360, Jul 1922* Wrather, William Embry What of our future oil supply? Economic Geology, vol. 23, no. 3, pp.331333, May 1928* Wrather, William Embry and Frederic H. Lahee. Problems of petroleum geology; a sequel to Structure of typical American oil fields American Association of Petroleum Geologists (1934) 1073 pp.* Wrather, William Embry Trends in petroleum-production practice Economic Geology and the Bulletin of the Society of Economic Geologists, vol.30, no.7, pp.735749, Nov 1935* Wrather, W E Coal in Alaska (USGS) Miscellaneous Report - Alaska Territorial Department of Mines, Report: MR-195-26, 10 pp., 1943* Wrather, William Embry Wartime duties of U.S.G.S. cover multitude of services Oil & Gas Journal, vol. 42, no. 46, pp.102, Mar 1944* Wrather, William Embry Mineral resources and resourcefulness Mines Magazine, vol.36, no.5, pp.185186, May 1946* Wrather, William Embry A new tool for marine geology The Military Engineer, vol.44, no.302, pp.411412, Nov 1952* Wrather, William Embry The search for minerals, petroleum, and water resources Mines Magazine, vol.43, no.1, pp.3942, Jan 1953* Brantly, J.E. Memorial to William Embry Wrather, GSA Bulletin; April 1964; v. 75; no. 4; p. P71-P76* Pratt, Wallace E. William Embry Wrather (1883-1963) AAPG Bulletin; October 1964; v. 48; no. 10; p. 1733-1738References(*William Embry Wrather bio. U.S. Geological Survey, U.S. Department of the InteriorExternal links* Portrait of William Embry Wrather via the Geological Survey* Photograph of William Embry Wrather via the US Geological Survey
20900836
2009_New_Year_Honours
The New Year Honours 2009 principally for the United Kingdom as well as the Realms were announced on 31 December 2008,() to celebrate the year passed and mark the beginning of 2009.The recipients of honours are displayed here as they were styled before their new honour, and arranged by the country whose ministers advised HM The Queen on the appointments, then by honour, with grades i.e. Knight/Dame Grand Cross, Knight/Dame Commander  etc. and then divisions i.e. Civil, Diplomatic and Military as and where appropriate. Civil Division  Knights Bachelor *Professor Timothy Robert Peter Brighouse, for services to education.*Professor David Nicholas Cannadine, for services to scholarship.*Alexander Crombie, for services to the insurance industry in Scotland.*Dr. Andrew Cubie CBE, for public service in Scotland.*Peter John Bellet Dixon, for services to the housing sector.*Professor Neil James Douglas, for services to medicine.*Robert Paul Edwards, for services to local and national education.*Christoper Andrew Hoy MBE, for services to sport.*David Charles Jones CBE, for services to business and to charity.*Kenneth Lloyd Jones QPM, for services to the police.*Nigel Graham Knowles, for services to the legal profession.*David Thomas Rowell Lewis, for services to the legal profession and to the City of London Corporation.*John Robert Madejski OBE, for charitable services.*Neil Stuart McKay CB, for services to the NHS.*His Honour Judge Goolam Hoosen Kader Meeran, for services to the administration of justice* Nicholas Wyndham Partridge OBE, for services to healthcare.* John Christopher Powell, for services to the advertising industry.* Terence David John Pratchett OBE, for services to literature.* Bernard Francisco Ribeiro CBE, for services to medicine.*Professor Martin John Taylor FRS, for services to science.*Dr. Mark Jeremy Walport, for services to medical research. Order of the Bath  Knights Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) *Nicholas MacPherson, Permanent Secretary, HM Treasury*Jonathan Phillips, Permanent Secretary, Ireland Office Companions of the Order of the Bath (CB) * Patricia Margaret Alrded CBE, Director-General and Deputy Head of the Foreign and Defence Policy Secretariat, Office*John Stephen Pitt-Brooke, Director-General Secretariat, Land Forces, Ministry of Defence*Professor Derek William Jones, Former Senior Director, Welsh Assembly Government*David John Pearson, Deputy Treasury Solicitor, Solicitors Department*David James Smith, Commercial Director, Dept for Work and Pensions*Ralph Edwin Tabberer, Director-General for Schools, Dept. for Children, Schools and Families.Royal Victorian Order Knights Commander of the Royal Victorian Order (KCVO) * His Grace The Duke of Devonshire CBE, HMs Representative at Ascot* Rear Admiral Jeremy Michael De Halpert CB, Deputy Master, Trinity House* The Rt Hon. Raymond Arthur Clanaboy, 4th Baron ONeill TD, Former Lord Lieutenant of County Antrim* Sir John Charles Buchanan Riddell Bt. CVO, Lieutenant of Northumberland Commanders of the Royal Victorian Order (CVO) *Elizabeth Faith Currer Buchanan LVO, Former Private Secretary to TRHs The Prince of Wales and The Duchess of Cornwall*Major General David Leslie Burden CB CBE, Former Receiver General and Chapter Clerk, Abbey*Paul Robert Virgo Clarke, Chief Executive and Clerk of the Council, The of Lancaster*Sir Thomas Farmer CBE, Chairman of the Board of Trustees, Duke of Edinburghs Award*Stuart Gordon Mole OBE, Former Lieutenant of East Sussex*Michael John Stevens LVO, Deputy Treasurer to The Queen and Director of Finance to the Royal Household*Hugh Rowland Wyatt, Former Lieutenant of West Sussex 1998-2008 Lieutenants of the Royal Victorian Order (LVO) *Mrs Alisa Jane Anderson, Deputy Press Secretary to The Queen and Head of News*Peter McEuan Ashby, Helicopter Pilot, Queens Helicopter Flight*Dr Khaled Omar Azzam, Director of the Princes School of Traditional Arts*George Hassall MVO, Director, Royal and Diplomatic Affairs, Jaguar Land Rover*Thomas George Stewart McCaw MVO, Former Land Steward, Eastern District, The of Cornwall*Charlotte Helen Robinson MVO, Administrator, Privy Purse and Treasurers Office Members of the Royal Victorian Order (MVO) *Edward George Bedding, Senior Painter and Decorator, Royal Household*Tracy Caroline Emms, Executive Assistant to the Defence Services Secretary*Michael John Field, Framing and Exhibition Conservator, Royal Collection*Michael David Flynn, Duke of Edinburghs Coachman*Diana Rosemary Hawkins, Former Secretary to the Ladies-in-Waiting to The Queen*Chief Inspector John Anthony Hourihan, for services to Royalty Protection, Metropolitan Police Service*Mrs Joan Mary Hughes, Entries Secretary, Windsor Horse Show*Roger Langley Judd, Former Assistant Organist, St Georges Chapel, Windsor*Keith Thomas Lawler, Senior Painter and Decorator, Royal Household*Rachel Louise Loryman, Secretary, HRH The Duke of Yorks Household*Mrs Eva Grazyna Zlelinsha-Millar, Senior Photographer, Royal Collection*Mrs Katrina Mary Munro, Head of Design, Royal Collection Enterprises Ltd.*Diana Stantion, Liuetenancy Officer, Somerset County Council Royal Victorian Medal (RVM)  RVM Gold *Adrian Osborne RVM, Electrician, Sandringham Estate RVM Silver *Sgt John Matthew Attwell, Former Orderly to HRH The Duke of York*PC Malcolm Brownlee, for services to Royalty Protection, Metropolitan Police Service*Dennis Michael Burge, Heating Engineer, Hampton Court Palace, Historical Royal Palaces*Sgt Gregory John Gillham, for services to Royalty Protection, Metropolitan Police Service*Andrew Paul Godfrey, Fruit Farm Worker, Sandringham Estate*Kenneth Pritchard Jones, Head Groundsman, Crown Estate, Windsor*David Francis Long, Proprietor, Walter and Gas Services*Mrs Margaret Mary Mountstevens, Former Daily Lady, Frogmore House*John Daniel Powell, Yeoman Bed Goer, Queens Body Guard of the Yeomen of the Guard*Keith Sanderson, Chauffeur, Royal Household*Roderick Clive Truelove, Yeoman Clerk, HM Tower of London*Mrs Flora Wehlau, Household Attendant, Government House, Canberra, Australia.Order of the British EmpireDames Commander of the Order of the British Empire (DBE)*Jennifer Ambramsky, CBE, for services to broadcasting.*Professor Sally Claire Davies, for services to medicine.*Fradd, for services to nursing.*Professor Wendy Hall, CBE, for services to Science and Technology.*Anne Elizabeth Owers, CBE, for services to the criminal justice system.*Dr. Rosalind Joy Savill, CBE, for services to the arts.Commanders of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) *Charles Benedict Ainslie, OBE, for services to sport.*James Felton Somers Hervey-Bathurst, for services to heritage.*Nicholas John Bowd, Scottish Executive.*Mrs Isabelle Boyd, for services to education.*David John Brailsford, MBE, for services to sport.*Professor Tina Bruce, for services to early years.*Alistair Buchanan, for public service.*Earl Cameron, for services to drama.*Douglas Caster, for services to the defence industry.*Chance, for services to music.*Thomas Alastair Clark, for services to central banking.*Professor Kathleen Louise Costeloe, for services to medicine in London.*John Coughlan, for services to local government.*Mrs Shirley Cramer, for services to education.* Lucy Manuela De Groot, for services to local government,*Professor Colin Dennis, DL, for services to the agri-food industry.*David Keith Dingle, for services to the shipping industry.*Ben Paul Oakley Dyson, Department of Health*Professor Leslie Colin Ebdon, for services to local and higher education.*Keith Elliot, for services to further education.*Richard John Hugo Fleck, for services to business and to the legal profession.*David George Flory, Department of Health*John Chistopher Freeman, for services to local government.*Professor Duncan Ian Dunbar Gallie, for services to social science.*Mrs Judith Valerie Gisbon, for public and voluntary service.*Professor Lesley Anne Glover, for services to environmental science.*Bryan Mark Gray, MBE, for services to the community in the north west.*Wynee Philip Morgan Griffiths, for services to the food industry.*Professor Ian Halliday, for services to science.*Dr. Patrick Anne Hamilton, for services to medicine.*Mrs Sue Hammerson, OBE, for charitable services.*Hugh Christopher Emlyn Harris, for voluntary service to community relations in the City of London.*Charles Donald Hendry, QFSM, for services to local government.*Robert David Holden, for services to the rail industry.*William Andrew Myers Holroyd, OBE, for services to the administration of justice.*Dr Owain Arwel Hughes, OBE, for services to music and charity.*Jeremy Robin Powis Hyde, HM Deputy Chief Inspector of the CPS*Dr John Gordon Jenkins, for services to medicine in Northern Ireland.*Peter Jones, for services to business, entrepreneurship and to young people.*James Juffs, for public and voluntary service.*His Honour Judge Geoffrey Harvel Kamil, for services to the administration of justice.*Tarun Kapur, for services to education.*William James Gregory Keegan, for services to financial journalism.*Thomas Burton Loram Kirkwood, for services to medical science.*Malcolm Lowe-Lauri, for services to the NHS.*Dr. Melanie Lee, for services to medical science.*Ian Leitch, Parliament*Mrs Linda Lennon, HM Court Service, Ministry of Justice*Professor Ottoline Henrietta Miriam Leyser FRS, for services to plant science.*Dr Nigel Francis Lightfoot, for services to public health.*Derek Anthony Ludlow MBE, DL, for services to business and to the community in Bedfordshire.*Mrs Juliet Lyon, for services to the welfare of prisoners.*John MacQuarrie, for public and voluntary service.*Clive Andrew Maxwell, for public service.*David Francis McAllister, HM Prison Services, Ministry of Justice.*Richard John McCarthy, Deputy Director of Housing and Planning, Dept for Communities and Local Government.*Colin William McKerracher QPM, Chief Constable of Police, for services to the police.*Francis McLoughlin for services to further education.*David George Moorhouse, for services to the maritime industry.*Terence Keith Morgan, CEO, Tube Lines,  for services to public transport.*Leslie Porter Murray, for services to the environment.* Gillian Mary Newton, CEO, Fire Services College, Dept for Communities and Local Government*Michael William Norgrove, Director of Excise, Revenue and Customs*Michael David Parker, Former CEO of British Nuclear Fuels, for services to energy industry.*Stephen Parker, for public service.*Cllr. David Robert-Parsons, Leader of County Council, for services to local, regional government and to the voluntary sector.*Nicholas Campbell Paul, for services to business.*David Lee Pearson OBE, for services to equestrianism and disabled sport.*Pine OBE, for services to jazz music.*Robert Anthony Plant, Singer and Songwriter, for services to music.*Paul John Potts, Executive Chairman of the Association, for services to journalism.*John David Priest, Dept for Work and Pensions, for public and voluntary service.*David Prince, for services to local government.*Professor Martin Charles Raff FRS, for services to life sciences.*Professor Anne-Marie Rafferty, for services to healthcare.*David Evan Roberts MBE, for services to disabled sport.*Dr. Sue Roberts, for services to healthcare.*Professor Thomas Michael Roberts, DEFRA*Dr. Michael Gerald Galton Schluter, for charitable services through the Relationships Foundation and the Jubilee Centre in Cambridge.*Finlan McMillan Scott TD, CEO of the Medical Council, for public service.* Deborah Frances Shackleton, for services to the housing sector.*Professor Isobel Nicol Sharp, for services to the accountancy profession.*Charles James Francis Sinclair, for services to the newspaper industry.*Dr. Indarjit Singh OBE, for services to inter-faith and community relations.*Andrew Michael Slade for public service.*Dr Ian McKenzie Smith OBE, for services to the arts in Scotland.*Mrs Priscilla Snowball, for services to the advertising industry.*David Whitlock Tanner OBE, Team GB Olympic Rowing Team, for services to sport.*Professor Alexander Allan Templeton, for services to medicine.*Jeremy Jack Thomas, for services to the film industry.*Mrs Rosemary Teresa Thorp, for services to education and international development.*Robert Upton, for public service.*Marina Alandra, Lady Vaizey, for services to the arts.*John Esmond George Vaux, Former Speakers Counsel, House of Commons*Professor Anthony James Venables, Former Chief Economist, Dept for International Development*Anthony Watson, for services to economic development in Northern Ireland.*Professor Peter Neil Temple Wells, for services to healthcare science.*Wiggins OBE, for services to sport.*Professor Paul Wilkinson, for public service.*Professor David Charles Woods, for services to education.*James Samuel Younger, former Chairman of the Electoral Commission, for public service.Officers of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) *Professor Thomas Alan Acton*Adlington*Jonathan Patrick Adair Adnams*Gideon Amos*Mrs Elizabeth Antrobus*Professor David Croisdale-Appleby*Mrs Catherine Ann Archer*Mrs Joan Asby, MBE*Professor Deborah Ashby*Athill*Sara Aye Moung*Ayton, MBE*David Bailey*Martyn Murray Baker*George Christopher Band*Dr. Alan Barber*Mrs Lucinda Jane Barnett*Mrs Victoria Barnsley*Keith Leslie Barwell* Gillian Rose Beasley*David George Bell*Mrs Catherine Susan Beswick*Dr. Anita Kumari Bhalla, DL*Keith Raymond Bowley* Caroline Elizabeth Breakey*Dr. Isabel Bruce*Professor Anthony Applemore Mornington Bryer*Nicholas Buckland*Ian Kellman Bynoe*John Miuchael Caines*Mrs Jane Caldwell*Rodney John Calvert*Professor Sara Carter* Joyce Margaret Catterick*Adrian Oswald Wynn Cave*Dr. James Alan Harvard Cave*Professor Martin Cave*Dr. Nadia Chambers*Michael Christensen*Mrs Jean Combes*Dr. Diane Coyle*Nicholas Pury Cust*Ronald Daniel*Mrs Cheryl Linda Danson*Keith James Datchler* Katherine Anne Davies*Dr. Stephen Roger Davis*Leslie Dawson*Alan Edward Deighton*Kelvyn Derrick*Uday Kumar Dholakia*Dr. John Rhidian Dowdle*Geoffrey Drage*Robert Drew*Ann Irene Duddy*David Alexander Dunkley*Fergus Early*Meral Hussein Ece*Professor Marcial Hernan Echenique*Stephen Kenneth Ellison*Richard James Emery* Carole Eniffer*Duncan Fisher*Professor Alfonso John Forte*Robert Norman Froud*Thomas Alan Fry*Mrs Elizabeth Gaere*Mrs Jane Mary Gardam*Mrs Catherine Gilchrist*Mrs Janet Mary Dowlen-Gilliland*Michael John Glover*Mrs Kathleen Mary Gooding*Dr. Susan Elizabeth Gregory*Mrs Salima Hafejee*Mrs Pauline Ann Halliday*David John Hampson*Professor Barry William Hancock*Roger Harvey*Stuart Henry Haynes*Professor Christopher John Heginbotham*Brigadier John Hemsley* Melanie Henwood*Dr. Alan John Heyes*Professor Carole Hillenbrand, FBA, FRSE*David Hinchcliffe*John Alan Holmes, QFSM* Marianne Hood*Dr. Ursula Howard*Christopher Herard Hughes*Howard Hughes*Mrs Ellen Hunter*Dr. Musharraf Hussain*Andrew Charles Hutchinson*Dr. Robert Jackson*Mrs Ruth Margaret James*Councillor Ann Marie John*Jill Johnstone*Professor Elphin Wynne Jones*Rhydian James Morgan-Jones*Mrs Susan Elizabeth Jones* Lakhbir Kaur* Rosemary Kelly*Brian Richar Calvert Kemp*Mrs Jacqui Kennedy*Kenny*Mrs Christine Margaret Kent*Mrs Asha Khemka*Sascha Kindred*Edward Norman King*David Knyaston*James Anthony Lake, QPM*Philip Lane*Lui On Lee* Christine Lenehan*Captain Michael Charles Gordon-Lennox*Bernard Lewis*Carl Henry Lis*Thomas Derek Christopher Lloyd, TD, DL*John Anthony Lockett*John Logan*Dr. Paul Gerard Logan*Dr. Andrew John Low* Val Lowman*Hector MacKenzie*Susan Margaret Graham Matheson*Mrs Kerry Ann Maxwell*Professor Alan Keith Maynard*Brian McCargo, QPM*Iain David McGeachy*McGlynn, MBE*Professor Donna May Mead*Professor Philip Scott Mellor*David William Midgley* Nicola Jane Milican*Mrs Hannah Miller*Mrs Janet Miller* Katrina Jane Mitchell*Dr. Sally Sarah Jane Montgomery*Mrs Rosaleen Moore*Paul Morrell*Charles Morrison*Dr. Robert Mulvaney*Muthalagappan*Terence Frank Neville, JP*David Robert Newsome*Robert John Nicholas*Grahame Richard Nix*David St.John OCarroll*Mrs Christine Owen*Edward Leslie Hinton Palfrey*Stephen Mackenzie Park*Peter Parks*Professor Alan Alexander Paterson*Adam Erskine Peat*Iain Bryden Percy, MBE*Professor Andrew Pettigrew, FBA*George Andrew Pindar, DL*Julian Mark Piper*Robin Stanley Pitman*William James Poole*Mrs Elizabeth Brown Porter*Anis Rahman*Professor Andrew Madan Ramroop*Peter James Rankin*Timothy Reddish, MBE*Dennis Rees*Professor Graham Charles Rees, FBA*Dr. Randal William Richards*Brigadier Peter Neil Ralli Stewart-Richardson, MBE*Dr. Geoffrey Ridgway* Fiona Ritchie* Hilary Riva* Sarah Elizabeth Robinson*Stephen Rodford*Mrs Jacqueline Ronchetti* Joanne Roney*Mrs Marilyn Rydstrom* Gail Josephine Sackloff*Trevor Kenneth Salmon* Lucy Elizabeth Sayce*Sylvia Diana Scarf*The Reverend Adam Scott, TD*Thomas Scott* Judith Alexandra Anne Serota*Sheen*Dr. Jonathan Paul Sheffield*Howard Gordon Shelley*Mrs Judith Ann Shelley*Mrs Diane Edward Sherwood*Professor David Mark Shucksmith*Brian Wentworth Sinnamon*Mrs Judith Sischy*David Sleep*Mrs Susan Gwynneth Smith* Carole Snee*Geoff Snow* Boni Patricia Sones*Councillor Nicholas Stanton*Alexander Stephen*Paul Stephenson*Neil Laurie Stoddart*Mrs Sarah Joanne Storey, MBE*Adam Suddaby*Ben Jeffrey Peter Summerskill*Mrs Michele Sutton*Mrs Anne Elizabeth Taylor*Hugh Taylor*Ian George Taylor*Thomas Thomson*Clifford Christoffel Todd* Valerie Gladys Vamplew*Jennifer Rowan Van Tinteren*Arnold Roy Vandermeer, QC* Sian Caroline Vasey*Dr. Peter Warburton*Sarah Kate Webb, MBE*Professor Christopher Welsh*Mrs Susan West*Stephen Henry White*Councillor Bernard James Whittle*Peter Wilding*Mrs Denise Jennifer Wilkinson*Professor Richard Andrew Williams*Stephen David Williams, MBE*Mrs Karen Winfield*Dr. Robert James David Winter* Wendy Wright*Keith YoungMembers of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) This list is not complete, please help by contributing.*Mrs Pauline Adams. For services to the North East Ambulance Service.*Dr David Francis William Adey. General Medical Practitioner, Southampton. For services to Healthcare.*Mrs Barbara Adlington. Higher Executive Officer, Plus, Department for Work and Pensions. For public and voluntary service.*Dr Emmanuel Akuffo. Consultant Psychiatrist, Waltham Forest. For services to Medicine.*Harold Alderman. Boxing Historian. For services to Sporting Heritage.*Enam Ali. For services to the Indian and Bangladeshi Restaurant Industry.*Ishtiaq Ali. For services to the community in Lancashire.*Mrs Kathleen Margaret Norah Allen. For voluntary service to People with Disabilities in West Sussex.*Mrs Pauline Allen. For services to the Independent Monitoring Board, HM Prison Ford and to the community in West Sussex.*Peter Edwin Allen. For public service.*Frances Louise Allingham. Clerk and Committee assistant, House of Commons.*Mrs Isabel McKenna Chalmers Anderson. For voluntary service to Music in Ayrshire.*Mrs Jenny Arwas. For charitable services.*Sheila Mary Astbury. For voluntary service to the community in Shrewsbury, Shropshire.*Meg Anne Atkinson. For services to the Soldiers and Airmens Scripture Reader Association, RAF Lyneham, Wiltshire.*Mrs Jean Atton. For voluntary service to the Royal British Legion in Leicestershire.*Robert Austin. Founder and director, Formula Schools Design and Technology Competition. For services to Education.*John Aves. Former Wheelchair Technician, The Duke of Cornwall Spinal Centre. For services to People with Disabilities.* Patricia Susan Hazel Baker. Director, Pyramid Educational Consultants UK. For services to Children and Young People.* Joanna Margaret Bancroft. Director of Personnel and Development, Cumbria Constabulary. For services to the Police.*Clive Anthony Barber. Manager E, HM Prison and Young Offenders Institution, Reading, Ministry of Justice.*Mrs Brenda Barker. For voluntary service to Stowlawn Tenants and Residents Association, Bilston, Wolverhampton.*Eric Keith Barkham. For voluntary service to Sport and to the community in Virginia Water, Surrey.*Mrs Monique Claire Marie Barnes. For voluntary service to the community in Bury St. Edmunds, Suffolk.*Mrs Hilary Basterfield. Executive Officer, Jobcentre Plus, Department for Work and Pensions.*Kenneth Bates. Former Chairman, University of the Third Age Nottingham. For voluntary service to Adult Education.*Mrs Brenda Valerie Beach. Founder, Gateway Club. For services to People with Learning Disabilities in Hertfordshire.*Mrs Elizabeth Beck. Chair, Lemington Community Association. For voluntary service to the community in Newcastle-upon-Tyne.*Mrs Pamela Mary Becke. Special Constable, West Mercia Constabulary. For voluntary service to the Police in Bridgnorth, Shropshire.*Dr Marlene Anne Behennah. For voluntary service to the community in Mevagissey, Cornwall.*Mrs Dorothy Mary Bell. For services to the Heritage Centre in Bellingham, Northumberland.*Mrs Jennifer Bell. Former Governor, Harrington Hill Primary School, Hackney, London. For voluntary service to Education.*Mrs Shirley Diane Bellis. For voluntary service to the community in North Wales.*Mrs Valerie Anne Bennett. For voluntary service to the community in Whatlington, East Sussex.* Maxine Benson. Director, Everywoman Ltd. For services to Womens Enterprise.*Dr Chitra Bharucha. For services to the Animal Feed Industry.*Dr Parvin Bhatia. General Medical Practitioner, London Borough of Richmond. For services to Healthcare.* Christine Ann Bickerdyke. Prison Officer, HM Prison Wakefield, Ministry of Justice.*Douglas Oliver Birch. For voluntary service to the community in Brownhills, West Midlands.*Mrs Patricia Bird. Chair, Hexham Community Association. For voluntary service to the community in Reading, Berkshire.*Gerald Bishop. Employee Development manager, Cobham plc. For services to the Defence Industry.*Mark Bishop. For public service.*Cyril Blackman. For services to the Royal Marines Association.*Gerald Blacoe. Export manager, Fogarty (Filled Products) Ltd. For services to International Trade and to the community in Lincolnshire.*Mrs Pamela Blofield. For voluntary service to the community in Shrewsbury, Shropshire.*Robert Brian Bloomfield. For voluntary service to Rugby Union in Northern Ireland. (Dunmurry, Belfast)* Susan Blyth. For services to the Young Mens Christian Association and to the community in Warrington, Cheshire.*Simon Bolam. For services to the Insurance Industry.*Elisebeth Ann Bold. Executive Officer, Pension, Disability and Carers Service, Department for Work and Pensions. For public and voluntary service.*Mrs Elizabeth Anne Bolton. For services to Animal Welfare.*Michael John Bolton. Undermaster, Sevenoaks School, Kent. For services to Education.*Stanley Boor. For voluntary service to the community in North Lincolnshire.*Erwin Bottomley. Former Deputy Mine manager, National Coal Mining Museum. For services to Heritage.*Robert Andrew Boulton. Chief Superintendent, Dorset Police. For services to the Police and to the community in Bournemouth.*Mrs Ann Bowen. Grade C1, Ministry of Defence. For public service.*Mrs Christine Boyle. Managing director, Lawell Asphalt Roofing. For services to Womens Enterprises in Northern Ireland.*Dr Jules Timothy Brabants. Canoeist. For services to Sport.*Alec Brader. Former Leader, Revesby Summer Playscheme, Boston, Lincolnshire. For services to Young People.*Mrs Hilda Brailsford. For voluntary service to the community in Ironville, Nottinghamshire.*Mrs Ann Mary Brew. For charitable services.*Thomas David Briggs. For voluntary service to St. John Ambulance and to the community in Cheshire.*Mrs Margaret Bright. Former International Student Support Officer, Sheffield Hallam University. For services to Higher Education.*Bristow. Cyclist. For services to Disabled Sport.*Stephen Bristow. Joint Proprietor, Greenwood Forest Park. For services to the Tourist Industry in North Wales.*Mrs Isobel Mauveen Brodie. Former Deputy Headteacher, Websters High School, Angus. For services to Education.*Dr Timothy Andrew Broome. Former Head, Target Division, ISIS Facility, Rutherford Appleton Laboratory. For services to Science.*Keith Brough. Special Constable, Lothian and Borders Police. For voluntary service to the Police.*Mrs Beryl Brown. Former Library Manager, Wychwood Library, Oxfordshire. For services to Local Government.*Christina Brown. Senior Officer, HM Revenue and Customs. For public and voluntary service.*Mrs Linda Quinn*Christopher Buckland. For voluntary service to the British Red Cross Society in Northern Ireland.*Garth Buckle. Business Links Team Co-ordinator, Hounslow Education Business Partnership. For services to Young People in West London.*Michael Bull. Teacher, Whitehall Primary School. For services to Education and to the community in Leicester.*Claude Bullingham. For voluntary service to the community in Whaddon, Cheltenham.*David Charles Bullock. Electronic Workshop Engineer, Institute of Hearing Research, Medical Research Council. For services to Science.*Mrs Carol Ann Burke. Former manager E, HM Prison and Young Offenders Institution Askham Grange, York, Ministry of Justice. For public and voluntary service.*Robert Burns. Business Development manager, Lancashire Constabulary. For services to the Police.*Terry Elliott Burns. For services to the Trade Union Movement and to the community in Burnley and Lancashire.*Tony Burns. For voluntary service to Amateur Boxing.*Mrs Lindsay Marie Burr. For services to Business and to the community in Ryedale, North Yorkshire.*Simon Burr. Vice-president, Engine Controls, Goodrich Corporation. For services to the Aerospace Industry.*James Walter Butler. Sculptor. For services to Art.*William Tinsley Cairns. For services to Music in Northern Ireland.*Mrs Helen Calvert. Executive Officer, Child Support Agency, Department for Work and Pensions. For public and voluntary service.*John Francis Carberry. Regional Development Officer, Royal National Institute for the Deaf. For services to Disabled People in Northern Ireland.*Amanda Estelle Carter. For voluntary service to the community in Leicester.*Professor Ronald Allan Carter, University of Nottingham. For services to local and national Higher Education.*Mrs Kate Cartwright. For voluntary service to the Yorkshire and East Midlands Lay Observer Panel.*James Walter Butler, for services to art.*Edward Clancy, for services to sport.*Cooke, for services to sport.*Cundy, for services to disabled sport.*Marina Dalglish (Mrs Martha Marina Daglish) - wife of footballer Dalglish, for services to breast cancer patients on Merseyside.()*James Frederick DeGale, for services to sport.*Anne Patricia Dunham, for services to disabled sport.*John P. Egan for services to the community in Leeds*Goodison, for services to sport.*Lewis Carl Davidson Hamilton, for services to sport.*Hindmarch, services to the fashion industry.*Andrew Triggs Hodge, for services to sport.*Mark Hunter, for services to sport.*Anthony Edward Kappes, for services to disabled sport.*Kenny, for services to sport.*Kinnaird, for services to the beauty industry.*Paul Christian Manning, for services to sport.*Samuel Hamilton Miller, for services to motorcycle heritage*Christine Ljeoma Ohuruogu, for services to sport.*Pendleton, for services to sport.*Zachary Purchase, for services to sport.*Lieutenant Peter Reed, for services to sport.*Richardson, for services to disabled sport.*Rebecca Jayne Romero, for services to sport.*Simmonds, for services to disabled sport.*Betty Smith, for services to drama.*Staff, for services to sport.*Swade, for services to the   history of computing.*Thomas for services to sport.*Matthew Benedict Walker, for services to disabled sport.*David Russell Weir, for services to disabled sport.*Philippa Claire Wilson, for services to sport.Diplomatic ServiceKnight Bachelor*Professor Christopher John Greenwood CMG. Professor of International Law, London School of Economics. For services to public International Law.Knights Commander of the Order of St Michael and St George (KCMG)*Andrew Thomas Cahn, CMG. Chief Executive, Trade and Investment.*William Charters Patey CMG. HM Ambassador, Riyadh.Companion of the Order of St Michael and St George (CMG)*Mark Canning. HM Ambassador, Rangoon.*Eugene Gerard Curley OBE. Counsellor, Foreign and Commonwealth Office.*Christopher John Hickey. Director, British Council, Spain.*Anthony Michael Layden. The Foreign Secretarys Representative for Deportation with Assurances. For services to Counter-Terrorism.*Robert Macaire. Former Director of Consular Services, Foreign and Commonwealth Office.*Sarah MacIntosh. Former British High Commissioner, Freetown.*Richard Gordon Monk OBE, QPM. Former Police Commissioner, UN Interim Mission in Kosovo. For services to Policing in Kosovo.*Adam McClure Thomson. Director of South Asia and Afghanistan, Foreign and Commonwealth Office.*Scott Andrew Norman Wightman. Former Director of Global and Economic Issues, Foreign and Commonwealth Office.Knight Grand Cross of the Order of the British Empire (GBE)*The Rt Hon. Gordon Slynn, The Lord Slynn of Hadley QC PC. Former Chairman, International Law Association. For services to European and International Law.Commanders of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) *Harry James Benson. Freelance Photo-Journalist. For services to photography, and to the community in the UK.*Nicholas Peter Clegg. Founder and Managing Trustee and Chairman, Daiwa Anglo-Japanese Foundation. For services to UK-Japanese relations.*Professor Linda Colley. Author and Professor of History, Princeton University. For services to historical studies.*Professor Peter Hugh Nolan. Sinyi Professor, Judge Business School, University of Cambridge. For services to supporting British business in China and Chinas integration into the global economy.*Professor David Norse. Emeritus Professor of Environmental Management, UCL. For services to international sustainable development and UK/China relations.*John Richard Shervington Skerritt. Financial Secretary. For public service, Montserrat.Officers of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) *Nicholas Jonathan Alexander. 1st Secretary, Foreign and Commonwealth Office.*George Alkiviades David. For services to UK/Greek relations in the field of education.*Dr Alexander William Lowndes De Waal. For services to development and conflict resolution in Africa.*Professor David Geraint Evans. Professor of Materials Science, Beijing University of Chemical Technology. For services to international science and UK/China Relations.*Michael Ernesto Francino. Former Consultant Team Leader, Department for International Development. For services to economic reform in Iraq.*Patrick Hugo Gray. For services to British nuclear non-proliferation initiatives in Russia and the Commonwealth Independent States.*Dr John Anthony Director Hemery. Centre for Diplomatic Studies. For services to British interests overseas.*David Alexander James Hepworth, QGM. Former Senior Investigations Adviser, British Embassy, Kabul. For services to the Police in Afghanistan.*Michael John Holloway. Regional Director, Consular and Visa Services for Iberia, British Embassy, Madrid.* Ann Kenrick. Secretary-General, British Section, Council. For services to promoting Franco-British relations.*Iftikhar Ahmed Khan. For services to UK/Bangladesh trade and development relations and corporate social responsibility.*Mrs Cheryl-Ann Elizabeth Lister. Former Chairperson and CEO, Bermuda Monetary Authority. For services to promoting sound financial regulation in Bermuda.*Rurik Miles Marsden. Former 1st Secretary (Development), British Embassy, Rangoon.*Jarlath Stephen Norman. 1st Secretary, Foreign and Commonwealth Office.*Charles John Sinclair Nuttall. Former Director, British Council, Colombia.*William James Paterson. Former EU Chief Police Adviser and Team Leader, Darfur. For services in support of the African Union Peacekeeping Mission to Darfur.*Gary LeRoy Phillips. Consultant. For public service in Bermuda.*Derek Laurence Powell. Managing Director, International Training Services. For services to training.*Paul Desmond Sherar. Former Director, Visa Services Operations for the Asia Pacific Region, British Embassy, Beijing.*Professor James Arthur Ainscow Stockwin. Nissan Professor, Modern Japanese Studies and Director, Nissan Institute of Japanese Studies, Oxford University. For services to academic excellence and the promotion of UK/Japanese understanding.*Rupert Robert Sword. Chairman and Regional head, Latin America Schroder Investment Management, Schroders plc. For services to British commercial interests and to the British community in Argentina.*Andrew Robert Hay Thomson. 1st Secretary, British Embassy, Bogota.*David Richard Townsend. 1st Secretary, Foreign and Commonwealth Office.*Professor David Warburton. Professor of Paediatric Surgery, Childrens Hospital Los Angeles. For services to UK/USA collaboration on healthcare research.*Nicholas Charles Young. Journalist, Researcher and Trainer for Aid Agencies. For services to sustainable development and to civil society in China.Members of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) *Sean Bennett. Fleet Manager, British Embassy, Baghdad. For services to charitable activities in Iraq.* Eziethamae Eleanor Bodden. For services to the community, Cayman Islands.*Philicianno Callwood. Proprietor, Foxys Bar and Restaurant, Entrepreneur and Musician. For services to tourism, British Virgin Islands.*David John Carter. 1st Secretary, Foreign and Commonwealth Office.*Mrs Pamela Dorothy Horridge-Deakin. Vice president, Ibiza and Formentera Association for the Prevention of Cancer. For services to charitable activities in Ibiza and Formentera.* Vivien Christine Esslemont. Assistant director, British Council, Mozambique.*Mrs Rebecca Dawn Fortunato. President, Gibraltar Amateur Swimming Association, and vice president, Gibraltar Commonwealth Games Association. For services to sport.*Paul William Franklin. 2nd Secretary, Foreign and Commonwealth Office.*Iain Peter McPherson Hardy. Honorary Consul, Valparaiso.*Mrs Marguerite Loudon Hopkin. For services to the British community in France.*Mrs Elizabeth Florence Joshua. For services to education and the community, St. Helena and Ascension Island.*Mrs Shirley Adams-Leach. For services to musical education, Falkland Islands.*Paul Stuart Millard. HM Ambassadors driver. For services to the British Embassy in Berne.*Nicholas Michael Miller. 2nd Secretary, British Embassy, Bogota.*Mrs Samantha Jane Morshed. Founder, Hathay Bunano knitwear company. For services to disadvantaged and vulnerable women and children in Bangladesh.*Mrs Ann Munro. Vice Consul, British Embassy, Doha.* Alexandra Maria Pearson. For services to victims of the Chinese earthquake in May 2008.*Ian Seabourne. Founder, Operation Breakthrough. For services to tackling juvenile delinquency through sport in Hong Kong.*Layla Kelly Slatter. Former 3rd Secretary, British Embassy, Damascus. For services in the Middle East and Afghanistan.* Vanessa Frances Hall-Smith. Director, British Institute of Florence. For services to promoting UK culture in Italy.*Arthur Chesley Trott. Artist and Sculptor. For services to Art in Bermuda.*Anthony Tsui Tin-Yau. Director, Croucher Foundation. For services to science and UK/Hong Kong relations.*Alister Stanley Widdowson. Former Senior Teacher, British Council, Burma.* Inga Mary Williams. Secretary, Links House Senior Citizens Residence. For services to the British community in Argentina.*Christopher John Worthington. Honorary Supervisor, Commonwealth War Graves Commission, Sri Lanka. For services to the memory of the war dead.Military DivisionRoyal NavyOrder of the BathKnight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) *Vice Admiral Trevor Alan Soar OBECompanion of the Order of the Bath (CB)*Major General Gordon Rose MBE RMOrder of the British EmpireCommander of the Order of the British Empire and Honorary Physician to HM The Queen (CBE & QHP)*Surgeon Commodore Timothy Roger Douglas-RileyCommander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) *Rear Admiral Trevor Allan SpiresOfficers of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) *Commander David Daniel Acland RN*Commander Mark Vincent Caretta RN*Captain Lynne Gibbon ARRC, Queen Alexandras Royal Naval Nursing Service*Commander David Hadfield*Commander Stephen John Murray*Commander James Le Seelleur Perks*Captain (formerly Cmdr) Gavin Scrimgeour Pritchard*Captain John Blain Minto ReesMembers of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) *Lt (now Lt. Cdr) William John Adams*WO Class 1 Air Engineer Mechanic Martin Bailey*WO Class 1 Warfare Specialist (Abovewater Warfare Weapons) Robert Bainbridge*CPO Weapon Eng Mechanic (Radio)(Submarine) Paul Burton*PO Air Eng Mechanic David Robert James Dallimore*WO Class 1 Warfare Specialist (Sensors Submarine) John Strannigan Dickie*WO Class 2 (Acting WO Class 1) Steven Graham Eaton RM*Lt-Cmdr Derek John Login, Royal Naval Reserve, Sea Cadet Corps.*Majr. John David Maddison RM*WO Class 2 Eng Technician (Marine Eng Submarine) Allan Lindsay Mason*WO Class 1 Warfare Specialist (Abovewater Warfare Weapons) Paul Mounsor*Major (acting Lt-Col) Alexander Bruce Murray RM*Captain (acting Major) Martin David Tidman RMArmyOrder of the BathKnight Grand Cross of the Order of the Bath (GCB) *General Sir Francis Richard Dannatt KCB CBE MC ADC, Chief of the General Staff, British Army (shall be retiring as professional head of the Army in 2009 to be replaced by Sir David Richards)Companions of the Order of the Bath (CB)*Major General Adrian John Bradshaw OBE, Kings Royal Hussars*Lt. Gen Andrew Collingwood Figgures CBE*Lt. Gen Louis Patrick Lillywhite MBE QHS*Maj Gen. Jonathan David Page OBE, Parachute RegimentOrder of St Michael and St GeorgeCompanion of the Order of St Michael and St George (CMG)*Colonel Peter David Fraser-Hopewell MBE, Royal ScotsOrder of the British EmpireKnight Commander of the Order of the British Empire (KBE)* Lieutenant General Graeme Cameron Maxwell Lamb CMG DSO OBE, Queens Own HighlandersCommanders of the Order of the British Empire (CBE)*Brigadier Robert Hanbury Tenison Aitken, Royal Regiment of Wales*Brigadier Nicholas Roy Davies MBE MC, Parachute Regiment*Colonel Timothy John Hodgetts QHP, Army Medical Corps*Brigadier Stephen George Vowles, Army Legal Services Branch (AGC)Officers of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) *Lt Col Scott Ross Adams, Staff and Personnel Support Branch, AGC*Col Rakesh Kumar Bhabutta, Army Medical Corps*Acting Col Andrew Mark Blowers, Surrey Army Cadet Force*Acting Col John Barrie Davies, Glamorgan Army Cadet Force*Lt Col Edward Richard Bickersteth Heal, REME*Col Philip James Hubbard, Royal Army Medical Corps*Col James Timothy Edward Illingworth, Army Air Corps*Lt Col Jonathan Charles Probert MBE, Logistics Corps*Col Peter Samuel Marshal Rowlinson TD, Royal Army Medical Corps, Territorial Army*Lt Col Alistair John Thomson, Education and Training Services Branch, AGCMembers of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) *Staff Sergeant Glen John Adams*Captain Michael Paul Eamon Angove*Warrant Officer Class 1 Robin David Bartlett*Major Hugh Benson*Acting Lieutenant Colonel Jeremy Graham Bromfield*Major Gavin Derek Brown*Sergeant Raymond Burke*Major Kenneth Campbell*Major Jon Cadey Spencer Cheek*Major Andrew David Cox*Sergeant Stephen John Crighton*Major Jody Philip Davies*Lieutenant Colonel Timothy John Davies*Major William Hywel Lewis Davies*Sergeant Justin Paul Dine*Staff Sergeant Paul Duffin*Captain Neil Anthony England*Major Rodney Victor Gray*Major Nigel Patrick Hanley*Captain Colin Andrew Howard*Major Toby Alfred Warde Ingram*Acting Major Barry Johnson*Sergeant Shane Anthony Jones*Major William Robert Kefford*Major Peter Alexander Little BEM*Major Mathew Richard Pemberton MacKenzie*Lance Corporal Angeline Patricia Matley*Major James McClung*Major Bryan Mialkowsky CD*Warrant Officer Class 1 Andrew David Mills*Captain Dean Richard Murch*Lieutenant Colonel John Crispin Morison Orr*Warrant Officer Class 2 Geoffrey Paine*Warrant Officer Class 1 Colin Neil Preece*Staff Sergeant Christopher Price*Warrant Officer Class 2 Robert Proctor*Major Thomas Robert David Ridgway*Major Paul Shields*Major Michael John Short*Colour Sergeant Paul Gregory Simpson*Captain Neil Stuart Thomas*Major Darren Lars Thompson*Major Jonathan Peter Thorn*Major Phillip Shepheard-Walwyn*The Reverend Steven, Royal Army Chaplains Department*Acting Lieutenant Colonel Lewis John Williams TD*Lieutenant Colonel William Stewart Codrington WrightQueens Volunteer Reserves Medal (QVRM)*Warrant Officer Class 2 Maurice William Byrne*Colonel Celia Jane Harvey OBE TD*Warrant Officer Class 2 Joseph Raymond Krikorian*Sergeant David Paul SadlerRoyal Air ForceOrder of the BathKnight Commander of the Order of the Bath (KCB) *Air Marshal Christopher Hugh Moran OBE MVO*Air Marshal Stuart William Peach CBECompanion of the Order of the Bath (CB)*Air Vice Marshal Charles Wright NessOrder of the British EmpireCommander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) *Group Captain Andrew Brian Brecht OBE*Air Commodore Philip Colin Osborn OBE*Group Captain Edward Jackson Stringer OBEOfficer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) *Wing Commander Dean Richard Andrew*Wing Commander Lawrence John Bennett*Wing Commander Ian Duguid*Wing Commander Andrew Charles Hine*Wing Commander Richard David Mason MBE*Wing Commander Peter William McAlpine*Wing Commander Simon Peter Rochelle DFCMembers of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) *Flying Officer Steven John Abbott*Squadron Leader Steven Andrew Berry*Flight Sergeant Robert Thomas Bray*Warrant Officer Robert Michael Byrne*Flight Lieutenant Matthew Alan Clark*Chief Technician Nicholas John Deavin*Warrant Officer David Elder*Squadron Leader Robert Andrew Ellen*Warrant Officer Stewart John Farmer*Sergeant Paul Anthony Fawcett*Squadron Leader Andrew Thomas Fell*Squadron Leader Lewis Gusterson*Squadron Leader Anthony Christian Keeling*Squadron Leader Sean Christopher Leach*Squadron Leader David Thomas Morgan*Warrant Officer Mark Antony Salter*Sergeant Justin Hartland Scholes*Squadron Leader Andrew John WhiteThe Commonwealth Nationsand BarbudaCompanion of the Order of St Michael and St George (CMG)*Colonel Trevor A. Thomas, for services to the Antigua and Barbuda Defence ForceOfficer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) *Lieutenant Colonel Edward H. Croft, Antigua and Barbuda Defence ForceMember of the Order of the British Empire (MBE)*Mrs Gledina Mashela Roberts-McKay, for services to public serviceBarbados Commander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) *Marvo Olivia Manning, for service to the arts and to youth development*The Very Reverend Frank Bert Hamilton Harcourt Marshall, for services to religion and to the community*Astor Burleigh Watts, for services to the construction industry Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) *Mrs Enid Amelia Gay, for services to nursing and nursing education*Cyrul Valentine Walker, for services to education and to the Diaspora*Winston Carloyde Yearwood, for services to entertainment, tourism and youth education. Members of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) *Reverend Lucille Onita Baird, for services to the Church and the community*Mrs Marlon Loleita Hart, for services to the promotion of local cuisine*Geoffrey Cartlon Morris, for services to education and childcareBelizeCommander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) *Roswell Roosevelt Adial Williams, for services to the public and community serviceOfficer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) *Mrs Floridalba Carmita Contreras, for services to the education and the communityMembers of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) * June Amelia Heusner JP, for public and community service* Celi Nunez McCorkie, for services to the community and commerceIslands Officer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE) *Mrs Marjorie Tuainekore Tere Crocombe, for services to the Cook Islands, the Pacific, education, literature and the community.Member of the Order of the British Empire (MBE)*Tutai-o-Ngarnetua Toru, for public service and services to sportBritish Empire Medal (BEM)*Taepae Tuteru, for public service and service to the Church*Tomoavao Tamanu Wichman, for services to the community and to scientific inventionsGrenadaCommander of the Order of the British Empire (CBE) *George Ignatius Brizan CMG, for services to politics and educationMembers of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) *Hillary Anne Gabriel, for community work with persons living with disabilities*Richard N. Hughes, for services to sport*Michael Pierre, for services to politics and education British Empire Medal (BEM) *Peter Joseph Blair, for services to sport and culture*John Francis, for services to farmingChristopher and Nevis Members of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) *Mrs Mary Sophia Morton, for public service*Clifford Macleod Fitzroy Thomas, for services to the trade unionsVincent and the GrenadinesCompanion of the Order of St Michael and St George (CMG)*Reverend Arthur Hoskins Huggins, for services to religion and educationOfficer of the Order of the British Empire (OBE)*Alphius Nathaniel Jack, for services to business, religion and the community*Dr Timothy Leroy Providence, for services to medicine and to the communityMembers of the Order of the British Empire (MBE) *Mrs Muriel Dorothy Gunsam, for services to business and to religion* Anesta Ileen Rodney, for services to education and to the community*Mrs Cacheta Iselma Matthews-Williams, for services to business and to the communityNew Zealand P.C.N.Z.M. D.C.N.Z.M.C.N.Z.M.O.N.Z.M. M.N.Z.M. M.N.Z.M. Additional O.N.Z.M. Honorary M.N.Z.M.Honorary Q.S.O. Q.S.M.D.S.D.ReferencesExternal links* Complete list
20907419
Lowell_Bayles
awardsTrophy 1931Lowell R. Bayles was an Air Race pilot of the Golden Age of Air Racing.  He was the winner of the 1931 Trophy flying the Bee Model Z.  Bayles was killed in the crash of the Model Z during an attempt at the landplane speed record when the plane crashed at over  mph.Early lifeBayles was born in Illinois on January 24, 1900, the oldest child of R.E. Bayles.  He graduated from Illinois High School and attended the of Illinois in mining engineering, but was forced to leave due to eye trouble.  He was working as an electrician in various mines around Illinois when he began taking flying lessons.FlyingBayles began taking flying lessons from a former War I instructor pilot.  He eventually bought a surplus Curtiss  JN-4 Jenny The Jenny was lost when he stopped over in Illinois during a gang war between Birger and the Brothers Gang.  Birger had been bombed from the air and he mistook Bayles plane for the bomber and had the plane dynamited.()After a stint back in the mines, Bayles began barnstorming around the country.  In 1928 he partnered with H. Roscoe Brinton starting a flying service in Springfield, Massachusetts.  Due to the Depression, orders for aircraft had stopped and the Brothers Aircraft Company saw the air racing circuit as a way to stay in business. To raise seed money for the air racing operation, the Springfield Air Racing Association (SARA) was formed.  A group of local Springfield merchants and businessmen who sought to promote Springfield bought shares to fund creation of the racing planes.  Bayles added $500 of his own money to be the pilot in the venture.Bayles flew the Gee Bee Model X in the Cirrus Derby in 1930, coming in second and sharing the $7000 purse with the Granvilles.In 1931, Bayles piloted a Gee Bee Model E Sportster in the National Reliability Air Tour, coming in fourth in the point standing and winning the Great Lakes Trophy for a total of $2000 in prize money.()At the 1931 Air Races, Bayles and the Bee Model Z, christened the City of Springfield, cleaned up, first winning the $7500 Trophy prize with an average speed of  , then the Shell Speed dash with an average of  , breaking the speed record for the course, then won the Goodyear Trophy race with an average of .()Speed Record and DeathBayles had failed to break the official 3 km World Landplane Speed Record at the 1931 National Air Races. Following the Thompson Trophy race, the Gee Bee Z was re-engined with a larger,  Wasp Senior radial, in preparation for an attempt at establishing another world speed record at Wayne County Airport in Detroit, Michigan.(Gee Bee Model Z.  Fantasy of Flight Air Museum. Retrieved: May 26, 2010.)On December 1, 1931 Lowell Bayles attempted the speed record again and made four passes at an average of  , but did not surpass the old record by the required .  On December 5, Bayles tried again, diving into the course from  and leveling off at  as rules allowed. Travelling over ,  from the ground, the Model Z suddenly pitched up, the right wing folded beyond the flying wire attachment point, most likely due to aileron flutter stressing the wing spar and causing it to fail.  The plane crashed alongside of a railroad track in a huge ball of flame and smoke.  Lowell Bayles body was thrown  from the disintegrated plane.Analysis of the crash, based on motion picture film of the event examined frame-by-frame, showed that the aircrafts fuel cap had come loose and crashed through the Gee Bee Zs windscreen. It struck the pilot and incapacitated him, causing a sudden upset in pitch that led to the structural failure of the wing.(Gee Bee Z. Air Racing History. Accessed 2010-05-26.) In addition, tests of a reproduction aircraft have shown that the Gee Bee Z was susceptible to aerodynamic flutter at high speed.(His fiance, Gertrude St. Marie of Springfield, travelled to his hometown of Mason, Illinois for his funeral, along with Mrs. Zantford Granville.()ReferencesExternal links* Video of the Gee Bee Model Z crash
20919598
Greeks_in_Ethiopia
The Greek community in Ethiopia today numbers about 500 persons and can be traced back to the 18th century. It is mainly located in the capital, Ababa, and the city of Dawa.HistoryThe name Ethiopia itself is Greek and means of burned face.() It is first attested in the Homeric epics but it is unlikely to have referred to any particular nation, but rather, to people of Sub-Saharan African descent in general. The Greek community in Ethiopia is first attested by the presence of craftsmen and sailors in the 18th century (1740) in what was then Abyssinia, who played a part in the commerce between the country and Europe.()() The explorer Bruce reported that a number of Greek refugees from Smyrna arrived in Gondar during the reign of the Emperor Iyasu II, who included twelve silversmiths, whom the emperor put to work producing a variety of items for both his court and the churches of Gondar.(Raymond Silverman and Neal Sobania, Mining a Mother Lode: Early European Travel Literature and the History of Precious Metalworking in Highland Ethiopia, History in Africa, 31 (2004), p. 348)The community saw its heyday in the early part of the 20th century with the establishment of the Holy Metropolis of Axum by the of Alexandria in 1908 and of the Greek organizations in Addis Ababa (1918) and Dire Dawa (1921).()Present SituationIn the post-war period the community grew to 3,000 persons. It suffered during the revolution that overthrew Selassie in 1974, when the hostility of the Derg towards all foreign communities drastically reduced its size to the current population of about 500.(Today there is still a Greek school located in the capital as well as a Greek Orthodox church in the same city (St. Froumendios). The school has about 120 students, many of whom receive scholarships to continue their studies in Greece.() However there is an increasing initiative by Greeks to take advantage of the investment opportunities currently available in Ethiopia.()See also*Diaspora*in Eritrea*in Zambia*in ZimbabweReferences Further reading **. Reviewed in **External links*Addresses of the Greek Organizations in Ethiopia*Greeks in Eritrea 
20940617
Magnesium_oxide_wallboard
thumb|Magnesium oxide wallboard (10 mm thickness)oxide more commonly called magnesia is a versatile mineral that when used as part of a cement mixture and cast into thin cement panels under proper curing procedures and practices can be used in residential and commercial construction. Some versions are suitable for a wide range of general building uses and for applications that require fire resistance, mold and mildew control, as well as sound control applications and many other benefits. As an environmentally friendly building material, magnesia board has strength and resistance due to very strong bonds between magnesium and oxygen atoms that form the magnesium oxide molecules (chemical symbol MgO).Magnesia boards are used in place of traditional drywall as wall and ceiling covering material and sheathing. It is also used in a number of other construction applications such as: fascias, soffit, shaft-liner & area separation, wall sheathing, and as tile backing (backer board) or as substrates for coatings and insulated systems such as Finish Systems, EIFS, and some types of stucco.Magnesia cement board for building construction is available is various sizes and thickness. It is not a paperfaced material. It generally comes in light gray, white or beige in color. Numerous versions and value of grades exist including smooth face, rough texture, utility, versatile grades as well as different densities and strengths for different applications and uses.Presently various magnesia cement boards are widely used in Asia as a primary construction material. Some versions have been designated as the official construction specified material of the Summer Olympic Games and some versions are used extensively on the inside and outside of all the walls, fireproofing beams, and as the sub-floor sheathing in one of the worlds tallest buildings, 101, located in Taipei, Taiwan.Magnesia cement is manufactured in a number of areas around the world, primarily near areas where Magnesia based ores (periclase) deposits are mined. Major deposits are found in China, Europe, and Canada.(Periclase at Mindat) Magnesia ore deposits in the US are negligible. Estimates put the use of Magnesia board products at around 8 million SQF in Asia alone. It is gaining popularity in the US, particularly near coastal regions.History*Magnesia cement uses in masonry construction is ancient. It was used primarily as a mortar component and stabilizer for soil bricks. Magnesia has also been identified in the Wall of China and other ancient landmarks. cement is reported to have contained high levels of Magnesia.*In the West, cement has replaced Magnesia for masonry uses. However, New York Citys Bridge base is made from locally mined cement, a mixture of oxide and magnesia cement commonly called Natural Cement, the only natural non-fired cement made in the US.*Magnesia cement boards were approved for construction use in the US around 2003.*Due to its fire resistance and safety ratings, New York and New Jersey were early adopters of Magnesia cement board. Florida has adopted Magnesia boards for mold/mildew resistance. It is hurricane and impact tested and approved in County.*Located in Taipei, Taiwan, Magnesia board can be found on all 101 stories of Taipei 101, currently the second tallest building in the world. Magnesia sheeting was used on the inside and outside of all the walls, fireproofing beams and as the sub-floor sheathing.*Magnesia sheeting was the official specified construction material of the 2008 World Olympics buildings in Beijing, a project costing over $160 billion.Purpose and use*Magnesia is widely used primarily as wallboard alternative to conventional gypsum-based drywall. The Magnesia boards can be scored and snapped, sawed, drilled, and fastened to wood or steel framing.*It can be used for interior or exterior applications.*Magnesia boards are a good example of the advances made in construction materials to meet changes in building codes for safety and durability.Applications*Interior Wall and Ceiling Board*Exterior Sheathing*Trim Materials*Fascias()*Soffits*Shaft-liner & area separation wall board*Tile backing (backer board) and underlayment*Substrates for coatings and insulated systems such as: Direct-Applied Finish Systems, EIFS, SIPS, Portland type Stucco and Synthetic Stuccos.Advantages*Ratings and testing:**Fire-resistant (UL 055 and ASTM-Tested and A-Rated)**Waterproof (Freeze/Thaw-Tested for 36 months)**Mold/fungus/bug free (non-nutritious to mold, fungus, insects ASTM G-21)**Impact-resistant (ASTM D-5628)**NYC Approved (MEA # 359-02-M)**Silica/asbestos free**STC-Rated 53-54*Can be used in the place of traditional drywall or cement boards. No special tools required.*Hard non-absorbent surface  no paper.*Can be used in applications like cement-based siding. *Available in colors.*Environmentally friendly  It is removed from ore at about 25% of the temperature (400-800 F) required to form CaO, the starting material for the preparation of lime or portlandite used in common mortar and plaster.*Magnesia boards have been mentioned in articles about the biologically friendly construction.Disadvantages*Natural deposits of magnesium oxide occur primarily in China, local governments there prohibit the exportation of the raw materials for manufacturing outside China.(China Expands Scope of Prohibited Category under Export Processing Trade)*Little mining of magnesium based minerals occur in the United States at this time.*In most cases good quality magnesia board is more expensive than conventional paperfaced gypsum drywall material.*Like all cement mixtures magnesia cements and related mixing recipes and equipment require strict controls in both the raw material going into the mixer as well as the curing process and proper waiting time for setting and handling of the fresh and semi-fresh product. Many cheaper brands cut corners making inconsistent material. *Several different producers exist with big differences in their production and selling costs which greatly impacts on the mix design and curring process which makes each brand very different in potential uses. Even though the different brands may look and feel similar caution must be used when selecting the versions and brands for specific use since they are not all the same or usable in the same way.*As a new kind of board material it has unique installation requirements. Each version of magnesia board needs to be installed using the manufactures recommendations to avoid installation problems.References
20949824
Sam_Akoitai
Sam Akoitai, born 5 May 1961 in Bougainville,(Hon. Sam Akoitai MP, Asia Downunder Conference) is a New Guinean politician, a member of the Resources Party.(Akoitai joined the Bougainville Copper Limited company in 1978, and worked there for eight years.( In 1990, he became involved in the Bougainvillean civil war, leading a resistance movement against the Revolutionary Army (BRA), and subsequently participated in the ensuing peace process. During the war, he was abducted by the BRA, and several members of his family were murdered. He initiated peace talks with the BRA in 1994.(Interview with Sam Akoitai, Australia Broadcasting Corporation, 2 September 1997)In 1997, Akoitai took part in the Papua New Guinean general election, and was elected Member of Parliament for Central Bougainville. He was appointed Minister for Bougainville Affairs in the government of Prime Minister Skate. In 1999, he was appointed to the State Ministry. He lost his position in government when Skate lost office to Morauta later that year.In the 2002 general reelection, Akoitai retained his parliamentary seat, and was appointed Minister responsible for Mining, Environment, Conservation and Correctional Institution Services by Prime Minister Somare.(In 2008, no longer a member of the national government, he took part in the Bougainvillean presidential election, and finished second out of fourteen candidates, defeated by Tanis.(New Bougainville president promises unity, ABC Radio Australia, 29 December 2008)References
20959055
PakistanVietnam_relations
Pakistan and Vietnam relationship are largely based on mutual trade and international political cooperation opportunities between the 2 countries. Pakistan maintains an embassy in Hanoi(Embassy of Pakistan in Vietnam.), and Vietnam has an embassy in Islamabad(Vietnam Embassy in Pakistan).During the Pakistan floods Vietnam provided aid worth US$50,000 to the government of Pakistan(Vietnam assists Pakistans flood victims).Trade linksTrade between the two countries increased from US$10 million in 1999 to US$150 million in 2008(Pakistan, Vietnam to review progress on trade.). Pakistan is Vietnam largest tea importer(Technology needed for VN tea aroma to spread). Pakistan exports to Vietnam consist of cotton, leather and pharmaceutical product, and include  potential(Pakistan calls for more investment from Vietnam)(Vietnam Keen to Enhance Trade with Pakistan - Nguyen Quang Thuc) for export of motorcycles, plastic products and surgical instruments and investment in coal mining and aquaculture. Meanwhile Vietnam has potential to export rubber, rubber products and machinery to Pakistan.Political cooperationIn May 2001 General Musharraf, paid an official visit to Vietnam. In March 2004, President Duc Luong, at the invitation of President Pervez Musharraf, also visited Pakistan(Viet Nam  Pakistan Relations).Pakistan considers Vietnam an important diplomatic partner, because of Vietnam full membership of ASEAN, and Vietnam support of Pakistans bid to be a full dialogue partner of ASEAN(Vietnam enhances economic ties with Pakistan, Bangladesh). Therefore under the Pakistan East Asia Vision Strategy foreign policy, Vietnam has potential to promote Pakistan mutual interest in ASEAN, whereas Pakistan supports Vietnam bid for non-permanent membership of the United Nations Security Council(Vietnam - one of the important elements of Pakistan East Asia Vision Strategy policy).Vietnam support for Pakistan in 20011 for EU duty waiver for its textile products has also been seen as very critical by Pakistani diplomats.(Pakistan edges closer to EU duty waiver -diplomat, Reters, 26 May 2011)References
20982434
Robert_Taylor_Shillington
Robert Bob Taylor Shillington (October 3, 1867January 11, 1934) was a Canadian politician, mine owner, druggist and hockey executive. Shillington was a member of the provincial legislature in the province of Ontario, representing the Timiskaming riding, first elected in 1908.Born in Merival, a rural village now located within the city limits of Ottawa, in 1867, Shillington was one of ten children of Thomas and Elizabeth Shillington. Shillington attended the Ottawa Model School and Collegiate. He then attended the of Toronto, graduating in pharmacy. He returned to Ottawa and opened a druggist business on Sparks Street. His business was successful and he invested in mining in the Haileybury area. He also became an executive with the Hockey Club. In 1903, after the Ottawas had won their first Cup Canadian championship, he gave each player a silver nugget. That donation led to the nickname Silver Seven.(Kitchen, p. 119) He would manage the club through its 19031906 championship run. In 1905, he sold his druggist business. In 1906, he moved to Haileybury full-time. He ran for a seat in the 1908 Ontario election and won in the district of Timiskaming.In 1890, he married Harriet Score and the couple had one child, Clarissa. Bob died in Toronto in 1934 and Harriet in 1939. He and his wife are interred in Mount Pleasant Cemetery in Toronto.Shillington Avenue, an east-west road in Ottawa is named after the Shillington family which at one time owned the property.References*External links*
20998603
List_of_people_from_Rochdale
This is a list of people from Rochdale, in Manchester. The demonym of Rochdale is Rochdalian, however, this list may include people from Heywood, Littleborough, Middleton, Milnrow and Wardle, all from the wider Borough of Rochdale. This list is arranged alphabetically by surname:__NOTOC__B*Baker - actor famous for playing Who on television.(Colin Baker biography)*Bardsley - gained fame from appearing on 4s Swap in 2003.()()*Bottomley - actress known for her roles on Doors, Heartbeat and currently as Shoo Coggan on BBC drama, Hope Springs.()C*Choudhury - candidate on Sugars The Apprentice series 5.(Noorul aims to reach top of Sir Alans class Rochdale Observer (Manchester Evening News). 20 March 2009. Retrieved on 2009-05-02.)*John Collier - acclaimed Urmston-born 18th-century caricaturist and satirical poet who was raised and spent all his adult life in Milnrow.(Hignett (1991), p. 39.)(Rochdale Metropolitan Borough Council (N.D.), p. 33.)*Coogan - Middleton-born and raised comedian.()*Jack Crabtree - contemporary British artist who was born in Rochdale.(Jack Crabtree at Art In Wales)E*Estelle - Crumpsall-born actor and singer who lived for much of his life in Rochdale.(Farewell to screen star Lofty Don - News - Rochdale Observer)F*Fenton - Heywood-born pioneering war photographer. His work on the Civil War is particularly acclaimed. A plaque marks his former home.()*Fields - real name Grace Stansfield - actress, singer and comedienne (Gracie Fields biography)*Friel - stage and screen actress (Anna Friel biography)G*Goodyear - television actress and personality, best known for her portrayal of Lynch in Street.(http://www.heywoodadvertiser.co.uk/news/s/513096_riding_plans_for_goodyear)K*James Kay-Shuttleworth, 1st Baronet -  politician and educationalist.(James Kay-Shuttleworth biography)M*Milne - Liverpool-born, Milnrow-raised professor, geologist and mining engineer who invented a pioneering seismograph (known as the Milne-Shaw seismograph) to detect and measure earthquakes.()(Hignett (1991), p. 38.)*Miller - controversial entrepreneur from Rochdale.()()O*Oddie - naturalist and actor.()R*Robert Raines - former Anglican vicar of Milnrow, and an antiquary. He edited 23 volumes for the Chetham Society publications.()S*Stansfield - Award-nominated and BRIT Award-winning R&B and soul singer, was raised in Heywood.(http://www.heywoodadvertiser.co.uk/news/s/513866_playing_pooh_in_the_school_play_was_my_big_break)*Joseph Smith - steeplejack known as the Best Steeplejack in the World (Joseph Smith biography)T See also *of people from Greater ManchesterReferencesNotesBibliography**
21006911
2009_in_Algeria
Events from the year 2009 in AlgeriaEventsJanuary*January 2: The death toll from political violence reached sixteen in the month of December 2008, double the number of the previous month. The total killed in 2008 dropped to 338 from 491 in 2007. Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb claimed to have murdered five members of government security forces in December 2008.(Timeline-Algerian violence toll doubles in Dec, 2008 rate down, Reuters, January 3, 2009, internet article.)*January 3: Al Qaedas African wing claimed to have killed at least 29 members of the Algerian security forces in the past three months. It conducted 21 attacks in northern Algeria, between September and December 2008. The incursions came in Bejaia, Algeria, and Biskra. The group was previously known as the Group for Preaching and Combat (GSPC).(Terror raids toll rises in Algeria, Daily News, January 4, 2009, internet posting.)*January 7: The Palestinian ambassador to Algeria, Ahmed Al-Hourani, emphasized the importance of regaining unity among all factions in Palestine. He told Fatour Essabah that Israel has set a new map of the region, separating the Strip from the Bank, and joining them to Egypt and Jordan, respectively.(Algerians can contribute in the unity of Palestine, Khabar, January 8, 2009,internet article.)*January 7: In Dhebahia, western Province, a 65-year-old woman sustained a leg injury while she was harvesting olives with another family member. She was treated in the emergency area of her towns hospital after she stepped on a bomb planted by terrorists.(Blast injures seriously a woman in Bouira, El Khabar, January 8, 2009, internet article.)*January 12: Protectors of the Salafiste Preaching Group, a rival terrorist organization to Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb, is led by Mohamed Ben Salem, a.k.a. Abu Djaafar Al-Afghani. The group has posted video recordings of attacks against Algerian army forces in Tipaza, Bel Abbes, Ain Deffla, Relizene, and Tissemsilt. These are regions in which Al Qaeda has yet to establish known bases.(Salafiste Protectors resume terror activity, El Kabar, January 13, 2009, internet posting.)*January 12: Terrorist murdered a 40-year-old man and his 75-year-old mother during an ambush in Amelza in southern Sidi Bel Abbes. The attackers used a gun stolen from an 80-year-old man to kill the two people and injure another relative, who was hospitalized.(Terrorists kill 75-year-old woman and her son in Sidi Bel Abbes, El Khabar, January 13, 2009, internet posting.)*January 13: Without Borders urged Algerian authorities to conduct a full investigation into the attempted murder of Hafnaoui Ghoul, a journalist for the daily al-Wassat. Ghoul, a rights advocate, was approached by a group of hooded assailants who gagged him and tore his clothes on the night of January 6, 2009. The attempt came at Ghouls home in Djelfa and the attackers fled without being identified.(Algeria-Hooded assailants launch knife attack against journalist, Group-Canada Newswire, January 15, 2009, internet article.)*January 14: The criminal court in Algiers has sentenced to death a terrorist bearing the initials K.J., with the nickname Abou Khitama. He was charged with killing hundreds of civilians and security agents after joining terror organizations in Defla province in 1994. Khitama was arrested on June 13, 2005. His murders occurred over the years from 1996 - 2005.(Blood thirsty terrorist sentenced to death, El Khabar, January 15, 2009, internet article.)*January 14: Algerian Labour Party PT Louisa Hanoune expressed opposition to a government proposal to install a national committee of elections supervising. She believes that such an organization has not been proved to be efficient.(Labour opposes governmental committee to supervise elections, El Khabar, January 15, 2009, internet article.)*January 17: The GAC Group of Dubai has opened a ship agency in Algeria to exploit the booming gas and oil business there.(GAC opens Algeria ship agency, American Shipper, January 16, 2009, internet article.)*January 18: Al-Qaeda militants in training have been reported to have succumbed to the death, a plague which decimated Europe during the Ages.(Report: Plague killing Al-Qaeda terrorists, UPI, January 19, 2009, internet article.)*January 21: Fifteen people have died during storms which occurred in Algeria over a 48-hour period. Most of the dead were the victims of traffic accidents. The storms struck both the northern and southern parts of the country. Hundreds of homes in Alouef, Ouargia, and Ghardaya have been damaged.(Algeria battered by storms, Independent (Gambia), January 22, 2009, internet article.)*January 21: Algeria Telecom has formed a partnership with Iristel under the Algeria Connect brand. With Algeria Connect phone calls can be made from Algerian phones to locations worldwide at the cost of a local call.(Algeria Connect forms VOiP partnership with Iristel, Telegeography Comms Update, January 22, 2009, internet article.)*January 21: Algerian judicial police reported a total of 34,000 crimes committed in the nation during 2008. 23,900 people were involved and 23,729 were taken into custody.(34,000 crimes committed during 2008, says judicial police services, El Khabar, January 22, 2009, internet article.)*January 28: Algerias foreign ministry admonished the United States for warning of terrorist attacks in Algiers,  during a meeting with a senior American diplomat.(Algeria Scolds U.S. About Terror Warning, Press, January 27, 2009, internet article.)*January 28: tuberculosis is prevalent in Algeria despite the efforts of government authorities to control the disease. The abattoirs  of Algiers and Blida were studied between August and November 2007. A total of 7250 animals in all were screened. In 260 of these gross visible granulomatous lesions were found and put into culture. Bacterial isolates were afterward analyzed employing molecular methods.(Molecular characterization of Myobacterium bovis strains isolated from cattle slaughtered at two abattoirs in Algeria, BMC Veterinary Research, January 27, 2009, research article.)*January 28: Warren, Algeria CIA station chief according to Propaganda Press, is alleged to have raped two Muslim women during his posting in the North African nation. He is supposed to have used a knockout drug to lace the womens drinks prior to the assault, News reported.(Andrew Warren, Algeria CIA station chief raping Muslim women, http://www.PropagandaPress.org, January 27, 2009, internet article.)February*February 5: Abou Djerra Soltani, head of the of Society for Peace, said that he has no regrets for having once been a candidate of the Salvation Front (FIS), during the legislative elections of 1991.(Im for the return of FIS to politics, El Khabar, February 4, 2009, internet article.)*February 10: Algerian President Abdelaziz Bouteflika designated April 9, 2009 as the date for the nations presidential election. He invited a number of international groups to monitor the elections by sending observers.(Algerian president sets April 9 election date, Earth Times, February 9, 2009, internet article.)*February 10: Growth in Algerian gas exports may disappoint European nations which hope to trim their reliance on imports from Russia. Algeria, the third biggest contributor of gas to the Union is readying to step up its exports. It will add a pipeline to Spain and increase the capacity of its existing links to both Spain and Italy.(Algeria gas export growth may disappoint Europe, Peninsula (newspaper), February 10, 2009, internet article.)*February 14: The Algerian state news agency reported that two roadside bombs exploded in eastern Algeria, killing seven people. The first bomb detonated in Foum El-Metlag, close to the countrys eastern border with Tunisia. Two police officers and a firefighter died when a second bomb exploded after rescue services arrived. The tragic events took place in the aftermath of President Bouteflikas announcement that he would seek a third term in office.(Algerian bombs,Daily, February 14, 2009, internet article.)*February 18: Al-Jazeera aired a recording by members of Al-Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb in which they claim to have kidnapped two Canadian diplomats, one of them a former advisor to Prime Minister Trudeau. The men were abducted in Niger in December 2008. Salah Abu Mohammed, spokesman for the Algerian/North African group, also claimed responsibility for the capture of four European tourists in January 2009. The four were kidnapped in Mali, and are a citizen, two Swiss, and a German.(Al-Qaida claims it kidnapped two Canadians, Sun, February 17, 2009, internet article.)*February 18: The Algerian Office of Childhood Protection and Minors Crimes revealed that up to 1414 children in the country suffered abuse in 2008. This included 762 female children and 652 male children.(Sexual abuses phenomenon hits alarming level in 2008 in Algeria, El Khabar, February 17, 2008, internet article.)*February 25: Nigeria and Algeria began talks in Abuja about completing  a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU). The agreement would implement the Trans Sahara Gas Pipeline, which will transport gas from Nigeria to be delivered to Mediterranean and European gas markets. The gas line will also pass through Niger and Algeria.(Nigeria: Partnership With Algeria to Commit Swelves to $12 Billion Trans Sahara Gas Pipeline Project, http://www.allAfrica.com, February 24, 2009, internet article.)*February 25: A patrol associated with the Malian National Gendarmerie seized a sizable cache of arms and munitions intended to be delivered to Al-Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb. The arms load included a large number of machine guns and ammunition, launchers, mortars, and anti-tank missiles. The weapons were in transit from Guinea and were taken by authorities in Mali. It is assumed that the cache was financed by the kidnapping and ransom of two Austrian tourists, who were later freed in November 2008. The Austrian government denies having paid for their ransom.(Mali army seizes an arsenal in its way to Algeria, El Khabar, February 24, 2009, internet article.)*February 25: Morocco expresses a willingness to discuss reopening its border with Algeria, which has been closed for fifteen years. It will also entertain talks concerning fighting terrorism, smuggling, and immigration.(International, El Khabar, February 24, 2009, internet article.)*February 27: Members of Algerias North African wing claim to have killed nine security guards near an Algerian power facility close to Jijel, approximately 215 miles east of Algiers. The attack was carried out using bombs and mortars. The guards were employed by Sonelgaz, and they were working on an electricity dam.(Al-Qaida offshoot claims Algeria attacks, PR-inside.com, February 26, 2009, internet article.)March*March 3: Algerian state radio says that members of the Algerian military killed sixteen militants aligned to Al-Qaeda during the past weekend. The raid began on Friday near Blida, beginning with a tip from a terror support cell which was penetrated a week before. The government has killed one hundred and twenty members of Al-Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb in the past six months.(Troops kill 16 al-Qaida militants in Algeria, Times, March 3, 2009, internet article.)*March 3: Candidates for the April 9 Algerian Presidential election number six, including incumbent President Bouteflika. The others are leftwinger Louisa Hanoune, the only woman candidate, nationalists Moussa Touati and Fawzi Rebaine, and Islamist politicians Mohammed Said (a moderate) and Djahid Younsie (a hardliner).(Algerian poll contenders unveiled, BBC, Tuesday, March 3, 2009, internet article.)*March 9: At least two people died on March 7 during an attack on Algerian security forces in Tadmait, near Ouzou, about sixty miles east of Algiers.(Two die in Algerian barracks attack: witnesses, International News, Pakistan, Monday, March 9, 2009, internet article.)*March 10: Nadjar Hadj Daoud was released from Chaabet Ennachine Prison in Ghardaia on Monday, March 9. Daoud, the managing director of Al-Waha (The Oasis) is a frequent critic of the corruption in the administration of Algerian President Bouteflika. His six month jail sentence for defamation was issued by a minor court in 2005 and upheld by Algerias highest court in 2008. Daoud was imprisoned for his article in Al Waha which described multiple rapes by a local government official against his female coworkers. Daoud was provisionally released by a judge following an assassination attempt almost one month ago.(Algerian journalist provisionally released, facing jail term, to Protect Journalists, March 10, 2009, internet article.)*March 14: Algerian border guards seized 3.5 tons of cannabis in a desert region close to the frontier with Morocco. The cannabis was confiscated near Ferradj, approximately 100 kilometers from Bechar. More than 38 tons was seized in 2008 compared to only 4 tons in 2007.(Algerian border guards seize 3.5 tons of cannabis, Star (Lebanon), Friday, March 13, 2009, internet article.)*March 16: An Algerian sheep farmer had his throat slit and three of his children were killed in a bomb attack near the border with Tunisia. Militants killed three hundred sheep prior to killing their owner in this attack in Houidjbet. The motive for the attack was uncertain.(5 killed in Algeria attack near Tunisian border, P.R.-inside.com, March 15, 2009, internet article.)*March 19: Algerian chief investment officer of Spa Dahli, Abdelouahab Rahim, 57, has proposed an renewal project for Algiers. In February 2009 Rahim floated a 91.3 million pounds bond issue to fund a portion of the project. It is worth a total of 2.5 billion pounds in investment over a number of years. It is the first public bond offering made by a private Algerian company.(Algerian investor builds big dreams for capitol, of Malta, Wednesday, March 18, 2009, internet article.)*March 22: A prosecutor of the criminal court of Oran ordered the detention of a forty-year-old woman for belonging to an international network of terror which targeted important personages in Algeria. She contends that the female terrorist network is headed by the Israeli Mossad. The center of the network is located in Egypt and some Gulf nations.(International Terrorism: A woman arrested in Oran, Ennahar Online, March 21, 2009, internet article.)*March 22: The five opponents of President Bouteflika trail the incumbent in terms of financing for the April 9 election. The state provides fifteen million dinars (150,000 Euros) to each candidate for his campaign. However this sum is insufficient to cover the costs of public meetings, posters, and updating websites. In Algiers 5,000 associations and neighborhood committees have been entrusted with the task of convincing voters to go out and vote.(Algeria Presidential: finances shortage for Bouteflikas opponents, Ennahar Online, March 21, 2009, internet article.)*March 24: Gas asphyxiation accounts for the death of one person per day in Algeria. As many as thirty persons per day die during the cold season and two hundred nineteen succumbed to gas asphyxia in 2008.(Gas suffocation kills a person per day in Algeria, El Khabar, March 25, 2009, internet article.)*March 25: 120 Algerian Harragas (illegal immigrants) are serving prison terms in Province after being charged with illegal immigration and attempting to cross the border into Greece. The term of their detention in jail in northwest Turkey is five days.(120 Algerian Harragas detained in Adana prison in Turkey, El Khabar, March 25, 2009, internet article.)*March 31: Bank has purchased a 60% stake in TMs Gulf Bank of Algeria it was announced on March 30.(Burgan Bank buys major stakes in Algeria, Iraq banks, Maktoob Business, March 30, 2009, internet posting.)*March 31: Gambia and host Algeria will meet in the final of the 8th CAF-17 soccer championship. The Baby Scorpions of Gambia shutout Malawi 4-0 in a semifinal played in Zeralda on March 29.(CAF U-17: Gambia, Algeria for final, Vanguard, March 31, 2009, internet article.)April*April 5: A police officer who feared terrorists would kill him and his family committed suicide in Gouraya  (Department of Tipaza). He ended his life with a service weapon after receiving death threats from a terrorist group.(A police officer commits suicide in Tipaza, Ennahar Online, April 4, 2009, internet article.)*April 6: Al Qaeda warned Algerian voters against reelecting President Bouteflika in the April 9 election. In a statement posted on jihadi forums, Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb called Bouteflika a ferocious enemy to Muslims. They asked for money and moral support for the mujahideen.(Al Qaeda warns Algeria against electing Bouteflika again, Times (Pakistan), Monday, April 5, 2009, internet posting.)*April 6: Algerian authorities arrested thirty-five terrorists from various North African countries including Mauretania, Tunisia, Libya, Morocco, and a single one from Mali. Each is thought to have ties to Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb. The one Mali national is considered to be associated with the famous ivory case.(35 terrorists originated from Maghreb countries arrested in Algeria, El Khabar, April 5, 2009, internet article.)*April 6: Tunisian rights activist, Sihem Bensidrene, was expelled on her arrival at Algiers airport after arriving from France. She represented a working group monitoring Arab media. She was invited to Algeria by the LDDH. The group denounces the Bouteflika regimes opposition to the defenders of human rights in the Maghreb.(Sihem Bensedrine expelled at Algiers airport, Ennahar Online, April 5, 2009, internet posting.)*April 9: President Bouteflika expressed sadness and pain upon hearing of the earthquake which struck LAquila, Italy on April 6. He transmitted a message of condolence to Italian President Napolitano.(Bouteflika sent a message of condolence to the Italian president, April 8, 2009, Ennahar online edition.)*April 10: Abdelaziz Bouteflika tallied 90.24% of the vote to earn a third mandate as Algerian president on April 9. Voting was carried out under tight security. Two incidents of violence occurred when a bomb exploded at a polling station in Imeghenine near Boumerdes, and a police officer died after a roadside bomb detonated in Tebessa.(Bouteflika elected for a third term, Magharebia.com, April 9, 2009, internet article.)*April 14: Mohammed Djahid Younsi, Ali Faouizi Rebaine, and Louisa Hanoune, challengers to Bouteflika in the April 9 presidential election, accused the administration of rigged elections throughout Algerias forty-eight provinces. Hanoune plans to file a claim with the Constitutional Council with an appeal of the results.(Bouteflika contenders dispute election results, Magharebia.com, April 13, 2009, internet article.)*April 19: The upcoming Pan-African Festival will mark Africas return to the international cultural stage. It will be held in Algiers forty years after the noted PanAf of 1969. Forty-four of the fifty-three member states of the Union have confirmed that they will participate. Other nations which will attend include the States, Cuba, Venezuela, and Brazil.(Algiers festival to mark African cultural renaissance,http://www.Magharebia.com, April 19, 2009, internet article.)*April 23: Algeria Watch, a French and German rights organization, estimates 10,000 people disappeared between 1992 - 1996 during the war between the Algerian government and Islamic rooted militants and guerrillas. President Bouteflika offered amnesty to rebels who gave up their insurgency in 2006. He has promised to expand his offer following his recent re-election.(Algerias Disappeared Relatives Stranded By Bouteflikas Peace Program, News, April 23, 2009, internet article.)*April 28: President Bouteflika reappointed Ahmed Ouyahia as Prime Minister after Ouyahia earlier submitted his resignation.(Mr. Bouteflika reappointed Prime Minister and his government, Ennahar Online, April 27, 2009, internet article.)*April 28: The brother of a contractor in the town of Jijel was kidnapped by a terrorist group led by Noureddine, alias Djelbib.(Jijel:A contractors brother kidnapped, Ennahar Online, April 27, 2009, internet article.)*April 28: The father of Abou Daoud, 34, coordinator of Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb, has been arrested by Algerian security forces in the Department of Tlemcen. Daoud sustained a serious injury during a fight between Moroccan police and members of his terrorist group. Born in 1975, he was responsible for logistics operations in Al Qaeda bases in Boumerdes and Ouzou.(The coordinator of El Qaida in the Islamic Maghreb, Abou Daoud wounded, Ennahar Online, April 27, 2009, internet article.)*April 29: The Ministry of Health, Population, and Hospital Reform issued a communique which stated Algeria has the necessary means to combat flu.(Algeria Has The Necessary Means To Fight The Epidemic, Ennahar Online, April 28, 2009, internet article.)*April 29: The strawberry fair is held every two years at the community arts centre in Jijel. The provincial agriculture department reports that the event is being attended by a number of producers and strawberry cultivators this year.(Jijel: 2nd Strawberry Fair, Ennahar Online, April 28, 2009, internet article.)May*May 4: The criminal court in the jurisdiction of Tizi Ouzou sentenced three people to life imprisonment on a charge of forgery. The same court sentenced three other individuals to twenty year sentences without suspension. The case dates back to July 25, 2006 when the court of Azazga received a complaint from France.(Life and 20 years sentences against 6 convicted, El Khabar, May 3, 2009, internet article.)*May 4: The Tunisian group Loukil, formed in 1998, is near opening an industrial unit in Algeria. The company is expected to invest eight million pounds after acquiring a plant in the Azaba region in Annaba. The firm makes steel structures used in construction workshops and infrastructures.(Tunisian Group Loukil to enter Algerian market, El Khabar, May 3, 2009, internet article.)*May 6: The of Algeria is initiating a new system for opening and managing bank accounts in foreign currency. Specifically, new regulations focus on curbing concealed embezzlements by foreign companies, their owners and managers.(The Bank of Algeria adopts a new act for bank accounts in foreign currency, El Khabar, May 5, 2009, internet article.)*May 6: There are a growing number of medical mistakes in hospitals and medical centers throughout Algeria. 200 medical errors remain pending from 2006. The Chairman of the Council of Medical Deontology is requesting that a law be enacted requiring private clinics to be insured.(Average citizens remain main victims, El Khabar, May 5, 2009, internet article.)*May 11: Mohand Issaad, head of a fact-finding panel regarding events in the Kabylie region in 2001, describes Algerian justice as a caricature-like situation. He attributes the causes to congestion of people, as well as economic, social, and cultural factors.(Algerian Justice is in a caricature-like situation, El Khabar, May 11, 2009, internet article.)*May 11: The Office of National Exams and Contests (ONEC) stated that up to forty centers of exam correction have been opened in Algeria. From twenty to fifty teachers in each province will be assigned the task of correcting exams. Technical reasons have prevented the opening of such centers in some southern provinces like Tindouf, IIizi, Adrar, and Tamenrasset.(Assistant teachers to be in charge of controlling baccalaureate exam papers correction, El Khabar, May 11, 2009, internet article.)*May 11: Saifi,  a former Algerian Islamist leader, is urging leaders of al Qaedas North African wing to lay down their arms. A security crackdown has resulted in a sharp decrease in attacks. Saifi planned the 2003 kidnapping of thirty-two tourists. He wants remaining insurgents to accept a longstanding amnesty offer.(Ex militant urges al Qaeda to surrender, Independent (Zambia), May 10, 2009, internet posting.)*May 13: Jong Il sent a telegram congratulating Algerian Prime Minister Ouyahia on being reappointed prime minister.(Congratulations to PM of Algeria, Korean News Service, May 12, 2009, internet article.)*May 20: Spanish police arrested thirteen people in Bilbao who are suspected of financing Islamic militants in Algeria. Authorities broke up a gang of twelve Algerians and one Iraqi who are thought to be involved in trafficking, and robbery.(Spanish police arrest Algerian Islamist suspects, Times, May 19, 2009, internet article.)*May 22: The Algerian coast guard has arrested twenty-two illegal migrants whose ages range from 17 to 31 in Annaba province. Traveling in a handmade boat four miles north of Cape Ras El Hamra, their destination was the Italian coast.(22 Harragas arrested in Annabas coasts, May 21, 2009, internet article.)*May 22: Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb has announced a fifteen day deadline for the English negotiator prior to executing an English tourist held by the organization since the beginning of 2009. Al Qaeda is using the English tourist as a bargaining chip to obtain the release of Qatada El Filastini, alias Mohamad Abou Omar, age 48.(El Qaeda threatens to kill the British hostage and negotiates with England, Ennahar Online, May 21, 2009,internet article.)*May 22: A French court has rejected demands from military veterans for millions of dollars in compensation for thirty years of testing in Algeria and Polynesia. However the French government is planning to draft legislation to compensate some victims of nuclear testing.(French Court Turns Away Veterans Plea For Compensation, Of America, May 21, 2009, internet article.)June*June 1: Algerian Minister of Energy and Mines, Chakib Kelil, says that hydrocarbons revenues in 2009 will likely vary between $40 and $45 billion. He estimates that oil prices may reach $70 to $75 per barrel in 2010 if the United States and European economies recover. Until the conclusion of this year Kelil surmises oil prices will stabilize between $60 and $65 per barrel.(Algerias hydrocarbons revenue to hit $45b per barrel say Kelil, El Khabar, May 31, 2009, internet article.)*June 2: Algerian security forces have arrested four men accused of plotting to abduct foreigners. One of these men, Abu Djendel, once worked as a keeper of a garden adjacent to the Homeland Security Directorate (DGSN), and Bastion 23 Castle. One group of persons watched foreigners to see which places they frequented, while another planned their abductions or targeted them for terrorist attacks.(4 men plotting the abduction of foreigners in Algiers arrested, El Khabar,June 1, 2009, internet article.)*June 3: The North African wing of Al Qaeda put to death English hostage Edwin Dyer in Mali. The group had been threatening to kill Dwyer unless Abu Qatada, a Jordanian Islamist, was released from an English prison. Dwyer was assassinated on May 31 following the expiration of a second deadline imposed by Al Qaeda.(Al-Qaeda kills British hostage in Mali, GlobalTV, June 2, 2009, internet article.)*June 8: A municipal guard was killed and two others injured by a roadside bomb near Tizi Ouzou on June 7. The bomb exploded in Mizrana as the vehicle arrived carrying the guards. The communal guard was created in 1996 to support security forces in municipalities.(Algeria: a communal guard killed near Tizi Ouzou, El Ennahar, June 7, 2009, internet article.)*June 8: Algeria hopes to raise its natural gas exports to thirty billion cubic meters over the next five years according to Chakib Khelil, Minister of Energy and Mines. The volume exported via the gas pipeline linking Algeria to Italy will be increased by up to seven billion cubic meters.(Nuclear production in Algeria bound to the ability of importing enriched uranium, El Khabar, June 7, 2009, internet article.)*June 16: A group of Palestinian children arrived in Rafah on their way to Algeria. They will spend holidays there following psychotherapy following an attack by Israeli forces. The group is made of sixteen people, including nine children and seven guides (Ghazawi children in Algeria, Ennahar Online, June 15, 2009, internet article.)*June 16: An Algerian citizen residing in Lehdada in the Department of Tlemcen took hostages in the visa office of the Moroccan embassy, while carrying a large dagger in his hand. Security services managed to subdue the man after surrounding the premises around midday on Monday. The man resided near the border of Morocco and Algeria. The former captives are Moroccan except for one, who is of German nationality.(Hostage-taking at the Consulate of Morocco in Tlemcen, Ennahar Online, June 15, 2009, internet article.)*June 20: Algerias initial case of flu has been detected at Boumediene Airport. The sick woman is an Algerian national who resides in Germany and came to Algiers from Florida. She was conveyed to El Kettar Hospital for treatment.(First case of swine flu identified in Algeria, Ennahar Online, June 19, 2009, internet article.)*June 22: Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb is claiming responsibility for murdering 18 paramilitary policemen and 1 civilian. An attack on a security convoy for Chinese construction workers in Mansoura, Bou Arreridj Province, on June 17, is one of 10 carried out by AQIM between May 22 and June 18.(Al Qaeda Claim Algeria Attack, The Times, Zambia, June 21, 2009, internet article.)*June 25: Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb claims to have killed American aid worker, Chris Leggett, in Mauritania, on June 23. al Jazeera TV reports that Leggett was murdered for spreading Christianity. A native of Tennessee, Leggett taught at a centre specializing in computer sciences and languages in a working class section of Nouakchott. He was shot several times by unidentified gunmen.(African al Qaeda killed US man, BBC, June 24, 2009, internet article.)July*July 2: Russian industry sources report that Iran and Algeria are considering acquiring Russian-origin submarines in 2010. The particular submarines the countries desire are of the Project-636 and Amur-1650 classes.(Iran, Algeria Eye Russian Subs, Middle East Newsline, July 1, 2009, internet article.)*July 7: Ziani, a (soccer) from Algeria, signed a four-year contract with Wolfsburg. Formerly with Marseille, the 26-year-old is the second signing by the German club since winning the championship of the Bundesliga in May.(Wolfsburg signs Ziani     from Marseille, http://www.Pr-inside.com, July 6, 2009, internet article.)*July 9: SNC-Lavalin Inc., announced that it will design a new city in Algeria, to be built over an eight year period, which will be large enough for 80,000 inhabitants.(SNC-Lavalin to design Algerian city, and Mail, July 8, 2009, internet article.)*July 13: Cuban President Castro is in Algeria. He was greeted by Algerian President Bouteflika.(Cubas Raul Castro in Algeria, Latina, July 12, 2009, internet article.)*July 13: The North African wing of Al Qaeda received $4.17 million for the release of Swiss hostage Werner Greiner. Greiner was handed over to authorities in the remote northern region of Mali on July 12. Greiner was kidnapped along with Edwin Dyer near the border of Mali and Niger on January 22. The source declined to say who paid the ransom.(Al Qaeda frees Swiss hostage for ransom, of Malta, July 12, 2009, internet article.)*July 16: Support is building among the Algerian establishment for a new amnesty for al Qaeda members, even the most militant. However some, who formerly surrendered under previous amnesty offers, are taking up arms again, due to depressed living conditions.(Algeria ex-rebels say cash key to weakening Qaeda, Times (Pakistan), July 15, 2009, internet article.)*July 21: In the town of Dellys, Algerian security forces shot and killed a 25-year-old man who was wearing a belt which contained explosives. He planned to use a bomb against the coast guard in the town. The man, Omar Toudji, was a member of the Al Ansar cell of al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb. He joined the fundamentalist guerrillas in 2004. Dellys is 100 kilometers east of Algiers.(Algerian security forces kill bomber, & Guardian, July 22, 2009, internet article.)*July 28: Six people died and twenty-five more were injured when a lorry, coach, and cross-country vehicle crashed. The lorry overtook another vehicle about thirty kilometers from the town of Chlef, west of Algiers. It collided with the coach and the car.(Algiers crash leaves six dead, Independent (Zambia), July 27, 2009, internet article.)*July 30: Bouteflika has established two companies which will manufacture weapons for the Algerian defense industry. One company, EDIV, will be known by its French acronym. It will produce commercial vehicles for a factory in Tiaret, northwest Algeria.(Algeria joins regions arms industry, UPI, July 29, 2009, internet article.)*July 31: Algeria has joined Mali and Libya in planning an offensive against the Al-Qaeda network. The countries have agreed to share intelligence and to plan military operations against the terrorist organization. (Algeria, Libya, Mali Plan Offensive Against AQIM, Middle East Newsline, July 30, 2009, internet article.)August*August 5: More than ten Chinese were injured in a confrontation between Chinese businessmen and Algerians in Algiers. It was not reported the extent of the injuries but it was mentioned that some Chinese citizens might leave Algeria.(More than 10 Chinese injured in clash with Algerians, Daily, August 4, 2009, internet article.)*August 5: France denied that its consulate in Algeria was involved in spying activities in the North African nation.(France denies spying in Algeria, News 24.com, August 4, 2009, internet article.)*August 13: Three suspected militants have been killed by the Algerian army in the Bou Arreridj region, approximately 200 kilometers southeast of Algiers. The men traveled in three cars and were surprised by troops who were acting on a tip-off. Army members recovered homemade bombs and weapons. The area is a transit passage for terrorists associated with al-Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb.(Armed militants killed in Algeria, http://www.iol.co.za, August 14, 2009, internet article.)*August 14: The Algerian football team defeated Uruguay 2 - 1 in a match at the 5 July Stadium in Algiers. The team is preparing for a World Cup qualification game versus Zambia in September. *August 15: 17 people were killed in a head on collision near Ghazaouet, when a lorry and a minibus collided. More than a dozen members of the same family were traveling together and died.(Head on collision kills 17, Independent Online, August 16, 2009, internet article.) *August 16: A survey revealed that there are 1,169,000 unemployed persons in Algeria. The study by the Office of National Statistics discloses that 87% of unemployed Algerians are willing to accept work positions below their levels of education.(The Algerians do not spit on jobs, Ennahar Online August 17, 2009, internet article.)*August 20: The potential for terrorist attacks threatens the construction of a 2,500 mile Trans-Sahara gas pipeline projected to run from Nigeria through Niger, to Algeria. The region is perilous because of the prospect of attacks by al Qaeda forces. The pipeline will cost in the neighborhood of $13 billion and feed natural gas to Europe.(Trans-Sahara Gas Pipeline Will Be Risky, UPI.com, August 21, 2009, internet article.)*August 28: President Bouteflika has called for Algeria to expand its defense industry. His mandate will, if successful, enable the country to become self-sufficient in a number of areas of military production.(Algeria Ordered To Expand Defense Industry, Middle East Newsline, August 27, 2009,internet article.)*August 29: Five people were killed in two separate attacks in eastern and western Algeria. Two members of the Algerian military died in a car bomb attack while two more armed soldiers were murdered in Province. Three soldiers were wounded in this ambush by Islamic radicals against the Algerian army. Bouteflika continued to pledge amnesty to repentant terrorists.(Five Killed in Algeria Attacks, India eNews, August 30, 2009, internet article.)September*September 3: Three officials who are employees of the Boumediene Airport, were arrested after an investigation guided security officials to an attempted heist of 595,000 Euros. The three  are suspected in an embezzlement plot involving other airlines which operate in Algeria.(Embezzlement of 595,000 euros; Officials at H.B. Airport incriminated, Ennahar Online, September 2, 2009, internet article.)*September 7: Algeria defeated Zambia 1 -  0  in a World Cup qualifying match. Afterward fireworks erupted in the town of Amar and thousands of people flooded the streets. Twelve fans were injured during fighting in the streets of Constantine. Two who were hurt seriously were evacuated to a hospital.(Clashes, injuries and deaths; the victory turns into mourning, Ennahar Online, September 8, 2009, internet article.)*September 11: Eight people were taken away by floods and a ninth was killed during thunderstorms which occurred in southwestern Algeria. 700 km southwest of Algiers 4 people drowned in Bayadh. In the Naama district, 600 km from Algiers, 4 died when their auto was caught in a flash flood in a river bed.(Algeria Floods Kill Nine, Times, September 12, 2009, internet article.)*September 17: Servge Gurvil, director general of the Algerian subsidiary Diamal, was dismissed from his position after making comments regarding the political situation in Algeria. Gurvil had received a warning on  April 15, 2009, after he wrote an earlier document. A new CEO will be appointed, probably in the next week.(Diamal Case: CFAO confirmed the firing of CEO and prepares a message of apology, Ennahar Online, September 16, 2009, internet article.)*September 22: El Mouhtarem, the author of Algerie-politique, writes for a pro-government newspaper during the day. Following work he becomes the author of one of Algerias most popular political blogs. A law which is likely to be approved in October calls for internet police to crackdown on online criminal and terrorist activities. If free speech is restricted by the law, El Mouhtarems blog could become endangered.(Algerian Bloggers Feel Threatened By Proposed Law, York Times, September 21, 2009, internet article.)*September 23: A soldier in Idjalouahen, near Timizert, was killed when a roadside bomb exploded on September 17. The bomb is believed to have been planted by terrorists who are active in the region between Boumerdes and Ouzou.(Boumerdes: A soldier killed in the explosion of a bomb in Timizert, Ennahar Online, September 23, 2009, internet article.)*September 26: A terrorist group and the Algerian armed forces confronted each other in Boumerdes on September 25, in the Ghazeroual region. The altercation came after a two day operation by the armed forces. The army acted upon information about presumed terrorist movements between Baghila and Naciria, in Boumerdes. Two terrorists, likely members of Saryate Ghazaroual, are thought to have been injured in the combat.(Boumerdes: Two terrorists wounded in a clash in Ghazeroual, Ennahar Online, September 25, 2009, internet article.)*September 28: 930 fully inhabited bee hives will soon be distributed to beekeepers in Tebessa province, 634 kilometers east of Algiers. This is a portion of a program of integrated rural development (PPDRI). It  will provide hives to 83 beekeepers, covering 28 communes in Tebessa.(Tebessa/beekeeping: more than 900 full hives to be distributed, Ennahar Online, September 27, 2009, internet article.)*September 29: President Bouteflika is in Cuba, where he arrived on the evening of September 28 for three days of work and friendship. Bouteflika and President Castro will look at ways to enhance bilateral cooperation. They will also consult on regional and international issues they have in common.(President Abdelaziz Bouteflika in Havana, Ennahar Online, September 29, 2009, internet article.)October*October 7: An English medical delegation has agreed to visit Algeria once a month to provide medical care for infants suffering from congenital cardiopathy. The English doctors will expedite disease diagnosing techniques and distance training through video conference systems.(British medical delegation in Algeria, Ennahar Online, October 6, 2009, internet article.)*October 7: Most of the attacks conducted by the Salafist Group For Preaching and Combat (GSPC) employs the use of homemade bombs and explosives. These devices are used because the terrorists lack military means and manpower. The explosives have rendered immense casualties to members of the Algerian security services.(Droukdal officially declared reprisal war against civilians, Ennahar Online, October 6, 2009,internet article.)*October 9: Journalist and rights activist Hafnaoui Ghoul is on trial for criticizing local authorities in Djelfa province. The Committee to Protect Journalists has asked Algerian authorities to drop charges against Ghoul.(Algerian journalist faces 16 politicized lawsuits, CPJ Press Freedom Online, October 8, 2009, internet article.)*October 12: Ten Islamic militants and three soldiers were killed in an intense gun battle in the Desert. This occurred when a convoy of well armed militants was attacked by members of the Algerian army. The gunmen, traversing the desert in 4X4 vehicles, looked for refuge near the Great Erg, the worlds largest sand dune. They repelled security forces, killing three and wounding two more. A security chief in Bechar said that Algerian troops, supported by army helicopters, killed ten militants, including three who were not Algerian nationals.(Militants and Algerian Army Clash in Desert, New York Times, October 11, 2009, internet article.)*October 17: Algerias Ministry of Public Works is studying the feasibility of a road link between Tindouf and Choum in northern Mauretania.(Mauretania Road Link Planned, News 24, October 16, 2009, internet article.)*October 19: President Bouteflika is closely following the progress of the Algerian national soccer team which will play Egypt in a qualifying match for the World Cup, to be held in Africa.(Bouteflika follows closely the national team, Ennahar Online, October 18, 2009, Internet Article.)*October 19: L. Mourad, nicknamed Nouh Abu Qatada Es-Salafi, a terrorist, was ambushed and killed in El Khither, in the province of El Bayedh. Known as the Salafi in English, L. Mourad was one of the oldest and most ominous of the amirs of the GSPC, Salafiste pour la Predication et le Combat.(Nouh Abu Qatada eliminated in an ambush, Ennahar Online, October 18, 2009, internet article.)*October 22: Sonatrach has joined Frances Total and Spains Cepsa in the Timimoun natural gas project. Located in southwestern Algeria, Timimoun expects to produce 1.6 billion cubic meters of natural gas annually.(Algeria Plans New Energy Development, Middle East Newsline, October 21, 2009, internet article.)*October 23: Hundreds of youths from the Algiers slum district, Diar Echems, threw stones at police from the roads which lead to their decrepit homes. The youths, with their parents assistance, were protesting the need for them to sleep in rooms which are occupied by ten or more people. Another reason for the violence is that Algerian authorities threatened to prohibit the construction of shanties on a soccer ground in the area.(Slum conditions spark clashes with police in Algeria, France Presse, October 23, 2009, internet article.)*October 27: The Algerian-American Sonatrach-Anadarko announced the signing of a $149.7 million contract with the Italian firm Bonatti. The agreement is for conducting gas facilities near Messaoud, Algerias largest oil field.(Algeria/Oil: Contract of $150 million for Italian Bonatti, Ennahar Online, October 26, 2009, Ennahar Online.)*October 29: Two hundred Tunisian families crossed the border between Algeria and Tunisia in late October. They occupied tents in the El Mezara region, in the town of Bir El Ater, Tebessa province. They have requested asylum from Algerian authorities after fleeing Hogra injustice.(Tunisian families seeking political asylum in Algeria, Ennahar Online, October 28, 2009, internet article.)November*November 4: Six new cases of A/H1N1 have been confirmed by the Algerian Health Ministry. This brings the total number of Swine Flu cases up to 98. A 24-year-old foreign national in Algiers and a 5-year-old residing in Tizi Ouzou have recently been diagnosed with the virus.(A/H1N1 flu:Six new confirmed cases in Algeria, Ennahar Online, November 3, 2009, internet article.)*November 5: National army forces killed a terrorist in the village of Ouzellaguen, and seized his rifle. Several terrorists, including one wounded, escaped. The terrorists body was taken to Khelil Amrane in Bejaia for identification.(A terrorist eliminated in Ouzellaguen (Bejaia), Ennahar Online, November 4, 2009, internet article.)*November 7: A meeting in Algiers was held between Dr. Sheikh Abderrahmane al-Nuaimi Ben Amir, an activist for human rights and Qatari preacher noted for his strong positions, and former leaders of the Salafist Group For Preaching and Combat (GSPC). Hassan Hattab (Abu Hamza), founder of GSPC, outlined an initiative which seeks to stop the bloodshed in Algeria.(Hassan Hattab targets preachers to strengthen his initiative, Ennahar Online, November 6, 2009, internet article.)*November 12: Algeria ranked 1st in Group C, 3 points ahead of Egypt, prior to a meeting of the two countries soccer teams on November 14 in Egypt.(Algeria-Egypt: Sudan will host a possible playoff, Ennahar Online, November 11, 2009, internet article.)*November 12: The total number of persons infected by H1N1 influenza in Algeria has risen to 133, with 11 new cases confirmed by the Ministry of Health, Population, and Hospital Reform.(Swine flu: 11 new cases confirmed in Algeria, Ennahar Online, November 13, 2009,internet article.)*November 14: On November 13 Abdelmalek Droukdal and 48 of his associates were sentenced to death absentia. This judgment was rendered for their participation in an April 2007 attack in Algiers, which caused the deaths of 11 people and injured more than 100.(Capital punishment in absentia for Droukdal and 48 defendants, Ennahar Online, November 13, 2009, internet article.)*November 15: The Civil Guard announced the arrest of an Algerian suspected of being a part of a terrorist organization. He was providing terrorist cells in Algeria with information and assistance with logistics and finances.(Terrorism: An Algerian suspect arrested in Spain, Ennahar Online, November 14, 2009, internet article.)*November 23: Six people were arrested and taken before a judge at Harrach by the anti-terrorist unit of judiciary police. They are from Berraki and Errais in Moussa. Each has been detained following accusations that they belong to a terrorist group and support terrorism. The network is considered responsible for reigniting terrorism in Algiers by recruiting youths into their organization. The arrested persons are between 21 and 35.(Dismantling of a third terrorist network in the capital, Ennahar Online, November 22, 2009, internet article.)*November 23: 18 new cases of H1N1 have been confirmed in Algeria on November 22, bringing the total number of cases in the nation to 186. 5 cases were reported in Algeria, including two young women ages 27 and 22, a 15-year-old girl, an 8-year-old girl, and a boy, age 9.(Swine flu: 18 new cases confirmed in Algeria, Ennahar Online, November 22, 2009, internet article.)*November 29 A French citizen has been kidnapped by Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb in the northern Mali town of Menaka. Located 1,500 northeast of Bamako, the man was seized in a hotel on the night of November 26, November 27.(A French kidnapped by AQMI in northern Mali, Ennahar Online, November 30, 2009, internet article.)*November 30: 25 new cases of A/H1N1 swine flu were confirmed by the health ministry on November 29. 11 people in Algiers have been diagnosed with the virus. 299 cases have been reported altogether in Algeria. 3 people have died.(Swine flu: 25 new cases confirmed in Algeria, Ennahar Online, November 30, 2009, internet article.)December*December 6: Oil ministers of the of Arab Petroleum Exporting Countries (OAPEC) reported that international investment in petroleum has decreased by 20% due to the crisis of 2007-2009.(Intl oil investment shrinks 20% amid financial crisis: OAPEC, China View, December 5, 2009, internet article.)*December 8: Egypt will return its ambassador to Algeria provided that Algeria compensates Egypt for vandalized property, resulting in the aftermath of a soccer game and row which followed it. The Egyptian ambassador was recalled from Algeria in November 2009.(Egypt:Algeria must say sorry and pay, Independent, December 7, 2009, internet article.)*December 9: A 32-year-old pregnant woman in Oran died of A/H1N1 on December 1, 2009. Including the death of a 26-year-old Setif man, the number of deaths attributable to the virus in Algeria is 10.(Swine flu: a new fatal case in Oran, Ennahar Online, December 8, 2009, internet article.)*December 9: The Algerian army destroyed 5,700 mines from the pre-Algerian independence era, in November 2009. The mines, most of them raised by the army, were part of a demining program, which continues 47 years after independence. As of November 30, 2009, 426,599 mines, 358,515 antipersonnel mines, 65,873 anti-group mines, and 2,211 illuminating mines had been eliminated in the operation. (Algeria: over 5,700 mines from the colonial period destroyed in November, Ennahar Online, December 8, 2009, internet article.)*December 9: Three Spanish humanitarians have been detained by members of Al-Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb. The kidnapping occurred on November 29 while they were in Mauritania. In a separate excursion the forces of AQIM took prisoner a Frenchman, Pierre Camatte, in Mali on November 25.(The Spaniards Detained By AQIM Hardliners, Ennahar Online, December 8, 2009, internet article.)*December 10: High ranking officials, acting on the advice of intelligence services, are encouraging the Nations Security Council to adopt an Algerian proposal to limit the payment of ransom to terrorist groups.(Algeria leads an international campaign against paying ransoms, El Khabar, December 9, 2009, internet article.)*December 22: Despite having a large group of women participating in the health-care, justice, and educational fields, the number of females holding parliamentary seats has declined from 35 in 1962 to 30 in 2007. Political and legal experts convened in Algiers on 20 to increase awareness among Algerians about womens role in politics and their relationship to the media.(Algeria considers quotas to boost female political candidates, Magharebia, 23, 2009, internet article.)*December 28: Algerian border guards seized in excess of three tons of hashish and two Toyota all terrain vehicles in the vicinity of Akla El Bereaber. Traffickers abandoned the drugs and vehicles prior to escaping across the Moroccan border. A Kalashnikov rifle was also recovered during this operation.(Three tons of drugs seized and a Kalashnikov recovered in Bechar, Ennahar Online, 29, 2009, internet article.)*December 29: Mali is facing a difficult dilemma in determining a response to Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb. It is particularly problematic to resolve on a course of action in response to hostages taken by the group. Currently six European kidnap victims are thought to be prisoners of Al Qaeda in Mali.(Mali unable to face Al-Qaeda, Ennahar Online, 30, 2009, internet article.)*December 30: Chakib Khelil, Energy and Mining Minister, raised Algerias estimated hydrocarbon export revenues from $40 billion to $43 billion. The higher estimate is the result of an increase in world oil prices. Sonatrach chief, Mohamed Meziane, stated that hydrocarbon revenues were valued at $34.5 billion in late October 2009.(Algeria Expects Revenue From Hydrocarbon Exports Of 43 Billion USD For 2009, Brunei fm World, 31, 2009, internet article.)*December 31: Al Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb have demanded $7 million and the release of a number of its members being detained in Mauretania in return for permitting the release of three Spanish aid workers it is holding in Mali. The three Spanish workers were kidnapped on 29, 2009.(Spain negotiates with Abu Zeid a ransom of Five Million Euros, Ennahar Online, 1, 2010, internet article.)Referencesen Algrie
21023948
Kazem_Oraee
Kazem Oraee Mirzamani (in Persian :   ) was born in 1954 in Iran. He completed his school in Iran and university education in the UK. He received two first degrees in Mining Engineering (1978) and Mathematics (1981), a Masters degree in Technological Economics (1979) and a PhD in Economics of Mining (1983). Professor Oraee has taught in several universities in Iran in the fields of Mining Engineering and Technological Economics, and has supervised over 90 Masters degree and PhD research projects.Current Academic ActivitiesProfessor Oraee currently lectures at several universities in Tehran including Tarbiat Modarres, Amir Kabir and Azad Universities, and in Scotland he lectures in the University of Stirling, where he is an honorary professor. In addition to eagerly following the current global mining and technological advances, he actively contributes to ground-breaking research for which he has received several prestigious acknowledgments and recognitions. He also actively participates in mining conferences all around the world, Including the annual International Conference on Ground Control in Mining,(http://icgcm.conferenceacademy.com/latestmeeting.aspx?Subdomainicgcm) the SME prestigious 100 Years of Research, in which he gave three presentations(http://www.smenet.org/meetings/details/?meeting100%20Years%20of%20Mining%20Research%20%28in%20conjunction%20with%202010%20SME%20Annual%20Meeting%20%26%20Exhibit%29) and the MPES.(http://www.mpes-cami-swemp.com/intro.html)Many of Professor Oraees publications are freely available in the University of Stirlings research publications database STORRE.File:Pres1.1.JPG|Kazem Oraees presentationFile:Pres1.2.JPG|Kazem Oraees presentation at the 28th International Conference on Ground ControlBooksProfessor Oraee has written 12 books in Persian, in areas of Mining, Technological Economics, Economics, and Linear Programming. The full list of his books can be found online. Interested students and academics can purchase these books from Amazon(http://www.amazon.co.uk/shops/nikzado) and Adineh Books.(http://www.adinebook.com/gp/search/refpd_sa_top/243-5662843-7032225?search-aliasbooks&author%D8%B3%DB%8C%D8%AF%DA%A9%D8%A7%D8%B8%D9%85+%D8%A7%D9%88%D8%B1%D8%B9%DB%8C+%28kazem+oraee%29%28k.oraee%29&select-authorauthor-exact)Professional ActivitiesProfessor Oraee acts as advisor to the provincial government of Khorasan and to the Ministry of Mines and Metals of Iran. He is also continuously asked for advice from businesses and the government regarding macro economic policies.File:Speech1.1.jpg|Kazem Oraee as the keynote speaker in the annual congress of the Iranian Mining ChamberFile:Speech1.2.jpg|Keynote speaker, annual congress of the Iranian Mining ChamberFurthermore he is a keen writer and contributes to specialised newspapers in technical issues such as mining, technological economics and macro economics. Thus he has grown into a controversial critic of the Iranian macro economic policies.(http://www.donya-e-eqtesad.com/Default_view.asp?@96143)He currently chairs the board of directors for Jovein Cement Plc(http://www.joveincement.com) and Khorasan Gypsum Ltd.(http://www.khorasangypsum.com/)Awards and recognitionsAmongst many of his professional and academic awards, the most recent are the award known as Professor of the Year by the Ministry of Industries and Mines (2007), and the Ministry of Employment award of The leading industrial job creator the following year.In 2009 however, he was granted the Medal of Excellence from the Institute of Materials, Minerals and Mining, for conspicuous contribution, either during the year or cumulatively over a number of years, to the art, science and practice of the mining industry. He is known for his skill in combining the theoretical with the practical needs of society. He has concentrated on technological economics and has promoted best practice in mining in Iran. This involved fostering excellent links between the two countries, supporting the exchange of students and staff.(http://www.iom3.org/content/award-winners-2009)File:IOM3 B.jpg|Kazem Oraee receiving the Medal for ExcellenceFile:IOM3 B2 copy.jpg|Kazem Oraee in the 2009 IOM3 AwardsPortal and ContactsProfessor Oraees students have jointly compiled a number of his academic articles and publications in a website designed for student access.(http://www.miningpapers.com)He can be contacted to address any academic questions through his email address at the Stirling University.ReferencesExternal links* http://www.aku-press.com* http://www.business.stir.ac.uk/staff/ProfOraeeN.htm* http://www.khorasangypsum.com/newsite/Managers.htm* http://www.aku-press.com/eAuthor.asp?Seq180* http://www.miningpapers.com/* http://www.iom3.org/content/award-winners-2009
21051243
Charles_Scott_Haley
Charles Scott Haley (November 8, 1884 &ndash; 1958), a mining engineer, was an expert in the field of gold deposits.(  His 1923 work, Gold placers of California (California State Mining Bureau Bulletin 92, 1923) described all economic occurrences of alluvial gold deposits in California that were known at the time. Bulletin 92 was the first statewide comprehensive study of tertiary fluvial placers, dredge fields, and dry placers. Even present-day, it continues to be a standard reference.()Personal lifeHaley was born in County, California. His parents, married on October 3, 1876, were Caleb Scott Haley (born February 16, 1833), of Nova Scotia, and Annie Louisa Barclay (born December 6, 1852) of Nova Scotia.() His paternal grandparents were Ebenezer Haley and Mary Lee Scott.  His maternal grandparents were Andrew Barclay and Mary Elizabeth Morton.()In 1907, he received a Bachelor degree from the College of Mining at of California, Berkeley.Haley married at the age of 50, and had six children, including: Frederick, Arthur, Helen, Charles, and Annie.  His wife, Jean, was a teacher at Nevada City Elementary School.()CareerHis early mining experiences were in Alaska, California, and Oregon, as well as Colombia, Honduras, and Peru.( He opened an office in Francisco in 1917, and shortly thereafter, joined the States Army Corps of Engineers, attaining the rank of major during World War I.(In 1921, upon returning from an assignment in British Columbia, Haley was retained by the California State Mining Bureau to document Californias gold placers. After conducting the study, he authored Gold placers of California: California State Mining Bureau Bulletin 92 and Topographic map of Sierra Nevada gold belt showing distribution of the auriferous gravels, in 1923.(One of his articles also appeared in the journal, Mining and Scientific Press.()Partial works* (1923). Gold placers of California. San Francisco: California State Mining Bureau. OCLC 3080130* (1923). Topographic map of Sierra Nevada gold belt showing distribution of the auriferous gravels. San Francisco: California State Mining Bureau. OCLC 81025598References  
21067578
Economy_of_Spokane,_Washington
The economy of Spokane plays a vital role as the hub for the commercial, manufacturing, and transportation center as well as the medical, shopping, and entertainment hub of the  Northwest region. Spokanes economy has traditionally been natural resource basedheavily dependent on extractive products produced from farms, forests, and mineshowever, the citys economy has diversified to encompass other industries, including the high-tech and biotech sectors.The Spokane area is considered to be one of the most productive mining districts in North America. In the late 19th century, gold and silver were discovered in the Inland Northwest, leading to intensive development of mines in the region. The expansion and growth of Spokane abruptly stopped in the 1910s and was followed by a period of population decline due to economic factors.The first permanent European settlement in the Spokane area and Washington state came with the trade, with the westward expansion and establishment of the West Companys House in 1810. The Spokane House was the center of the fur trade between the Rockies and the Cascades for 16 years. Economic history  Trade At the nexus of the Little Spokane and the Spokane, David Thompsons men built a new fur trading post, which is the first long-term European settlement in Washington state.() This trading post known as the House was in operation from 1810 to 1826.() The Spokane House, which was operated by the British West Company and, later, the Bay Company, was the center of the fur trade between the Rockies and Cascades for 16 years. As the North West Company was absorbed into the Hudsons Bay Company in 1821, the operations at the Spokane House continued until 1825, when they shifted their operations to Colville; afterward the company still remained active in the Spokane region.(() Mining boom In 1883, gold and silver were discovered in the Inland Northwest.() The discovery of gold, silver, and lead in the Coeur dAlene region (which generally encompasses present day Stevens, Ferry, and Pend Oreille counties and northern Idaho) in the 1880s precipitated a rush of prospectors into the region. Mining emerged as a major stimulus to Spokane and the city served as a popular outfitting and jumping off point for miners. As a regional shipping center, the city furnished supplies to the miners who passed through on their way to mine in the Coeur dAlene district as well as the Colville and Kootenay districts in subsequent mining booms.( By the mid-1890s, high mining operations were underway in the region.( ) The Spokane area is still considered to be one of the most productive and reformed mining districts in North America.()() The Coeur dAlene district of Shoshone County (also known as Silver Valley) in northern Idaho has produced more silver than any other mining district in the United States, and is historically one of the top three silver districts in the world in total silver produced.( The district competes with Potosi in Bolivia and Pachuca-del Monte in Mexico for the title of greatest silver district, each having produced more than a billion troy ounces of silver. Spokane Stock Exchange During the mining boom, Spokane had its own stock exchange, the Stock Exchange, which began trading mining shares on January 18, 1897.() As the railroad and commercial center of the Inland Empire and with established corporate headquarters for most of the gold, silver, lead, and zinc mines of the region, it was a natural place for the exchange. The exchange originally consisted of 32 members and listed 37 stocks of mines in southern Columbia, northern Idahos Silver Valley in the Coeur dAlene Mining District, and Northeastern Washington.(  At its peak of operation, the Spokane Stock Exchange rivaled the mining exchanges of San Francisco, Denver, Salt Lake City, and Toronto. With the Silver Boom of the 1960s, participation in the Spokane Stock Exchange was vast, with more than 100,000 investors from all 50 states and many foreign countries.( Pressure from the Exchange Commission due to new board member, Meyer Blinders racketeering and securities fraud charges resulted in the remaining members of the board voting to dissolve the exchange. When the Spokane Stock Exchange closed on May 24, 1991, it was the last regional mining exchange in the United States.( Logging, foresty, and agribusiness Just after the turn of the 20th century mining declined and agriculture and logging replaced mining as the primary influence in the economic development of Spokane. The city also became noted for processing and distributing dairy and orchard products and for producing products milled from timber. By the early 20th century Spokane was primarily a commercial center rather than an industrial center.(W. Hudson. Inland Empire Mining and the Growth of Spokane, 1883-1905, Pacific Northwestern Quarterly, April 1969.)Today, a number of companies have located or relocated to the Spokane area, drawn by the easy access to raw materials and lower operating costs, such as cheap hydroelectric power.()() The surrounding area, especially to the south, is a productive agricultural region known as the Palouse. A number of award winning wineries and breweries also operate in the Spokane area.()() Stagnation The expansion and growth of Spokane abruptly stopped in the 1910s and was followed by a period of population decline.(Stratton (2005), pp. 35) Spokanes slowing economy largely contributed to this decline. Control of regional mines and resources became increasingly dominated by national corporations rather than locals, diverting capital outside of Spokane and decreasing growth and investment opportunities in the city.( The 1920s and 1930s saw similar, but less drastic slow growth also due to economic factors. The Inland Northwest region was heavily dependent on extractive products produced from farms, forests, and mines which experienced a fall in demand.(Stratton (2005), pp. 38) Spokanes situation improved with the start of World War II when aluminum production initiated in the Spokane valley due to the areas inexpensive electricity and the increased demand for airplanes.After decades of stagnation and slow growth, Spokane businessmen headed by King Cole formed Spokane Unlimited, an organization that sought to revitalize downtown Spokane.(Stratton (2005), pp. 211-212) Early but modest success came in the form of a new parking garage in 1965. Soon, focus to revitalize the economy focused on improving Havermale Island in downtown Spokane, which was dominated by railroad depots and warehouses. A recreation park that would showcase the Spokane falls was the preferred option, and the organization successfully negotiated with the railroad companies to free up the island property and relocate their rail lines.(Stratton (2005), pp. 215) In the 1970s, Spokane was approaching its one-hundredth birthday, and Spokane Unlimited hired a private firm to start preparations for a celebration and fair.( In a report delivered by the firm, the proposal of a worlds fair was introduced, which culminated in 74. Economy diversification The late 1970s was a period of growth for Spokane. However, the success seen in the late 1970s and early 1980s once again was interrupted by another U.S. recession in which silver, timber, and farm prices dropped. Although a tough period, Spokanes economy had begun to benefit from economic diversification, being the home to growing companies such as Tronic and having research, marketing, and assembly plants for other technology companies helped lessen Spokanes dependency on natural resources.(Schmeltzer (1988), pp. 87)thumb|right| Spokane Flour MillForesty and agribusiness continue to be important elements in the local economy, but Spokanes economy has diversified to encompass other industries, including the lucrative high-tech and biotech sectors.( Economic development in Spokane focuses on six industries: manufacturing, aerospace, health sciences, information technology, clean technology, and digital media.() Sizable companies with locations in the Spokane region include Agilent (closing Spokane area operations in the fall of 2010(Agilent Technologies to close at Liberty Lake, May 11, 2010. Spokesman-Review. http://www.spokesman.com/stories/2010/may/11/agilent-to-close-at-liberty-lake/)), BlueStar Technologies, Cisco sales office, Networks, Dynamics (which closed its Spokane area Dynamics Itronix division in 2009(Itronix to close local plant, cutting at least 300 jobs, February 24, 2009. Spokesman-Review. http://www.spokesman.com/stories/2009/feb/24/itronix-to-close-local-plant-cutting-at-least-300/)), Corporation, Honeywell, Itron, Aluminum, Telect, and Triumph Composite Systems.( Spokanes downtown was the site of a 100-block wireless HotZone networkone of the largest of its kind in the country, which was seen as symbolic of its dedication to the development of technological opportunities and resources.()() As of 2010, the HotZone was falling in to disrepair(Spokane may drop free wireless Internet service, June 1, 2010. Spokesman-Review. http://www.spokesman.com/stories/2010/jun/01/hotzone-cooling-down/) but local firms have stepped in to continue its operation.(Free Downtown Wi-Fi Returning, July 2, 2010. Spokesman-Review. http://www.spokesman.com/stories/2010/jul/02/in-brief-free-downtown-wi-fi-returning/) Regional services With the arrival of the Pacific Railroad in the late 19th century,  Spokane became a transportation hub for the Inland Northwest region.(Stratton (2005), pp. 32) After the arrival of the Northern Pacific, the Union Pacific, Great Northern, and Milwaukee, St. Paul and Pacific railroads, Spokane became one of the most important rail centers in the western United States, being the site of four transcontinental railroads.((Schmeltzer (1988), pp. 44) Spokane became an important rail and shipping center because of its location between the Mountains and the Range and between mining and farming areas.(Schmeltzer (1988), pp. 41)() As a regional shipping center, the city furnished supplies to the miners who passed through on their way to mine in the Coeur dAlene as well as the Colville and Kootenay districts.(Stratton (2005), pp. 28)As the metropolitan center of the Inland Northwest as well as southern Columbia and Alberta, the city serves as a commercial, manufacturing, transportation, medical, shopping, and entertainment hub.()()  The city is also the hub for the service industries, and the wholesale and retail trade center of the  Inland Northwest region.(  Due in part because Spokane is the largest city between Seattle and Minneapolis and because it lies along the route to many regional attractions, tourism is on the rise in the area.(Schmeltzer (1988), pp. 88) Spokane can be a base camp for activities such as river rafting, camping, and other activities in the region. Head offices Spokane and its metropolitan area is the headquarters to some notable companies, such as 1000 company, Corporation, which operates as a estate investment trust (REIT) and owns and manages timberlands located in Arkansas, Idaho, Minnesota, and Oregon,() financial services provider, Financial Corporation,() as well as the fast growing genetics company, Genomic Laboratories.()() Also, computer equipment manufacturer, Tronic,() auto manufacturer, Cars,() gold mining company, Reserve,() newspaper publisher, Publishing Company, and the business arm that administers the to People Student Ambassador Program, Group,() have their head offices in Spokane.Other company headquarters in the Spokane metropolitan area include the technology companies, Itron and Telect in Lake, Washington,()() computer game developer, Worlds in Washington,() and retailer, Mountain Gear in Valley, Washington.() Leading industries From 2005 to 2007, the leading industries in Spokane for the employed population 16 years and older were educational services, and health care, and social assistance, 25 percent, and retail trade, 12 percent.Currently, Public Schools is the largest employer in the city of Spokane.() The health care industry is a large and increasingly important industry in Spokane, the city provides specialized care to many patients from the surrounding Inland Northwest and as far north as the Canadian border. According to the US Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, Spokane ranked #4 in the country for metropolitan areas with the highest published employment concentrations and wages of this occupation.() Other industries include construction and mining, manufacturing, transportation, communication and networking utilities, finance, insurance, real estate, and government.( Furthermore, all branches of the U.S. armed forces are represented in Spokane County. The largest military facility in the area is Air Force Base. Economic development The local and state government are undertaking steps to develop the economy of the Spokane region. At the local level there is The Spokane Area Economic Development Council, which works with businesses to locate and utilize local and state business incentives. The Spokane Neighborhood Economic Development Alliance offers two revolving loans to businesses and nonprofit organizations expanding or creating new jobs in Spokane. Also, advocating for regional economic growth in workforce, industry, manufacturing, public policy, and healthcare is Greater Spokane Incorporated, a joint organization consisting of the former Chamber of Commerce and the former Economic Development Council.() At the state level, there are a wide variety of tax incentives exist for businesses operating, expanding, or relocating to Spokane. Industry and area-specific tax incentives are available, as well as loans, bonds, credits, and grants. See also *of Spokane, Washington References 
21082883
Alfred_Hulse_Brooks
Alfred Hulse Brooks (July 18, 1871  November 22, 1924) was an American Geologist and served as chief geologist for Alaska for the States Geological Survey from 1903 to 1924. He was a native of Arbor, Michigan and graduated from University in 1894.(http://www.akhistorycourse.org/articles/article.php?artID184 accessed January 13, 2009.)  He is credited with discovering that the biggest mountain range in Arctic Alaska was separate from the Mountains.(http://www.s9.com/Biography/Brooks-Alfred-Hulse S9.com Biographical Dictionary. accessed January 13, 2009)In 1898, the federal government announced a systematic topographic and geologic survey of Alaska that would include renewed exploration of the Brooks Range. Alfred Hulse Brooks, the new head of the Alaskan branch of the States Geological Survey (USGS), called the project far more important than any previously done, due in large part because it furnished the first clue to the geography and geology of the part of Alaska north of the Yukon Basin. Between 1899 and 1911, six major reconnaissance expeditions traversed the mountain range, mapping its topography and geology and defining the patterns of economic geology so important to prospectors and miners.(http://www.nps.gov/gaar/historyculture/usgs-exploration-in-the-brooks-range.htm Gates of the Arctic website. Accessed January 13, 2009.)Every year from 1904 to 1916 and from 1919 to 1923, Brooks wrote summaries of Alaskas mineral industries. The missed years, during War I, were those that he spent in France as chief geologist for the Expeditionary Force in France.(Honors* 1913 - Received the P. Daly Medal of the Geographical Society.(http://philomenasoltour.blogspot.com/2008/10/alaskan-report-by-will.html)* 1913 - Received the Malta-Brun gold medal of the Geographical Society of Paris, France.(* The mineral Hulsite is named for Mr. Brooks.(http://webmineral.com/data/Hulsite.shtml)* The Range, a mountain range that stretches from west to east across northern Alaska and into Canadas Yukon Territory, was named for Mr. Brooks in 1925Publications* Preliminary report on the Ketchikan mining district, Alaska, with an introductory sketch of the geology of southeastern Alaska by Alfred Hulse Brooks. US Geological Survey Professional Paper No. 1, 1902* Mineral resources of Alaska, report on progress of investigations in 1912 by Alfred Hulse Brooks, G.C. Martin, Sidney Smith. US Geological Survey Bulletin No. 542, 1913. 308 p.* The iron and associated industries of Lorraine, the Saare district, Luxemburg, and Belgium by Alfred H. Brooks and F. La Croix. US Geological Survey Bulletin No. 703, 1920.* The German defenses of the Lorraine Front by Alfred Hulse Brooks. United States Army, American Expeditionary Forces. 1918.* The geography and geology of Alaska : a summary of existing knowledge by Alfred Hulse Brooks, Abbe, and Urquhart Goode. US Geological Survey Professional Paper No. 45, 1906.Sources* Alfred Hulse Brooks by Otis Smith Science, Volume 61, Issue 1569, pp. 8081* Memorial of Alfred Hulse Brooks by Philip Sidney Smith. Society of America Bulletin; March 1926; v. 37; no. 1; p. 15-48References
21098942
The_Cold_Nose
The Cold Nose is the debut album by of Eagles. It has been reissued twice. It was originally released in the US as The Whitey On The Moon UK LP on Records on October 21, 2003, and reissued in the UK as The Cold Nose on Records on January 8, 2008. The Dust October 7, 2008 US reissue contains four bonus tracks. The album is sample-heavy and multilayered. The second track, Sailing By Night, contains a sample of the song Meetings Along The Edge from the Glass and Shankar project Passages, as well as a sample from the Magic Orchestra track, Rydeen. The third track Noam Chomsky Spring Break 2002 samples the Spektor song Prisoners. The track We Have to Respect Each Other samples Taylor, the human horn.Tracklisting#On Glaze - 1:51#Sailing by Night - 4:35#Noam Chomsky Spring Break 2002 - 3:15#The Piano in the Bathtub - 4:23#Romo-Goth - 2:40#Gravitys Greatest Victory/Rex Snorted Coke - 2:29#Origin of Love - 2:00#Family Romance - 4:19#Forty Dollar Rug - 3:15#We Have to Respect Each Other - 0:38#The Curious Butterfly Realizes He Is Beautiful - 2:53#The Horse You Ride - 4:20#Ghost in Summer Clothes - 3:55#: bonus tracks on American Dust reissue#Dinner for Two - 2:05#Day School/Rooster - 3:50#Mining for Gold/Payoff - 2:31#Ghost in Summer Clothes (demo) - 4:15
21115375
History_of_Honduras_(to_1838)
Honduras was originally inhabited by indigenous tribes, the most powerful of which were the Maya. The western-central part of Honduras was inhabited by the Lenca. These autonomous groups had their conflicts but maintained their commercial relationships with each other and with other populations as distant as Panama and Mexico.(Background note: Honduras Department of State (December 2008). Accessed January 20, 2009 .)On July 30, 1502, Columbus first saw Honduran soil and he claimed the territory in the name of his sovereigns, II of Aragon and I of Castile. He named the area Honduras (meaning depths) for the deep water off the coast. In 1523 the first expeditionary forces arrived under the command of Gonzales de Avila, who hoped to rule the new territory. In 1524, de Olid arrived with the same intent on behalf of Cortes. Olid founded the colony de la Cruz and tried to establish an independent government. When Cortes learned of this, he decided to reestablish his own authority by sending a new expedition, headed by de las Casas. Olid, who managed to capture his rivals, was betrayed by his men and assassinated. Cortes then traveled to Honduras to firmly establish his government in the city of Trujillo before returning to Mexico in 1526. Honduras formed part of the colonial era General of Guatemala. The cities of Comayagua and Tegucigalpa developed as early mining centers.(By October 1537, the Lenca chief, Lempira, a warrior of great renown, had managed to unify more than two hundred native tribes in order to offer an organized resistance against penetration by the Spanish conquerors. After a long battle, Governor Montejo gained the Valley of Comayagua, established Comayagua city in another location, and vanquished the indigenous peoples in Tenampua, Guaxeregui, and Ojuera.(Honduras gained independence from Spain in 1821. The country was then briefly annexed to the Empire. In 1823, Honduras joined the newly formed Provinces of Central America federation, which collapsed in 1838.(Pre-Columbian eraMayan civilizationFile:05.Copn (38).JPG|Ruins of the Maya city of Copn|thumbPre-Columbian Honduras was populated by a complex mixture of indigenous peoples representing a wide variety of cultural backgrounds and linguistic groupsthe most advanced and notable of which were related to the Maya of the Yucatn and Guatemala. Maya civilization had reached western Honduras in the 5th century A.D., probably spreading from lowland Mayan centers in Guatemalas Petn region. The Maya spread rapidly through the Motagua Valley, centering their control on the major ceremonial center of Copn, near the present-day town of Rosa de Copn. For three and a half centuries, the Maya developed the city, making it one of the principal centers of their culture. At one point, Copn was probably the leading center for both astronomical studiesin which the Maya were quite advancedand art. One of the longest Maya hieroglyphic inscriptions ever discovered was found at Copn. The Maya also established extensive trade networks spanning as far as central Mexico.(Haggerty & Millet (The Mayan heritage).)Then, at the height of the Maya civilization, Copn was apparently abandoned. The last hieroglyph date in Copn is 800 A.D. Much of the population evidently remained in the area after that, but the educated classthe priests and rulers who built the temples, inscribed the glyphs, and developed the astronomy and mathematicssuddenly vanished. Copn fell into ruin, and the descendants of the Maya who remained had no memory of the meanings of the inscriptions or of the reasons for the sudden fall.(Other indigenous groupsFollowing the period of Maya dominance, the area that would eventually comprise Honduras was occupied by a multiplicity of indigenous peoples. Indigenous groups related to the Toltec of central Mexico migrated from the northwest into parts of what became western and southern Honduras. Most notable were the Toltec-speaking Chorotega, who established themselves near the present-day city of Choluteca. Later enclaves of Nahua-speaking peoples, such as the Pipil, whose language was related to that of the Aztec, established themselves at various locations from the Caribbean coast to the de Fonseca on the Pacific coast.(Haggerty & Millet (Other indigenous groups).)While groups related to indigenous peoples of Mexico moved into western and southern Honduras, other peoples with languages related to those of the Chibcha of Colombia were establishing themselves in areas that became northeastern Honduras. Most prominent among these were the Ulva and Paya speakers. Along the Caribbean coast, a variety of groups settled. Most important were the Sumu, who were also located in Nicaragua, and the Jicaque, whose language family has been a source of debate among scholars. Finally, in parts of what is now west-central Honduras were the Lenca, who also were believed to have migrated north from Colombia but whose language shows little relation to any other indigenous group.(Although divided into numerous distinct and frequently hostile groups, the indigenous inhabitants of preconquest Honduras (before the early 16th century) carried on considerable trade with other parts of their immediate region as well as with areas as far away as Panama and Mexico. Although it appears that no major cities were in existence at the time of the conquest, the total population was nevertheless fairly high. Estimates range up to 2 million, although the actual figure was probably nearer to 500,000.(Spanish conquest and settlementInitial explorationsFile:Colomb.jpeg|Columbus gave Honduras its name, meaning depths.|thumb|uprightEuropean contacts with the indigenous population of Honduras began with the final voyage of Columbus. In 1502 Columbus sailed past the de la Baha (Bay Islands) and shortly thereafter reached the mainland of Central America. While at one of the islands, Columbus discovered and seized a large canoe loaded with a wide variety of trade goods. Evidence seems to indicate that the canoes occupants were Mayan traders and that their encounter with Columbus marked his first direct contact with the civilizations of Mexican and northern Central America. Despite the fact that the canoe had been observed coming from the west, Columbus turned east and then south, sailing away from the civilizations and doing little exploring on the Honduran coast. His only direct legacy was the assigning of a few place names on the Caribbean coast, notably Guanaja for one of the Islas de la Baha, Gracias a Dios for the eastern extremity of Honduras, and Honduras (depths in Spanish) for the overall region. The latter name suggests the deep waters off the northern coast.(Haggerty & Millet (The initial explorations).)Little exploration took place for the next two decades. Spanish navigators Daz de Sols and Yez Pinzn probably touched on part of the Honduran coast in 1508 but devoted most of their efforts to exploring farther north. Some expeditions from the islands of Cuba and Hispaniola may have reached the mainland and certainly began to decimate the population of the Islas de la Baha in the second decade of the century, but otherwise the Honduran Caribbean coast was a neglected area.(Interest in the mainland was dramatically revived as a result of the expedition of Corts to Mexico. While Corts was completing his conquest of the Aztec, expeditions from Mexico, Panama, and the Caribbean began to move into Central America. In 1523 part of an expedition headed by Gonzlez Dvila discovered the de Fonseca on the Pacific coast, naming it in honor of Bishop Rodrguez de Fonseca. The following year, four separate Spanish land expeditions began the conquest of Honduras.(Era of the conquistadorsFile:Cortes-Hernan-LOC.jpg|Corts briefly established his own authority over Honduras.|thumb|uprightThe nearly simultaneous invasions of Honduras in 1524 by rival Spanish expeditions began an era of conflict among rival Spanish claimants as well as with the indigenous population. The major initial expeditions were led by Gonzlez Dvila, who hoped to carve out a territory for his own rule, and by de Olid, who was dispatched from Cuba by Corts. Once in Honduras, however, Olid succumbed to personal ambition and attempted to establish his own independent authority. Word of this reached Corts in Mexico, and to restore his own authority, he ordered yet another expedition, this one under the command of de Las Casas. Then, doubting the trustworthiness of any subordinate, Corts set out for Honduras himself. The situation was further complicated by the entry into Honduras of expeditions from Guatemala under de Alvarado and from Nicaragua under de Soto.(Haggerty & Millet (The era of the conquistadors).)In the initial struggle for power, Olid seemed to gain the upper hand, capturing both Gonzlez Dvila and Las Casas. His captives, however, having managed to subvert the loyalty of some of Olids men, took Olid prisoner, and then promptly beheaded him. Although later condemned for this action by a Mexican court, none of the conspirators ever suffered any real punishment.(The arrival of Corts in Honduras in 1525 temporarily restored some order to the Spanish conquest. He established his own authority over the rival claimants, obtained the submission of numerous indigenous chiefs, and tried to promote the creation of Spanish towns. His own headquarters was located at Trujillo on the Caribbean coast. In April 1526, Corts returned to Mexico, and the remaining Spaniards resumed their strife.(Some order was again restored in October of that year when the first royal governor, Lpez de Salcedo, arrived. Lpez de Salcedos policies, however, drove many indigenous people, once pacified by Corts, into open revolt. His attempt to extend his jurisdiction into Nicaragua resulted in his imprisonment by the authorities there. After agreeing to a Nicaraguan-imposed definition of the boundary between the two provinces, Lpez de Salcedo was released but did not return to Honduras until 1529.(The early 1530s were not prosperous for Honduras. Renewed fighting among the Spaniards, revolts, and decimation of the settled indigenous population through disease, mistreatment, and exportation of large numbers to the Caribbean islands as slaves left the colony on the edge of collapse by 1534. The Spanish crown renamed the depressed province as Honduras-Higueras, subdividing it into two districts. Higueras encompassed the western part while the rest remained known as Honduras. The decline in population of the province continued, and only the direct intervention of Pedro de Alvarado from Guatemala in 1536 kept Higueras from being abandoned. Alvarado was attracted by the prospect of gold in the region, and, with the help of native Guatemalans who accompanied him, he soon developed a profitable gold-mining industry centered in the newly established town of Gracias.(The discovery of gold and silver deposits attracted new settlers and increased the demand for indigenous labor. The enforced labor, however, led to renewed resistance by the native people that culminated in a major uprising in 1537. The leader of the uprising was a capable young Lenca chieftain known as Lempira (after whom the Honduran national monetary unit would eventually be named). Lempira established his base on a fortified hill known as the de Cerqun and until 1538 successfully defeated all efforts to subdue him. Inspired by his examples, other native inhabitants began revolting, and the entire district of Higueras seemed imperiled. Lempira was ultimately murdered while negotiating with the Spaniards. After his death, resistance rapidly disintegrated, although some fighting continued through 1539.(The defeat of Lempiras revolt accelerated the decimation of the indigenous population. In 1539 an estimated 15,000 native Americans remained under Spanish control; two years later, there were only 8,000. Most of these were divided into encomiendas, a system that left the native people in their villages but placed them under the control of individual Spanish settlers. Under terms of the encomienda system, the Spaniards were supposed to provide the indigenous people with religious instruction and collect tribute from them for the crown. In return, the Spaniards were entitled to a supposedly limited use of indigenous labor. As the native population declined, the settlers exploited those remaining even more ruthlessly. This exploitation led to a clash between the Spanish settlers and authorities on one side and on the other side the Catholic Church led by Father de Pedraza, who, in 1542 became the first bishop of Honduras. Bishop Pedraza, like others after him, had little success in his efforts to protect the native people.(Failure in the NorthWhile the Spanish had great success in the conquest and colonization of the Pacific parts of the country, they had much less success in the north.  The northeastern region, known to the Spanish by a Nahuatl name Taguzgalpa, resisted repeated attempts at conquest successfully.  Orders or grants for conquest were issued in 1545, 1562, 1567 and 1594, with no appreciable Spanish progress being reported.  When these efforts failed, the Spanish attempted to reduce Taguzgalpa and neighboring Tologalpa (located in Nicaragua) through missionary efforts that began in 1604 and continued intermittently throughout the remainder of the Spanish period.  In their efforts the missionaries sought to convert the inhabitants to Christianity and to persuade them to settle in missionary supervised new villages.  While some reported conversions in the thousands, the total number resettled never amount to more than a few hundred.On the eastern side of the north coast, the Spanish had more luck.  The earliest settlers established coastal ports at Puerto de Caballos (todays Puerto Corts), Trujillo and Gracias a Dios, as well as interior posts at Pedro Sula and Naco.  The latter experienced some growth during a brief gold rush in the 16th century, but in subsequent periods declined.  There is some evidence that the Spanish presence was fairly strictly limited to just these towns and that a fairly thickly settled countryside was completely outside their control.  However, in much of the sixteenth and 17th centuries, the Spanish on the Pacific side shipped good across the uncontrolled space to the ports for trans-shipment to Spain.The failure of the Spanish to control the north coast left the region open to outsiders who were prepared to work with the local people against Spanish interests, and thus northern Europeans began trading and eventually settling in the northern areas during the various wars between England, the Netherlands and Spain of the period 1580 to 1625.Colonial HondurasSpread of colonization and growth of miningThe defeat of Lempiras revolt, the establishment of the bishopric (first at Trujillo, then at Comayagua after Pedrazas death), and the decline in fighting among rival Spanish factions all contributed to expanded settlement and increased economic activity in the 1540s. A variety of agricultural activities was developed, including cattle ranching and, for a time, the harvesting of large quantities of sasparilla root. But the key economic activity of 16th-century Honduras was mining gold and silver.(Haggerty & Millet (The spread of colonization and the growth of mining).)The initial mining centers were located near the Guatemalan border, around Gracias. In 1538 these mines produced significant quantities of gold. In the early 1540s, the center for mining shifted eastward to the Guayape Valley, and silver joined gold as a major product. This change contributed to the rapid decline of Gracias and the rise of Comayagua as the center of colonial Honduras. The demand for labor also led to further revolts and accelerated the decimation of the native population. As a result, slavery was introduced into Honduras, and by 1545 the province may have had as many as 2,000 slaves. Other gold deposits were found near Pedro Sula and the port of Trujillo.(By the late 1540s, Honduras seemed headed for relative prosperity and influence, a development marked by the establishment in 1544 of the regional audiencia of Guatemala with its capital at Gracias, Honduras. The audiencia was a Spanish governmental unit encompassing both judicial and legislative functions whose president held the additional titles of governor and captain general (hence the alternative name of General of Guatemala). The location of the capital was bitterly resented by the more populous centers in Guatemala and Salvador, and in 1549 the capital of the audiencia was moved to Guatemala.(Mining production began to decline in the 1560s, and Honduras rapidly declined in importance. The subordination of Honduras to the Captaincy General of Guatemala had been reaffirmed with the move of the capital to Antigua, and the status of Honduras as a province within the Captaincy General of Guatemala would be maintained until independence. Beginning in 1569, new silver strikes in the interior briefly revived the economy and led to the founding of the town of Tegucigalpa, which soon began to rival Comayagua as the most important town in the province. But the silver boom peaked in 1584, and economic depression returned shortly thereafter. Mining efforts in Honduras were hampered by a lack of capital and labor, difficult terrain, the limited size of many gold and silver deposits, and bureaucratic regulations and incompetence. Mercury, vital to the production of silver, was constantly in short supply; once an entire years supply was lost through the negligence of officials. By the 17th century, Honduras had become a poor and neglected backwater of the Spanish colonial empire, having a scattered population of mestizos, native people, blacks, and a handful of Spanish rulers and landowners.(Colonial society, economy, and governmentAlthough mining provided much of the limited revenue Honduras generated for the Spanish crown, a majority of the inhabitants were engaged in agriculture. Attempts to promote agricultural exports had limited success, however, and most production remained on a subsistence level. If anything, the province became more rural during the seventeenth and 18th centuries. As a result of economic declines or foreign attacks, several town governments simply ceased to function during this period.(Haggerty & Millet (Colonial society, economy, and government).)The cattle industry was probably the most important agricultural activity. Much of the cattle industry was on a small scale, but by 1714 six ranchers in the areas of the present-day departments of Yoro and Olancho owned over 1,000 head of cattle each. Some of the cattle were driven to Guatemala for sale. Such sales, however, occasionally produced meat shortages in Honduras and led to conflicts between Guatemalan and Honduran provincial officials.(Much of the Honduran interior remained uncolonized and outside of effective Spanish control during the colonial era. The Jicaque, fleeing into the hills, managed to retain considerable cultural autonomy. Other indigenous groups, however, were increasingly brought under Spanish influence and began to lose their separate identities. This assimilation was facilitated by occasional expeditions of government and church officials into new areas. One such expedition into Yoro in 1689 found forty villages of native people living outside of effective Spanish control.(V; Rey de Espaa.jpg|Philip V and subsequent Bourbon rulers of Spain brought change to Honduras|thumb|uprightBy the end of the 17th century, governing Honduras had become a frustrating, thankless task. Only Comayagua, with 144 families, and Tegucigalpa, with 135, had over 100 Spanish settlers. The province boasted little in the way of education or culture. The lack of good ports, especially on the Pacific coast, limited contacts with the outside world. Whenever possible, the Spanish colonists forced native people to move to the Tegucigalpa area, where they were available for labor in the mines. However, illegal resettlement and corruption in the mining industrywhere every available ruse was used to avoid paying taxescreated a constant series of problems for colonial authorities. Smuggling, especially on the Caribbean coast, was also a serious problem.(Early in the 18th century, the Dynasty, linked to the rulers of France, replaced the Habsburgs on the throne of Spain and brought change to Honduras. The new dynasty began a series of reforms throughout the empire designed to make administration more efficient and profitable and to facilitate the defense of the colonies. Among these reforms was a reduction in the tax on precious minerals and in the cost of mercury, which was a monopoly. In Honduras these reforms contributed to a revival of the mining industry in the 1730s. Efforts to promote the Honduran tobacco industry as a royal monopoly proved less effective and encountered stiff local opposition. The same was true of plans to improve tax collection. Ultimately, the Bourbons abolished most of the corrupt local governmental units, replacing them in 1787 with a system of intendencias (the name of the new local unit and also its administrator, a royal official who supervised tax collections and commercial matters, controlled prices and credit, and exercised some judicial functions).(Anglo-Spanish rivalryA major problem for Spanish rulers of Honduras was the activity of the English along the northern Caribbean coast. These activities began in the late 16th century and continued into the 19th century. In the early years, Dutch as well as English corsairs (pirates) attacked the Caribbean coast, but as time passed the threat came almost exclusively from the English. In 1643 one English expedition destroyed the town of Trujillo, the major port for Honduras, leaving it virtually abandoned for over a century.(Haggerty & Millet (Anglo-Spanish rivalry).)Destructive as they were, raiding expeditions were lesser problems than other threats. Beginning in the 17th century, English efforts to plant colonies along the Caribbean coast and in the Islas de la Baha threatened to cut Honduras off from the Caribbean and raised the possibility of the loss of much of its territory. The English effort on the Honduran coast was heavily dependent on the support of groups known as the Zambo and the Miskito, racially mixed peoples of native American and African ancestry who were usually more than willing to attack Spanish settlements. British settlers were interested largely in trading, lumbering, and producing pitch. During the numerous 18th-century wars between Britain and Spain, however, the British crown found any activity that challenged Spanish hegemony on the Caribbean coast of Central America to be desirable.(File:SanFernadodeOmoa.jpg|Fort at Fernando de Omoa|thumbMajor British settlements were established at Gracias a Dios and to the west at the mouth of the Sico, as well as on the Islas de la Baha. By 1759 a Spanish agent estimated the population in the Ro Sico area as 3,706.(Under the Bourbons, the revitalized Spanish government made several efforts to regain control over the Caribbean coast. In 1752 a major fort was constructed at Fernando de Omoa near the Guatemalan border. In 1780 the Spanish returned in force to Trujillo, which they began developing as a base for expeditions against British settlements to the east. During the 1780s, the Spanish regained control over the Islas de la Baha and drove the majority of the British and their allies out of the area around Black River. A British expedition briefly recaptured Black River, but the terms of the Convention of 1786 gave definitive recognition to Spanish sovereignty over the Caribbean coast.(To independenceCollapse of Spanish ruleIn the early 19th century, Spanish power went into rapid decline. Although Spain was allied with France during the Wars, in 1808 Bonaparte forced the Spanish king to abdicate and put a Bonaparte on the Spanish throne. In response, Spanish people erupted in revolt in Madrid and throughout Spain, setting off a chain of uprisings in Latin America. In Honduras, resentment against rule by the exiled Spanish king increased rapidly, especially because increased taxes for Spains struggle against the French threatened the cattle industry. In 1812 disturbances that broke out in Tegucigalpa were more linked to long-standing rivalry with Comayagua, however, than to opposition to Spanish rule. The disturbances were quickly controlled, and, to appease local discontent, the municipal government of Tegucigalpa was reestablished.(Haggerty & Millet (The collapse of Spanish rule).)The rivalry between Tegucigalpa and Comayagua helped precipitate the final collapse of Spanish authority in Honduras. A new Spanish administration attempted to transfer Comayaguas tobacco factory to Tegucigalpa. This move led to defiance by Comayagua, which refused to acknowledge the authority of the government in Guatemala. The weakened Spanish government was unable to end Comayaguas defiance, and for a time civil strife threatened to break out. Conflict was averted by the decision made by all the Central American provinces on September 15, 1821, to declare their independence from Spain. This action failed to resolve the dispute between Tegucigalpa and Comayagua, however; the former now urged the creation of a unified Central American state, while the latter favored union with the of Mexico under the rule of General de Iturbide. Ultimately, Comayaguas position prevailed, and in early 1822 the Central American provinces declared their allegiance to Mexico.(This union lasted just over a year and produced few if any benefits for either party. In March 1823, Iturbide was overthrown in Mexico, and the empire was replaced by a republic. The American Congress, in which Comayagua but not Tegucigalpa was represented, was quickly convened. With little debate, the Provinces of Central America declared their independence from Mexico. Mexicos only effort to reverse this decision consisted in maintaining control over Chiapas, the northernmost of the six previous provinces of Central America.(United Provinces of Central AmericaFrom its 1823 inception, the new federation (the United Provinces of Central America) faced a series of ultimately unresolvable problems. Instead of engendering a spirit of unity, Spanish rule had fostered divisions and local suspicions. In the case of Honduras, this divisiveness was epitomized by the rivalry between Tegucigalpa and Comayagua. There was even some sentiment for admitting these two cities as separate provinces within the federation, but that proposal was ultimately rejected. In addition, much of the region was suspicious of Guatemalan ambitions to dominate Central America and wished to retain all possible local authority rather than surrender any to a central government.(Haggerty & Millet (The United Provinces of Central America).)At least equally serious was the division of the politically active population into conservative and liberal factions. The conservatives favored a more centralized government; a proclerical policy, including a church monopoly over education; and a more aristocratic form of government based on traditional Spanish values. The liberals wanted greater local autonomy and a restricted role for the church, as well as political and economic development as in the United States and parts of Western Europe. The conservatives favored keeping native people in their traditional, subservient position, while the liberals aimed at eventually eliminating indigenous society by incorporating it into the national, Hispanic culture.(At the time of Central American independence (1823), Honduras was among the least-developed and least-populated provinces. In 1824 its population was estimated at just over 137,000. Despite its meager population, Honduras produced two of the most prominent leaders of the federation, the liberal Morazn (nicknamed the Washington of Central America) and the conservative Cecilio del Valle. In 1823 del Valle was narrowly defeated by liberal Jos Arce for election as the federations first president. Morazn overthrew Arce in 1829 and was elected president of the federation in 1830, defeating del Valle.(The beginning of Morazns administration in 1830 saw some efforts to reform and promote education. Success was limited, however, because of lack of funds and internal fighting. In the elections of 1834, del Valle defeated Morazn, but del Valle died before taking office, and the legislature offered Morazn the presidency. With clerical support, a conservative uprising began in Guatemala in 1837, and within a year the federation had begun to dissolve. On May 30, 1838, the Central American Congress removed Morazn from office, declared that the individual states could establish their own governments, and on July 7 recognized these as sovereign, free, and independent political bodies.(For Honduras, the period of federation had been disastrous. Local rivalries and ideological disputes had produced political chaos and disrupted the economy. The British had taken advantage of the chaotic condition to reestablish their control over the Islas de la Baha. As a result, Honduras wasted little time in formally seceding from the federation once it was free to do so. Independence was declared on November 15, 1838.(ReferencesFootnotesWorks cited*Haggerty, Richard & Richard Millet. Historical Setting. In A Country Study: Honduras (Tim Merrill, editor). of Congress Research Division (December 1993). 
21127722
Franklin_B._Sprague
laterwork Businessman and judgeFranklin Burnet Sprague (July 16, 1825  February 7, 1895) was an American military officer, businessman, and judge.  He joined the Army during the Civil War, serving on the Oregon frontier.  During his military service, Sprague explored much of Oregon.  While building a road near Klamath, Sprague led a party into the Cascade Mountains to investigate Lake.  His party was the first to descend the 800-foot caldera wall to reach the lakes shore.  A month later, Sprague published an article highlighting the lakes unique beauty.  Today, the Sprague River in southern Oregon bears his name.Early lifeSprague was born on July 16, 1825 in Ohio.  His parents were Pardon and Mary (Meeker) Sprague.  His father was stockman, hotel keeper, county sheriff, and state legislator.  Sprague received a private education in a small school near his home.  He later attended Wesleyan University in his home town.(Franklin B. Sprague, RootsWeb, Ancestry.com, www.rootsweb.ancestry.com, January 11, 2009.)In 1850, Sprague moved to Oregon.  He settled in Jackson County, where he opened a shop that built fanning-mills(http://www.history.rochester.edu/appleton/a/fanninin.html) for winnowing grain.  Sprague was the first manufacturer in the Northwest to produce modern machines.  Like the majority of Oregonians at the time, Sprague was a strong supporter of the Union during the Civil War.(Military serviceIn 1864, Sprague joined the Army, and was commissioned as a Captain in the Oregon Volunteer Infantry Regiment.  He was given command of I Company,(Alvord, Benjamin (Brigadier General), Dispatch to Headquarter, Department of the Pacific, Headquarters District of Oregon, United States Army, Fort Vancouver, Washington Territory, February 23, 1865.) and posted to Southern Oregon.  He participated in a number of skirmishes with the Northern Paiute and other Indian bands in southeastern Oregon.  In addition to fighting Indians, Sprague learned to speak their languages and counted many Indians among his friends, including the Modoc chief known as Captain Jack.(Captain Sprague was well respected as a leader, and often led detachments of cavalry as well as infantrymen.  In October 1865, Sprague was leading a patrol of eleven cavalry troopers from C Company of the Oregon Cavalry south of Warner Lake in present day County, Oregon, when they were ambushed by approximately 125 Indians in two groups.  Sprague and his troops were caught between a lake, high cliffs, and the two groups of Indians.  After exchanging long-range gun fire with the Indians, Sprague determined that while the Indian in front of him had guns, those behind him had only bows and arrows.  He quickly ordered his men to charge to the rear.  His men broke through the Indians line and made a successful escape with no casualties.(Bancroft, Hubert Howe, History of Oregon, The History Company Publishers, San Francisco, California, 1888, p. 517.)(Michno, Gregory, The Deadliest Indian War in the West: The Snake Conflict, 1864-1868, Caxton Press, Caldwell, Idaho, 2007, pp. 124-125.)(Edwards, Glenn Thomas, Oregon Regiments in the Civil War Years: Duty on the Indian Frontier, unpublished Master of Arts thesis, Department of History, of Oregon, Oregon, June 1960.)Crater LakeSprague and twenty men from Company I were assigned to build a road linking the Rogue River with the existing  John Day road. This connected Jacksonville and southwest Oregon with John Days mining country. After the construction work was completed, Sprague published a list of the best camp sites along the road in the Jacksonville newspapers so that the wagon masters could find the best water and grass along the way.(Greene, Linda, Captain Franklin B. Sprague, Historic Reseach Study Crater Lake National Park, Oregon, Cultural Resources Branch, Denver Service Center, National Park Service, United States Department of the Interior, Denver, Colorado, June 1984.)On August 1, 1865, two hunters from Spragues road construction crew rediscovered Lake, which had been first visited in 1853, but was never effectively recorded so that others could locate it. Based on directions from his hunters, Sprague and five other men visited the lake on August 12. They climbed down the 800-foot caldera cliff to become the first explorers to reach the lake shore.( Spragues account of the visit was reported to Jacksonvilles leading newspaper, the Oregon Sentinel on August 25.(Spragues report was published in the Oregon Sentinel on September 9, 1865.  It included several significant observations.  First, Sprague identified the volcanic origins of the lake.  His report described Island, and observed it was a remnant of volcanic activity.  Second, his description of the lakes unique beauty was thoughtful and eloquent.((Unrau, Harlan D. and Stephen R. Mark, Discovery And Exploration Of Crater Lake: 1853-1885, Administrative History, Crater Lake National Park, National Park Service, United States Department of Interior, 15 July 1986.)Sprague also predicted that the lake would be visited by thousands hereafter.  Finally, he recommended that the lake not be named after its discoverer, saying:  I do not know who first saw this lake, nor do I think it should be named after the discoverer.  Sprague suggested it be called Lake Majestic.  Today, it is known as Crater Lake.  Since he was the first to identify the lakes volcanic origin, Sprague deserves some credit for the name.((Later lifeOn July 19, 1867, Captain Sprague and the men of Company I were mustered out of the Army.  They were the last members of the 1st Oregon Volunteer Infantry Regiment to be released from active duty.((Official Army Register of the Volunteer Forces of the United States Army for the Years 1861, 62, 63, 64, 65 (Part VII), Missouri, Wisconsin, Iowa, Minnesota, California, Kansas, Oregon, Nevada., Adjutant Generals Office, Secretary of War, Washington, D.C., March 2, 1865.)In 1868, Sprague returned to County, Ohio.  He settled in Sunbury, where he started a grain milling business.  In 1875, Sprague ran as the Democratic Partys candidate for Delaware County Probate Judge, and was elected.  He was easily re-elected in 1878, completing his term in 1882.  Sprague died on February 7, 1895.  He is buried in the Oak Grove Cemetery in Delaware, Ohio.(LegacySprague played an important part in the early history of Lake National Park.  His exploration party was the first to reach the lakes shore.  He was the first to identify the lakes volcanic origin, and his article in the Oregon Sentinel generated public interest in Crater Lakes unique beauty.((In addition, Sprague explored much of Southern Oregon.  The Sprague River is named after him.  The Sprague River Valley, the town of Sprague River, and Sprague River Park in National Forest near Oregon also derive their names from Franklin Sprague.((McArthur, Lewis A., McArthur, Lewis L., Geographic Names (Seventh Edition), Historical Society Press, Oregon, 2003, pp.904.)References
21140651
Ust-Nera
Ust-Nera () is an urban locality (a settlement) and the center of District of the Republic, Russia, located at the confluence of the Nera and the Rivers.  Population: Gold mining is the main occupation in the settlement.  The Highway was extended northwest to Ust-Nera in 1937.  There is an airport and a small museum. River traffic on the Indigirka is limited by the rapids  downstream.Referencesca:Ust-Neracs:Us-Nerade:Ust-NeraNeranl:Oest-Neraja:pl:Ust-Neraru:-
21161870
Fort_Glanville_Conservation_Park
 official_site  Fort Glanville Conservation Park Fort Glanville Conservation Park is a registered heritage conservation area in South, South Australia, a seaside suburb of Adelaide, that incorporates a  functional 19th century fort. The fort was built after more than 40 years of indecision over the defence of South Australia. It was the first colonial fortification in the state and is the best preserved and most functional in Australia. Fort Glanville was designed by Governor Major General Sir Jervois and Lieutenant Colonel Scratchley, both important figures in early Australian colonial defence. When built it was designed to defend both Semaphores anchorage and shipping entering the River from naval attack.Construction of the fort began in 1878. It was officially opened in October 1880 and completed by 1882. Due to changes in the Port River and shipping movements, Largs surpassed it for strategic importance by 1890. By the close of the 19th century, the fort was largely unused and had no defence significance. It was briefly used for military purposes during War I and War II, though not for its original defensive role. For much of the 20th century the area was put to a variety of uses including accommodation, a park and a boy scout campsite. After coming into state government hands in 1951 it was declared as a conservation park and is now managed by the National Parks and Wildlife Service; preserving and showcasing its historic value. The fort and surrounds occupy the northern half of the  conservation park, the southern half is a caravan park. The fort is a lunette shaped defensible battery that was supported by land forces for self-defence. When constructed it was seen as of the art, incorporating powerful and modern weapons. Its main armament is two rifled muzzle-loading (RML) 10 inch 20 ton guns backed up by two 64 pounder 64 cwt guns, both rare in their particular configuration. The fort retains its original 19th century cannons and three have been restored to working condition.Fort Glanville Historical Association operates the park under license and conducts open days in the park, recreating the past operation of the fort including military drill and the firing of period weapons. The Association, park service, other volunteers and various grants have all helped ensure the fort is presented in close to original condition. It is the most complete 19th Century fort in Australia, and one of very few in the world that remains in original condition. Connecting the fort to Semaphore jetty is the Semaphore and Fort Glanville Tourist Railway, a  gauge passenger steam train operated by volunteers from the National Railway Museum.Historic backgroundIn the early years of colonial South Australia, the colonists saw themselves as part of the Empire and external defence as an Imperial responsibility. Communication lines were long and the empires wars remote. Great Britain had undisputed military predominance and she was expected by all to protect her colonies, even one as distant.( For local defence, Governor Gawler raised the first military force in 1840, comprised solely of volunteers and known as the Australian Volunteer Militia Brigade.(Brook (1986), p.29.) It was granted the Royal title in 1841 but the brigade had all but ceased to exist a year later.( The colony obtained its first artillery in 1847 with the arrival of six guns of various types.(Brook (1986), p.30.)Tensions between Britain and the Empire in the 1850s, as starkly demonstrated by the War, along with Australia-wide moves towards self-government caused a reassessment of the colonys defence posture. The various colonies regarded themselves as possible targets for the Russian Pacific Fleet, then based in Siberia.( In 1854, Governor Young appointed a commission under Finniss to report on the defence of the colony, in case of war. Boyles report recommended leaving strategic defence in the hands of the Imperial Navy, though South Australia was to purchase a 400 ton naval vessel. Local defence was to be largely handled by the existing small Imperial garrison and local colonial force, supported by the artillery obtained in 1847.(NPWS (1988), p.51.) When the Crimean War ended in 1856, the danger passed and the perceived need for expensive defence preparations with it. For many years nothing substantive came about from debate on defence of the colony.(FGHA (2000), p.5.) Over time there formed a consensus favouring Semaphore for fixed defences or fortification; a strategy also argued by the government established Hart Commission in 1858. Raiders were seen as unlikely to force the shallows of the River but instead were expected to stand off Semaphore, shell the port and use their guns to support landings.( The Hart Report recommended building of towers at Semaphore and Glenelg, the first report to recommend permanent fortification at Semaphore, though none were built mainly due to the cost.(NPWS (1988), p.52.)The volunteer military force was revived in 1859, with new and modern arms for the infantry, cavalry and artillery. Though there was a few years of enthusiasm and a restructuring in 1866, by 1870 the force was virtually disbanded.( In that year also, British troops were withdrawn from the other Australian colonies; none were by then stationed in South Australia.(Jobson (1997), p.14.) With no definitive defence policy, in 1864 the government had sought advice from Captain Parkin of HMS Falcon and Commodore Sir William Wiseman commander of the Australian station; both visiting British naval officers. They both recommended fixed fortifications for the coast supported by gunboats. Sir Wisemans report particularly recommended construction of forts at Semaphore, Port Creeks entrance and one midway between.( In 1864 a story circulated, supported by press speculation, that there was a danger of the Russian fleet attacking Melbourne should Russia and Britain find themselves at war. The Australian Register produced an editorial decrying the states lack of defences. Within days 20,000 (A$4.14 million in 2005)(Currency converted using relative rate of 85.08989 between January 1864 and 2005 for the Pound Stirling from: Converted to Australian Dollars at $10.4112 from Australian Reserve Bank published spot rate for January 2005) was provided by the government for defence, an amount then seen as insufficient for significant preparation. The danger passed without any lasting defence action except the governments in-principle adoption of Sir Wisemans recommendations.( To curtail costs only the Semaphore fort was to be built initially, as it was considered the most critical. Site preparation begun and two  guns were purchased, but escalating cost estimates caused the plan to be abandoned by 1868.(NPWS (1988), p.53.)During the early 1870s South Australias defence was solely dependant on the volunteer military, and a few artillery pieces purchased during earlier war scares.( British troops had been withdrawn from the Australian colonies in 1870, leaving the state dependant on its own military resources.(FGHA (2000), p.2.) In a report to the government in 1866, Colonel Freeling and Major Scratchley recommended establishment of a permanent military force. In 1876 the South Australian government, along with those from South Wales, Victoria and Queensland requested from the War Office that General Sir Jervois, a noted coastal fortification expert, be appointed to advise on defence needs. He arrived in Sydney in mid 1877 with then Colonel Scratchley.( The 1877 report, delivered after he became South Australian Governor, called for three batteries, at Largs Bay, Semaphore and Glenelg, connected by a military road and supported by field gun emplacements, naval elements and mobile forces.( He determined that South Australias most probable defence risk was an attack by up to two ships rather than a larger force, and this formed the basis of the final fortification design.( His report called for Military Road to be extended to Marino, an electro-contact torpedo station be established on Island and that a gun boat be provided.(NPWS (1988), p.55.) In November 1878 the government passed the Military Forces Act, which provided for the raising of a permanent military force and reserve. Two volunteer reserve rifle companies were formed in 1878 and a permanent artillery unit in 1882.(At this time Semaphore, with its jetty built in 1860, was the states main entry point for passengers and mail. It had a signal station (built 1872) and a ball tower (built 1875). Semaphore remained of great maritime significance for the state until the 1880s.(NPWS (1988), p.50.) When the decision was made to build the fort, in 1878, the states population had reached approximately 250,000. Settlement extended beyond Port Augusta, though Adelaide remained the dominant feature in the economy partly due to the layout of the rail network. At this point Adelaide had a population of over 30,000. Adelaide was the main port for South Australia, with over 1000 ships visiting each year, and a local population of over 2,500.(NPWS (1988), p.49.)FoundationScratchley had inspected the proposed South Australian fort sites, and Jervois and Scratchley were both responsible for the final fort design and location.(Hastings (1986), p.178.) The first fort was erected to guard both the entrance to Port Adelaide and the anchorage at Semaphore.(NPWS (1988), p.III.) It was built on sandhills near Glanville Hall at Semaphore, on a promontory called Point Malcoma name that is now used for an adjacent reserve. The site was chosen so as to best guard shipping sailing to both the Port River and the Outer Harbour; and a second northern fort was to protect the entrance to Port River itself.( At the time of its construction it was seen as a defence against foreign threats, mainly Russian.( Scratchley had offered to design the battery, the offer accepted by Cabinet in January 1878, and he was primarily responsible for the design of both Fort Glanville and Largs.( The plans were drawn by Bain Moncrieff of the South Australian Engineer-in-Chiefs Department, supervised by Scratchley in his Melbourne headquarters. Moncrieff, at Scratchleys suggestion, was later to supervise the forts construction.() Plans for both batteries were completed in June 1878, tenders called for in July and the contract for Fort Glanville awarded in August to John Robb of South Australia for the sum of 15,893 12s 7d.(Construction began in 1878 and though completed by 1882 the fort was operational in 1880.(NPWS (1988), p.10.) Changes were made to the design during construction. Some forced by armament changes and others made to ensure additional security, including a rear-defence wall and connecting road from Military Road.(NPWS (1988), p.56.) By January 1880 two guns were in place and the fort opened later the same year( with an extensive opening ceremony on 2 October. In addition to parades, a small target was moored  offshore and fired on by all guns. A total of sixteen shots were fired during which one of the ten inch guns proved faulty. Only one ranging shot was fired and the shots were estimated to land from on-target to 350 yards short.() The forts final cost was approximately 36,000 (A$7.05(Currency converted using relative rate of 80.56383 between January 1882 and 2005 for the Pound Stirling from: Converted to Australian Dollars at $10.4112 from Australian Reserve Bank published spot rate for January 2005) million in 2005) consisting of 23,600 for physical structures and the remainder for armament and fittings.( At the time of its construction it was at the forefront of such fortification design, and was considered of the art.(When first conceived, it was known as the Semaphore Battery, later changed to South Battery and then Fort Glanville by the opening ceremony.(Hastings (1986), p.179.) The name Glanville came from nearby Glanville Hall, residence of John Hart (1809&ndash;1873) thrice Premier of South Australia.(ONeill (1972), pp.355&ndash;356.) Hart had named the house after his mothers name (Mary Glanville).() Personnel File:General Joseph M Gordon.jpg|right|thumb|Maria Gordon in 1921For the eighteen months after its opening, the fort was manned by B company of the South Australian Volunteer Artillery but only on weekends.() This changed in mid 1882 when South Australias first permanent military force was formed.(FGHA (2000), p.3.) The fort became the headquarters for the South Australian Permanent Military Force, then the states entire standing army of one officer and eighteen other ranks.(FGHA (2000), p.6.) Some of the unit was stationed at nearby Fort Largs from 1886; and, by 1889 the unit had grown to one officer and 45 other ranks.(NPWS (1988), p.54.) This force grew to 53 of all ranks by 1892 and was by then known as the Permanent Artillery. The unit trained 27 more officers and men who were sent to man the George Sound batteries near Western Australia. Though some of the gunners served in the Boer War, the unit itself never saw action. Fort Glanvilles section was called out in 1890, marching to assist the police with a waterside workers strike in Port Adelaide. In this case no shots were fired and the strikers did not confront the police or troops.( Additional defence acts were passed in 1886, 1890 and 1895 but, until defence passed into federal hands after 1901, the states permanent military force was comprised solely of artillery.( Shortly after the of Australia, a regiment of the Royal Australian Artillery (RAA) was formed and what had been the Permanent Artillery became No.10 company RAA.( The fort was manned to an extent during War I, with one non-commissioned officer and 11 gunners stationed as of November 1914. Military reports and orders show the fort manned to at least mid 1918, though at this point it is doubtful if the guns were fit to engage targets.(There is little in the way of surviving personnel records from the forts active time.(Hastings (1986), p.180.) They may have either been destroyed or transferred to Melbourne after federation. The forts record book shows it manned by a section of either the Royal Australian Artillery or B Company of the militia garrison artillery. For the time covered by the book, strength varied from 56 to 108 men of all ranks.(Hastings (1986), p.182.) Two figures who served at the fort are remembered for their impact outside its operation:*Battery Sergeant Major Charles Moritz, who initially joined the volunteer artillery and was the Permanent Artillerys first recruit.(*Maria Gordon (18561929), the forts first commander and later military commandant for South Australia. Gordon retired in 1914 as Chief of the General Staff, Australian Military Forces.(Structurethumb|left|Fort Glanville entrance via Queen Elizabeth II walkThe fort is designed as a defensible battery, rather than a defensive strongpoint. The faces of the fort join to form a half-moon shape or lunette.( The guns primary role was to defend Port Adelaide and the Semaphore anchorage rather than the fort itself, and the design reflects this. It was intended to be supported by field artillery, cavalry and infantry for self defence and to repel landings.(FGHA (2000), p.7.) While the fort retains its original form, the ditch and glacis (embankment) have been modified and are largely non-existent in some areas. Ground levels have been changed to accommodate paths and a park, and the original western fence no longer exists.(NPWS (1988), p.11.)The entrance road was constructed from Military Road to the forts rear gates. Its path is largely followed by the modern Elizabeth II walk, though the former road was slightly to the south. This walk links the conservation parks visitor centre to the fort gates; some of the old road can still be seen close to the gates. What was the muster ground is partly taken up by the caravan and camping park and a car park. It was levelled and filled in the 1950s for this use. What remains of this ground, north of the caravan park, was returned to its 1880s profile in 1993 funded by a Federal Government grant. In the 19th century, the muster ground was used for training of the Volunteer Military Force including artillery, who camped on the site. As designed the forts rear was protected with a wooden palisade or stockade. In 1881 a masonry wall was added, greatly strengthening defence. Most of the stockade was reconstructed in the 1970s; some of the original wooden structure is visible in the forts north.(FortificationThe main defensive structure is a revetted lunette shaped earthwork. It has a  thick rampart with  of concrete and  of brick forming a wall for the earth fill.(Parsons (1986), p.240.) The rampart is covered by natural vegetation and, in both the 19th and 21st century operation, is closed to access to preserve this. The glacis gives extra protection to the fort and was designed to blend the fort into the landscape. It surrounded the fort on the north, south and seaward sides and was made by forming the surrounding sandhills. The side facing the fortthe scarpis steep and, with the front face of the rampart, forms a  wide ditch that can be raked by rifle fire from the caponier or the stockades sides. The outer face is a gentle slope and is designed to be covered by case shot fired from the forts 64-pounder guns. The southern glacis section was removed during mining and construction of the caravan park, both after World War II. The western glacis is changed, but still visible, and the northern glacis was recreated in 1993showcasing the purpose of the glacis and the function of the caponier.( Access to the fort is via double gates at the forts rear, one each through the stockade and the rear defence wall. Both gates were removed or destroyed over time and the 21st century gates are reconstructions. The formal parade ground or manning parade lies between the rear walls and barracks, and the raised terreplein. It was formerly used for drill training, assembly and formal parades. First gravelled when constructed, it was paved with tar in the 1890s to solve drainage problems. Around the seaward side of the manning parade runs the terreplein. It is a raised crescent shaped level on which the guns platforms sit, and is ascended from the manning parade by ramps and stairs.(After numerous proposals the sand hills rear and north of the fort were removed in 1882, improving the forts land defence and allowing the 64-pounder guns to sweep the Semaphore jetty. This now levelled area was used as a bivouac and exercise area for the colonys volunteer troops. A stable, office, shed and gunners store were also erected north of the fort. The gunners shed was damaged by fire in 1895 and replaced further eastward. These buildings did not survive into the 21st century.(Internal roomsthumb|left|Internal structure of the caponierOn either side of the terreplein, wide of the 64-pound guns, are two small rooms known as the expense stores. They were used for ready-to-use ammunition for the adjacent guns, except for armour piercing shells which were stored in the rear-defence walls archways. Between the 64-pounders and the 10 gun positions are two raised observation platforms set into the structure for gun commanders to spot the fall of outgoing shells. Ranging was either performed from here or from a ranging position set in the sand hills to the forts north. Between the 10 guns is a T-shaped loading gallery that draws shells and gunpowder via a hoist system from the magazine below. Either side of the gallery was installed the Armstrong mechanical loading systems for the 10 guns. These mechanical systems proved unsuccessful and were removed in the 1890s, though the southern one has been reconstructed. The magazine is accessed from the manning parade and is directly beneath the 10 gun loading gallery. Voice pipes and hoists originally installed have been removed but their remains are visible.(FGHA (2000), p.8.)The caponier (rifle gallery) extends into the ditch between the rampart and glacis from the forts north west corner. It is connected to the fort via a tunnel, running under the rampart from the manning parade. For blast protection and defensibility the tunnel was built with a dogleg. The caponier has rifle firing ports and was originally protected from direct artillery fire by the glacis.( Early plans showed the caponier extending from the forts south west, and a tunnel linking the magazine and southern guns.(Buildingsthumb|right|16 pounder being loaded in front of the guardhouse and rear defensive wall. Note the archways formerly used to store 64-pounder ammunitionThe barracks consists of two levels, with rifle firing holes on all sides. Iron shutters closed on the inside and were locked with wooden beams. In 1885 the verandah facing the manning parade was enclosed with wooden shutters to keep the weather out. These shutters were removed during 20th century restoration work and the verandah returned to original condition. The roof was at first flat timber overlaid by  of lime concrete. This first roof leaked and an iron roof was added in 1885. The first floor of the barracks contains the officers rooms and troops barracks room.(FGHA (2000), p.9.) Its eastern (outer) wall is not flat, incorporating a design feature known as hornwork, which opens the field of fire from the rifle holes. Some of the firing holes were bricked in during the 1930s; this has been only partly rectified during restoration.(The basement contains the gunners mess, canteen, No. 1 ancillary store, pantry and officers kitchen. The canteen sold everyday necessities as well as a few items like biscuits, sweets and tobacco to the stationed troops. Profits from the canteen were used to fund sporting equipment for the garrison. The No.1 ancillary store was used for various pieces of delicate equipment, fuses, friction tubes and rockets. In 1887 an explosion in the room caused a number of injuries, damage to the store and to the above officers quarters. The barracks room and officers quarters are connected with a door, probably added in the 1930s as it is not part of the original plans. The barracks room accommodated approximately 20 men. For display purposes it is outfitted as for similar period barracks.(FGHA (2000), p.10.)A laboratory is built into the rear wall, on the forts southern side. This room is set into the end of the rampart and was used to prepare gunpowder charges. A guardhouse was built at the manning parades southern end in 1885. It is now used as a duty room for the drill squad during recreation demonstrations but originally was a guards room and separate cells connected by telephone to Fort Largs. Up to three men appear to have been accommodated in the guards room. When the fort was converted to use as a caravan park the guard house was converted to an ablution block.(FGHA (2000), p.11.) A store and ablution block were also built in 1885 between the stockade and rear defence wall.(ArmamentEarly plans for the forts armament were drawn up by Harding Stewart of the British Office. They called for four   rifled muzzle loading (RML) guns, two mounted in turrets and two behind vertical iron shields. This configuration of siege artillery had not been tried before and the plan was abandoned due to the large expected cost.(Hastings (1986), pp.178&ndash;179.) Two of the 9 in guns had been in South Australia since c.1868 after a Colonial Government request, but were not used in the eventual fort design. The final Jervois/Scratchley design omitted the turret and iron shields. 64-pounder RML guns were substituted for two of the 9 in guns and 10 in 20 ton RML guns for the remaining two. The 20 ton guns were chosen over the then standard 18 ton gun by Jervois after he saw the plans in England, the decision influenced by the then fully committed nature of the Arsenal. Jervois had originally ordered the 18 ton guns but cancelled the order and changed to the Armstrong 20 ton when the arsenal was unable fulfil the order. He also ordered Armstrongs mechanical loading and protected barbette system for the 20 ton guns.( This original battery of four heavy guns remains in place at the fort.(FGHA (2000), p.12.)10 inch RML gunsthumb|left|10 inch 20 ton RML gun on a reconstructed carriage. Barbette protected loading system to the rightThe forts main armament were the two RML 10 inch 20 ton gunsNumbers 3470 and 3472. They were manufactured in 1879 by WG Armstrong and Company and originally used the Armstrong protected barbette loading system.( They were made to the 1878 pattern and supplied on traversing slides. The guns have a  calibre, a range of  with a muzzle velocity of  and are capable of penetrating  of iron at .(They fire  projectiles using a  gunpowder cartridge. Though they were insufficient against contemporary battleships, they were seen as adequate for the cruisers that the fort was expected to face. The carriages weighed  and moved on semi-circular traverses.( The guns were loaded either manuallyusing the Woolwich (derrick) systemor via the Armstrong mechanical loader. The Armstrong system enabled loading of the guns from behind the protection of the rampart whereas the manual system required at least two crew to be exposed on the ramparts top.( Despite this the guns were manually loaded for most of the their operational life as the Armstrong cable drive was faulty and too difficult to maintain. The guns had a 14-man crew and loading took about 2 minutes, a rate of fire that was only slightly faster using the Armstrong equipment.(By 1902 the guns had together fired 219 rounds,( though not all at full charge with the records showing only 125 effective full charges.( The platforms and traverses were scrapped in 1937 but the gun barrels were uneconomic to cut up and were left in place. One gun platform and its equipment was rebuilt in 1997 using money raised by Fort Glanville Historical Association volunteers working at the Grand Prix.(64 pounder RML gunsright|thumb|64-pounder gun on its firing platformIn the flank barbettes are mounted two mark III 64 pounder 64 cwt guns, numbers 462 and 463. They are rifled muzzle loading heavy guns weighing  with a  calibre steel barrel. They were made to the models 1867 pattern by the Arsenal, Woolwich, England in 1872.(NPWS (1988), p.57.) Their intended use was to protect the flanks and approaches to the fort. These smaller guns use an  charge of gunpowder to send a  projectile up to . There are iron rings fixed in the rampart wall that indicate traversing gun carriages were intended to be mounted, though this never eventuated. The guns were supplied with siege over-bank carriages. The lower carriage sections are the type made for the guns when used as field pieces and the upper sections are brackets that raise the guns to the over-bank firing position. In this particular configuration the two guns are thought to be the last in the world.(FGHA (2000), p.13.)By the end of their active use in 1902 together they had fired 1540 rounds in practice, though not all at full power as they are recorded as firing under 300 effective full charges.(NPWS (1988), p.57.) By then the wheels were significantly rotted and the ammunition limbers had become unserviceable.( Less wheels, the guns were removed from the fort in 1909; Adelaides city council then set them in Brougham Gardens, Adelaide.(FGHA (2000), p.4.)(Hastings (1986), p.184.) Both were returned to the fort in 1976 and remounted on restored carriages of the original design. They are the only two guns of their type remaining in Australia.(NPWS (1988), p.9.) The southern gun (Number 463) fired three blank charges in 1980 to mark the centenary of the first firing at the fort. This same gun is fired regularly by the volunteers of the Fort Glanville Historical Association (FGHA).(Both types of heavy guns used where the only ones of their specific series and type to come to Australia.(NPWS (1988), p.58.) Though they were never in anger, the battery is only  mean sea level which would have limited the accuracy of the mark III depression rangefinders used.(Other weaponryPrior to 1895 two  breech-loading guns had been imported for use in small boats. This use was rejected by military authorities and the guns sat unused. In 1895 the South Australian Defence Committee proposed that the guns be mounted at Fort Glanville, replacing the 64-pounders whose siege carriages were then unfit for service. This proposal would have greatly extended the useful life of the fort, at little cost. The two military branches, army and navy, could not reach agreement and the proposal was abandoned by 1897. The guns eventual fate is unknown, though a gun found in the Port River later indicates they may have been dumped.(Gun emplacements were made, about a mile apart south of the fort, for six 16-pounder field guns to provide close defence in case of an attempted beach landing. From 1890 the fort was equipped with moveable armament. It received an 1867 Whitworth 12-pounder RML field gun and a 5-barrel 0.45 Martini-henry cartridge firing gun. The 12-pounder had fired 222 effective full charges by 1902; at which time both weapons were obsolete( and their eventual fate is unknown.( A 32-pounder  smoothbore gun on a stepped wooden carriage was purchased in 1878. Manufactured by the Royal Arsenal in 1806, it was the familiar ships cannon and came to South Australia with two other identical guns. By 1902 no ammunition was held for it and it was listed as for instruction only.( The gun was probably destroyed in the 1930scertainly by the end of the 1940s with pieces of such a gun found on site in 1983.(right|thumb|2-pounder RML Whitworth mountain gunIn the late 20th century the fort acquired three 16-pounder RML mark I field guns. They were formerly used by A battery, South Australian Volunteer Artillery from 1880 until 1901. Gun number 288 is complete and used for blank firings by the Historical Association.( Also acquired is a 2-pounder RML Whitworth gun made in 1867. It was also used by A Battery, subsequently by Fort Largs as a signal gun. It is one of only two of this type known to exist, the other in the United Kingdom.( The visitors centre has two 9-pounder brass smoothbore field guns made by H&C King in 1819. They arrived in South Australia in 1857 and were used for practice shoots near the fort c.1860; one is known to have been on the manning parade in 1890 though its use is unknown. They later became saluting guns at Fort Largs, moving by 1919 to near the Jervois Wing of the Library of South Australia. The Gallery of South Australia saved them from a 1941 wartime scrap drive and mounted them on reproduction naval carriages in front of Government House in 1962. The gallery took them back in late 1977 and transferred them to the Trust of South Australia in 1988. The History Trust has loaned them to Fort Glanville for display.( Outside the visitors centre is a  breech-loading Armstrong  gun (No.4242) that was made in 1884 and used in Victoria. The Scientific and Industrial Research Organisation (CSIRO) brought it to the state in 1966 for research, subsequently moving it to Perry Engineering at Mile End. In 1984 the CSIRO donated the gun to the park.(Defence significanceWork began in 1882 on Fort Glanvilles northern sister Largsthen known as the Port Adelaide batteryto the same specification as Fort Glanville; its barracks and rear defence wall were finished in 1885. Though guns had already been purchased specially, plans for the third fort at Glenelg were not proceeded with. South Australia was experiencing a depression in 1886 and that coupled with a report by General Bevan Edwards scuttled plans for the third coastal fort.( As early as 1888 the emphasis for defence of the Adelaide coast had already shifted to Fort Largs; a fact cited as part of the reason for abandonment of the Glenelg fortifications.(From this point Fort Glanvilles significance declined rapidly. Fort Largs was equipped in 1889 with two 6 inch breech-loading guns which outranged Glanvilles armament. The decline was also linked to changes in Port Adelaides maritime facilities and the consequent northward movement of anchored and berthed vessels. During the 1880s work had proceeded with deepening the Port River, enabling large ships to sail up and berth rather than the former practice of anchoring off-shore.(NPWS (1988), p.59.)The fort remained as headquarters of South Australias permanent military force until the 1890s(NPWS (1988), p.7.) and as late as 1895 there were still plans to upgrade the 64-pounder armament, though without result.( By 1901 the fort was manned on a caretaker basis only and no permanent forces were stationed.( The Federal Government assumed responsibility for South Australian defence in 1903 and took over the fort. Though Glanville by then had no significant defence role, the state received 14,739 in compensation.( From that point its significance was not defence related but as the first and best preserved 19th century fortification in South Australia.()20th centuryAt Federation in 1901 South Australias defences became a federal responsibility. Though both infantry and artillery units were housed at the site on occasion,groupnote by 1903 there was no longer a permanent military presence at the fort. For most of the 20th century the site was neglected and largely vacated. It did attract some usage though not always of a military nature. During War I it was partly revived for a former use, with ammunition stored on site. During the same period however the military used it as a detention barracks.groupnote Some or all of the fort was leased for private accommodation during the depression.( During the 1930s the magazine was again used, this time to store arms ammunition.( From June 1931 until the beginning of World War II the site housed a Scout detachment, and was used as a district camp-site for the Scouts.( The Department of Defence decided in 1937 that much of the equipment and fittings at the fort were surplus to requirements. Consequent to this the mountings and carriages for the 10 inch guns were removed and sold as scrap; though effort was made to scrap the barrels it proved uneconomic and they were left in place.( In an unusual turn of events, the fort briefly housed refugees. Twenty-nine islanders from the Maldives were rescued from their sinking dhow by a ship bound for Wallaroo. They stayed at the fort for a week in 1938, before repatriation could be arranged.() During War II the fort again attracted military related use. During 1944 the Proof and Experimental Establishment at Port Wakefield made use of the site to proof QF 6 pounder anti-tank guns manufactured at General Motors Holden in Woodville.( The fort was also used as a residence again, with at least two families reported as living in the under-ground sections during the war.()After the war, the State Government negotiated with their federal counterpart to gain control of Fort Glanville. This eventuated in the 1951 sale of the  site, which was subsequently administered by the State Tourist Department as a caravan and camping park.( The park occupied the muster ground outside the fort and the forts barracks building was used as a managers residence.( The caravan park has had various managers since establishment: Until 1981 it was managed by the National Parks and Wildlife Service, by Woodville Council until 1986 and subsequently by a private operator under a long-term lease.(NPWS (1988), p.13.)A significant change in the forts conservation and preservation outlook was its declaration as a Historic Relic under the Aboriginal and Historic Relics Preservation Act in 1972.() Up to then there had been growing awareness of the significance of the site in terms of the states colonial heritage. Control of the park was moved to the National Parks and Wildlife Service (NPWS), and the fort and surrounds became designated as Fort Glanville Conservation Park.( The National Estate Grants Program provided funds in 1975 for conservation work; NPWS began this work in the same year and the caravan park boundary was moved southwards.( Though the site had long been neglected, there was minimal permanent damage to its structure.( During the 1970s reconstruction, much of the stockade was replaced. The replaced timbers are visibly different as they have shrunk significantly with large gaps that are not evident in the original timber.(NPWS (1988), p.89.) Adelaide City Council agreed to return the 64-pounder guns and new wheels were made; replacing those rotted over half a century before.( In a ceremony on 2 October 1980, the 100th anniversary of the guns first firing, one of the 64-pounders was fired again;() later a commemoration plaque was added to the forts flagpoles base. Shortly after this firing the Fort Glanville Historical Association was formed, and was incorporated in 1981. Fort Glanville was opened for public visitation in 1981.(As part of South Australias sesquicentenary, the South Australia Jubilee 150 board granted $250,000 for work on the fort, allowing construction of a visitor centre.( Elizabeth II visited and inspected the site, and newly constructed visitor centre, for almost an hour on 13 March 1986. For the visit the historical association demonstrated firing of both the 64 and 2 pounder cannons.( The visitor centre was officially opened one month after this visit.(NPWS (1988), p.3.) Governor Dame Mitchell named the old road Queen Elizabeth II Walk in March 1991 ceremony, commemorating the 5th anniversary of the queens visit.( Considerable subsequent restoration work has been completed on the fort, including the barracks interior. The portion of the muster ground that is not within the caravan park was returned to its original level in 1993.(Park and fort todayFort Glanville Conservation Park is one of South Australias most important heritage sites. It is the premier site in the state, and possibly Australia, for showcasing colonial era defences and fortifications.( The fort is listed on the National Trusts classified list( and on the Register of State Heritage Items.(NPWS (1988), p.16.) It is considered significant, in national historical military terms, for its association with Jervois and Scratchley; both leading British defence experts who influenced Australian defence thinking in the late 19th century.( The fort was very well constructed with high quality materials; facts that have been noted as contributing to its preservation.(NPWS (1988), p.15.) The fort is largely intact and in original condition and is, along with Bluff Battery in Hobart, the best preserved Jervois-Scratchley designed fort in Australia.( It is the only Australian colonial fort to still have all of its original armament, and the only to have a regular living history program.() Its companion Fort Largs does survive but in greatly modified condition, converted for use as the Australia Police academy.( The fort retains its original armament; armament that is both rare in Australia and worldwide.(The conservation park is in the suburb of Semaphore South and incorporates the fort and surrounding area. It covers approximately , bounded by Bower and Military roads, Point Malcolm Reserve and Semaphore beach. The land is entirely land and is administered by the National Parks and Wildlife Service (NPWS). It is divided into roughly two halves, the northern contains the fort and the southern a caravan park. While it is managed by the NPWS, the Fort Glanville Consultative Committee and Fort Glanville Historical Association are heavily involved. The committee is appointed by the Minister for Environment and Planning and acts to advise the Minister and liaise with the community.(NPWS (1988), p.1.) As of 1988, the fort hosted approximately 7,000 visitors annually,(NPWS (1988), p.14) and is used as an event venue including the annual of Charles Sturt citizenship ceremony.(The historical association is an incorporated body of volunteers who use the fort under licence from the Minister. The operate the fort and visitor centre, holding monthly public open days at which the history of the fort is recreated; this includes drill demonstrations and firing of the forts weapons.() They maintain static displays of the forts active period and sell souvenirs. The associations goal is to have the site open as a fully operational fort for interpretation, tourism and education.( The volunteers are involved with recreation, living history and ceremonial work outside the fort. They act as guards of honour at some Government House functions and attended the restoration opening of the Western Australia fort, and the annual re-enactment of the of Waterloo in Victoria.( The fort has history displays, including the barracks laid out and furnished in period detail. The visitor centre has displays showing the development of South Australias colonial defence from 1836 and artifacts found on site during restorations.( Connecting the fort to Semaphore jetty is the Semaphore and Fort Glanville Tourist Railway, a  gauge steam train operated by volunteers from the National Railway Museum.() The railway opened in 1991 and, as of 2002, carried over 16,000 passengers annually.()NotesReferencesBibliography* * * * * * * Further reading* * *  External links * * 
21183643
Through_the_earth_mine_communications
Through-the-Earth (TTE) signalling is a type of radio signalling used in underground mines that uses low frequency waves to penetrate dirt and rock, which are opaque to higher-frequency conventional radio signals.In mining these higher frequency signals can be relayed underground through various antennae, repeater or mesh configurations, but communication is restricted to line of sight to these antenna and repeaters systems. OverviewThrough the earth transmission can overcome these restrictions in underground mines by using ultra low frequency signals, where the signals can travel through several hundred feet of rock strata. Hence an antenna can be located on the surface only at a mine site, and provide signal coverage to all parts of the underground mine.  This is important in mining applications, particularly after any significant incident, such as fire or explosion, which would destroy much of the fixed communication infrastructure underground.If the terrain makes a surface antenna impractical to install, then the antenna can be installed underground. But because the signal travels through rock, the antenna does not need to run into all parts of the mine to achieve mine wide signal coverage, thus minimizing the risk of damage during an incident.Personal emergency deviceTo date only one system has been successfully developed and deployed, and is known as the PED System, where PED is an acronym for Personal Emergency Device.  Initially developed after a mining disaster in Australia at Moura No. 4 Coal Mine in 1986 (http://www.dme.qld.gov.au/mines/moura_no4.cfm), and further developed after the Moura No. 2 Coal Mine explosion in 1994 (http://www.dme.qld.gov.au/mines/moura_no2.cfm) where the need for a communication system to survive major incidents underground was identified in the enquiries into the disasters.  PED is a one-way text paging device, with widespread installations in Australia, and some installations at mines in the States, China, Canada and Sweden.  The best documented use of PED during a mine emergency is from the Willow Creek Mine Fire in 1998 in Utah, where it was able to quickly alert miners underground of the need to evacuate the mine before toxic fumes from the fire filled the mine.  Reports of this use can be seen on the Safety & Health Administration (MSHA) web site at (http://www.msha.gov/disasterhistory/WCREEK/CHRONO/C0.HTM) and (http://www.msha.gov/disasterhistory/WCREEK/WCREEK.HTM).DevelopmentOn-going developments based on initial research undertaken in Australia by the Commonwealth Scientific Industrial Research Organisation (CSIRO) after the 1994 mine accident and given further impetus by the investigations into the Mine disaster the PED System is undergoing further development to provide two-way though the earth communication capability.A recent demonstration in a US coal mine showed two-way TTE text messaging achieved at the deepest trials to date. Two-way signalling was achieved through 1,820 feet of overburden between the underground transceiver and the surface transceiver.References(
21196033
VF2291
VF2291 is a station owned by the Ore Company of Canada that broadcasts on the frequency 102.1 FM in Lake Mining, Newfoundland and Labrador, Canada.External links*
21213502
Ministry_of_Education_and_Training_(Vietnam)
footnotes       The Ministry of Education and Training (MOET) is the ministry responsible for the governance of general/academic education and higher education (training) in Vietnam.  Vocational Education is controlled by the Ministry of Labour, Invalids, and Social Affairs (MoLISA).   Ministry offices are located in central Noi, on Co Dai Viet.  In the Vietnamese system, MoET is responsible for the professional performance and regulation of educational institutions under it, but not for ownership or finance, except for the major public universities (VNU, Vietnam National University, in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City, fall directly under the Prime Ministers office, not MoET).  Ownership and administrative/financial responsibility for the bulk of educational institutions, including all school-level general education, falls under Provinces or Districts, which have substantial autonomy on many budgetary decisions under the Vietnamese constitution.  Some institutions are also controlled by other central ministries, although mainly at higher education levels (senior secondary and colleges).  DepartmentsThe Ministry maintains provincial-level departments (DoETs, Departments of E&T), under which there are also district offices (BoETs, for Bureau of E&T), and central departments.  Central departments of note include:(Ministry, Departments)*Science and Technology Activities in Education and Training*Information and Communication Technology Center*National Institute for Education Strategy and Curriculum Development*Education Publishing House*Educational Equipment Company No. 1UniversitiesColleges and universities under the maintenance of the Ministry of Education and Training include:(Ministry, Universities)*of Social Labour*of Chemicals*Chi Minh City College of Marketing*of Mining Engineering*Chi Minh City Procuratorial College*of Trade Unions*of Journalism and Propaganda *University of Education No.2 *University of Education *Nhon University of Education *Chi Minh City Technical Teacher Training University *University, Ho Chi Minh City*Open University (HOU) *Dong University *Lang University (VLU)ReferencesSee also* in Vietnam* of universities in Vietnam* Vocational schools of the Ministry of Industry* Ministry of Transport schools and collegesExternal links*Ministry of Education and Training*National Institute for Education Strategy and Curriculum Development at Ministry site*Education Publishing House and list of subsidiaries, at Ministry siteGio dc v o to (Vit Nam)
21226439
Henry_Fell_Pease
Henry Fell Pease (28 April 1838- 7 December 1896) was a coal and ironstone mine-owner from North East England and Liberal politician who represented Cleveland. Pease, a member of the prominent Quaker Pease family, was born at Middleton St. George, near Darlington, the eldest son of Henry Pease and his wife Anna Fell, daughter of Richard Fell of Uxbridge. He was educated privately.(Debretts House of Commons and Judicial Bench 1886) He became a partner in  the family firm of Pease and Partners (Limited), who owned coal and ironstone mines and was also a director of the Valley Railway. When Darlington was incorporated as a borough in 1868 he became a councillor, and was twice  mayor of Darlington in 1874-75. In 1881 and 1882 he was president of the Liberal Federation.(Durham Mining Museum Archives) He was a J.P. for County Durham and the North Riding of Yorkshire.(Pease was elected as MP for Cleveland in 1885 as a Liberal and held the seat until his death at the age of 58 at  Brinkburn, Darlington.( In 1862, Pease married his second cousin Elizabeth Pease, eldest daughter of John Beaumont Pease, of North Lodge, Darlington.( They had two sons and one daughter.( See alsoof political families in the United KingdomReferencesExternal links*Durham County Council  Portrait Of Henry Fell Pease
21238975
Bhanora_Colliery
Bhanora colliery is a coalfield area situated 12 km from Asansol, Bengal. The settlements population is approximately 10,000. It is divided into four panchayats. The area is part of the barabani legislative assembly constituency in West Bengal.() The colliery is an important element in Indias coal mining industry.References
21250329
Stanrock_Mine
The Stanrock Mine is an historical uranium mine located approximately 11.5 km northeast of Lake, Ontario, owned by Mines. The site has been decommissioned and rehabilited with ongoing monitoring by Denison Environmental Services.the site was in operation from 1958 to 1960, and again from 1964 to 1985, during which time it produced 6.4 million tones of ore.HistoryGeologyOther mines in the area* Mine* American Mine* Mine* Mine* Mine* Mine* Mine(s)* Mine* Mine* Mine* MineSee also*Quartz-pebble conglomerate deposits*mining*of uranium mines*of mines in OntarioExternal links* MiningWatch Canada - Elliot Lake Uranium Mines* CIM Bulletin - The Story of Elliot Lake* The Gulliver Denison Mines Ltd Dossier
21264119
Albert_Knight_(politician)
Albert Knight (February 12, 1817 &ndash; after 1881) was a merchant and political figure in Quebec. He represented Stanstead in the Assembly of the Province of Canada from 1861 to 1866.He was born in Vermont, the son of Samuel Knight. He worked as a clerk before establishing his own business at Stanstead Plain in the Townships. Knight helped establish the Saint Francis bank and the Waterloo, Magog and Stanstead Railway, and was president of the Townships Bank branch at Stanstead. He was also involved in several mining companies. In 1838, he married Julia Ann Rose. Knight was an unsuccessful candidate for a seat in the Legislative Assembly in 1858 and for a seat in the Canadian House of Commons in 1867.His daughter Florence Alberta married Felix Hackett. References *Biography from Assemble nationale du Qubec (french) External links * Albert Knight, Stanstead, Quebec, McCord Museum of Canadian History
21284358
Harish_Saluja
Harish Saluja is a filmmaker and artist residing in Pittsburgh, States. He is the founder and Executive Director of Silk Screen Asian Arts and Cultural Organization, host of Music from India radio program, working on his next feature film and creating art for upcoming gallery shows.Early lifeSaluja was raised in Indias northwest state of Punjab. Growing up, he had a passion for art. His mother, a singer, exposed him to classical Indian music. He was fascinated by film, especially the work of filmmaker of Ray. Saluja would ride his bike even in the most extreme weather just so he could watch the newest releases.Moving to Bombay and studying film was Salujas dream as a boy, but instead he settled for the secure path of engineering. He graduated with a degree from the prestigious Kharagpur and spent the following four years working as an engineer in a mining company.In 1971 Saluja moved to the United States, where, he believed that in America an artist could undoubtedly flourish. After quickly learning that art doesnt always buy bread, Saluja headed to Pittsburgh, well known for its steel industry. He was told that this was a place where an engineering degree would be appreciated. He was hired at a publishing company  of which he eventually became co-owner.Work in FilmSaluja began working in film as Associate producer on Tony Bubas Pets (1994) and then as the executive producer of Eat Dog.  He also acted in various commercials and in the Disney film Money for Nothing starring Cusack.In 1995 he established New Ray Films . Its first film was The Journey (1997) - which he wrote, directed, produced and also acted in a small role. The film is a Comedy/drama chronicling the cultural and generational shock of a retired Indian headmaster who comes to the U.S. to visit his physician son and American daughter-in-law. The film starred Seth and Jaffrey, two extremely talented Indian actors who were appearing together for the first time after (film) (1982) and Beautiful Laundrette (1985).The Journey premiered at the Seattle Film Festival in 1997 and was screened in over 20 festivals nationwide. It won the Audience Award for Best Film at the Film Festival and the Best Independent Film award at the Cleveland Film Festival. The film also had a wide release in theaters across India.Critics praised Salujas first film. In Variety, Emanuel Levy wrote: technically accomplished directorial debut from Harish Saluja this nicely executed cross-cultural, cross-generational seriocomedy deserves to be seen on the big screen, particularly in cities with Indian (and other immigrant) communities.Driven by the subject matter and message his film delivers, Saluja stated to the India Post: Even though India has the largest filmmaking industry, there have been very few filmmakers of stature among the Indian immigrants. I feel that we  the Indian community  should make films about Indians in America.Saluja has discussed his passion for telling stories about Indian Americans in many interviews. He believes that it is up to the visionaries of this community to get their stories told.In addition to making films, Saluja has also shared his knowledge by teaching courses through the Honors College at the of Pittsburgh.Currently Saluja is working on two films.Art careerIn addition to his work in film, Saluja has produced many works of abstract art that combine vivid colors and musical patterns. He has created series based on Ragas and on jazz. Harry Schwalb of ARTnews described Salujas style, writing: Saluja sees the musics endless patterns  which evolve simultaneously in repetitively strummed layers of tone and rhythm  as like colored threads, woven by the performer into a musical carpet.Salujas work has been showcased at various galleries in USA and  Europe.Radio WorkSaluja co-hosts the weekly radio program Music From India, which runs every Sunday night on the NPR affiliate, WDUQ-FM. The program has been airing since 1972 and is one of WDUQs longest-running programs. It is the longest-running Indian music program in the country and among the longest in the world.His work as a radio host has made Saluja well known in the Indian community around Pittsburgh. He is often asked to emcee various community events and festivities.NotesPlease see the following links for more articles and video clips of Harish Saluja:Living Life King Size Business Worldhttp://www.newray.com/files/Living%20Life%20Kingsize.jpgEngineer, Artist, Radio Host, Filmmaker: Harish Salujahttp://www.newray.com/files/Engineer.pdfFilmmaker completes his Journeyhttp://www.newray.com/files/filmmaker.pdfIntruding on Lifehttp://www.newray.com/files/intrude1.pdfhttp://www.newray.com/files/intrude2.pdfThe Journey Producer Both Actor and Directorhttp://www.newray.com/files/pghpg_dir.pdfSilk Screen FestivalComcast Newsmakers: Harish Salujahttp://www.youtube.com/watch?v907nZyWn9LI&featureplayer_embeddedComcast Newsmakers: Harish Saluja on Silk Screen 2008http://www.youtube.com/watch?va6ltizG5L8o&featureplayer_embedded#The Silk Screen Movie Festivalhttp://www.youtube.com/watch?vhcLcVm5yc50&featureplayer_embeddedHarish Saluja on Pittsburgh Today Livehttp://kdka.com/video/?id41062@kdka.dayport.comReferences*WDUQs Biography of Harish Saluja*Filmmaker Completes His Journey, Niki Kapsambelis*Harish Saluja on NYTimes.com*Pop City feature Cultural Awareness: An Important Story, Kelli McElhinny*The Journey Is Complete, Harry Kloman*Pittsburgh Post Gazette Newsmakers: Harish Saluja / Local film producer a believer in the arts, 29 Sept. 2003*indieWIRE: Harish Salujas Journey--A Lesson in Selling, The Hard Hard WayExternal links*Silk Screen Asian American Film Festival*New Ray Films*YouTube: Harish Saluja on Comcast Newsmakers*Video clip of Harish Saluja on WQEDs OnQ: India in Pittsburgh
21303333
Sugar_Loaf_Islands
 additional info  The Sugar Loaf Islands (often Sugarloaf Islands) () are a collection of five small uninhabited islands and several stacks near Taranaki, Taranaki, New Zealand. The largest island, Moturoa Island, covers approximately . Motumahanga is the island furthest from shore, at approximately  or .The Sugar Loaf Islands Marine Protected Area (SLIMPA) was established in 1991 to protect the area from oil exploration. This strengthened the protection that had been in place since the formation of a park in 1986.The island group was named in 1770 by Cook.IslandsThe Sugar Loaf Islands can be divided in to inner and outer island groups.()The inner islands comprise Mataora (Round Rock), Pararaki (Seagull Rock) and Motuotamatea (Snapper Rock). Mataora connects to the mainland at low tides, as does Motuotamatea on very low spring tides. Pararaki is separated from Mataora by a 20 meter wide channel.The outer islands comprise Motumahanga (Saddleback Island) and Moturoa.Several small rock outcrops are included in the island group. Waikaranga (Seal Rocks), and Tokatapu are several hundred meters offshore. Close to Moturoa lie Whareumu (Lion Rock),a vegetated stack and two barren rocks, and Tokomapuna (Barrett Reef).Marine protected areaIn 1986, an area encompassing the Sugar Loaf Islands was protected as a marine park. Concern over oil exploration led to strengthening of the protection, through the enacting of the Sugar Loaf Islands Marine Park Act in 1991. An area of , including  of land, encompassing the islands and surrounding seabed and ocean spanning from Taranaki in the north to Stream in the south, was protected from commercial, recreational fishing and mining. The act deemed Moturoa Island, Motumahanga, Waikaranga, and Whareumu as sanctuary areas (requiring a permit for entry), with the remaining area a conservation park.()()In 2008, the 1404 ha Marine Reserve was established adjacent to the Sugar Loaf Island Marine Protected Area (SLIMPA).GeologyThe Sugar Loaf Islands, along with onshore pinnacles such as Paritutu (), represent the oldest volcanic activity on the Taranaki peninsula. Dating between 1.7( and 1.74( million years of age, the islands are believed to be the remains of a ring fracture or feeders to eroded vents,() and are composed of a porphyritic hornblende andesite.() Volcanic activity in Taranaki subsequently shifted to Kaitake (580,000 years ago), then migrated southeast to Pouakai (230,000 years ago) and the current centre of activity, Taranaki (last erupted in 1755).()The Sugar Loaf Islands are the type locality of taranakite,() a phosphate mineral that forms from the reaction of bird guano with the aluminous rocks comprising the islands. This was the first new mineral species to be discovered in New Zealand.() See also * of islands of New ZealandReferencesExternal links*Map of the Sugar Loaf Islands Marine Protected Area and Tapuae Marine Reserve, DOC
21323899
A.D._Wilson
A.D. Wilson (Allen David Wilson) - (September 17, 1844  February 21, 1920)(Foster, Mike. Mapping Mountains: A. D. Wilson, Nineteenth- Century Colorado Cartographer, Colorado Heritage, no. 4, pages 22-33, 1988) was an American cartographer.BiographyHe was born in Illinois. He left school and in March 1867, enlisted with the Geological Survey of California. There he learned triangulation. In July 1868, he joined King for his Exploration of the Fortieth Parallel and stayed with him through 1872.  Wilson then joined Vandeveer Hayden and between 1873 and 1878, he triangulated across western Colorado, western Wyoming, and eastern Idaho. In 1879, Haydens Survey was merged with others to form the Geological Survey. King named Wilson the chief topographer of the USGS.Wilson resigned from the USGS on September 30, 1881, in order to become chief topographer for the Transcontinental Survey, organized by Pumpelly. Villard, president of the Pacific Railroad, had invited Pumpelly to map the sprawling areas of Washington, Idaho, and Montana and to identify the economic resources near the railroad lines. Pumpelly published part of that survey in his report for the Tenth Census, including at least one of Wilsons maps.(Foster, page 32)During the 1890s, Wilson relocated to California where he and other civic leaders organized the Athenian Bank (later renamed the Security Bank and Trust of Oakland). In 1918, the bank was absorbed by the Bank of Italy and soon thereafter became the of America. He died of influenza on February 21, 1920 in California.(Foster, page 33)Awards and honors* Wilson (Colorado) was named for A. D. Wilson, a topographer with the Survey. He was in the first ascent party, which climbed the peak on September 13, 1874, via the south ridge (a difficult route, not often climbed today).(Walter R. Borneman and Lyndon J. Lampert, A Climbing Guide to Colorados Fourteeners (3rd ed.), Pruett Publishing, 1994, ISBN 0-87108-850-9, pp. 231-239.)* Peak - Elevation 14,017 feet - This peak high in the San Juan mountains above the old mining structures in the Silver Pick Basin was named for A.D. Wilson, a chief cartographer with the Survey.(http://www.toppeak.com/index.asp?addItemtrue&intProductId84 accessed January 28, 2009)*Glacier (Mount Rainier) - a medium-sized tributary glacier located on the southeast flank of Mount Rainier in Washington state.Publications* Report on the Primary Triangulation of Colorado in Haydens Tenth Annual Report, (1878), pages 275-309.* Geological and Geographical Atlas of Colorado and Portions of Adjacent Territory, 1877* Leadville special map (Lake County) Colorado. Geological Survey (1910)* Colorado, Tenmile District. Geological Survey (1897)(reprinted 1945)ReferencesExternal links* Historic Maps by A.D. Wilson
21337737
Harry_McDame
Henry Harry McDame (1826  c. 1900) was a Bahamas-born prospector in the California and Columbia gold rushes.(; much of the basic biography for this article is drawn from this cite.)  He arrived in the of British Columbia in 1858, along with many other blacks from California encouraged to move to the colony by Governor James Douglas and took up land near modern-day Quesnel.  He and his neighbour at Quensellemouthe, Giscome, explored and established a major route to the River Gold Rush at what became known as Portage, connecting the northern bend of the River with the River, thereby connecting the Fort George area to the Peace and, by a roundabout route, to the River goldfields.  They explored the Peace, Nation and Rivers, as reported in a column in the Colonist, December 15, 1863.  They prospected on Creek in the Omineca area in 1870, but in 1874, like thousands of others, went to the Country following reports of rich gold deposits around Dease Lake.McDame and Giscome, with other partners, formed the  Discovery Company and staked on what became known as McDames Creek (McDame Creek today).  British Columbia Mines Reports for 1874 for this area, by Commissioner Sullivan, comment I learn that a new creek has been discovered...now known as McDames Creek....Within 30 days they had extracted gold valued at $6000 (approx. $250,000 today).  In 1877 McDame Creek was the location of the find of a nugget weighing 72 ounces, worth $1,300 at the time ($52,000 today) and which is the largest nugget found in British Columbias history.(Notes on Placer Mining in British Columbia, British Columbia Dept of Mines Bulletin No. 21, originally published in 1946.)  McDame mined with his partners in this area until the early 1880s when McDame returned to the Omineca, discovering gold on Lorne Creek in 1884, but went broke later in the year and wound up in hospital in British Columbia.  He returned to the Omineca after his recovery, staking with a new partner, Sam Booth, and died in that region sometime before 1901.LegacyIn addition to McDame Creek, also named for him was McDame, originally known as McDame Post or McDames Creek Post, which was sold to the Bay Company in 1875 and has also been known as Fort McDame.  McDames Creek Indian Reserve No.2 is located in the same area and is named for the creek, which in the language is known as Kasha (the source word for the term Cassiar, referring to fibrous rock - or a crow).McDame also prospected in other areas, such as the Skeena, which was another route to both the Omineca and Cassiar gold districts; there he conferred a few placenames including Chimdemash Creek, the meaning of which is not known.()ReferencesFurther reading*BC Historical News, Vol 18, No.3, 1985
21348305
Taiping_Lake_Gardens
 website  http://www.mptaiping.gov.my/Taiping Lake Gardens is the first public garden established during British rule in Malaysia. The garden is located near Larut, within the town center and the Zoo.HistoryThe Taiping Lake Gardens was originally a mining site before it was established as a public garden in 1880. The idea of a public garden was dear to the heart of Colonel Sandilands Frowd Walker.()  It was developed by Charles Compton Reade (18801933), who was also responsible for planning the Lumpur garden town. The abandoned tin mine was donated by Chinese capitalist and former Perak State Council member Thye Phin (son of Keng Quee) as a recreation park for public use. In 1884 the gardens were planted with grasses, flowers and trees; a part of the gardens was fenced, to keep bulls out.()The  site was the first public garden in Malaya, and was cherished for its beauty; it has been well-maintained since its opening.  There are ten scenic lakes and ponds, which highlight the gardens. Along Residency Road, near the gardens, were golden rain trees () (pterocarpus indicus) planted along the pathway. In George L. Peets A Journal in the Federal Capital, when he visited Taiping in 1933 he said I know of no more lovely sight in this country than the Taiping gardens when the rays of the early morning sun are shining obliquely through their clumps of bamboo, palms and isolated trees scattered on islands among the expanse of water. One receives in that glorious half hour an experience of light in foliage that is quite unobtainable in England.There are few private and government houses located near the gardens; among them are the Old Residency (home of the Secretary to the Resident), the Rajas House at the junction of Birch Road and Residency Road and the army officers residences on Batu Tugoh Road. The gardens were so striking that they attracted many travelers to write of their beauty: Lakes and pondsthumb|Taiping Lake Gardens|altView across pond, with trees and hills in background*Alamanda Pond*Island Pond*Jungle Lake*Oblong Pond*Pavilion Pond*South Lake*Swan Lake*West LakeAccessibilityAirPenang International Airport is about a 90-minute drive from Taiping. Kuala Lumpur International Airport is about a four-hour drive south via the North-South Expressway.RoadTaiping is easily accessible from the PLUS North-South Expressway. From Penang (90 km away) Kamunting is the nearest exit, whilst Changkat Jering is the most convenient exit from the motorway if you are traveling north from Ipoh (70 km). Taiping is well-connected to the rest of Peninsular Malaysia by express buses, which arrive at and depart from the long-distance bus station at Kamunting (6 km from the town centre) and Simpang (7 km from the town centre). Buses also travel direct from Taiping to Singapore and Hat Yai. Southbound buses depart from Kamunting and call along Simpang (Medan Simpang) to pick up passengers from Simpang before heading to the highway via the Changkat Jering interchange. Bus tickets are available from counters located at Medan Kamunting and Medan Simpang.Rail Keretapi Tanah Melayu (formerly known as the Malayan Railway) operates a number of daily services along the main north-south line which stops at Taiping station. One service, the Ekspres Langkawi, connects Taiping with Hat Yai.Attractions*Lakes and ponds - There are about 10 man-made lakes and ponds distributed throughout the gardens.*Maxwell Hill (Bukit Larut) - A hill station with an altitude of about 1000m; ideal for jungle-trekking and camping. Accessible by four-wheel drive; accommodation available on the hilltop. No reservations; visitors must go early (at 8 am) to buy tickets for the day. Visitors must specify what time they want to go up and what time to come down. Cost is RM4.00 (US$1.40) per person, round trip. One option is to hike up, which takes an average of 2-3/4 hours (one way); the jeep journey takes 25 minutes.*Tulip garden - Located at Bukit Larut, it is the first tulip farm established in Malaysia. Admission to the tulip farm is RM1 (US$0.35) outside tulip season and RM2 (US$0.70) during the season.* Taiping Zoo and Night Safari Taiping - First zoo to be established in Malaysia; popular on weekends with day-trippers from out of town** Day zoo: adults RM12, child (312 years) RM8 (US$2.80); discounts available for school groups, senior citizens (age 55+) and tourist groups (20 or more); open 08:30-18:00, feeding times 10 am and noon** Night safari: adults RM16, child (312 years) RM10 (US$3.50); discounts available for senior citizens (55+) and tourist groups (20+); open 20:00-23:00 (closes at midnight on Saturdays and the eve of public holidays)ImagesFile:TaipingLake.jpg | Taiping LakeFile:Raintree.jpg| Rain treeFile:Taiping lake gardens with hills behind.jpg| View of Bukit Larut from gardensFile:TaipingZoo.PNG| Taiping ZooFurther reading*Eugene Khoo (2007), A History of Taiping, MalaysiaReferencesExternal links*The Star Newspaper*Pictures of Taiping Lake Gardens
21369707
The_Pill_Versus_the_Springhill_Mine_Disaster
The Pill Versus the Springhill Mine Disaster is Brautigans seventh poetry publication. A limited, signed, hard cover edition of fifty copies was issued simultaneously with the soft cover version of the first edition.The collection of ninety-eight poems includes thirty-eight that were previously uncollected.  The rest were  gathered from five of Brautigans previous poetry publications. In some cases, all of the poems from an earlier book were included in this volume.The title poem uses just four lines to draw a parallel between the 1958 mining disaster in Nova Scotia and the use by the authors lover of birth control pills, in that both leave life, with all of its potential, buried forever.*Entry on Brautigan.net*Images of First Limited Edition*Images of First Trade Edition
21392255
Fishing_industry_in_the_Maldives
The industry in the Maldives is the islands second main industry. According to national tradition in the words of former President Abdul Gayoom, Fishing is the lifeblood of our nation, it is inborn. From the soil on which we live, to the sea around us, it remains an integral part of our existence. Fishing, and our country and its people, are one and shall remain inseparable forever.( )The Maldives has an abundance of aquatic life and species of fish. Common are tuna, groupers, fish, barracuda, runner, trevally and squirrelfish and many more. Aside from being of essential importance to the economy, fishing is also a popular recreational activity in the Maldives, not only among locals but by tourists. The islands have numerous fishing resorts which cater for these activities.The Maldives is an archipelago in the Ocean, located south west of the southern tip of India. Its population in 2008 was 386,000.( There are twenty-six atolls containing 1,192 islets, of which two hundred and fifty islands are inhabited. The low level of islands makes them vulnerable to sea level rises.(Historythumb|left|The Maldives is a chain of 1190 small coral islands, grouped into 26 atollsFishing has long been the life blood of the Maldivian economy.( Today it still employs half the Maldivian workforce. Formerly, Maldives shipped 90 percent of its fishing catch of tuna in dried form to Lanka.() However, because Sri Lanka cut back its imports of such fish, in 1979 Maldives joined with the Japanese Marubeni Corporation to form the Maldives Nippon Corporation that canned and processed fresh fish.( Also in 1979 the Maldivian government created the Industrial Fisheries Company.(  This company controls the processing and exporting of frozen and canned tuna. They also provide a collector vessel. All fishing is undertaken by the private sector and its involvement in processing and export is increasing.(Progress has also been made as a result of fisheries development projects undertaken by the Bank. Harbour and refrigeration facilities have been improved, leading to a fourfold increase in earnings from canned fish between 1983 and 1985.(  Further construction of fisheries refrigeration installations and related facilities such as collector vessels were underway in 1994, with funding both from Japan and the World Bank.The tiny, low-lying islands have an average elevation of a few feet above sealevel. The highest elevation of any island is not more than three and a half meters.(Government of Maldives and United Nations Post-Tsunami Lessons Learned and Best Practices Workshop 2005.) Although the Maldives were in the direct path of the 2004 Indian Ocean tsunami, little permanent damage resulted to the coral beds and fishing grounds.(Assessment of Damage to Maldivian Coral Reefs and Baitfish Populations from the Indian Ocean Tsunam)The mainstays of the Maldives economy are its fisheries and tourism. Both are intrinsically related to the reefs.(FAO: Maldives: Executive Summary) The fisheries were the dominant sector of the economy until 1985, when the tourism industry overtook the fisheries in terms of its contribution to GDP. However fisheries continue to provide an important source of income for about 20 percent of the population, with about 22,000 individuals involved in full-time fishing activities.(StatisticsThe following table shows the total volume of aquatic species caught in the Maldives, as reported by the FAO,( for all commercial, industrial, recreational and subsistence purposes.Almost half of the catch is consumed locally.(EEZImage:Coral atoll formation animation.gif|thumb|right|Corals (tan and purple) settle and grow around an oceanic island, forming a reef. The interior island subsides, eventually disappearing beneath the water, leaving a ring of still growing coral with an open lagoon in its centre. This process of atoll formation can take as long as 30 million years.As with other countries, the Maldivian  economic zone (EEZ) gives its industry special fishing rights.(* United Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea - Part V) It covers about 900,000 square kilometres. This area, plus the inland areas, are the areas which the Maldives can, under international law, regard as its fishing grounds.For most coastal countries, the EEZ roughly coincides with the shelf, the fishing rich area of relatively shallow water, less than 200 metres deep, that extends from most continental coastlines. The EEZ gives fishing and mineral rights to this shelf. In the case of the Madives, there is no continental shelf, since the Maldives are not part of a continent. The coral atoll equivalent of a continental shelf is the shallow coral floors surrounding the islands and within the coral basins and lagoons. The total land (not immersed) area of the islands is about 300 km2(, and the total coral shelf area is about 35,000 km2.(This shelf area is large compared to the land area (120 times larger), but still small compared to deep ocean part of the Maldivian EEZ (30 times smaller).There are four areas in the Maldives where fisheries can operate.* Land areas: The islands in the Maldives are too small to have inland lakes and rivers, so there are no inland fisheries. Nor have there been any land based aquaculture activities to date.* Coral lagoons: Many of the islands in the Maldives have subsided, leaving lagoons wholly or partially enclosed by a ring of coral (see diagrams below right). These lagoons team with reef fish and other aquatic life.* The outer coral shelf: which slopes away steeply, and does not offer as rich fishing grounds as the inner lagoons do.* Deep ocean: which is by far the largest part of the Maldivian EEZ. This area is inhabited by fish, small schooling fish, sometimes called fish, and larger fish who predate on them, such as tuna and shark. By far, the greatest volume of catch in the Maldives comes from this area.Bait fisheriesDifferent types of bait fishing are used in Maldive. Most common method is night time using lights.Reef fisheriesFile:Maldives - Kurumba Island.jpg|thumb|left|Island, subsiding asymmetrically within its fringing reef in the MaldivesFile:Maldives small island.jpg|thumb|right|Subsided island leaves a coral lagoon in the MaldivesReef fisheries are fisheries for reef fish and other organisms that live among reefs. The Maldives contain 2.86 percent of the world coral reefs.( The FAO estimated in 1992 that a sustainable yield of about 30,000 tonnes per year was possible for commercial reef fish. The atoll basins, which are by far the largest part of the Maldivian atolls, were identified as having large reef fish resources. Outside the atolls, the deep reef slopes support some high value species, but their total potential yield is relatively small.(Anderson, R. C.; Waheed Z.; Rasheed. M. and Arif, A. (1992) Reef Fish Resources Survey in the Maldives - Phase II FAO: Working paper: BOBP/WP/80.)Larger commercial reef fish, such as medium to large snapper, grouper, emperor and reef associated jack, are best caught by handlines and longlines.( Other resources include fish, and non invertebrates, such as sea cucumber, lobster, clam and coral. An increase in demand for reef fish from the tourism industry and overseas markets has raised the level of exploitation of particular reef fish varieties.(In terms of value, grouper have been the most significant component of the reef fishery. The grouper fishery has also come under pressure due to demand from local tourism and international markets. The grouper fishery has been sustainable so far, but there is very little potential for expansion under current practices, and a strict management regime is required.(Exports of fish from the Maldives is increasing. Currently, about 100 species of fish are exported, with 20 species comprising over 75 percent of the trade. Some species exported are rare in the Maldives, and are vulnerable to overexploitation.( fishing is occasionally practiced in the Maldives to capture aquarium fish.Shark have been fished for centuries in the Maldives. The main groups of sharks caught in the Maldives are sharks, deep water sharks and ocean sharks. The reef shark fishery generates more revenue for the fisheries and tourism than the other groups. Shark fisheries continue to be exploited, particularly for export purposes.(The lobster fishery is mainly targeted for the local tourist industry.(File:Lutjanus kasmira school.jpg|thumb|right|Schooling snapper,lutjanus kasmira, in the Maldivescoral has been harvested from reef beds for centuries, and the market for them is increasing. In the absence of adequate controls and monitoring, it is difficult to estimate how many people or areas are engaged in exploiting red coral.(Other coastal resources such as cowrie and cuttlefish play a nominal role, and can be sustainably exploited at the present level. However, resources that can be cultured such as giant clams, sea cucumber, some species of aquarium fish, and turtles, have considerable potential.(Pelagic fisheriesFile:Moofushi Kandu fish.jpg|thumb|right|trevally sizing up schooling anchovies, in the MaldivesImage:Tuna.jpg|thumb|right|tunaPelagic fisheries are fisheries for pelagic fish, that is, for fish that are offshore in the open ocean, such as small schooling fish, sometimes called fish, and larger fish who predate on them, such as tuna and ocean sharks.The major fishery in the Maldives is the tuna fishery. The most important tuna species is the tuna, although they are coming under increasing pressure. Next most important, in terms of fish exports from the Maldives, is the large tuna.(The tuna are caught by the following methods: and line, handline and longline. The pole and line method is most commonly used, and results in 90 percent (2002) of the total fish catch.( This traditional use of the pole and line method in the Maldivian tuna industry has contributed to the sustainability of the tuna resources. With recent further improvements in fishing gear and methods, it appears that the catch levels may be close to the sustainable yield.(However, an even more extensive and sustainable coastal resource is fish, such as anchovies and herring. This fishery is an integral part of the pole and line tuna fishery, since tuna feed on the forage fish. Future development of the traditional pole and line tuna fishery depends on the availability of this bait fishery. Catch rate for forage fish have increased greatly in recent years, but there is not enough data to really know what the current status of the forage stocks are.(File:Maldivesfish3.jpg|thumb|left|Maldivian fishermen using The and line method.For poles, Maldivian fishermen use a bamboo or plastic construction pole, typically 10 to  in length and capable of handling a fish weighing as much as , with a line and a feathered barb-less hook attached to the smaller end of the pole.( The fishermen will go out at the start of a fishing day in their dhoni boats, looking for live bait such as small scads, silver side and sardine, which are kept alive by the specialised fresh seawater circulating system of the dhoni. With bait on board they then go out looking for schools of tuna.()However a variety of different types of fishing are practised in the Maldives. Very popular is evening fishing just before the sunset.( Recreational fishing is seasonal, dictated to by the monsoons. game fishing is particularly popular with tourists who will go out on boats with local fishermen and catch big game for sport.MaricultureMariculture is the culture of marine organisms in seawater. The islands in the Maldives are too small to have inland fisheries, nor are there land based aquaculture activities at present. Fishing occurs in reef, coastal and offshore waters. However, various forms of mariculture are being experimentally trialled, such as the culture of pearls, clams, lobsters, bche-de-mer and grouper.(Seaweed culture has been trialled with little success so far. Nonetheless, culture appears promising given the extensive reef areas which can provide suitable habitats. Culturing crabs in mangrove areas is also a possibility.(Sea cucumbers have been an important coastal resource. They were a very successful fishery to begin with, but have been overfished and need appropriate management to recover. Cultured sea cucumbers have considerable potential, although forage and grouper fisheries can be negatively affected by waste water from sea cucumbers.(MarketingFile:Maldivesfishmarket.jpg|thumb|left|A Fish Market in MalThe capital of the Maldives, Mal is known for its busy markets.( Fish is an integral part of the Maldivian diet and it is a common sight to see office workers in formal white shirts and ties on bicycles after work taking skipjack home to eat.( Trolleys packed full of fresh tuna or skipjack are carted around in door to door sales. Tuna however is the most important fish, and in recent years in the Maldives the industry has become more efficient, using tuna waste and residue to be processed into fishmeal, an animal food supplement, further contributing to the economy.( The tuna industry in the Maldives has been greatly helped by The State Trading Organisation which rebuilt the efficient tuna cannery plant on the island of Felivaru.( The canning process typically takes four days, and the plant has the benefits of modern technology and even a laboratory for research and quality control.(Fishing fleetFile:Traditional Maldivian Dhoni.jpg|thumb|right|Dhonis are the traditional fishing boat of the Maldives.The islands of the Maldives have an extensive fleet of small fishing boats, built domestically, each of which can carry about eight to twelve persons. These boats are called dhonis.In 1995 there were 1,674 vessels, of which motorised vessels for coastal pole and line tuna fishing accounted for 1,407 vessels. Of the remainder, 5 were sailing dhoni (masdhoni), 48 were mechanised dhoni (vadhudhoni), 209 were vadhudhoni with sails, and 5 were rowing boats used to troll reef waters.(Based on a US$3.2 million loan from the Development Association(IDA), most of the boats were mechanized in the course of the 1980s.(  Although the addition of motors increased fuel costs, it resulted in doubling the fishing catch between 1982 and 1985. Moreover, the 1992 catch of 82,000 tons set a record; for example, in 1987 the catch was 56,900 tons.(The dhoni, which with its variants, makes up almost the entire fleet, is a small open boat traditionally built from coconut wood, although wood imported from Southeast Asia and fibreglass is increasingly used. Originally sailing craft, nowadays these boats are usually fitted with motors. The main site for building dhonis is in Alifushi Raa Atoll. This boat building is a traditional craft in the Maldives, and young apprentices are still trained by skilled craftsmen. Boats crafted from timber take about 60 days to complete.IssuesOverfishing has occurred for* corals - These were presumably once abundant on Maldivian reefs. Over the last two decades large quantities were removed, and they are now protected.(* clams - The giant clam fishery was very short-lived, lasting about a year from 1990. This exploitation of the giant clam was very destructive to the reefs and the government banned the fishery in 1991.(* Turtles - Turtles have been exploited for local trade and consumption for hundreds of years. They were further exploited to provide curios for the tourists. A moratorium on catching turtles is has been in force since 1995.(* Sea cucumbers - The most popular species of sea cucumbers have been overexploited,   resulting in near collapse of the fishery in 1997.(Environmental issues include pollution. Examples are increasing risks of spills from oil tankers, and industrial discharges from countries to the north, such as organochlorine residues such as DDT, and heavy metals such as mercury, cadmium, lead, and arsenic.( Certain destructive methods used when fish aggregating can cause irreversible damage to the coral reefs, as can boats dropping anchors. Toxic household chemicals have been used when forage fishing.( There has been a loss of coastal habitats associated with dredging harbours, reclamation, and the mining of coral and sand for construction. This has affected seagrass beds, mangroves and coral reefs. The significance of mangroves areas to the coastal and marine fishery has not been adequately studied.(Outside aid programmes have initiated reef monitoring projects in the Maldives. However, monitoring has been discontinued when projects have finished, and little of this information has been used to inform decision-making. The Maldives needs to maintain continuity in monitoring, and coordinate its approach to managing its reefs.(Rajasuriya, A., K. Venkataraman, E.V. Muley, H. Zahir and B. Cattermoul (2002) Status of Coral Reefs in South Asia: Bangladesh, India, Maldives, Sri Lanka In: C.R. Wilkinson (ed.), Status of coral reefs of the world: 2002. GCRMN Report, Australian Institute of Marine Science, Townsville. Chapter 6, pp 101-121.)ProspectsFactors which have contributed to increasing catches of fish include an increasing number of mechanised and motorised boats, installation of aggregating devices which improve the efficiency of fishing activities, and improvements in infrastructure for collecting and handling the fish catch. Of the pelagic species, skipjack tuna has been almost exclusively exploited. The pelagic fisheries may have considerable expansion potential, especially further from the coast, targeting species such as yellowfin. Demersal and reef species can also be exploited at higher levels. At present, development is limited by limited local facilities for storing and transporting fish.(Future prospects are partly a matter of the quality of fisheries research and management. Research is coordinated and carried out by the government run Marine Research Centre.(Marine Research Centre) The FAO Bay of Bengal Programme is exploring the reef and tuna fish, and facilitating a management system. The United Kingdom is helping investigations into the recovey of coral reefs, the status of tuna stocks, and possibilities for coral mining and further marketing. Canada is helping research into  coral reefs and the implementation of marine surveillance facilities.(See also* in Maldives* aid to Maldives* in the Maldives* of the MaldivesNotes:This article incorporates public domain text form the of CongressReferences* Anderson, R.C. and Ahmed, Hudha (1993) The Shark Fisheries of the Maldives FAO, Rome, Miscellaneous Publication: BOBP/MIS/7* Haglund Heelas, A.M. (1994) Fisheries Extension Services in the Maldives FAO, Rome, Report BOBP/REP/62.* FAO: Manual Boat Hauling Devices in The Maldives Rome, Working paper: BOBP/WP/71.* SAUP: Fishing subsidies in the Maldives* SAUP: Country profile* Van Der Knaap MV, Waheed Z, Shareef S and Rasheed M (1990) Reef Fish Resources Survey in the Maldives FAO, Rome, Working paper: BOBP/WP/64.External links*Fishing at Maldives.com*Sailing and fishing*Fishing safety* Marine Protected Areas in the Maldives* www.reefbase.org search on Maldives
21405709
Eduardo_Avaroa_Andean_Fauna_National_Reserve
 governing_body  Servicio Nacional de reas Protegidas (SERNAP)The Eduardo Avaroa Andean Fauna National Reserve (Reserva Nacional de Fauna Andina Eduardo Avaroa; Spanish acronym: REA) is located in Lpez Province.  Situated in the far southwestern region of Bolivia, it is the countrys most visited area.() It is considered the most important protected area in terms of tourist influx in the Department.Located at an altitude between  and  in Bolivia, it extends over an area of  and includes the Laguna Coloreada National Wildlife Sanctuary. Categorized under IUCN Category IV, it is primarily for the protection of birds that inhabit the different lagoons in the reserve.(() The reserve protects part of the Andean dry puna (oligothermic) ecoregion.()() The reserves major attractions are erupting volcanoes, hot springs, geysers, lakes, fumaroles, mountains and its three endemic species of flamingos in particular.()()()HistoryEstablished in 1953, the national park is named after Avaroa (18381879), the Bolivian war hero of the 19th century. It was created by Supreme Decree (SD) of 13 December 1973 and extended on May 14, 1981.GeographyFile:Arbol de Piedra.jpg|thumb|left|200px|de Piedra (stone tree), an unusual rock formation, about 7 meters high, carved by wind-blown sand in the Eduardo Avaroa Andean Fauna National Reserve.The reserve is situated in the southern region of mountains in southwestern Bolivia. The highest mountain in the range is Avaroa, which borders with Chile and Argentina. The mountains rise to heights varying from . The basin features depict active volcanoes, hot springs, geysers and fumaroles, and a parallel has been drawn with the National Park in the US. Its water resources are limited to lakes and salt water lagoons due to very low rainfall of  annually.(( Two communities, Quetena Chico and Quetena Grande, lie within the reserve.(Lakes include Laguna Verde, Colorada, Laguna Salada, Laguna Busch and Hedionda. Laguna Colorada lies at an altitude of  and covers . It is named after the effect of wind and sun on the micro-organism that live in it.( The lake is very shallow, less than  deep, and supports some 40 bird species, providing pink algae to population of rare Flamingoes who can walk across it.(()An unusual natural feature of attraction (much photographed) in the reserve is an isolated rock formation projecting out of the sand dunes of Siloli at a place known as de Piedra.  It is about  north of Laguna Colorada. It is known as the Stone Tree as it is in the shape of a stunted tree, which is formed as a thin rock due to strong wind action.()()The climate in winter (May to August) is dry, generally with no rain during the summer (December to April). The average temperature is . The lowest temperatures are recorded during the months of May, June and July.The park contains the following mountains:*Sairecabur  5,981 m, border with Chile*Putana  5,776 m*Licancabur  5,415 m, border with Chile*Piedras Grandes  5,710 m*Chijilla  5,709 m*Callejn Chico  5,708 m*Aguas Calientes  5,684 m*Villama  5,678 m, border with Argentina*Bravo  5,656 m*Sanabria  5,654 m*Loromayu  5,641 m*Silata Chahuna  5640 m*Juriques  5,626, border with Chile*Poderosa  5,614 m*Quebrada Honda  5,593 m*Guayagues  5,584 m*Cahuna  5,583 m*Huaylla Jarita  5,578 m*Amarillo  5,560 m*Tres Cumbres  5,509 m*Pabeilln  5,498 m*Aguita Brava  5,485 m*Baratera  5,484 m*Bajo  5,468 m, border with Argentina*Puripica Chico  5,464 m*Suriphuyo  5,458 m*Panizo  5,456 m*Tinte  5,384 m, border with Argentina*Brajma  5,356 m*Guacha  5,340 m*Viscachillos  5,301 m*Lagunitas  5,287 m*Michina  5,287 m*Colorado  5,264 m*Sandoncito  5,252 m*Lagunitas  5,203 m*Estrato  5,193 m*Letrato  5,193 m*Chicalin  5,123 m*Cojita  5,116 m*Zapaleri  5,090 m, border with Argentina and Chile*Nelli  5,078 m*Linzor  5,069 m*Puntas Negras  4,963 m*Totoral  4,963 m*Cueva Blanca  4,957 m*Chaco Seguro  4,948 m*Loromita  4,846 mCultureQuetena Chico, founded in the 1920s, has a population 520, while Quetena Grande, founded shortly thereafter, is the smaller of the two and has a population of 180. Although the inhabitants are of Quechua decent, their primary language is Spanish. Health care and schooling were unavailable until the 1990s, while electricity and potable water systems were also unavailable at least until 2005.( Near Quetena Chico, there are some archaeological remains, jaranas (stone huts), tambos (trail markers), rock paintings, and  a ceremonial site lying in a depression between two volcanoes.() Atulcha (or Chullpares), is an archeological site with mummies in a cave on Tunupa Volcano.EconomyThe most important income generating activity for the two local communities has been camelid farming, selling llama wool and meat. With the restriction on fox hunting subsequent to the REA, community members livelihoods have been negatively affected as the fox is the principal predator of llamas. Before establishment of the REA, flamingo egg sales provided monetary income to locals.( The park visitor centre is located in Quetena Chico and tourism is growing steadily as, in 2007 there were over 67,000 visitors, six times the number reported in 1997.() In addition to working in the tourist trade, locals pan for gold in the Ro Quetena.Mining is a major industry in and around the reserve, rich in natural resources of veins of lead, zinc and silver. As a result, 61 mining concessions are located in the park. Also extracted are its nonmetallic mineral resources like sulfur and ulexite the evaporating mineral. Ulexite is converted to acid and is exported to the United States, Europe, Asia and Australia.(FloraThe reserve in the Andean has vegetation consisting of tropical alpine herbs with dwarf shrubs of the forests of Polylepis.( Plant and tree species are reportedly about 190 species, in the harsh terrain, which have emerged given the conditions of salinity, lack of fresh water, low temperatures, and scarcity of nutrients. Flora restricted to this and other ecoregions include the genera Barneoudia, Hexaptera, Nototriche, Pycnophyllum and Werneria. The vegetation is characterized by the strong presence of pasture grass (straw) such as feather grass (ichu)  in some plains and hillsides. The important plant species on which people are dependent for fuel wood in the area is yareta, which grows in the forest of the reserve at  per year amidst rocky terrain. This hardwood tree, which looks like a foamy bubble bath but is as hard as stone, grows slowly, attaining a height of about  in height with girth of  and can be as old as 3000 years.(( In places with higher humidity, Tola or Thola (Parastrephia lepidophylla), Quinoa and Kenua bush tree are found.(The villagers use vegetation as fuel for heating and cooking.FaunaFile:Andean Flamingos Laguna Colorada Bolivia Luca Galuzzi 2006.jpg|thumb|left|200px| Flamingos, Colorada.The reserve is habitat for ten reptile species (including two reptiles of the genera Liolaemus), amphibians and fish. Other domesticated animals that are raised in 500 villages inhabited by Quetena Grande and Quetena Chico communities are the llamas and alpacas; however, grazing by these animals on the native grasses and plants in the reserve has a detrimental effect on the conservation of the park.((The fauna is characterized by the presence of species that have adapted to extreme living conditions in the region, some of them endangered. The reserve is home to 80 species of birds. Out of six flamingo species in the world, three species namely, Chilean, Andean and James flamingos are found in very large numbers in the freshwater lakes and saltwater lagoons of the reserve; of the  chilensis, andinus and jamesi flamingos in the reserve, their population recorded in 1994 as 26,600.( In addition, the reserve is also the habitat for 80 more species of birds, which include the falcons, ducks, Rhea (pennata), Tinamou (pentlandii) and Goose (melanoptera).(( Endemic birds found in this ecoregion also include the endangered Ash-breasted tit-tyrant (alpinus); the critically threatened royal cinclodes (aricomae), the vulnerable Berlepschs canastero (berlepschi); and species of least concern the line-fronted canastero (urubambensis), scribble-tailed canastero (maculicauda), short-tailed finch (Idiopsar bracyurus), and gray-bellied flower-piercer (Diglosa carbonaria).((Mammals reported in the protected reserve are 23 species, which include pumas, Andean foxes (Pseudalopex culpaeus) and vizcacha (rabbit -like), and also species of vicuas (Vicugna vicugna), suri, condor, keua, puma (Felis concolor), andean cat (Felis jacobita), and quirquincho (Chaetophractus nationi).((ThreatsThe region of Polylepis forests as a whole has been subject to heavy degradation. The overuse of tarapacana, and compacta has brought the reserve under severe stress. It is due to overgrazing by domesticated animals, use of forest trees for fuel, burning, clearance for cultivation and due to dumping of tailings or mining wastes. Tourism is also perceived as a threat to the park environment and the tourism industry has reported a visitation of a large number of people annually to the reserve; the security forces engaged for protecting the park is inadequate to meet this challenge. Human disturbance, soil erosion, wastes in lakes and lagoons, and fecal coliform runoff from waste are also identified reasons affecting the conservation of flamingos.((ConservationVerde y Blanca desde la cumbre del Licancabur.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Laguna Verde and Volcn LicancaburThe Conservancy and the Bolivian National Protected Areas Service (SERNAP) has the onus for operating and maintaining the reserve with its trained 14 park guards who are provided with patrol vehicles and two-way radios. However, keeping in view the growing influx of tourists to the park and other threats from other sources as reported, SERNAP has prepared a Master Plan for park management plan subsuming ecotourism as an essential component to generate financial resources.( According to Andy Drumm, director of the Ecotourism Program, entrance fees at the reserve amounted to about $200,000 in 2006.() This necessitated a scientific study on the carrying capacity of the reserve due to large influx of tourists. However, SERNAP is associating the TROPICO (created in 1986 as a non-governmental, non-profit organization for biodiversity conservation in Bolivia.()) as its conservancy partner to introduce and enforce environmental regulations in the reserve.(Parks in Peril (PiP), a program of intervention, a collaboration between the Agency for International Development (USAID), and the Nature Conservancy to Preserve our Natural Heritage provided funding for conservations works of the reserve, which is one of the most economically backward areas. This funding, provided between 1999 and 2002, enabled PiP to work in association with the SERNAP and the Nature Conservancy, and TROPICO providing the supervisory services, to evolve a self sustaining strategy of utilizing park entrance fee for conservation related aspects. This experience gained from this pilot model for ecotourism is now replicated in other parks in Bolivia.() Other strategies adopted for conservation of the reserve were: Restricting visitor access to some of the reserves vulnerable resources; providing natural gas and solar energy as cooking fuel replacing wood cutting from the reserve; agricultural extension services to educate farmers on better methods of farming; improvement of infrastructure in the reserve including staffing for patrolling and security; and collection of scientific data.(References External links * Eduardo Avaroa Andean Fauna National Reserve (in Spanish)Nacional de Fauna Andina Eduardo AbaroaNacional de Fauna Andina Eduardo Avaroanationale de faune andine Eduardo AvaroaAbaroa And faunos nacionalinis rezervatasAbaroa anti fauna mama llaqta risirwaAvaroan suojelualue
21419070
Martha_Mine
The Martha Mine is a gold mine owned by the Mining Corporation in the New Zealand town of Waihi.HistoryWilliam Nicholl marked out a  claim, calling it Martha after a family member.( Several smaller claims were later merged to form the Martha Company. By 1882 the first battery to break gold-bearing rock was in operation. The Martha Mine eventually grew into one of the worlds most important gold and silver mines, after industrial cyanide processes made recovering gold from the low-grade ores easier. Waihi prospered with the mine, by 1908 being the fastest-growing town in the Auckland Province, three times the size of Hamilton.(Gold Fever (from the History & Heritage section of the Waihi.org website))ProductionIssuesSome environmental protests occurred during the 1987 consenting process for further mine operations. In 2001, subsidence in the area caused a collapse of a house, and the operating company has recently agreed to pay compensation to about 130 households for various negative effects due to noise, blast vibrations and dust.(Martha mine may test goodwill, says report - The Dominion Post, Saturday 14 March 2009, Page C7)See also*in New Zealand*WatchdogReferencesExternal links*Newmont Waihi Gold Ltd - Martha MineMine
21433768
Dowty_Group
Dowty Group was a leading British manufacturer of aircraft equipment. It was listed on the Stock Exchange and was once a constituent of the 100 Index but was acquired by Group in 1992.HistoryThe Company was founded by Dowty in 1935 making aircraft equipment in Cheltenham under the name Dowty Aviation.(Gloucester Transport History) In its early years the Company invented the first internally sprung aircraft wheel and went on to make landing gear for Whittles jet-propelled Gloster aeroplane.( In 1960 the Company acquired Rotol Airscrews, giving it a propeller manufacturing capability (Dowty Rotol).( In 1961 it acquired Paul Aircraft, no longer a large scale manufacturer of aircraft, producing research aircraft, but producing powered control units for aircraft as well as other activities.(University of Wolverhampton: Local history) This was named Dowty Boulton Paul Ltd. In the 1960s the Company went on to develop fuel control systems for the jump jet and power controls for Concorde.(Dowty Group collaborated with the French Group Messier on aircraft landing gear and hydraulics over a long period of time.In the late 1980s the Company diversified into telecommunications and computer equipment acquiring Datatel, a software business, in 1987,(Dowty Group acquires Datatel Inc) Case Group plc, a telecommunications business, in 1988(Dowty Group launches tender offer for Case Group) and Dataco, a provider of network services, in 1990.(Dowty Group launches a tender offer for Dataco)OperationsThe Company manufactured hydraulic and actuation systems, advanced propeller systems, turbine engine components and tubular systems, as well as owning the Hamble aircraft structures business.(GE Aviation: History) The Dowty Group was also a market leader in the manufacturing of Mining systems solutions (Dowty Mining Equipment)Demise of the businessThe Company was acquired by Group in 1992.(British engineering firms merger moves forward New York Times, 1992)In 1993 TI Group hived off seven former Dowty Group companies engaged in the manufacture of electronic equipment by way of a management buy-out to form Electronics.()In 1994 TI Group transferred the Dowty landing gear business into a joint venture formed with SNECMA known as Messier-Dowty:( in 1998 that business became wholly owned by Safran. See also *industry in the United KingdomReferences
21472642
Awa-Kwaiker_people
footnotes   The Aw (or Kwaiker) are an ancient people that inhabit the regions of northern Ecuador (provinces of Carchi and Sucumbios) and southern Colombia (particularly the departments of Nario y Putumayo). Their entire population is around 32,555 members.( They speak a language called Awapit.ReserveThe Awa Reserve was established in northwestern Ecuador in 1987. The reserve combines indigenous and forestry legislature, so that the Awa people could manage the forest and their own lands.( This reserve is in the Chocoanos Forest within the Tumbes-Choc-Magdalena region, one of the most biodiverse places on the planet. Unfortuately logging and mining interests are illegally active in the reserve.(SubstistenceThe Awa traditionally hunt, gather, fish, and cultivate plants. Today, they also farm livestock, such as chickens, ducks, guinea pigs, and pigs.(Chernela 177)They practice a form of agriculture called slash and mulch, which involves clearing small parcels of land (about 1.25 to 5 acres) and leaving the fallen plants and trees to decay. Within days the vegetation turns to a layer of humus, favorable for planting. These parcels are cultivated for two or three seasons, then left fallow for periods of over seven years. They practice intercropping and grow many different varieties of manioc and plantains.(Chernela 175) They also grow maize, Colocasia, Xanthosoma, beans, sugarcane, hot peppers, chirimoya, tomato, tamarind, mango, achiote, borojo, naranjilla, papaya, inga, avocado, palm, and other useful plants.(Chernela 175-6) The trees outlive the annual plants and foster regrowth while the plots are left fallow.(Chernela 176)Awa hunt games such as the American Agouti, paca, collared peccary, deer, iguana, and several birds. Hunting is regulated on Awa land.(OrganizationsTheir main organization is called UNIPA, which stands for Unity of Indigenous People Awa. Another internal organization is CAMAWARI. Their main leaders are called Governors. Awa actively participate in local politics since 1993 when they elected the first mayor of in the municipality of Ricaurte (Juan Legarda) and several municipal counsellors. Since that year Awa people has continued to play an important role in the politics of the department of Nario.ConflictsThere have been several mass murders of Aw in 2009 by FARC rebels and by Colombian army.(http://www.amnesty.org/en/news-and-updates/news/third-mass-killing-colombia-awa-indigenous-peoples-2009-20090828)In 11 February 2009, 10 Awa members were killed by the Armed Forces of Colombia (FARC) guerrillas, who accused them of working as informers for the army.(Colombian rebels say 8 Indians killed as informers.).In 4 February 17 Aw were killed, reportedly by the FARC. In August 2009, twelve Aw of the same family were killed in Indigenous reservation of Gran Rosario, reportedly by the Colombian Army.(NotesReferences*Chernela, Janet M. The Awa of Ecuador. Stonich, Susan C., ed. Endangered Peoples of Latin America: Sturggles to Survive and Thrive. Westport, CT: Greenwood Press, 2001. ISBN 0-313-30856-X.External links*The Awa: Colombias tribal people, BBC News* Ecuador: The Awa People and their territory between political interests and economic pressure, World Rainforest Movement* Aw Kwaiker on Every Culture(Kwaiker)es:Aw(nationalit indigne)hr:Awa-Kwaikerit:Aw-Cuaiquerruna
21486748
Robin_Hemley
Robin Hemley, born May 28, 1958 in York City, is a Jewish American nonfiction and fiction writer, author of eight books, most recently, DO-OVER! In which a forty-eight-year-old father of three returns to kindergarten, summer camp, the prom, and other embarrassments (Little, Brown, May, 2009). His other writing includes Turning Life Into Fiction (2006), Extreme Fiction: Fabulists and Formalists (anthology, with Michael Martone, 2004), Invented Eden: The Elusive, Disputed History of the Tasaday (2003), Nola: A Memoir of Faith, Art, and Madness (1998), The Big Ear, stories (1994), The Last Studebaker, a novel (1992), All You Can Eat, stories (1988), and The Mouse Town, stories (1987).BiographyRobin Hemley was born to a literary family. His parents were both translators and editors of the work of Nobel Laureate Bashevis Singer, and his father, Cecil Hemley, was co-founder of The Noonday Press.He graduated from Indiana University in Comparative Literature in 1980 and from the of Iowa with an MFA in Fiction in 1982.He has received a Fellowship as well as fellowships from the Illinois Arts Council, the North Carolina Arts Council, the Ohioana Library Association, and the Washington State Arts Council.He has had artist residencies at the Colony, the Arts Work Center in Provincetown, Ragdale, and the Edward Albee Foundation.His awards include two Pushcart Prizes for Fiction, first place in the Nelson Algren Award for Fiction from The Chicago Tribune, and the Independent Press Book Award for Nonfiction.Since 2004, he has taught at the University of Iowa where he was hired as the Director of the Nonfiction Writing Program, and since 2000 he has taught at Vermont College (now College of Fine Arts) where he served as Faculty Chair for three years. He has also taught at the of Utah, Washington University, Lawrence University, and the of North Carolina at Charlotte.At Western Washington University, he edited The Bellingham Review for five years and founded the Wolff Award for Fiction and the Dillard Award for Nonfiction. At the University of Iowa, he founded the NonfictioNow Conference in 2005.He lives in City, Iowa, is married, and has four daughters.External links* Official web site* Departmental website, University of IowaSelected critical commentary DO-OVER! In Which a forty-eight-year-old father of three returns to kindergarten, summer camp, the prom, and other embarrassments Robin Hemley is on my very short list of writers I not only wish to read, not only need to read, but downright cant wait to read. Do-Over! is quintessential Hemley, full of wit and invention and brilliant language and warm humanity and when you least expect it-mid-bellylaugh, mid-bon mot-he will sneak up on you with a dazzlingly smart, deep-cutting insight into human nature. Do-Over! is an instant classic.  Robert Olen Butler, Pulitzer Prize-winning author of A Good Scent from a Strange MountainRobin Hemley has pulled out all the stops and managed to take that familiar wistful longingthe if-only sensation we have in regarding the pastand turned disappointment and chagrin into exhilarating time-travel. This series of reprises from childhood and youth has a charm that goes beyond a backward look, and becomes a touching mid-life memoir in which the heart of a child is soothed and liberated.  Patricia Hampl, author of The Florists DaughterWhile it is frequently laugh-out-loud funny, what makes this book so absolutely endearing is the honesty and tender, humane insight of the author, and his reluctant, hard-won willingness to forgive his former self. A screwball premise winningly pulled off, Do-Over! should charm readers everywhere.  Phillip Lopate, author of Portrait of My BodyDo-Over! is one of the funniest, wisest, most perfectly observed books Ive ever read. Robin Hemley possesses a keen insight into the all-too-human wish to rectify our past mistakes. He also knows that we are better for having made them.  Bernard Cooper, author of The Bill From My FatherInvented Eden: The Elusive, Disputed History of the TasadayBesides a terrific story, Invented Eden is a savvy caution.  Harpers MagazineHemley, a thoughtful novelist and memoirist, painstakingly unravels a dense snarl of romantic notions, political agendas, scientific rivalries, thorny personalities, and rampant misperceptions to disclose a far stranger tale.  BooklistWhats best about the book is Hemleys insistence on ambiguity; the truth, he notes, cannot be known because there is no one truth, but many different, overlapping strategies for interpreting the world.... By staking out a middle ground between Elizalde and the skeptics, Hemley enlarges Invented Eden, turning it into a book not just about one tribe but about the way we consider tribal culture as a whole.  David Ulin, Chicago TribuneRobin Hemleys book is a brave and wholly convincing attempt to find the truth concerning the anthropological fraud of the century.  James Hamilton-Paterson, London Review of BooksTurning Life Into FictionTurning Life into Fiction is simply the best guide to writing fiction I have read.  Altar MagazineAn enlightening and even inspiring guide to utilizing elements of ones own life and of ones family history as fodder for writing novels and short stories.  BooklistIf you write fiction, listen up, look around, and take note. Why strain your brain making things up when you can transform real life into stories worth telling? Hemley recommends keeping a journal (Its akin to an artists sketchbook), writing down your dreams (the unconscious is a great source of free material), and mining all those crazy stories your grandmother used to tell. Then combine bits and pieces from these sources, take one great mind leap (and many drafts) andvoilayouve got fiction.  Amazon.comNola: A Memoir of Faith, Art, and MadnessExceptional ... Hemleys book sits square in the center of the new and most successful nonfiction, exemplifying the trend of stretching the form. Nola is not just a life-and-death narrative of the authors brilliant and disturbed sister, but its also a complex narrative of Hemley himself .... Couple the inventive format with a writing style that is deeply reflective, utterly honest, and sensitive of the issues of writing nonfiction in this way, and you have a colossal memoir. Hemley involves himself not just in telling a life story, but creating meaning by revealing how he thinksexploring not one, but several voices that relate this narrative. In this, Hemley is a master .... This unconventional pattern of revelation will fascinate avid nonfiction readers, unless youre looking for mainstream confessional memoir, in which case, head for something lighter and less sophisticated than Nola.  Anne-Marie Oomen, ForeWord MagazineHemley, author of Turning Life into Fiction (1994), has not been able to write about his sister Nola until now, 25 years after her death. A young woman obsessed with the magical and the hidden, she became overwhelmed by voices and visions. Diagnosed as schizophrenic, she soon succumbed to an inexplicable overdose of prescribed medication. Its easy to see why her story demands to be told, but everyone in Hemleys family is fascinating, and he ponders his complex legacy in a mesmerizing juggling act, combining the drama of fiction with the candor of memoir and the close scrutiny of criticism. His mother, Elaine Gottlieb Hemley, is a fiction writer, and his father, Cecil Hemley, was a poet, Isaac Singers editor, and cofounder of Noonday Press. Nola wrote, too, and Hemley incorporates each of their voices into the tight weave of his intricate narrative, choosing wisely to abide by what could be the family mottoEverything is open to interpretation and revisionand allowing his readers to draw their own conclusions.  Donna Seaman, BooklistHemley takes the memoir form further than mere recollection of familial events, and delves into the arena of imagination and what if. His mission to tell Nolas story is complicated by the fickleness of family members memories, the mystic nature of much of Nolas work, and his own admission that he covets her strange and wonderful story himself. The result is a surprising and honest process of both writing and discovery--finding the facts and revealing the truths about the way we remember and what we try to forget. This is not a book to rush through, but one to savor and think about for a good long time.  Susan Swartwout, Amazon.com ReviewThe Big Ear (Stories)Clever, confident and, at times, even poignant...this collection abounds with intriguing situations skillfully rendered.  Publishers WeeklyThis collection of 16 stories by Robin Hemley has something for everyone.... In these stories in Hemleys third collection, someone is always trying to make sense of something. And the answer is never easy.  The Chicago TribuneHemleys characters are very real people, trying to make sense of themselves in a world often indifferent to them. If readability, to some, is a cardinal sin in writing, then Hemley is guilty. And may his sentence be to continue to write with such empathy, wit, intelligence, and compassion.  Matthew F. Benedict, South Bend TribuneThe Last StudebakerHemleys weaving of these lost souls stories into the Studebakers failure to capture the American heart and pocketbook could collapse into a clever trick. Yet The Last Studebaker is never gimmicky, and offers hope beyond economic and personal despair. Its not only the Studebaker, but life itself, that evokes rueful glances and missed opportunities, along with tenderness and unpredictable charm.  Rachel Shteir, Washington Post Book WorldIn South Bend, Ind., two down-on-their-luck characters, a divorced woman and an addled accident victim, team up to change their fates. Mr. Hemley cleverly uses the now-defunct Studebaker car company... to probe the apparent failure of the American dream.  Cathy A. Colman, The New York Times Book ReviewHemley draws a quirky road map of the human heart, with all its foibles and dangers.  Publishers WeeklyAll You Can EatHemleys stories are filled with... powerful and surrealistic images, some of them frightening, some of them funny.  Christopher Lehmann-Haupt, The New York TimesIn variously troubled waters, the people in Robin Hemleys short stories cling to their sense of humor.  People MagazineThere is so much promise in this first book from a writer of clear ambition. Hemley is an urban writer of spark and vigour.  Times Literary SupplementThe best stories in Robin Hemleys collection have a Holden Caulfield sense of how it is to be young and misunderstood in the world... Alarmingly adept.  Sunday TimesAlso by Robin HemleyExtreme Fiction: Fabulists and Formalists (co-edited with Michael Martone)The Mouse Town, Winner of the Word Beat Press Fiction Award (for a chapbook), Judged by Joy WilliamsBibliography Books *DO-OVER! In which a forty-eight-year-old father of three returns to kindergarten, summer camp, the prom, and other embarrassments (2009)*Turning Life Into Fiction (2006)*Extreme Fiction: Fabulists and Formalists (anthology, with Michael Martone, 2004)*Invented Eden: The Elusive, Disputed History of the Tasaday (2003)*Nola: A Memoir of Faith, Art, and Madness (1998)*The Big Ear, stories (1994)*The Last Studebaker, a novel (1992)*All You Can Eat, stories (1988)*The Mouse Town, stories (1987)Essays*The Bells of Balangiga in The Wall Street Journal*Dispatches From Manila in McSweeneys Internet Tendency*A Jews Christmas in The Philippines in The Far Eastern Economic Review*Field Notes for The Graveyard Enthusiast in New Letters*Aunt Blessy and Yamashitas Treasure in Lost Magazine*A Reincarnation, and Just When I Didnt Need One in The New York Times, Modern Love*Reviews of The Partisan Review, 1949 in The Believer*Review of Short Stories Magazine 1895 in The Believer*Big Man on Camp in New York Magazine*Prince Valiant in Brevity*Reading History to My Mother from Fourth Genre and The Touchstone Anthology of Creative Nonfiction, 1970-Present*Something Has to Be Understood: An Appreciation of Sherwood Anderson for The Ohioana Library Association*The Question Robin Hemley Hates in  Creative Nonfiction Fall 2010, Issue 39Short stories*All Good Things Are Surprises in Narrative*My Fathers Bawdy Song in Ploughshares Blogs*Guest Post on Fake Memoirs for The National Book Critics Circle BlogInterviews*An Interview with Mitch Teich of Milwaukee Public Radio on Do-Over!*An Interview with Steve Paulson on To the Best of Our Knowledge on Wisconsin Public Radio, on Invented EdenReadings*Robin Hemley Reads Big Man On Camp at Meacham Writers Conference, University of Tennessee, Chattanooga
21503362
China_University_of_Mining_&_Technology
#REDIRECT University of Mining and Technology
21525506
List_of_Super_Friends_episodes
Friends is  American animated series about a team of superheroes which ran from 1973 to 1986 on ABC. In the 1990s, the show was being shown on Network and more recently its sister channel, Boomerang. It is based on the League and associated book characters published by Comics.Each episode was 60 minutes long. After the second season, it was reduced to 30 minutes and ever so often expanded cast of characters by featuring other JLA heroes joining the main five Super Friends (Superman, Woman, Aquaman, Batman and Robin) on a semi-regular basis. The series episodes varied from single episode stand-alone stories to episodes with two, three, or even four segments.The varied incarnations of the group, from Super Friends (19731974) through Super Powers Team: Galactic Guardians (19851986), were considered by their creators to be one series. There were a total of 109 episodes, along with two episodes of New Scooby-Doo Movies, with Batman and Robin appearing in The Dynamic Scooby Doo Affair and The Caped Crusader Caper.Super Friends episodesSeason 1: 19731974{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)Wonderdog check out the Electrical Generator Plant and find a mysterious shadowy figure. The young heroes chase the mysterious figure but only to bump into Sir Cedric Cedric who says the suspect had gotten away. The Super Friends must stop the power outage disasters with the help of Wendy providing details about the Electrical Generator Plant figure out who is the Power Pirate and how Sir Cedric fits into the picture.ShortSummaryColonel Wilcox from the Secret Department of Investigation S.D.I. calls upon the Justice League to help prevent Dr. Baffles from carrying his threat of stealing French lithographs. The Super Friends stake out the American Museum. Wendy, Marvin and Wonder Dog along with Superman, disguised as Clark Kent, keep an eye on things from inside the museum. At the museum Wonder Dog starts sneezing because he smelled almonds in the air, and while all the commotion was going on the paintings became missing. Dr. Baffles now threatens to steal a hefty shipment of $5 million in gold. The Justice League must now make sure a shipment of gold makes it to Hawaii. The Super Friends thwarted an attempted heist by a gang of crooks and safely got the shipment of gold onto a ship. On the ship, the junior members run into Mr. Mergen, a man they met earlier at the library. Wendy starts having suspicions about Mr. Mergen and she, Marvin snd Wonder Dog follow him. Meanwhile the Super Friends decide to check on the money and find almond residue. They come to the conclusion that Professor Baffles made the money disappear with a chemical solution. The junior members catch up to Mr. Mergen to find out hes actually Dr. Baffles. Dr. Baffles reveals hes going to make humans non corrupt again by making books, paintings, music, and other bad influences go away. Mr. Dabney and Mr. Darvey, the two brutes Dr. Baffels works for, hold Dr. Baffles captive as well after refuses to have anything more to do with them. Wonder Dog escapes and warns the Super Friends that Wendy and Marvin need to be rescued. ShortSummaryWhen machines start operating by themselves, the Government asks the Justice League of America to investigate. The heroes arrive at G.E.E.C.where Professor Goodfellow shows the Super Friends his G.E.E.C. (Goodfellows Effort Eliminating Computer) invention which would free everyone of work and responsibility. When Mr. Huggins, the special assistant to the President, tells Professor Goodfellow the government will not involve itself with G.E.E.C. the Professor then starts to offer free G.E.E.C. service to anyone who wants it. After a few weeks the Super Friends decide to ask Professor Goodfellow to let them check the security of G.E.E.C., but after their visit the G.E.E.C. computer goes berserk and the Justice League of America get the one member who could assist them in this situation, Man.ShortSummaryOn their summer vacation in Florida with Wendy, Marvin and Wonder Dog discover their pool that has been frozen solid. Batman and the Junior Super Friends head to the World Weather Center after Colonel Wilcox informs Batman to find out whats causing the wild weather changes and stop it. They find out a tall, bald, thin man with glasses named Dr. Thinkquick, who is from a continent called Glacia up near the North Pole, is shifting the Gulf Stream with a jet nozzle from his tugboat at sea as well as a remote control device to warm the climate at his dreadfully cold country, without taking into consideration to what will happen to Florida and the rest of the world.ShortSummaryAfter many reports of a talking albatross, Colonel Wilcox asks the Superfriends to round up the 3 industrialists who refuse to attend a meeting about pollution. An ecoterrorist named Dr. Pelagian has terrorized these three industrialists in an attempt to frighten them into stopping their polluting. Aquaman decides to investigate the identity of Dr. Pelagian based on a hunch he has about Dr. Ansil Hillbrandt, a brilliant marine biologist and the leading authority on the albatross. Aquaman also decides to search Point Gander, the place where Hillbrandt was last seen, and finds Prof. Hillgrants driving suit. Later the Junior Super Friends end up meeting with Prof. Ansil Hillbrandt, only to find out he faked his death and took to the sea where he has invented the technology that allows him to communicate with sea creatures and control the sea and the weather.ShortSummaryOn a mountain hiking trip at Mystery Mountain, Wendy, Marvin and Wonder Dog discover a giant metallic U. After reporting their findings to the Super Friends, the junior members show Batman & Robin the exact location where they saw the U. The caped Crusaders find Dr. Simian Shamon magnetically pulling down a meteorite of solid gold using his Shamon U. The junior Super Friends stumble upon Dr. Simian Shamons lab and discover his plans to use his Shamon U to mine the skies for gold meteorites. Dr. Shamon refuses to let the Junior Super Friends go or listen to his assistant Madam Lila LaBeau, causing Madam LaBeau to the young heroes to safety. However, the after affects of Dr. Shamons sky mining caused a green and red mist called Shamonite which caused animals, plants, and non-organic objects to either grow or shrink respectively including Wonder Dog. The Super Friends and Madam LaBeau must find a way to cancel out the Shamonite in Earths atmosphere.The Flash, who was saving the Taj Mahal from an Earthquake. The Flash uses his super speed to put the Earth back into orbit by reversing the magnetic poles of the Earth. The junior Super Friends notice a strange man whos dressed in heavy warm winter clothes. They chase after the strange dressed man and follow him to his hideout inside an active volcano on a Pacific island called Malibah. They find out the mans name is Kolbar and he comes from the planet Solartararium. Kolbar was trying to find another hot planet for his people to live on when their planet cooled off too heavily because of pollution. Superman, Aquaman, the Junior members, and the Flash journey to Solartararium to clean up the planet.ShortSummaryAfter a rocket came plunging back to Earth and crashed, Colonel Wilcox informs the Super Friends that the astronauts are missing. When Colonel Wilcox and the Super Friends investigated the scene they found a tape recording from a man named Dr. Rebos that said all further space exploration must cease including the top secret Venus probe mission. Conveniently, Clark Kent has been given a television assignment on the Venus space probe in which he attends with Wendy and Marvin. Wonder Dog forgot has pass and stays outside where hes confronted by a man who wants to take his picture. The man is actually Dr. Rebos who is talking picture so he can make an android double of Wonder Dog to infiltrate the space station and destroy the mission. Colonel Wilcox called Wonder Dog a traitor for his sabotage causing Wendy and Marvin to walk out in disgust. The teens figure it could not have been Wonder Dog after recalling the events of the day and decide to do same investigating. Meanwhile, the Super Friends guard the space center unbeknownst to them that Dr. Rebos is watching them to make an android Superman. The Super Friends encounter more confusion when Dr. Rebos makes a robot of Superman, and orders him to destroy the Mars space station. While the real Superman fights his android double, its up to the rest of the Super Friends pull the plug on Dr. Rebos and his androids.ShortSummaryA family of aliens from the planet Balunia leave their polluted planet for a home on Earth. After their flying saucer lands, the balloon people are befriended by the Super Friends. However, the news reports of these unusual guests prompt ambitious scholar Noah Tall to devise a plan to capture the balloon people. When they are kidnapped, the Super Friends must rescue them.ShortSummaryKing Plasto steals raw plastic powder to create Frerp, a special plastic which he uses to confound the Super Friends. The king has been intercepting every shipment of the powder on its way to the government space research station because he intends to use the raw powder for his own means. The Super Friends set out to end his reign of terror.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryImportant research projects have been closed down, and the Super Friends are called in to find and restore disappearing air conditioning units. The Super Friends mission leads then into a strange new subterranean world discovered by a pair of spelunkers. They are forced to fight the creatures of that world, animated trees and rocks.ShortSummaryUsing his micro-wave reducer, mad Dr. Hiram Gulliver shrinks all adults- including the Superfriends- to two inches tall to help the population problem (by saving resources)... and also to rule over them (he will remain full-sized to watch over the mini population of the world). The Green Arrow joins the Superfriends to stop him and to return things to normal.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummary|}The All-New Super Friends Hour episodesSeason 2: 19771978{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)ShortSummaryWonder Woman and Batman & Robin meet up with a misguided genius, Dr. Cranum, and his Brain Machine.Gleek have to teach some youngsters a lesson about the dangers of joyriding in an airplane.ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends match wits and skills in an underground adventure against the mysterious mining monsters known as the Earthors.ShortSummaryAquaman and special guest Vulcan find themselves facing the force of a shipwrecking whirlpool.ShortSummarySuperman, Batman and Robin are outnumbered but not outsmarted when they change the plans of the mysterious Secret Four.ShortSummaryThose outer-space Wonder Twins and Gleek point out the error of jumping to conclusions as they tackle an escaped tiger (and try to end the confusion on how the tiger got out in the first place).ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends combine their superheroics in an all-out conflict with the evil scientist Dictor and the mysterious Time Creatures.ShortSummaryWonder Woman and special guest star Chief fly half way around the world to save an Indian community from a giant cobra.ShortSummaryAquaman, Batman and Robin meet the menacing Hydronoids in a struggle to save the world from their evil invasion.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins and space monkey Gleek have a serious problem on their hands when they use their Exxor powers to detour the dangers of hitchhiking.ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends travel to a far-off frozen planet to rescue an entire Earth city stolen by the marauding Mongor.ShortSummaryWonder Woman with special guests Hawkman and Hawkgirl use their special skills in a space emergency.ShortSummarySuperman and Wonder Woman show no fear when they meet up with the terrifying Dr. Fright.ShortSummaryZan and Jayna, the Wonder Twins, and Gleek have to teach a lesson about street drag racing.ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends must call on their skills to overcome the perils of monstrous plant creatures.ShortSummaryBatman, Robin and special guest Rima battle a raging forest fire and find two escaped juvenile convicts.ShortSummarySuperman and Wonder Woman go on an elecrifying adventure when they meet the marauding monster of Dr. Droid.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins and Gleek have a few special tricks up their sleeve when a couple of thoughtless students turn into school vandals.ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends find themselves in critical combat against each other when they become captives of Tyrannic the ruler of the underseas world of Oceana.Atom are called on the save a speeding passenger train that has been taken over by a critical energy mass.ShortSummaryUpon encountering a man named Garth-1 on a South Pacific Island, Wonder Woman and Aquaman head to his home Arcava (an underground city within a deserted South Pacific Island) to help free his people from an evil dictator called the Enforcer.ShortSummaryZan and Jayna must save two boys that are trapped underwater by a shark.ShortSummaryAn evil scientist known as Barko devolves Earth back to a prehistoric planet, which will remain so unless the Super Friends can stop him and retrieve the machine responsible for this from the prehistoric times it was placed in.Green Lantern head to Africa to save trapped miners in a diamond mine that is slowly flooding.ShortSummarySuperman and Aquaman discover a deep down mystery of sinister submarines and sea life as they battle the Invisible Menace.ShortSummaryThose Wonder Twins and Gleek excel with Exxorian powers when they have to bring a dangerous initiation stunt to a safe ending.ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends zoom off in an all out struggle against invading insects from a far off planet, for the entire Earth is threatened by the coming of the Arthropods.ShortSummaryFlying over jungle rain forests, Wonder Woman and Rima search for some missing scientists who are about to become victims of the River of Doom.ShortSummarySuperman and Aquaman find themselves entangled in a deep-sea mystery when they meet the tenticled attack of a giant squid.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins, and their space monkey Gleek, teach some young people the serious dangers of playing the foolish game of Chicken.Manta and his terrifying water beast.Samurai, face the heat of a volcano in making a dangerous rescue.ShortSummarySuperman and Wonder Woman save priceless treasures and monuments from the greedy grasp of the Collector.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins and Gleek help teach a lesson in courage when they rescue a boy from the wreckage of an overturned van.ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends must use all of their superpowers in order to overcome the mental mischief of Medula and her power-hungry plans to eradicate all men.ShortSummaryBatman and Robin and special guest Apache Chief head toward the Northern Lakes to save an expedition from a giant snow creature.ShortSummary A woman named Professor Zhan makes a super strength potion which turns her into a 50 foot woman. Batman, Robin and Wonder Woman must look up to the incredible femme fatale and find a way to bring this 50-feet woman back to normal size. Prof. Zhan tries to make Batman drink it but she is stopped when her assistant sprays her with the antidote.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins and Gleek teach a lesson in honesty when a double-crossing cross-country runner has a misadventure in cheating.ShortSummaryA sinister space probe from planet Zeno visits Earth to capture people and objects for scientific study. The SuperFriends must stop Exploration Earth.ShortSummaryAquaman and special guest superhero Samurai use super teamwork to save an African village from the attack of the killer bees.ShortSummaryBatman, Robin and Wonder Woman must save the world from the mysterious mutants of the space sphere and its forbidden power.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins and Gleek travel into the hot desert to cool the dangerous canyon-jumping stunts of some reckless motorcyclists.ShortSummaryA space ship controlled by mysterious Lionmen probes for minerals and starts an earth shaking process that splits our planet into pieces. Will the SuperFriends meet the challenge?ShortSummaryBatman and Robin with special guest Black Vulcan play pied pipers when the city is terrified by rampaging rats.ShortSummarySuperman, Batman and Robin have to save society from the outrageous genetic experiments of a mixed-up scientist and his half-human half-animal beasts.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins and Gleek have to teach a serious lesson in brotherhood when the ugliness of prejudice gets some young people into trouble.ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends have to do some big thinking when the world is endangered by a shrinking machine in the hands of a greedy inventor.Flash rash to save them from Tibetan raiders.ShortSummarySuperman and Aquaman turn the heat on the sinister Sculpins plans to transform the world into a giant icebox with his instant freeze.ShortSummaryGleek and those Wonder Twins have to save a girl from the perils of a dangerous prank played by some thoughtless companions.ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends are called into action when the weird Professor Korloff brings a mysterious mummy to life to steal a cosmic power source for himself.ShortSummaryWonder Woman and her mighty mite friend, Atom, swing into action to save a cable car load of passengers caught in a high wind over a treacherous terrain.ShortSummarySuperman, Batman and Robin move into action when an inventors valuable plans are put in peril by the terrorizing tactics of a mysterious Marsh Monster.ShortSummaryThose far from home Wonder Twins and Gleek try to rescue some misguided teenagers who face trouble when they decide to become runaways.ShortSummaryThe SuperFriends exhibit all their bravery against the super sinister scheme of Professor Fearo and the threat of a world collision.ShortSummaryA scientist finds trouble when a time machine puts him 2000 years into the future. Superman, Hawkman and Hawkgirl come to the rescue.ShortSummaryBatman, Robin and Aquaman put to sea in an effort to end the pirating and pillaging of Captain Shark and his immobilizing ray.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins activate their special powers to save a couple of girls who try an ill-advised adventure as stowaways and almost wind up as flotsam and jetsam.Ghost, a villain from the past, is freed from his imprisonment and threatens the world with an eerie fate. He also wants to take revenge on Superman and Wonder Woman for imprisoning his spirit. Now the other Super Friends members must save Superman and Wonder Woman before it is too late.ShortSummaryIn far-off India, Superman and Green Lantern have their hands full when a huge, wild, white elephant tears through jungles and villages on a rampage-looking for its baby.|}Challenge of the Super Friends episodesSeason 3: 19781979{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)Cheetahs to loot and pillage the world.ShortSummaryThe alien Fearians recruit the Legion of Doom to help them trick the Super Friends into making Earths climate suitable for their Venusian bodies in exchange for letting the Legion of Doom rule the world.ShortSummaryBrainiac plans to trap Black Vulcan, Wonder Woman and Hawkman on an artifical planet ruled by The Toyman in a hole while the Riddler lures the other Superfriends into different traps so the Legion of Doom can take hold of the Worlds national treasuries.ShortSummaryGrodd The Gorilla devises a plan for The Legion, using a time-conveyer to loot the past... and trap the Super Friends in history.ShortSummaryThe Legion of Doom trick Batman & Robin, Wonder Woman and Green Lantern, who are guarding a chemical research plant and its newest creation, Liquid Light, by stealing their power devices. They are then captured by the Legion who holds a court and sentences them to face four android duplicates created by Brainiac while other Legion members attempt to steal the Liquid Light.Robin launch an attack on the Hall of Doom which is protected by the monolith, which produces an ice monster.  The Hall of Justice computer reveals that the monolith is not evil, it just appears that way because it is being controlled by evil beings; this gives Wonder Woman the plan to control it telepathically to do good.  After reversing all of the destruction and apprehending the Legion of Doom, the Legion uses the monolith one last time to escape. Brainiac attack the Hall of Justice in the guise of freeing their teammates, but it is a ruse to distract the Super Friends as the captured villains use the Justice Leagues computer to create the Growth Ray and enlarge themselves.  After a brief fight, the Super Friends are captured and sent to Saturn as the Legion of Doom creates a force field around the Earth to keep them out.  Bizarro conquers Washington DC, Sinestro takes over Peking, Captain Cold invades Africa and Toyman attacks London.  After battling gaseous monsters, Flash creates a tornado that sends the Super Friends back to Earth where they reconfigure the Justice League satellite into letting them through the force field.  The Justice League computer duplicates the growth ray and the Super Friends use it to battle the Legion of Doom.  Green Lantern bottles up Sinestro, Flash freezes Captain Cold, Batman stops Toyman and Superman cages Bizarro.  However, Lex Luthor teleports the captured members to freedom and uses a Hall of Doom decoy to distract the Super Friends as they escape. Green Lantern, Flash, Batman and Superman are the Giants of Justice!ShortSummaryPast and present collide when Lex Luthor decides to alter the past after discovering the secret origins of Green Lantern, Superman and Wonder Woman. Using the Hall of Dooms time conveyor, Cheetah cheats in a tournament to become Wonder Woman, Lex Luthor tricks Hal Jordan into letting him become the Green Lantern, and the Legion also uses the Hall of Doom to send young Kal-El to a red sun planet as Krypton explodes. The remaining Super Friends are captured and forced to fight against each other for the Legions enjoyment, but Batman & Robin, Flash and Black Vulcan discover a tape of the elimination plot and go back in time to undo the Legions tampering with the past. Flash first helps Diana fight Cheetah to become Wonder Woman, which Dianas mother accepts, Black Vulcan defeats Lex Luthor and Hal Jordan as test pilot gets green power to become Green Lantern. Finally, Batman and Robin save Superman, sending young Kal-El to Earth. Mom and Dad gets him named Clark Kent and Clark becomes Superman!  With the balance of time returned to normal, the Superfriend rescue their remaining comrades, but the Legion escapes again.Brainiacs brain wave amplifier to take over City. Lex Luthor cites that Grodds plan (turning everyone in Gorilla City into mind controlled apes) might work since everything else they tried has failed. Solovar, the ruler of Gorilla City, convinces Flash, Apache Chief, Batman and Robin to help him free the minds of the Gorillas. The four heroes get caught and must escape being hunted, call for help, and free the Gorillas from the mind control. With the Super Friends and the Gorillas after them, the Legion retreats from Gorilla City.ShortSummaryThe Legion of Doom negotiates with an old swamp sorceress and an ancient demon to bring all the Super Friends to the swamp to defeat them forever in exchange for power to control zombies. ShortSummaryTo everyones surprise, including the Super Friends, the Legion of Doom becomes the Legion of Good! But its a ruse while they conquer the Earth of 3984 with the help of a merciless race of magic beings known as the Barlocks. However, the Super Friends put together the Riddlers cryptic clues and Superman, Flash, and Green Lantern travel to the future to defeat them there and liberate the inhabitants. ShortSummaryWhen a few members of the Super Friends and Legion of Doom are engaged in a battle in Earths orbit, they are captured by a being named Vartu who brings them to his universe where he subjects them to a number of challenges to determine which is better, good or evil. While the five captured Super Friends and member of the Legion of Doom are busy with these contests, the remaining members of both sides search through different universes in an effort to find their missing comrades.ShortSummaryThe Toyman develops a device to trap three Super Friends in works of fiction hoping to eliminate them forever. ShortSummaryWhen Sinestro, Black Manta, and Cheetah are abandoned by the rest of the Legion of Doom on a failed mission, they are captured by the Super Friends. After escaping, they seek revenge against their comrades by utilizing a transmutation device, capturing a couple of the Super Friends in the process. Luthor actually has to summon the Super Friends to help them against their rogue members. ShortSummaryBatman is dead, killed with a crystal called Noxium, recovered by one time Legion of Doom member Dr. Natas and buried under the Hall of Justice by Superman in Kryptonian Steal, a harmless form of Kyrptonite.  Shown in a flashback when Superman inadvertently opens the casing, the Legion of Doom plans to kill the Super Friends as Batman was in the same way as the crystal holds each of the individual weaknesses that can do all of the Super Friends in.ShortSummaryThe Earth is shown to be in ruins and there is no life of any kind. Three aliens visit the Earth and investigate the ruins of the Hall of Justice, reviewing historical records of the Justice League of Americas conflicts against the Legion of Doom as well as the Legions individual origins.  When they can no longer review anymore data due to a computer malfunction, they find the Hall of Doom to discover that the destruction of Earth was inadvertently caused by Lex Luthor and the Legion of Doom in a final attempt to destroy the Super Friends. The aliens reverse the damage and sabotage Luthors plan to prevent the earth from being destroyed again, leaving Luthor and the Super Friends both mystified.|}Season 3: 19781979{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)ShortSummaryFrom the edge of the Milky Way, a winged creature named Rokan speeds toward Earth. Superman confronts the beast and realizes its Rokan, a beast from Krypton which was thought to be extinct and since Rokan is from Krypton she has the exact same powers as Superman. Escaping, the creature wreaks Havoc on Earth. The Super Friends attempt stop to stop Rokan by chasing her and her babies away with Kryptonite.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins agree to help Exxor defeat Darkon, a conqueror who has taken over Exxor and made its inhabitants his slaves. With the Wonder Twins captured by Darkon, Batman & Robin must free the twin heroes as the other Super Friends tackle Darkon and his troopers.ShortSummaryWhile sailing with Captain Pierre Marcel, the Wonder Twins and Gleek get sucked in a whirlpool. After receiving a distress call from the Wonder Twins, the rest of the Super Friends search for the twins only to get pulled in the whirlpool themselves. They emerge in a Wonder Land that is below the Earths crust. The Super Friends must now search for the Wonder Twins and rescue them ShortSummaryTraveling from space, three pirate ships make their way towards Earth. When Captain Sinbad and his Space Pirate crew reach Earth they start stealing treasures from South America. After receiving a message on the Justice League Trouble Alert, Superman and Wonder Woman confronts Captain Sinbad and his Space Pirate crew. Captain Sinbad then hurls city buildings toward a mountain range allowing the pirates to escape the two Super Friends. The Super Friends regroup to strategize and later streak off to confront the Space Pirates. While trying to stop a Space Pirate boat Wonder Woman gets hit with a stun laser and taken captive aboard one of the ships. Meanwhile at the Hall of Justice, the JLA satellite monitor picked up Wonder Woman causing Zan to convince Jana to go after her. When Zan and Jana find Wonder Woman, they get trapped by Space Pirates and a mind controlled Wonder Woman and were made Sinbads slaves. Wonder Woman then sends a warning to the other Super Friends to leave the Space Pirates alone or they may never see the Wonder Twins again. Superman then disguises himself as Clark Kent to enter the Space Pirates ship and rescue Wonder Woman and the Wonder Twins.ShortSummaryTraveling from a distant corner of the universe, a fleet of unidentified ships head towards Earth to hypnotize all children and gather them to Monument Valley, AZ. The Super Friends start to take action after the Wonder Twins became hypnotized and a call from the Justice League trouble alert. After the Super Friends tried to stop children from entering a spaceship, a UFO arose to destroy a nearby city. Batman & Robin stayed with the children as Superman and Wonder Woman stopped the UFO and the disasters it caused only to get trapped inside the space craft as it heads to the Anti-Matter Universe. Meanwhile at the Hall of Justice, The Wonder Twins escape by using hypnotic mind control on Aquaman to release themselves. Batman & Robin arrive back at the Hall of Justice to stop a near power source over load and snap Aquaman out of a mindless slumber. The Super Friends must now rescue the cargo of children and the Wonder Twins from slavery by an evil genius on the Planet Nofan and bring them safely home to Earth.Dracula awakes after a 100 year sleep. Dracula starts havoc by releasing a strange glowing powder that turns people into vampires. Meanwhile, Batman & Robin receive a distress call and speeds off to Transylvania. They search Draculas castle only to get captured by Dracula himself. Later Wonder Woman and Aquaman arrived in Transylvania after the Wonder Twins reported it was taken over by bats only to be attacked by dozens of mindless vampires. Another report of vampire attacks was made and this time Superman went to Vienna to stop them. While in Vienna, Superman runs into Dracula, who was continuing his conquest, and gets turned into a vampire. Realizing Superman is under Draculas control, the Wonder Twins attempt to stop the victimized Man of Steel. Wonder Woman, Aquaman, Batman, and Robin all escape the face of danger only to find that Superman and the Wonder Twins have been turned into vampires and are turning nearly everyone else into vampires as well. The four Super Friends regroup at the Biological Research Center in Switzerland to find a way to reverse the effects the vampires have on people. They now must find a strange breed of South American bat in the Andes Mountains whose cave has gases that could reverse the vampire effect. Its now up to the Super Friends to transform the vampires back to normal and figure out a way to stop Dracula.ShortSummaryAfter an experimental satellite from Kennedy Space Center falls back to Earth it breaks releasing deadly radioactive energy. The Super Friends then receive a distress call from the west coast saying Death Valley is being overrun by giant desert beasts. Wonder Woman and the Wonder Twins stay behind to check the Justice League computer for more information while the rest of the Super Friends head to Death Valley. At Death Valley they find wreckage and a man who says giant lizards had nearly destroyed the town. As Superman continues to search for the mysterious giant beast, he stumbles upon some mutated giant earthworms that he must save some teens from. As Aquaman, Batman, and Robin fight the beast creatures that attacked them, Wonder Woman finds out what happened via the Justice League computer and heads to NASA for more information. As Wonder Woman approaches the location of the downed satellite, the radiation turns her into a giant beast. As the Wonder Twins try to stop Wonder Womans destruction of a military base, the radiation genetically alters them into giant beasts. Meanwhile giant earthworms are digging holes into Californias coast which will potentially sink. To save everyone the Super Friends must stop the creatures and turn them and the Wonder heroes back to normal.ShortSummaryThree Kryptonian villains from Phantom Zone escape and expose Superman to Red Kryptonite causing him to age rapidly. The rest of the Super Friends get trapped by the villains and must now escape from the Phantom Zone. Meanwhile, the Justice League Computer tells Superman the only possible antidote for his rapid aging is Blue Kryptonite. Since Blue Kryptonite is harmful to Bizarro, it may have an opposite effect on Superman. Superman must take the Supermobile to go to the site where Krypton blew up and get the Blue Kryptonite in time to save the other Super Friends. Using the ray device the three villains stole from Superman, he sends the Kryptonian villains back to the Phantom Zone.ShortSummaryIn this story the Super Friends have to stop an energy draining monster which exists on computer tape and can appear anywhere at anytime. Wonder Woman and Superman, during one scene, go undercover as a science expert and Clark Kent, in an attempt to learn how the energy creature can be destroyed. One of the scientists working in the lab turns out to be the culprit responsible for unleashing the energy creature. The story borrows heavily from the national headlines of the time during the concerns of a looming crisis. ShortSummaryThe Super Friends must stop the plans of a conqueror named Torhana who seeks vengeance on the people of the surface world by freezing everything in his path. Torhana and his crew travel by ship, freezing oceans and continents and people...Aquaman uses his telepathy to summon sword-fish to cut him out of the ice and take him to Atlantis. Torhana and his crew appear to have the upper hand but by episodes end the Super Friends regroup and come up with a clever plan to melt all of the ice thats engulfed the planet. This is one of the few episodes in the series that features Aquaman at his usual base of operations in the comic books: the undersea city of Atlantis.ShortSummaryWhile in space Batman and Superman become possessed by brain creatures. The brain creatures ultimately take over the minds of Wonder Woman, Robin, and Aquaman when it appears that the Wonder Twins are successfully defeating Batman and Supermans asteroid attack of Earth. Batman and Superman, while under mind control, continue to attack the Earth by firing huge asteroids on the surface. Superman uses his speed to hurl multiple asteroids at the Earths surface which causes fissures, fires, and floods. Wonder Woman uses her mental powers to over-come the mind control and with the help of a magnetic cloud the brain creatures are expelled from the brains of Wonder Woman, Aquaman, Robin, Batman, and Superman. Wonder Woman then devises a plan to send an electrical current throughout Earth which causes the brain creatures to flee the planet and leave the minds of Superman, Batman, and Aquaman.ShortSummaryA crooked space circus proprietor, Zarnum, uses a device to turn protected animals that have been illegally captured into beasts to boost attendance at his space circus. Sensing that the Super Friends are onto his scheme he uses the device to change Wonder Woman, Aquaman, and the Wonder Twins into space creatures. Its up to the rest of the Super Friends to track down the elusive space circus, rescue the captive Super Friends, and bring an end to the poaching thats been taking place. NOTE: Zarnums name is loosely based on circus legend Barnum.ShortSummaryBatman and Robin head off to a planet named Texarkana after receiving a distress alert that a local villain, The Capricorn Kid, is terrorizing the planet. After defeating the Kid and putting him in jail the Kid vows revenge. He and his group of outlaws travel to Earth, break into the Hall of Justice, and plot their revenge on all the Super Friends. The Kids group successfully places each of the Super Friends in dangerous situations and they deliberately force Batman and Robin into freeing each person...but the catch is that each trap is timed and the object of the game is to free all the Super Friends from the various traps before its too late. In a show-down Batman and the Kid meet up in an old-fashioned shoot out.Gleek manages to escape Medusas clutches and ends up aiding Wonder Woman in removing Medusas necklace. By episodes end the Super Friends prove to be worthy of Aphrodites praise.      ShortSummaryAquaman is exposed to a radioactive substance that turns him into a prehistoric sea creature from which he evolved. In order to cure him, Superman and Wonder Woman, inside the Super Mobile, are shrunk down to microscopic size and sent within the creatures veins to attempt to give it another dose of radiation in the hopes that it will reverse the affects of the radiation and return Aquaman to normal. In the meantime the rest of the Super Friends have to do whatever they can to limit the creatures destructive nature all over the city.ShortSummaryThe Super Friends are visited by Mr. Mxyzptlk who comes complete with a script for a movie that he wants the Super Friends to star in. The imp uses his 5th dimensional mind control to cause the Super Friends to act out the script...but Superman is not affected by the mind control but he nonetheless goes along with everything in an elaborate plot to trick Mxyzptlk into saying his last name backwards. In one scene a zombie Lane shows up in a wedding dress wearing a kryptonite wedding ring.|}The Worlds Greatest Super Friends episodesSeason 4: 19791980{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)ShortSummaryNA.1978 Superman movie.Camelon, and loses his memory. A bunch of rebels led by Logan take him in as their black knight in a plan to overthrow Arthur 7. Its up to the Super Friends to help Superman remember and defeat the rebels.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNADr. Frankenstein steals the powers of Superman, Batman, and Wonder Woman and transfers them into his latest creation, its up to Robin to stop the Super-Monster.ShortSummaryA tornado transports the Hall of Justice to Oz where Mxyzptlk, who has once again escaped from the 5th Dimension, informs the Super Friends that they must find The Wizard to get home. Along the way they encounter the Wicked Witch of the Worst Kind in a gingerbread house who turns Superman into the Tin Man, Wonder Woman into the Cowardly Lion and Aquaman into the Scarecrow.|}Super Friends episodesSeason 5: 198081{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)ShortSummaryApache Chief, Batman, and Robin face great danger when attacked by Bigfoot creatures.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins and two other kids get trapped deep within the ski slopes. Meanwhile at the snow lodge, Clark Kent and Lois Lane are investigating a mysterious Ice Monster story. Clark sees the teens in danger and comes to their rescue as Superman.ShortSummaryBud, a fed-up make up artist for a movie studio, decides to redo a monster mask for a government film using his untested hormone solution. As the unsuspecting make up artist puts on the monster mask, the experimental hormone solution reacts strangely with his skin, changing him into the very monster he created. The Flash, Batman and Robin, who where in the studio supervising the government film, encounter Bud and dare to challenge his reign of terror. The Flash points out the only way to stop Bud is to counteract the make up formula. Batman agrees and comes up with a formula using some material from the Batmobile. When the heroes turn Bud back to normal, the director offers them a contract to star in his next film. However, Batman points out that they already signed a lifetime contract with the Justice League.ShortSummaryWhile monitoring the galaxy from his impenetrable Fortress of Solitude, Superman notices a Black Hole that is going to suck up the Earth. Superman attempts to stop it but gets himself pulled into the Black Hole. Using the Bat-Rocket, Batman and Samurai set out to accomplish what Superman failed to do. However, the two heroes end up getting pulled into an Asteroid Planet in the center of the Black Hole. Upon finding Superman imprisoned, the heroes are attacked by a Star Energy Creature. The Super Friends must break free and stop the Star Creature from absorbing the Earth.ShortSummaryThe Highway Angels, a motorcycle gang, start tormenting a senior citizen and his grandson. When the Wonder Twins try to help save but has a hard time dealing with the cycle gang and the danger at hand. Wonder Woman sees the twins and gives them assistance.ShortSummarySeveral miles off the coast of Hawaii, a routine Navy mission becomes a nightmare when a submarines controls short circuits and the nuclear reactor starts to overload. Black Vulcan and Aquaman try to help, but are attacked by nuclear mutated sea creatures. Black Vulcan actually gets eaten by a mutated whale in which Aquaman must come to his rescue. When the two heroes get free, they make it aboard the submarine whose communication transmitter went dead. Now their only chance is to launch Aquaman out of a torpedo tube to clear the beach while Bluck Vulcan uses his electrical powers.ShortSummaryA group of archaeologists accidentally releases Yuna the Terrible and her barbarian warriors. Batman and Robin responds to a distress call but get captured by Yunas warriors. Wonder Woman and Apache Chief respond to the Batmans distress call. During an encounter with Yuna, Apache Chief gets put into a trance and joins Yuna and her warriors. Wonder Woman tries to save them and must prove her strength against Yuna.ShortSummaryA group of Rock and Roll Space Bandits paralyze the Super Friends and invade a major city on Earth using their hypnotic music. The Wonder Twins come to the rescue but get hypnotized. Wonder Woman helps the rest of the Super Friends get free and they rush off to stop those musical menaces.ShortSummary Streaking in the Invisible Jet, Wonder Woman and The Atom answer a distress call on the emergency scanner from a Dr. Wells. Wells call was actually a trap to get Wonder Woman and The Atom to test out his new time machine. Wonder Woman starts pressing buttons attempting to escape but actually starts the Time Machine to send The Atom and herself to December 1776. General Washington mistakes Wonder Woman for a spy and attempts to capture her. The two heroes escape and move further back into the past to a 17th century galleon where they are confronted by Beard. After saving The Atom, Wonder Woman and Atom escape in the time machine. The Atom decides to shrink down to microscopic size to rewire the circuits in the time Machine to go back to 1980. When they come back Dr. Wells tries to elude them by using the Time Machine to escape. The heroes travel millions of years in the Pre historic past to capture him.    ShortSummaryGreen Lantern and Superman must stop the reign of terror caused by Martians who traveled to Earth in a returning space probe.ShortSummaryA group of teens dare each other to go into the old Brimstone Mansion in the cemetery, a place that is said to be haunted. Two of them go in the mansion and get trapped inside. The other two ask the Wonder Twins go inside to look for the other boys but get captured by old man Holmes, the cemetery caretaker. Gleek informs Batman & Robin who come to the rescue and stop Holmes cold in his tracks.ShortSummaryNot for off the Alaska coastline, millions of gallons of crude oil spill out from a ruptured supertanker. Suddenly the crude oil comes alive in the form of a giant monster. Aquaman sees the monster and helps the supertanker to stop the creature by using a harpoon with a net wrapped around to contain the monster. When that plain did not work, the captain called the other Super Friends while  Aquaman handled the monster. Hawkman and Hawkgirl arrive, but by the time they got there the oil monster had already taken off to the coast. Later, the oil monster attacks the Alaskan pipeline and grows even larger. Hawkaman and Hawkgirl try to stop the monster but they get covered in oil and get captured and eaten by the monster. Aquaman acts fast and saves the winged avengers by going inside the monster and using his telepathy powers as a radar. After Hawkman gets an idea of how to stop the monster, the three heroes go to a small general store to get all of the detergent soap so they can put the plan in motion. They arrive at the nearby harbor to find the monster feeding on the first storage tank. Aquaman leads the monster to the empty storage tank while Hawkman and Hawkgirl pour the detergent on the monster turning it back into plain crude oil.ShortSummaryVampiress, the Voodoo Vampire from Africa, goes after the Super Friends and seeks to make them her vampire slaves. Its now up to Wonder Woman and Black Vulcan to go her underground tomb and stop her.ShortSummaryA group of Exxorian monkeys arrive on Earth to invade the Planet. The monkeys want to destroy the Super Friends by putting Gleek under their control. The Wonder Twins must use their powers to help Gleek and the Super Friends.ShortSummaryThe Super Friends try to destroy each other as the impy villain Mr. Mxyzptlk strikes again!ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryWhile at the circus, the Wonder Twins and Gleek witness the revenge of circus animals as they zap the audience in a trance. The animals capture Gleek and zap the Wonder Twins as well, who they send off to lure Superman and Wonder Woman into a trap at the circus. The circus animals eventually turn the Super Friends into Super animals. Gleek frees Zan and Jayna from the trance, now its up to the Wonder Twins and Gleek to free Superman and Wonder Woman and to end to this circus once and for all.ShortSummarySuperman brings a new engine for the Bat-jet to the Bat-cave. However when Batman opens it up he finds the Riddler hiding inside. He hops out and spritzes Superman, Wonder Woman, Batman, and Robin with stupid spray. Theres only one antidote and the Riddler has hidden it somewhere and if the Super Friends do not find it before the time limit is up they will be super stupid forever. Before he hops away, the Riddler gives the Super Friends their first Riddle clue. The Super Friends arrive at the Mayan ruins in Chichen Itza, there Superman spots what he believes is the antidote in the pyramid by using his X-Ray vision. The Super Friends enter the pyramid only to be caught in a Riddler trap. They escape the trap they find the Riddlers second clue but by that time they need the assistance of the Bat-Computer because they had become too stupid to figure out the riddles. The computer tells them to go to Mt. Everest and there they defeat the Riddler and get the antidote.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins rescue a part of reckless hangliders who fell into a volcano. Soon after the volcano starts erupting. Jayna calls Batman & Robin, who help the Wonder Twins rescue the rest of the town and stop the lava flow.Paradise Island. The Amazons of Paradise Island travel to Washington DC to fight an epic battle against these femme fatales. ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryBizarro takes revenge on the JLA by turning members into Super Bizarro slaves and exposing Superman to Red Kryptonite. The Red Kryptonites horrible effects cause Superman to grow extra arms and legs. Now Supermans only chance to stop Bizarro and return to normal is Blue Kryptonite.|}Season 6: 198182{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)ShortSummaryWhen chasing a burglar in Gotham City, Batman and Robin are captured by Pack and Stardust, Bounty Hunters from Orion. Batman attempts to call for help using the Justice League beeper, but he did not realize the Bounty Hunters know help is coming and are ready to ambush them. Wonder Woman and Green Lantern come to save Batman and Robin but instead gets captured and imprisoned as well. The Bounty Hunters tries to take their captives to The Orion Territorial Prison but on the way the Super Friends make a break and go after the Bounty Hunters.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryWonder Woman receives a distress call from a scientist at a research center that is under attack from a giant. Scorpio, a mutant who is half scorpion and half man due to a failed growth serum experiment, learns of Wonder Womans presence and orders another attack from his bug army to steal the rest of the growth serum. Wonder Woman and The Flash goes after the bugs to save Robin while Batman and the scientist must create an antidote to return the bugs back to normal.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryWonder Woman arrives to help a sheriff from the hills of Virginia and investigate why a giant Cobra is creating holes. Shortly after, Wonder Woman and the Sheriff are captured by a giant mechanical cobra. Diamond Jack invents the mechanical Cobra to change coal into diamonds. Superman and The Atom rush to the aid of Wonder Woman and help her defeat Diamond Jack and his mechanical cobra. El Dorado is attacked by Alien Invaders. When El Dorado scares them off, an angered Alien Mummy attacks El Dorado and the others. Meanwhile at the Hall of Justice, Superman and Wonder Woman receive a U.F.O. alert and head out to Mexico. When the two Super Friends arrive see The Alien Mummy has El Dorado and the others have been put under mind control. When Superman and Wonder Woman confront the Alien Mummy, he turns both of them into golden statues. Wonder Womans attempt to communicate telepathically with El Dorado was a success when he breaks free of the Alien Mummys mind control and distracts the Alien Mummy with a hologram Beast. Meanwhile he transports himself to find his Super Friends turned to gold. El Dorado brings them back to the Alien Mummy who gets his power source broken by Supermans X-Ray vision which returns everyone to normal. El Dorado leads the Alien Mummy into his spacecraft and Superman sends him off.ShortSummaryZy-Kree, an escapee from the Phantom Zone (who is very similar to Zod in both appearance and back story) seeks revenge on Superman by turning the Earths sun red and thus depowering the man of steel. It is up to Green Lantern and Aquaman to help their friend defeat the evil Kryptonian who has the same powers as Superman.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryAfter saving a Whale, Aquaman notices the water is on fire and radios Wonder Woman for help who then tells Superman. Meanwhile Aquaman, with the help of his Whale friend helps move a ship from the path of the flaming water. Superman arrives stops the flames with a concrete road and his super breath. The Super Friends find out that a group of Lava Men are the ones who are causing the trouble. Solderath, King of the Lava Men, wreaks havoc on the surface world because he feels the Lava Men have been living underground for too long while the humans occupy the surface. While the Wonder Woman fights the Lava Men, Superman stops a fire ball over the Pole and Aquaman stops a giant whirlpool from draining the ocean. When the three Super Friends rejoin each other they defeat the Lava Men and return them back to the center of the Earth.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNA.El Dorado responds a series of art gallery robberies in Metropolis. They confront John Palette, a painter whose invention can turn paintings of his design into real life monsters that can steal for him.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryIn an Arcade, The Wonder Twins and Gleek encounter a witch who shrinks them. As Zan and Jayna elude danger, they call Wonder Woman for help. Now Wonder Woman and the Wonder Twins must stop the witch before she shrinks all of the customers. |}Season 7 (the lost season): 1983{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummary3 kids ride a condemned rollar coaster that gradually falls apart.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummary Superman and Batman are pulled into a space warp where they come across a strange planet inhabited by aliens known as Zoons. The leader of the group, Super Frog, plans on keeping who he sees as invaders as prisoners. He then turns Superman into an eagle and Batman into a real bat. The aliens headquarters is referred to as the Hall of Zoon. Fortunately Batman and Superman are able to warp into their own galaxy and the effects wear off...Batman remarks that Superman would have made a great eagle. ShortSummaryWonder Woman and Green Lantern think the Legion of Doom will strike since the entire Justice League is going to meet in the Hall of Justice the next day. Jayna and Zan are put in charge of security during the night. Giganta sets a trap and captures Gleek and takes him to Gorillia Grodd miles away on the outskirts of Metropolis. Because so many Justice League members were going to meet in one place, they tried to take precautions but a mechanical duplicate of Gleek arrives at the Hall of Justice to use his killer laser eyes on the Justice League and help Grodd and Giganta take over the Hall of Justice. Its now up to the Wonder Twins to free the Justice League and stop Grodd and Giganta.ShortSummary A writer turns into the creature he created after a lightning bolt electrocutes an electrical tower nearby. Chief and Superman are on hand to stop the behemoth from continuing his destructive ways. Krypton that it erased his time on Earth and that nobody had ever heard of Superman before. He goes back into the time warp and makes sure Krypton explodes because he figures that Earth would need a person like Superman to protect it.ShortSummarySpace dolls try to take over the world but run out of batteriesShortSummary2 divers find the Titanic which contains Thinking algae. Then the Titanic comes alive. ShortSummaryBatman & Robin foils some building constructors plans to revive the Hall of Doom, which was destroyed in a previous encounter with the Super Friends, and turn it into a Museum. When Batman figures something is wrong, the building constructors reveal themselves to be Lex Luthor, Soloman Grundy, Sinestro and the rest of the Legion of Doom. The Legion of Doom proceed with their salvage operation, restoring the Hall of Doom to its initial deadly condition. When the Legion of Doom attacks Metropolis, Superman and Wonder Woman attempt to stop them only to get crystallized by Lex Luthors Crystallization Ray. With the Super Friends defeated, the Legion of Doom take over the Hall of Justice to make their demands. Meanwhile Superman and Wonder Woman are able to move again thanks to Supermans X-Ray vision and are off to stop the Legion of Doom. Batman & Robin must find a way to reverse the polarity of Luthors Crystallization Ray to transform Superman and Wonder Woman back to normal so the Legion of Dooms raid on Fort Knox can be put to an end.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryThe Hall of Justice, with Wonder Woman and Samurai inside, gets swallowed up into the Earth. After tumbling through layers of rock, the Hall of Justices comes to a stop at a strange forgotten world beneath our own. When Wonder Woman and Samurai explore the strange subterranean world, they are attacked by pre-historic creatures called Slarums. Technos saves the two Super Friends and offers to show them the world of the Volti. During the tour Technos gets mad because the two Super Friends asked him why the Volti have not helped the Slarums and as a result, Technos imprisons them. Wonder Woman and Samurai escape and head over to the Hall of Justice to contact the other Super Friends only to be met by Slarums. Wonder Woman, Samurai, and the Slarums decide to pay the Volti a visit to unite the two races and lift the Hall of Justice back to the surface. Superboys life...hoping that he will never grow up to become Superman. Meanwhile, in the future, Superman learns of the plot and he too travels back in time to save his own past and capture the Phantom Zone villains.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryAfter obtaining living cells from Aquaman and El Dorados skin, Brainiac creates clones of the two heroes. Brainiac programs the Aquaman and El Dorado clones to their counterparts bring them back to Brainiacs Laboratory. After attempting to rob a ship, the clones are apprehended. The next day in court the clones say the Super Friends have turned against the people. The real El Dorado and Aquaman tricks Brainiac to free them and the hero transport to the Metropolis courthouse. There they clear up the situation and incarcerate Brainiac. ShortSummary While investigating a strange electrified spiked metal pod, Superman and Batman unwittingly unleash the cloud-like prisinor inside, (named sleep) and are then trapped in a dream world. They have nightmares. Superman dreams that everything he touches turns to kryptonite. Wonder woman tries to save them by wrapping her golden lasso around her waist and entering the dream world. She instructs a minor to wake her in five minutes by tugging on the lasso. It works. Superman then breathes the creature into his lungs and blows him back into the pod.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummary Space shuttle astronauts unwittingly load an alien chemical blob into their cargo bay (assuming it to be space junk). The blob starts eating metal and the astronauts call for help. Batman, Robin and Back Vulcan zip out there and rescue the astronauts.  Assuming the blob burned up in the atmosphere, they return to earth, but then the blob reappears and after some failed attempts, they figure out the creature has a problem with sugar. ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryNA.ShortSummaryBizarro creates trouble by zapping several of the Superfriends into an arcade game reminiscent of Pac-Man and Bizarro is in control of the hungry muncher.ShortSummaryGiant children arrive on Earth to play.ShortSummaryThe Wonder Twins and Gleek are on weekend patrol duty when the Justice League patrol craft is invaded by space racing punks. After the Wonder Twins decide to teach them to respect the law, the space racing punks decide to retreat by dematerializing. Unfortunately, they take Jayna along with them and hold her hostage. At the Hall of Justice, Wonder Woman and The Flash notice there are three spacecrafts violating lightspeed in the Saturn sector and decide to check it out. When they arrive they see the space punks have hit a space mining ship. Wonder Woman and The Flash save the two space miners and The Wonder Twins saves the out of control Space Ship.ShortSummary Superman and Woman are abducted by a race of alien beings and are forced to play intergalactic football which is referred to as space ball in this episode. By the end of the episode the heroes teach the aliens that the key to success is to work together.|}Super Friends: The Legendary Super Powers Show episodesSeason 8: 19841985{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)Firestorm makes his debut as a superhero and is invited to join the Super Friends.  Darkseid pursues Wonder Woman to be his and is able to capture her when Firestorm accidentally shuts off the Hall of Justices force field.ShortSummaryWith her free will removed, Wonder Woman leads the Super Friends into a trap after they arrive at Darkseids palace to save her.  Firestorms duo persona allows him to free himself and the Super Friends from Darkseids clutches.Brainiac develops android duplicates of Superman and Wonder Woman in an attempt to seek revenge on the Superfriends. He enlists the reluctant help of Darkseid who was tricked into following the android Wonder Woman right into Brainiacs star-ship. Darkseid and Brainiac hatch a plan to capture all the Superfriends...but, not long after their capture, it does not take long for the two egotistical villains to be at each others throats. Darkseid and his gang whisk away with Wonder Woman through their stargate but its Brainiac who indirectly has the last laugh on Darkseid. Samurai uses invisibility to trick Mirror Master into thinking that he is caught.  Samurai then grabs the portal device & releases his friends.  Mirror Master is lost in a mirror maze & is caught.ShortSummary Luthor disrupts Darkseids quiet time on Apokolips with a plan to destroy the Superfriends. One by one the Superfriends are lured into traps and zapped to Darkseids palace. Luthor plans on stealing the powers from the Superfriends. In order to do this he needs the beams from Darkseid. Once Luthor has gained the powers of the Superfriends he quickly sets his sights on taking control of Darkseids palace. The wily Darkseid, though, was prepared for a double-cross from Luthor. Suddenly, Luthor is powerless and the Superfriends are free...they regain their powers and they set out to stop Darkseids latest plan. They thwart his plan but he escapes into his stargate. Afterward, Luthor is put in prison stripes.   ShortSummary In this episode a small-time thief named Benny finds an ancient lamp during a robbery. Batman and Apache Chief apprehend the crook...but observing from a distance is Mxyzptlk. He decides to get into the act by playing the part of a genie...who zaps the crook away...and from that point forward the two go on a crime spree. Batman gets the last laugh on Mxyzptlk, though.Firestorm. Luthor succeeds in shrinking the Hall of Justice and its up to the now miniature Superfriends to save the day before the senior members of the group return from space. Ronald Raymond, creates his own secret identity...called Captain Mystery. He taps into the Hall of Justice files and shows up to help the Superfriends but winds up causing more harm than good. Luthor notices this and kidnaps Captain Mystery and intends on using him in his plot. Its up to the Superfriends to rescue Captain Mystery and capture Lex Luthor.Firestorm infiltrate the auction under disguise as ice creatures. They plan on bidding high and taking the gold kryptonite before it can fall into enemy hands. Gold kryptonite is the form that strips away all of the powers that Superman enjoys on Earth. El Dorado, Batman, and Superman travel to the Moon of Games to confront Kalibak about which star has Darkseid imprisoned Black Vulcan, Wonder Woman, and Firestorm. El Dorado hatches a plan with the help of Batman. Darkseid shows up unexpectedly, as El Dorado had feared, and Darkseid throws the gold kryptonite at Superman...but did it work? Robin, and Woman get caught up in an island mystery when a science experiment goes awry after Batman and Professor Stein went missing when on their way to the Tokyo Science Expo with Professor Steins Omnicaster. A scientist named Dr. Dan Corwin had walked into what is referred to as a Geneto Beam and is turned into a Dinosoid, which means half-human/half-dinosaur. His partner flees and hides in the jungle...its up to the estranged scientist, as well as Ronald, Robin, and Apache Chief to track down the evil scientist and transform everyone back to normal.   Firestorm, and Samurai have to babysit the kid whom they have nick-named super brat. Mxyzptlk does not make things any better with his practical jokes and pranks. ShortSummary A villain created for this episode, named Dollmaker, uses clay dolls and voodoo black magic to command the real Superfriends to commit crimes. A few of the Superfriends do not fall victim and must rescue the others from Dollmakers spell.ShortSummary Darkseid uses a royal princess from Tyron-7 to lure the Super Friends into a trap. He promised her that if she delivered the Super Friends that her planet would be spared from his wrath. However, as things are more apt to do, the plan does not necessarily follow that path and soon the princess learns that she was a pawn in Darkseids ultimate plot: To banish Tyron-7 into the universe. A projector turns the Super Friends to stone and its up to the princess and her father to free the Super Friends and stop Darkseid. Brainiac uses his star ship and his mental powers to take control of a small village. He turns people into zombie-like creatures who he enslaves to mine and work for him. Brainiac eventually takes control of the Wonder Twins who set out to capture Wonder Woman. This succeeds but would later backfire when Apache Chief grows 50 feet tall and rattles the Starship, which causes the ice block {Zan} around Wonder Woman to crack. Shes able to transform the Wonder Twins back to normal. Later on Chief, the Twins, and Woman are on hand to stop Brainiac and save the village. NOTE: This episode is the final appearance of the Wonder Twins and Gleek. ShortSummary Remlar, a villain from another galaxy, travels the universe in search of buildings and people to put on display in an intergalactic museum. Superman, Firestorm, and Samurai must figure out a way to stop Remlar and return the historical monuments and people to their rightful place.|}The Super Powers Team: Galactic Guardians episodesSeason 9: 19851986{| classwikitable|-! # !! Title !! Original Airdate(s)Cyborg is invited to join the Super Powers Team--but surprisingly turns down the offer. Anxious to have someone his own age as a fellow Team member, the nuclear-powered Firestorm seeks out Cyborg to learn the reason for his reticence. But it will take the intervention of Darkseid and his Parademons, to say nothing of some horrific-looking sea pods, to make Cyborg change his mind.NOTE: Sarah Simms, Cyborgs love interest in DCs normal continuity makes a cameo appearance.ShortSummaryWith Darkseid and his minions in hot pursuit, Superman, Firestorm and Cyborg temporarily take shelter in a huge derelict space vessel. It turns out that the three Galactic Guardians have boarded a ghost ship, controlled by a fugitive princess who uses hologram images to ward off pirates and to protect the people of her planet--who live in miniaturized form in a locket around her neck. Darkseid hopes to exploit the princess, and to take sinister advantage of Supermans weakened state!ShortSummaryBizarro #1, the weird yet funny Superman doppelganger from Htrae (Bizarro World), uses his duplicator ray to create Bizarro versions of Wonder Woman, Firestorm and Cyborg. These opposite clones are then called upon to protect Bizarro World from its many enemies. Unfortunately, the prankish Mr. Mxyzptlk plans to harness the powers of the three Bizarro superheroes in order to wreak havoc upon the earth, in an endless series of nasty pranks and practical jokes specially designed to drive everyone as crazy as HE is! Until the Real Wonder Woman uses the duplicator ray on Mr. Mxyzptlk to create Mr. Kltpzyxm, causing the Bizarro Super Powers team to go back to Bizarro World and stop him, and making Mr. Mxyzptlk accidentally say his name backwards and go back to the 5th dimension.ShortSummaryLittle does Wonder Woman suspect that the man she assumes to be her mortal boyfriend Steve Trevor is actually the evil Darkseid, who has rearranged his molecular structure in order to impersonate Steve. Its all part of a master plan to steal the deadly TC7 satellite and transform everyone on earth into hideous mutants. The Galactic Guardians set out to rescue the real Steve and thwart Darkseid--a task made doubly difficult when Wonder Woman herself is kidnapped!ShortSummaryGotham City is literally held in the grip of terror by The Scarecrows arsenal of Fear Transmitters. Scouring Gotham in search of Scarecrow, Batman is himself paralyzed with fright when he finds himself in the middle of Crime Alley, where years earlier the parents of Batmans alter ego Bruce Wayne had been murdered in cold blood. Taking advantage of the situation, Scarecrow intends to keep Batman trapped in Crime Alley forever by using Wonder Woman as bait--forcing the Caped Crusader to purge himself of his lifelong fears once and for all!NOTE: This is the first time that the origin of Batman is told in any other media outside the comics.ShortSummaryTheres a new supervillain in town, and his name is The Ace. Gathering together a gang of four hardened delinquents, the Ace decks them out in sinister playing-card costumes, and thus the Royal Flush Gang is born. In their efforts to defeat this scurrilous quintet of no-goods, Robin and Cyborg discover that the Ace is taking his orders directly from their perennial enemy Darkseid--while Robins sidekick Batman learns to his astonishment that the Ace is not a new nemesis at all, but instead a very old one... The Joker!ShortSummaryWhile enjoying a day off with Firestorm, Cyborg is captured by the robot minions of supercomputer Brainiac, who intends to use the bionic dogooder for one of his typically evil mind-blowing experiments. To save the life of his fellow Galactic Guardian, Firestorm enlists the aid of Batman and rushes to Cyborgs rescue. But it may already be too late: The two superpowered good guys are confronted by a gigantic killer robot...with Cyborgs brain and intellect trapped inside its power source!ShortSummaryWhile languishing in prison with the Penguin as his cellmate, evil necromancer Felix Faust conjures up a spell which enables him to steal the special powers of Superman. No sooner has this happened than the Penguin appropriates these powers for himself, and as result the Super Powers Team now works for him! In order to thwart the Penguin and emerge as the real villain of the peace, Faust absorbs all of Supermans powers, but Firestorm creates a kryptonite crown on Fausts head, weakening him and Wonder Woman uses her Magic Lasso to force him to give up Supermans powers and return them to the man of steel!NOTE: First appearance of Felix Faust and The Penguin. Curiously, Batman and Robin were not present to face The Penguin.ShortSummaryThe evil Darkseids latest project involves the capture and takeover of Star City, a gigantic orbiting earth colony. To this end, he replaces the satellites kidnapped inventor Mr. Moko with a robot lookalike that even fools Mokos daughter, Kiri. Meanwhile, Batman, Firestorm and Samurai must steer clear of Darkseids minions Kalibak and DeSaad and their robot army, long enough to allow Superman, Wonder Woman and Aquaman to seek out and destroy the control equipment hidden in Darkseids headquarters!ShortSummaryThe unthinkable has happened: Superman is dead, the victim of Kryptonite poisoning. Injured in the mishap which felled Superman, a weakened Firestorm is captured by Darkseid, who wants the Galactic Guardian to reveal the details of the Man of Steels demise. Meanwhile, several members of the Super Powers Team gather at the Fortress at Solitude, where they come across evidence indicating that Superman is still alive--but if this is true, why has he allowed the other Team members to fall into Darkseids clutches?NOTE: The Flash and El Dorado (who was not part of he official roster) appeared in this episode.|}External links*The Ultimate Super Friends episode guide* Super Friends Episode Guide* All-New Super Friends Hour episodesAmigosSuperamiciFriendsAmigosFriends
21540981
Omnibus_Public_Land_Management_Act_of_2009
 amendmentsThe Omnibus Public Land Management Act of 2009 (, ) is a law passed in the 111th States Congress and signed into law by President Obama on March 30, 2009.()Legislative history110th CongressOn June 26, 2008, Senator Bingaman of Mexico introduced the Omnibus Public Land Management Act of 2008 (). Although the bill had some support from both Democrats and Republicans, including Majority Leader Reid of Nevada, the Senate never voted on the measure due to threats by Senator Coburn (R-Oklahoma) to filibuster the bill.()111th CongressS. 22On January 7, 2009, Bingaman introduced the Omnibus Public Land Management Act of 2009 (), a new bill which incorporated 159 bills that had been considered by the Committee on Energy and Natural Resources during the Congress and, in some cases, earlier Congresses.(C-SPAN) Despite vehement opposition from Coburn and some other Republicans, the Senate passed a cloture motion on January 11 by a vote of 66-12(Vote 1, via Senate.gov) and then passed the bill on January 15 by a vote of 73-21, with four members not voting.(Vote 3, via Senate.gov)The bill was then sent to the House of Representatives, where it was expected to pass by a wide margin.()The bill was held at the desk instead of being sent to a committee.On March 11, 2009, the House considered the bill under suspension of the rules, meaning that a two-thirds vote would be required for passage. Those voting in favor of the bill (predominantly Democrats) fell two votes short of a two-thirds majority, 282-144. 34 Republicans voted in favor of the bill, while three Democrats voted against it: Boren of Oklahoma, Jim Marshall of Georgia, and Peterson of Minnesota.(Roll Call 117, via House.gov)House Democrats could then have brought the bill back to the floor under regular procedure, which would have allowed Republicans to submit amendments to the bill.() The bill, as voted on by the House, had been amended by Altmire (D-Pennsylvania), to prohibit the closing of the lands described in the bill to hunting and fishing, presumably to persuade sportsmen and hunters to vote for the bill.()H.R. 146On March 3, 2009, the House of Representatives passed a bill under suspension of the rules, the War and of 1812 Battlefield Protection Act (), 394-13. On March 12, one day after the House failed to pass the Omnibus Public Land Management Act, Reid announced that he would file cloture on H.R. 146. While in the Senate, the bill was amended to include a majority of the text in S. 22.(http://dpc.senate.gov/dpcdoc.cfm?doc_namelb-111-1-37) The Senate voted 73-21 for cloture and 77-20 to pass the bill. The House agreed to the Senate amendments, 285-140, on March 25.(Major Actions on H.R. 146, 111th Congress)President Barack Obama signed the bill into law on March 30, 2009, declaring one provision unconstitutional in his statement.()ComponentsTitle ITitle I of the bill designates two million acres (8,000 km) of wilderness in nine states (California, Colorado, Idaho, Michigan, Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Virginia, and Virginia)  for protection through addition to the Wilderness Preservation System. Among these lands are:*   in the National Forest.*   in the National Forest.*  wilderness additions in the vicinity of Hood, Oregon, including additions to the Creek Wilderness, of the Woods Wilderness, O. Hatfield Wilderness, Hood Wilderness, and Wilderness, as well as designation of the Wilderness, River Wilderness, and White River Wilderness.*   in the Oregon Badlands. (see Badlands Wilderness and Basin Wilderness)*   in Oregons National Monument. (see Mountain Wilderness)*   in the National Forest. (see Salmon Wilderness)*   in and near National Park.*   near Creek Wilderness in Virginia*   in Miguel County, New Mexico. (see Wilderness)*   in Rocks National Lakeshore. (see Basin Wilderness)*   in Idahos Owyhee Canyonlands:() ** Jacks Creek Wilderness - **  Jarbidge Rivers Wilderness - ** Jacks Creek Wilderness - ** Fork Owyhee Wilderness - ** River Wilderness  - ** Creek Wilderness - *   in California, including:**  added to the Wilderness in the Humboldt-Toiyabe and National Forests.**  in the Inyo National Forest. (see River Headwaters Wilderness)**  added to the Muir Wilderness in the Inyo National Forest and of Land Management lands.**  added to the Adams Wilderness in the Inyo National Forest.**  in the Inyo National Forest and Bureau of Land Management lands. (see Mountains Wilderness)**  in the Inyo National Forest and Bureau of Land Management lands. (see Mountain Wilderness)**  in the National Forest. (see Mountain Wilderness)**  in the Angeles National Forest. (see View Ridge Wilderness)**  added to the Tibia Wilderness in the National Forest.**  in the Bernardino National Forest. (see Mountain Wilderness)**  in the San Bernardino National Forest. (see Fork San Jacinto Wilderness)**  added to the Rosa Wilderness in the San Bernardino National Forest and Bureau of Land Management lands.**  of Bureau of Land Management lands. (see Mountain Wilderness)**  in Tree National Park, with another  pending cessation of non-wilderness activities and acquisition of inholdings.**  added to the Mountains Wilderness in Bureau of Land Management lands.**  added to the Wilderness in Bureau of Land Management lands.**  of Bureau of Land Management lands. (see Mountains Wilderness)**  added to the Mountains Wilderness in Bureau of Land Management lands.Title IITitle II establishes a Landscape Conservation System, to include of Land Management-administered National Monuments, Conservation Areas, Study Areas, components of the Trails System, components of the Wild and Scenic Rivers System, and components of the Wilderness Preservation System.Title II also designates three new National Conservation Areas (Stanton-Snowy River Cave National Conservation Area, River Birds of Prey National Conservation Area, and National Conservation Area) and one new National Monument (the Trackways National Monument in the Mountains of Mexico). It also transfers lands in Nevada, Utah, Idaho, and Washington to federal control.Title IIITitle III authorizes the States Secretary of Agriculture to, through the Chief of the States Forest Service, conduct studies in the interest of preserving open space in southern Colorado and deliver an annual report on the wildland firefighter safety practices...including training programs and activities for wildland fire suppression, prescribed burning, and wildland fire use, during the preceding calendar year.  Title III also prohibits further oil and gas leasing, geothermal leasing, and mining patents in a stretch of the National Forest; this provision was based on a bill being crafted by Senator L. Thomas of Wyoming before his death.Title IVTitle IV authorizes the Chief of the Forest Service to solicit (from regional foresters) nominations of forest landscapes of at least , primarily consisting of national forest lands, which are in need of active ecosystem restoration, for the carrying out of ecological restoration treatments. The Chief, acting on behalf of the Secretary of Agriculture, then may select up to ten of these proposals, aided by a fifteen-member advisory board, to be funded in any given fiscal year. For each proposal selected, 50% of the expenditures of the execution and monitoring of ecological restoration treatments would be paid for by a Collaborative Forest Landscape Restoration Fund in the States Treasury. However, each proposals expenditures are limited to $4 million per year.Title VTitle V designates thousands of miles of new additions to the Wild and Scenic Rivers System. It also adds six trails to the Trails System: the National Scenic Trail, the England National Scenic Trail, the Age Floods National Geologic Trail, the Washington-Rochambeau Revolutionary Route National Historic Trail, the Northwest National Scenic Trail and the of Tears National Historic Trail.Title VITitle VI creates a number of new States Department of the Interior programs. One of these programs, the Wolf Livestock Loss Demonstration Project, gives states and Indian tribes federal grants to help livestock producers to reduce livestock loss due to predation by wolves in non-lethal ways, as well as for the purpose of compensating livestock producers for their loss of livestock due to predation by wolves.  Another part of Title VI, the Paleontological Resources Preservation Act, was originally a Senate bill introduced in 2007 by Akaka (D-Hawaii). This provision establishes stronger penalties than previously required for nonpermitted removal of scientifically significant fossils from federal lands.  The provision was endorsed and strongly supported by the of Vertebrate Paleontology, an international association of professional and amateur vertebrate paleontologists.  In contrast, the Association of Applied Paleontological Sciences, an association of commercial dealers, opposed the measure.Title VIITitle VII makes three additions to the Park System and expands current National Park designations. It also authorizes an American Battlefield Protection Program, a Preserve America program, a Save Americas Treasures Program, and a Route 66 Corridor Preservation Program, all to be carried out by the Park Service.New National Park System components would include:*Great Falls National Historical Park in Paterson, Jersey*William Jefferson Clinton Birthplace Home National Historic Site in Hope, Arkansas*Raisin National Battlefield Park in Frenchtown, MichiganTitle VIIITitle VIII designates ten new Heritage Areas at the cost of $103.5 million:*Sec. 8001. de Cristo National Heritage Area, Colorado.*Sec. 8002. La Poudre River National Heritage Area, Colorado.*Sec. 8003. Park National Heritage Area, Colorado.*Sec. 8004. Plains National Heritage Area, Dakota.*Sec. 8005. National Heritage Area, Maryland.*Sec. 8006. Way National Heritage Area, Massachusetts and Hampshire.*Sec. 8007. Hills National Heritage Area.*Sec. 8008. Delta National Heritage Area.*Sec. 8009. Shoals National Heritage Area, Alabama.*Sec. 8010. Mountains-Turnagain Arm National Heritage Area, Alaska.Title IXTitle IX authorizes three new studies to examine new reclamation projects under the jurisdiction of the of Reclamation. It also creates 15 new water and endangered fish projects in four states. Furthermore, Title IX puts some federal water reclamation facilities under local control and funds conservation efforts.Title XTitle X codifies the settlements of three water disputes in California, Nevada, and New Mexico, in an effort to resolve decades of litigation.Title XITitle XI reauthorizes the National Geologic Mapping Act of 1992 at a cost of $64 million per year through the year 2018. It furthermore authorizes groundwater surveys in New Mexico, also by the Geological Survey.Title XIITitle XII creates five new oceanic observation, research, and exploration programs at a cost of $2.6 billion, including programs for undersea research, undersea and coastal mapping, acidification research, and ocean conservation. One provision, the Integrated Coastal and Ocean Observation System Act, would establish a national integrated System of ocean, coastal, and Great Lakes observing systems,  Federal and non-Federal components coordinated at the national level by the National Ocean Research Leadership Council in order to support national defense, marine commerce, navigation safety, weather, climate, and marine forecasting, energy siting and production, economic development, ecosystem-based marine, coastal, and Great Lakes resource management, public safety, and public outreach training and education.Title XIIITitle XIII deals with miscellaneous bills, including one that funds the Tropical Botanical Garden in Hawaii and another that increases the number of Assistant Energy Secretaries in the States Department of Energy to eight. Title XIII also amends the Fisheries Restoration and Irrigation Mitigation Act of 2000 and the Alaska Natural Gas Pipeline Act.Title XIVTitle XIV, the Christopher and Reeve Paralysis Act, provides $105 million over five years for coordinated paralysis research by the Institutes of Health.Title XVTitle XV grants the Institution $69 million for laboratory and greenhouse construction at three Smithsonian facilities.Acts amendedThe Omnibus Public Land Management Act of 2009 amended the following acts of Congress, in order of first appearance:* Public Law 100-326* Wilderness Act of 1984* and Scenic Rivers Act* River Gorge National Scenic Area Act* Wilderness Act* Rosa and San Jacinto Mountains National Monument Act of 2000* Peaks Wilderness Area, the Arapaho National Recreation Area and the Oregon Islands Wilderness Area Act* Public Law 103-64* Parks and Public Lands Management Act of 1996* Nevada Public Land Management Act of 1998* Public Law 108-67* of the Interior and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, 1999* Shur Bien Preservation Trust Area Act* Trails System Act* National Interest Lands Conservation Act* Public Law 102-543* Farm National Historic Site Establishment Act of 1990* River Canyon National Preserve Act of 1992* An Act to rename and expand the boundaries of the Mound City Group National Monument in Ohio* Parks and Recreation Act of 1978* Public Law 96-607* Alto Battlefield National Historic Site Act of 1991* Appropriations Act, 2005* Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2002* Public Law 97-250* Forest National Park Expansion Act of 2004* National Coastal Special Resources Study Act* Lands Recreation Enhancement Act* of the American Revolution National Heritage Area Act of 2006* Natural Resources Act of 2008* of the Interior and Related Agencies Appropriations Act, 1996* Aviation Heritage Preservation Act of 1992* Public Law 87-213* Public Law 106-45* Cave and Karst Research Institute Act of 1998* Public Law 87-126* and Shetucket Rivers Valley National Heritage Corridor Act of 1994* and Lehigh National Heritage Corridor Act of 1988* Canalway National Heritage Corridor Act* Public Law 99-647* Wastewater and Groundwater Study and Facilities Act* Public Law 106-392* Projects Authorization and Adjustment Act of 1992* Public Law 87-590* River Storage Project Act* Public Law 87-483* Geologic Mapping Act of 1992* Zone Management Act of 1972* Act of February 22, 1889* Morrill Act of 1862* Restoration and Irrigation Mitigation Act of 2000* Natural Gas Pipeline Act* of Energy Organization ActReferencesExternal links*, via THOMAS*Speech by Sen. Jeff Bingaman (D-New Mexico) supporting the bill*Press release from Sen. Tom Coburn (R-Oklahoma) criticizing the bill*GOP.gov analysis of bill*Detailed Maps of BLM Designated Lands under the Act - Bureau of Land Management
21557904
Dbora_Giorgi
Dbora Giorgi (born in 1959) is an Argentine economist, currently the nations Minister of Industry.CareerGiorgi was born in Balvanera, Aires in 1959 and graduated with honors from the Argentine Catholic University with a degree in Economics, later publishing numerous academic articles in her specialty. She entered the world of high finance as an arbitrageuse and, in 1989, co-founded Alpha Economic Studies, a financial consulting firm contracted by then-Argentine Central Bank President Gonzlez Fraga, a prominent conservative figure. She married in 1986, had one son and later bought a home in Buenos Aires upscale Belgrano section.(Notcias )Giorgi left Alpha Economic Studies in 1999 to accept a prominent post as Secretary of Commerce (a sub-Cabinet level position) at the hand of newly-elected President de la Ras first Economy Minister, Luis Machinea. Later named Secretary of Energy and Mining, she was transferred to the powerful post of Secretary of Industry by Economy Minister Cavallo. Following President Fernando de la Ras resignation in December 2001, she returned to Alpha, whereby she was invited as Director of the International Negotiation Center of the Industrial Union (UIA), Argentinas leading manufacturers lobby.Giorgi was appointed Minister of Production of the of Buenos Aires (Argentinas largest) by Governor Sol in 2005. In that capacity, she reopened the Undersecretariat of International Economic Relations, making the pursuit of foreign trade avenues central to her departments policy. She was also instrumental in the adoption of sizable tax cuts in the province during her tenure.(Punto Cero )(Aqu la Notcia )The Argentine government conflict with the agricultural sector helped lead to the reinauguration of the Production Ministry at the urging of UIA President Ignacio de Mendiguren.(El Litoral ) The powerful Economy Ministry transferred a number of influential Secretariats to the new Cabinet-level position (see external links, below), which would have oversight over much of the economys goods-producing sector in its purview. Recommended by Buenos Aires Province Governor Scioli, Dbora Giorgi was sworn in as Production Minister on November 26, 2008.(Clarn (11/25/2008) ) By way of further steps to improve her strained relations with the important agrarian sector, President Kirchner transferred the Production Ministrys farm policy portfolio into a new Ministry of Agriculture, renaming the former post as the Ministry of Industry.(Clarn (10/02/2009) )External links*Argentine Ministry of Industry and Tourism *Secretariat of Industry, Commerce and Small and Medium Business *Secretariat of Tourism *National Investment Development Agency ReferencesGiorgi
21573997
Red_Deer_Lake_(Manitoba)
 frozen             Red Deer Lake is a lake in western Manitoba, Canada. It is located approximately 5 miles north of Barrows and 10 miles west of Dawnson Bay of Winnipegosis, and 8 miles east of the Saskatchewan border. Barrows served as a quickly constructed lumber town for the Red Deer Lumber Company, although the sawmill closed around 1926 or 1927.(http://www.parklandtourism.com/index.php?pageidATTHER)(Aboriginal and Northern Affairs, http://www.gov.mb.ca/ana/community_profiles/pdf/red_deer_lake.pdf) The community of Red Deer Lake had a population of 40 in 2001.(The area is heavily forested and has hosted a number of logging companies and pulp processors. Fishing is common and fisheries in the lake and Dawson Bay process catch from Red Deer Lake. There is also coal exploration in the area as well, targeting the Formation.(http://www.infomine.com/index/properties/RED_DEER_LAKE_COAL.html)(Robert Charles Wallace, Mining and mineral prospects in northern Manitoba, 1919, page 38)References
21604965
Movement_and_Surveying_Radar
In pit mining operations, people and equipment are constantly at the base of a steep, man-made slope (the highwall or pit-wall). Instances where this slope fails resulting in a rock or earthfall can result in loss of life, injuries and damage or destruction of equipment (see mining). It has been found that, over the last few hours preceding a slope failure, there is nearly always a small movement, or alteration in the movement pattern in the rock face of that section.The system is intended to monitor mine slopes to detect this movement and generate a warning of impending failure (stability), so that personnel and equipment may be removed prior to the failure. The radar element provides very accurate, real-time, all weather slope movement measurements with sub millimetre detection ability, and is able to provide an alarm if the detected movement reaches a predetermined level, thereby permitting evacuation of the unstable area, and enhancing safety.All radar measurements are fully geo-referenced to an accuracy that allows easy integration with standard digital terrain mapping (DTM) tools.A second function of the Movement and Surveying Radar is to determine the absolute range to the electromagnetic reflective centroid of an area on a body of material or geographical feature. This functionality, combined with the accurately surveyed position of the measurement origin of the Movement and Surveying Radar and the positioning systems angular measurement information, may be used to generate survey data of geographical features such as mine walls and rubble dumps. The survey data collected may be used for applications such as the calculation of material removal volumes.A Movement and Surveying Radar combines simultaneously the execution of slope stability and surveying measurements, which together with high-speed external data links makes it a near real-time tool for mining safety, planning and productivity improvement.
21616064
Jalamid
Jalamid is a town and crossroads in Arabia near the Iraqi border. Transport It has phosphate deposits and is therefore the probable destination of a branch railway of the Railways Organization. See also * stations in Saudi Arabia* in Saudi Arabia References  External links * Mining is new pillar of the Saudi economy
21626530
Sanjay_Pathak_(politician)
Sanjay Pathak Aka Sanju Bhaiya is a young MLA (member of legislative assembly) from Vijayraghavgarh constituency of District in Pradesh State, India.He is the richest MLA of Madhya Pradesh State in present term 2008. He has declared  32 crore Rupees assets.Declared Assets Liabilities In ElectionsPersonalMr Sanjay Pathak belongs to well known Pathak family of Katni, Pradesh and son of former MP Minister Mr Satyendra Pathak & Mrs. Nirmala Pathak who is the current Mayor of Katni. He is married to Mrs Nidhi and has two sons and one daughter.Commercial ActivitiesHe is a leading businessman with commercial interests in mining, print media (partner in Hindi daily Yash Bharat), hotel & resorts (he owns hotels and resorts namely Syna Tiger Resort in national park, Nirmal Chhaya Resorts at Biruhali near Bandhavgarh and in other tourist places like khajuraho, National Park & Shimla), real estate (malls & commercial properties in Jabalpur and Katni) ,and education (he owns Syna International School and Syna International College in Katni MP.).Recently he has started coal mining venture in Indonesia.Political careerBiggest mining magnate of Madhya Pradesh, businessman and former Katni Zilla (district) Panchayat President, Sanjay Pathak won the Pradesh Legislative Assembly Election 2008 from his family constituency Vijayraghavgarh.ElectionIn the Pradesh Legislative Assembly Election 2008 he defeated sitting Janata Party (BJP) MLA Dhruv Pratap Singh by more than 20,000 votes despite of the fact that he was contesting assembly elections first time in his life.Controversy   He and his family are alleged to be working as mining mafia and indulged in land grabbing from tribals in and around Katni, Jabalpur and Sihora belt (mahakaushal region) in Madhya Pradesh.They are considered as Reddy Brothers of Madhya Pradesh, India Today Article.  Image:sanjay-pathak-mla-01.jpg|Sanjay Pathak Image:satyendra-pathak-ex-minister-01.jpg|Satendra Pathak (Father) Image:Nirmala_pathak_katni_mayor_02.jpg|Nirmala Pathak (Mother)Pathak Family KatniExternal links*Sanjay Pathak Homepage*Syna Tiger Resort*Syna International School *Nirmal Chhaya Resorts*Syna International College*Declared Assets Liabilities In Elections*32 crore Rupees assets.*Indian Election Commission reference*Digging Towards Disaster*Mining Controversy*Pollution MadhyaPradesh*Travel Talk India*People from Madhya Pradesh*  *Madhya Pradesh Tycoons
21655077
Observatory_Inlet
Observatory Inlet is an inlet on the North Coast of British Columbia.  It is a northward extension of Inlet, other sidewaters of which include the Canal. The entrance of Observatory Inlet, from Portland Inlet, lies between Ramsden Point and Nass Point. Ramsden Point also marks, to the west, the entrance of Portland Canal.()() Observatory Inlet was named by Vancouver in 1793, because he set up his observatory on the shore of the inlet, at Salmon Cove, in order to calibrate his chronometers. His two vessels, HMS Discovery and HMS Chatham, stayed in Salmon Cove from July 23 to August 17, 1793. During this time a boat surveying expedition under Vancouver himself explored Canal. Vancouver also named three headlands at the entrance of Observatory Inlet: Maskelyne Point, for Maskelyne,  the Royal, Wales Point, for William Wales, the mathematical master who sailed with Cook, and Ramsden Point, after the famed instrument-maker Ramsden.()GeographyObservatory Inlet has two main arms, the northwest and longer one being named Arm, fed by the River, and Arm, an east arm, fed by the River.  Hastings Arm is approximately 30 km in length, and runs on a nearly true north-south axis, Alice Arm is approximately 25 km in length and bends sharply, running on a roughly northeast-southwest axis.  From their merger to the mouth of Observatory Inlet is approximately 50 km in length, running south-southwest to its merger with the Portland Canal just southwest of Bay, which is a sidewater of Observatory Inlet and the saltwater outer estuary of the Nass.Of many islands in the inlet, two are located at the intersection of the Hastings and Alice Arms, Granby Island and Brooke Island.  Granby Island and Granby Bay are named for the mining company which operated Anyox, and also is the namesake of the River, in the Country, and the indirect namesake of British Columbia, on Lake (Mining Company Ltd.).SettlementsAt the aperture of Nass Bay is the community of Arrandale on its southern point, with the community of Gingolx (Kincolith) located on its northern shore just inside the bay at the mouth of the River.  Also entering the Nass estuary just to its east is the River.The smelter town of British Columbia is located on the west side of the inlet at Granby Bay, which marks the beginning of Hastings Arm.  At the head of Alice Arm is the locality of the same name, which is a former steamer landing and is on the west bank of the mouth of the River.  2.5 km due south of it, on the far side of the inlets shore is the former mining town of Kitsault.  Adjacent to the community of Alice Arm, but on the east side of the Kitsault River, is the Nisgaa village site of Gitsoolh (formerly Gitzault Indian Reserve No. 24).ReferencesExternal links*
21670148
Kuku_Nyungkal_people
 data32       MarrieThe Kuku Nyungkal people (or Annan River Tribe() are a group of Aboriginal Australians who are the original custodians of the coastal mountain slopes, wet tropical forests, waters, and waterfalls of the Upper River, south of QueenslandAll Kuku Nyungkal people share in common social descent from ancestors who back to time immemorial have transmitted, from generation to generation, their Kuku Nyungkal dialect, knowledge, names (for people, places, and things), traditions, heritage, plus lore(Australian Indigenous Law Reporter (1996) Aboriginal Land Claim to Available Crown Land near Helenvale: Wunbuwarra - Banana Creek Accessed 14 March 2009)In 1995 Queenslands Aboriginal Land Tribunal, relying on Kuku Nyungkal genealogical material submitted to them, estimated the total population of Kuku Nyungkal people to be at least 900 (not including those people who had married into Kuku Nyungkal families)(CountryNorman Tindales (1974) Catalogue of Australian Aboriginal tribes identifies  Kokonyungal country as covering fromRiver; south to Rossville; west to Annan-Normanby Divide(Tindale, Norman (1974) Kokobujundji (QLD) in his Catalogue of Australian Aboriginal Tribes. South Australian Museum Accessed 13 March 2009)Kuku Nyungkal people, in their own country based Strategic Plan, describe the extent of their country as follows( Bana Yarraliji Bubu Incorporated (2008) Strategic Plan for Kuku Nyungkal Country. Cairns.):Kuku Nyungkal Country lies in the northern part of the Wet Tropics World Heritage Area. The boundaries of our Country stretch from Annan River, Kings Plain, Rossville, Flat and Amos/Point to Cedar Bay and includes Hope IslandsA locally informed and produced Bama Way map acknowledges Kuku Nynungkal country and advises it is bounded to the north by the lower River (aka Yuku Baja), and to the south by Russell Creek (aka Ngarrilmurril)(Bama Way map Accessed 13 March 2009)LoreKuku Nyungkal local lore for their country has been described to anthropologist Dr Christopher Anderson as follows(Anderson, Christopher (1983) Aborigines and Tin Mining in North Queensland: A Case Study in the Anthropology of Contact History Mankind Vol. 13.No. 6.pp 473-498)The Upper Annan River area was divided into nine and twelve  patrilineal clan estates. Each estate was based on a discrete part of the Annan drainage basin... These ... estates formed a linguistically and culturally distinctive bloc over which travel and access to resources were relatively free for any person associated with the estateshere was a tendency for all adult men to attempt to stay on their own patrilineal estates ... and the land-using groups consisted ... of people related in a variety of ways.based on a core element consisting of a focal male, known as maja maja, his wives and children. The maja maja were identified with particular semi-permanent camps within their own patrilineal clan estate. These men would try to stay as much as possible at their own camps within their own estates, for it was there that their power was greatestThe maja maja were particular individuals of high achieved status and power ... who by virtue of their age, their knowledge of and supposed connections with the supernatural forces emanate in the ngujakura (law or dreaming)... were charged with the minding and looking after of their respective countries and the people associated with them. They ensured the health and well being in the human world and order in the natural world  particularly the steady supply of resources from the land .. by overseeing the maintenance of law by everyone. The breaking of social and cultural regulations was seen almost always to have ecological consequences, and moral knowledge and subsistence knowledge were seen as inextricably linkedWith their perceived special relationship to the yirru or nature-spirit which was said to live in the ground at certain sites ...the old men were able to ... sanction or punish ... breaches of the moral code HistoryPrior to the 1880s, Kuku Nyungkal people had, since time immemorial, possessed, occupied, used and enjoyed their country in accordance with their lore( as follows:Our Bama lore was strong in the past years ... The lore was made and enacted by Elders .. Everyone has responsibility for passing the lore down to the next generation and for carrying it out ... Some lagoons, swamps, springs and beaches are special story places with lores associated with them.  Some are sickness places, some are healing places, some are special places of birds, or feeding areas for other animals. There are special places for hunting and gathering seasonal food such as crab, mussels, bird eggs and certain fish etcIn 1885 tin was discovered at Mount Amos, within Kuku Nyungkal country, following which Kuku Nyungkal people first experienced a small scale invasion by tin miners, then  decades of sustained tin mining of their country(()Looking back, in retrospect, Kuku Nyungkal people living in the area, reflected on the tin mining era, leading anthropologist Dr Christopher Anderson to conclude(:A major effect of tin mining was the disturbance if not outright destruction of ... sites of significance to Kuku Nyungkal people. Almost all important sites in this region are (or were) associated with waterholes and/or waterfalls. Much of the illness and accidents which Europeans suffered in this area were attributed by Kuku Nyungkul to these actions. Violent thunderstorms or big winds, as well as the failure of certain food resources to appear properly or on time were also said to have stemmed from these actions.The disturbances which tin-mining brought to these sites could possibly also have had some kind of spiritual or psychological ill-effect for Kuku-Nyungkal people. Because the sites were foci for power of which old mean were meant to have exclusive control, the flouting of site entry restrictions and site disturbance by Europeans ... had important effectsOver the decades that followed Queensland authorities felt it necessary to progressively encourage and often forcibly remove Kuku Nyungkal people from the tin mining areas and associated external settlement, into lands specially reserved for the purpose such as Ayton,( Hopevale, Yarrabah, and other reserves.(Anderson, C & Coastes, S (1989) Like a Crane Standing on One Leg on a Little Island.  Research Study No. 1. The Underlying Causes for the Deaths of Australian Aboriginal People in Government Detention. National Aboriginal and Islander Legal Services Secretariat.)During the 1950s Church of Australia properly established an Aboriginal mission on the River, into which the remnant Kuku Nyungkal population still living on their country were moved.( The Lutheran Church described the situation as follows(Church of Australia(Queensland) (1978) Report of Visitation 1129 June, quoted in Bana Yarraliji Bubu Incorporated (2008) Strategic Plan for Kuku Nyungkal Country. Cairns.):The Bama people are deeply hurt (the degree can hardly be described) that across the years they have been evicted from their traditional lands by the encroachment of white settlers. From their traditional hunting grounds they were gradually herded into camps along or near the River.  Finally they have been constricted within the confines of a 250 acre reserve at Wujal Wujal.  The depth of their feelings was variously expressed: We are like a crane standing on one leg (no room for two feet on the ground) on a little island : we are like animals in a wild cagePresentBy 1995, one century after the initial invasion by tin miners, an Aboriginal Land Tribunal inquired into the extent to which Kuku Nyungkal traditions, beliefs, and people had been impacted by the colonization of their country.  At that time Kuku Nyungkal representatives submitted, and the Tribunal agreed(:Aboriginal culture in south eastern Cape York Peninsula has changed considerably since the arrival of the first European land visitor in 1872 ... Technological innovations and introductions have altered many aspects of Kuku-Nyungkul life and their economic and political system has also been affected by the social forces of a dominant way of life imposing itself on a previously independent people. Living away from country in a centralised community much of the time has also meant changes. The culture of the Kuku-Nyungkul people is not the same as it was one hundred years ago.On 9 December 2007, the Kuku Nyungkal people were included within an overarching Federal Court native title determination in which their legal right to their own lands and waters was retrospectively acknowledged, and new exclusive rights to possess, occupy, use and enjoys some of their original lands along the Annan River was restored(National Native title (2007) Eastern Kuku Yalanji Peoples native title determination Accessed 16 March 2009)See also* Nyungkal languageNotesReferences* Anderson, Christopher (1983) Aborigines and Tin Mining in North Queensland: A Case Study in the Anthropology of Contact History Mankind. 13(6) pp 473498External links* AusAnthrop Australian Aboriginal tribal database entry for  Nyungal* Gordon, Raymond G., Jr. (ed.), 2005. Kuku Yalanji entry in Ethnologue: Languages of the World, Fifteenth edition. Dallas, Tex.: SIL International. Online version* Tindale, Norman (1974) Kokobujundji (QLD) in his Catalogue of Australian Aboriginal Tribes. South Australian Museum.* Unitied Nations Universitys Media Studios (2008) Walking on Country with Spirits video brief showing Kuku Nyunkal woman (Marilyn Wallace) telling of Kuku Nyunkal country* Kuku Nyungkal Cultural Information Management System - webpage with some publicly available material*  Bana Yarralji Bubu Inc & University of Queensland video Nyungkalwarra Bama Returning to Country* Blog describing journey of Kuku Nyungkal cultural entrepreneurs seeking to restore Kuku Nyungkal lore and people to Kuku Nyungkal country
21680096
Granby_mining
#REDIRECT Consolidated Mining, Smelting and Power Company
21685280
Husnicioara_Coal_Mine
Husnicioara Coal Mine is an mining exploitation, one of the largest in Romania located in Husnicioara, County.() The legal entity managing the Husnicioara mine is the Company of Lignite Oltenia which was set up in 1997.(The exploitation has two open pits Husnicioara - Vest, Zegujani that produced 3.1 million tonnes of lignite in 2008.( The mine has around 700 workers and is endowed with five excavators, three spreaders, one mixed machine and four deposits spreader.( The total proven recoverable reserves of the mine amount to 67 million tonnes of lignite.(References
21699121
Daniel_A._Keim
Daniel A. Keim is a German scientist and full professor (Chair of Information Processing) in the Computer Science department at the of Konstanz, Germany. He received his Ph.D. in Computer Science from the of Munich in 1994. He has been assistant professor in the Computer Science department at the University of Munich, and associate professor in the Computer Science department of the Martin- Luther-University Halle. Keim has also worked as a senior researcher at AT&Ts Shannon Research Labs, Florham Park, NJ, USA. Keim has published extensively on topics specifically related to visualization and mining, and has given tutorials on related issues at several large conferences. He is an editor of TKDE and the Information Visualization Journal. Publications See Publications at Uni-Konstanz.de. External links * Homepage at Uni-Konstanz.de.Keim
21713669
Atomic_demolition_munitions
Atomic demolition munitions (ADMs), colloquially known as nuclear land mines, are small explosive devices.  ADMs were developed for both military and civilian purposes. As weapons, they were designed to be exploded in the forward battle area, in order to block or channel enemy forces.  Non-militarily, they were designed for demolition, mining or earthmoving.  However, apart from testing, they have never been used for either purpose.Military usesInstead of being delivered to the target by missiles, rockets, or artillery shells, ADMs were intended to be emplaced by soldiers.  Because of their relatively small size and light weight, ADMs could be emplaced by military engineers or Forces teams, then detonated on command or by timer to create massive obstructions.  By destroying key terrain features or choke points such as bridges, dams, mountain passes, and tunnels, ADMs could block the movement of enemy forces or channel them into pre-planned killing zones.(Field Manual 5-106, Employment of Atomic Demolition Munitions  (Washington: Department of the Army, July 1984) (Unclassified).)According to official accounts, the States deployed ADMs overseas in Italy and Germany during the War.(Kenneth W. Condit, The History of the Joint Chiefs of Staff--The Joint Chiefs of Staff and National Policy, Volume VI, 1955-56  (Washington: GPO, 1992) p.146; 93rd Congress, U.S. Security Issues in Europe  December 2, 1973, p.15; The New York Times  December 2, 1973, pp.1,34.) Recent scholarship also indicates that the most modern types, SADMs and MADMs, were deployed in Korea.(Peter Hayes, Pacific Powderkeg: American Nuclear Dilemmas in Korea (Lexington, MA: D.C. Heath and Co., 1991) p.48; Tom Gervasi, The Myth of Soviet Nuclear Supremacy (NY: Harper & Row, 1986) pp.416-417; William M. Arkin and Richard W. Fieldhouse, Nuclear Battlefields: Global Links in the Arms Race  (Cambridge: Ballinger, 1985) p.61.)Civilian usesADMs have never been used commercially, though such devices have been used to put out gas well fires as part of the Soviet test program.The Union tested the use of nuclear devices for mining and natural gas extraction on several occasions starting from the mid 1960s, as part of the Explosions for the National Economy program. Tests for similar purposes were carried out in the States under Plowshare, but due to radioactive contamination caused by the tests, no commercial use was made of the technology. With todays greater concerns over the dangers of radiation, it seems unlikely that nuclear devices will ever be used for non-military purposes.List of United States ADMs* W-7/ADM-B (c.1954-1967)* T4 ADM (19571963) Gun-type* W30/Atomic Demolition Munition (19611966)* W31/ADM (19601965)* W45/Atomic Demolition Munition (19641984)* W54/Atomic Demolition Munition (19651989)See also*nuclear weaponsReferencesDemolition Munitions
21729102
Jerome_H._Remick
__notoc__Jerome Hosmer Remick (15 November 1867  15 July 1931), was a Detroit music publisher, philanthropist and businessman from the late 19th century to the early 20th century.Life and careerJerome Remick was born in Detroit, Michigan. He was the son of James Albert Remick and Mary Amelia Hosmer.(Clarence Monroe Burton. Compendium of History and Biography of the City of Detroit and Wayne County, Michigan (Chicago: Henry Taylor & Co., 1909) pp.514-516) He graduated from the Detroit Business University in 1887, before joining the Whitney-Remick lumber firm, a family business started by his grandfather, Royal C. Remick.  Jerome married Adelaide McCreery in Michigan on June 26, 1895.(Scripophily.com)Remicks interests, however, did not lie in lumber, butin the developing popular sheet music industry, and in 1898 he bought out the small, struggling firm of Whitney-Warner Publishing Company in Detroit. He turned the company into an extraordinarily successful sheet music publishing house. In 1902 Remick and Maurice Shapiro founded Shapiro-Remick & Company, selling several million copies in 1905 of the enormously successful the Shade of the Old Apple Tree, written by Harry Williams and van Alstyne. The partnership was dissolved in 1906, and Remick started his own firm Jerome H. Remick & Co. Van Alstyne continued with Remick and a string of hits followed including Pretty Baby and Your Eyes have Told Me So.Remicks published songs influenced popular music trends, and included hundreds of hits such as Baby Face, Looking Over a Four Leaf Clover, You Beautiful Doll and Bye Blackbird, all of which contributed greatly to American heritage and culture.In 1909 the company published three ballads that sold more than a million copies &ndash; on Your Old Grey Bonnet, Bay in 1912 and You Wore A Tulip in 1914. The firm also published ragtime music such as Pickles Rag and and White Rag.Gershwin joined Remick in 1914 and composed many songs, but left the firm shortly after they published Ripples in 1917. To stay competitive Remick began to sign up unknown writers such as Warren, Dubin, Kahn and A. Whiting, ushering in the golden era of the Twenties music. Changes were in the air, though. The arrival of talking pictures obliged Brothers to invest in publishing houses, leading to their acquisition of Remicks company in 1929, gaining Remicks catalogue and staff writers, including Harry Warren and Al Dubin who created hits such as 42nd Street and Only Have Eyes For You.While competing publishing houses were located in Michigan, New York City and Chicago, Jerome H. Remick & Co. held sway in Detroit, also running a successful printing plant from there. The firm maintained branch offices in New York City and Chicago, with agencies all over the world, and started hundreds of music outlets under the name Remick Song Shops throughout the United States. Oddly, Remick could not read music at all, but had a natural understanding of public tastes.Remick was an enthusiastic gentleman farmer,  and owned a  estate on Avenue, growing fruit and vegetables, and raising chickens. His livestock included a herd of prize Holsteins, leading to a controlling interest in the Detroit Creamery Co.Remick was one of the influential patrons of the Symphony, repeatedly serving as the organizations president. His fundraising helped to create Orchestra Hall in 1919. His contributions also enabled the expansion of Detroits orchestra to 90 players so as to persuade Gabrilowitsch, Twains son-in-law, to become the Detroit Symphonys conductor. Remick also served as director on the boards of the pharmaceutical firm, Parke-Davis & Co, the Paige Motor Co, the Detroit Savings Bank, and the Union Trust Co. He also acted as secretary of the Whitney Land Co., which operated in Oregon and he had an interest in the Free Press. He was president of the Big Four Gold and Copper Mining Co. in Colorado, owning claims covering  north of the Little Jonnie Mine in the Leadville district.In 1928, because of ill-health, Remick sold the company to his Vice-President, Jerome Keit. The new firm was called The Remick Corporation, and was finally taken over by the Brothers conglomerate. Remick was survived by his wife, his children, and several grandchildren.(Band Shell Project blog)Remkick died on July 15, 1931, at the age of 63, and is buried along with his wife in Elmwood Cemetery in Detroit, Michigan.See also* Aeroplane Company (Remick was an investor)* SymphonyReferences;NotesExternal links*Indiana University Sheet Music Collection*The E. Azalia Hackley Collection
21740165
Sudbury_Steelworkers_Hall
The Sudbury Steelworkers Hall was a historic union hall in Sudbury, Ontario, which was destroyed by a fire on September 19, 2008.HistoryLocated at 92 Frood Road in Sudbury, on the northwest corner of the intersection with College Street, the building was originally built in 1947 as a Canadian Legion hall.(Steelworkers Hall, Ontario Abandoned Places.) Following several years of labour unrest in the city resulting from factional wars between Inco and Falconbridge mining employees over representation by the Steelworkers of America or the Mill and Smelter Workers, most workers eventually reconciled under the leadership of the Steelworkers. With the need to acquire a new home for the expanded union organization, representatives Don McNabb and Gib Gilchrist selected the hall, which the Legion had put up for sale due to declining membership. The union purchased the building, and moved into it on November 25, 1965.(Loss of Sudbury Union Hall A Great Tragedy, Historical Records Lost. USW Canada, September 19, 2008.)The building was also considered a local institution by the wider community, often being rented out as a banquet and reception hall and as a meeting venue for community groups, political party nomination contests, fundraising events and other community functions.( The building also housed some of Universitys classes prior to the construction of the universitys current campus in 1964.FireShortly after 2 a.m. on September 19, 2008, a fire broke out in the buildings banquet room.(Steelworkers Hall goes up in flames. Northern Life, September 19, 2008.) Fire alarms first went off at 2:12 a.m.(Chronology of the fire. Star, September 19, 2008.) The Greater Sudbury Fire Service responded to the alarms, and the fire appeared to be under control by 6 a.m. However, an isolated pocket of the fire later erupted again, and by 9:30 a.m. the revived fire had reached the buildings second floor offices.( By 11:15 a.m., police ordered the evacuation of the nearby Secondary School and Lansdowne Public School. Lansdowne students were bussed to Park Secondary School in the citys south end, while Sudbury Secondary students were moved to Composite School.( At the end of the school day, students who would ordinarily walk home from Lansdowne and Sudbury Secondary were bussed to St. Davids Catholic Elementary School for vehicle pickup by their parents.(With the fire remaining out of control, late that afternoon the decision was made to begin pulling down the buildings walls in an attempt to contain the fires spread. Excavators began creating a platform at around 6 p.m., and around 7:15 p.m. the excavators began to pull down the walls.(The fire was not fully extinguished until approximately 4 a.m. on September 20, 26 hours after it began. Firefighters used more than one million gallons of water to douse the flames.(United Steelworkers regional director Wayne Fraser issued a statement calling the fire a tragedy both for the union and the city as a whole:New Democratic Party leader Hampton also issued a statement, speaking about the buildings special place in the hearts of party members in the Sudbury area:Mayor Rodriguez stated that all my victories were celebrated in that hall and all my defeats. He called the building a labour temple ... a repository of what people believe, what motivates people, what drives an economy, a community.(Sudbury Fire Destroys Union Records and Memories. Ontario Heritage Connection, September 27, 2008.)Many of the unions records, including active files and archives comprising a major part of the citys documented history, were destroyed in the fire.(From historic landmark to ruins: suspicious fire destroys union hall; significant records lost in blaze. Northern Life, September 23, 2008.) Gerard, a former leader of Local 6500 who has been the president of the Steelworkers International since 2001, returned to Sudbury on the weekend and spoke to the media, stating that next to losing a family member, this is the most traumatic event in my life.(Steelworkers arson reward upped to $15,000. Northern Life, September 30, 2008.)At the time of the fire, the hall had already been booked solid for events every weekend through 2010.(AftermathThe intersection of Frood Road and College Street remained closed to traffic for most of the weekend as police investigated the fire.(Investigation continues into Steelworkers fire. Northern Life September 22, 2008)On September 22, the citys acting fire chief, Dan Stack, explained the fire departments findings regarding how the fire went back out of control after initially appearing to have been doused:At the same press conference, the office of the Fire Marshal confirmed that the blaze was being investigated as a potential arson.( The Sudbury Police Service issued a request for information, offering a $1,000 reward for tips given to the citys CrimeStoppers line.( The Steelworkers locals in Sudbury and Sault Ste. Marie, as well as the head office of United Steelworkers International, later made additional donations which resulted in the reward being increased to $15,000 on September 29.(After accepting many equipment and furniture donations from the community, the union moved into new temporary offices at 128 Pine Street on September 26.(Steelworkers move into new home. Northern Life, September 26, 2008.) The Sudbury Police Service announced on November 3, 2008 that two 12-year-old boys had been arrested in conjunction with the fire. The boys reportedly poured a flammable accelerant into one of the buildings outer ventilation ducts, which they then lit with a match.( Under the provisions of Canadas Criminal Justice Act, the two cannot be publicly identified in the media.(12-year-olds arrested for Steelworkers Hall blaze. Northern Life, November 3, 2008.)Full demolition of the building began in January 2009.In June 2009, the Steelworkers chose not to build a new facility on the original site, but instead purchased a former grocery store, which was shut down by the Loeb chain in February 2009, as the new hall.(Steelworkers buy former Loeb store. Northern Life, June 11, 2009.) The new facility, located at 66 Brady Street, is  in size.(Steel buys former grocery store. Sudbury Star, June 10, 2009.) (Youths responsible for Steelworkers Hall face sentencing Northern Life, November 30, 2009)ReferencesExternal links*USW Local 6500
21752270
History_of_Rio_de_Janeiro
File:Ile-de-villegagnon.jpg|thumb|Attack of French island by the Portuguese on 15 March 1560.Several years after the Portuguese first explored Brazil, French traders in search of pau-brasil (a type of brazilwood) reached the rich area extending from the Cape Frio coast to the beaches and islands of Bay, the economic and, above all, strategic importance of which was already well-known. In 1555, one of the islands of Guanabara Bay, now called Island, was occupied by 500 French colonists under the French admiral Durand de Villegaignon. Consequently, Villegagnon built Coligny on the island when attempting to establish the Antarctique colony.The Portuguese wanted to expel the French from Spain, and the task was given to de S, a nephew of Gov. Mem de S of Brazil, who in 1565 occupied the plain between Dog Face Hill (Morro Cara de Co) and the Loaf and Urca mounts, thus laying the foundations of the future town of de Janeiro. After two years (156567) of bloody battles, in which Estcio de S was killed and the French expelled, Mem de S chose a new site for the town, farther inland on the coast of the bay, at the top of the Hill of Rest (Morro do Descanso), or St. Januarius Hill (So Janurio), later called the Castle Hill (Morro do Castelo). In 1568 the settlement was laid out in the form of a medieval citadel, protected by a bulwark and cannons.The surrounding fertile land, allotted to Portuguese settlers by the Portuguese king in enormous plots called sesmarias, was planted with sugarcane, which was to provide the colony with its main source of income. In 1660 the community became the seat of the government of the southern captaincies (Portuguese administrative units) of Brazil. In the second half of the 17th century, the captaincy population grew to 8,000 inhabitants, two-thirds of whom were probably African slaves and Indians.At the beginning of the 18th century, Brazil began to engage in gold and diamond mining, which brought about remarkable changes in the colonys economy and stimulated a great migration from Europe, thereby increasing the number of people of European ancestry. The former village became a town of 24,000 in 1749. When the colonial capital was transferred from Bahia to Rio de Janeiro in 1763, the town expanded farther, far beyond its walls. The remains of the monumental Roman-style aqueduct Arcos (Arches) built at this time still stand in the city.At the end of the 18th century, the towns economy, as well as that of the colony as a whole, was in a crisis because of the decline of the mines and competition from Central America for the world sugar market. In 1796 the value of exports from Rios port was less than half of what it had been in 1760.Coffee production and the resettlement of the Portuguese royal family in Brazil in 1808 again brought prosperity to the colony. By 1815, when Brazil became a kingdom, Rio de Janeiro was large enough to accommodate a foreign population. At about that time the citys original appearance was being transformed; from 1808 to 1818 some 600 houses and 100 country houses were built, and many older buildings were restored. Many streets were lighted and paved, more land was reclaimed, new roads were opened, and new public fountains were installed. Among new institutions established were the Royal Press, the Royal Library, the Theatre of Saint John, the Academy of Fine Arts, the Garden, and the of Brazil. When King John VI returned to Portugal in 1821, Rio had almost 113,000 inhabitants and 13,500 buildings, and the town had extended both northward and southward. A year later Brazil was independent.Expansion of coffee plantations in the State of Rio de Janeiro gave a new impulse to the citys development. Nobles and bourgeois moved their residences north to the So Cristvo district. Merchants and English bankers chose to live around the Outeiro da Glria and Praia do Flamengo areas in the south, or they established their residences in the nearby Botafogo and Laranjeiras districts. The French, on the other hand, lived in country houses scattered in the Tijuca area farther westward.In that era, as Brazil expanded its world export trade in such products as coffee, cotton, sugar, and rubber, the city changed its appearance, and the traces of its colonial past were effaced. In 1829 oxcart traffic was banned from the Rua do Ouvidor, then the citys most elegant street. In 1838 the first public transportationhorse-drawn busesbegan to run to the districts of So Cristvo, Engenho Velho, and Botafogo. In 1868 the first tramcars, also drawn by animals, were introduced. A steamboat service to Niteri began to operate in 1835. The first railroad was built in 1852 to Petrpolis, and a line reached Queimados in the Igua area in 1858. In 1854 gas replaced oil for street lighting, and wireless telegraphy was inaugurated. Sewerage was installed in 1864, and telephone service began in 1877.When Rio de Janeiro, which had formerly been the capital of the empire, became capital of the republic of Brazil in 1889, it was already a considerable community. At the time of the 1890 census, it had more than 520,000 inhabitants on 61 square miles (158 square km), ranking it as the largest city in Brazil and one of the larger cities in the world. The 1891 constitution designated it the Federal District.During the federal administration of Pres. Francisco de Paula Rodrigues Alves, from 1902 to 1906, Rio de Janeiro was further transformed. A team of administrators and technicians drained swamps, cleared slums, paved and widened streets, and markedly improved health conditions, notably by reducing cases of yellow fever and smallpox. The central avenue (called Avenida Rio Branco from 1912), still the most important of the Centre, was opened during that period; Avenida Beira-Mar, running parallel to part of the south shore, was built on reclaimed land; and several other important avenues were opened.The population of the District exceeded 1,000,000 by 1920 and increased to 1,750,000 by 1940. During that period the number of industrial establishments in the Federal District nearly trebled. Castle Hill was demolished, land reclamation increased the area in the Centre, and the first skyscrapers appeared. Streetcar lines, now moved by electrical power, multiplied. While settlement spread on the east coast, some areas to the north lost status, such as So Cristvo, which became an industrial and lower-class residential neighbourhood.In the mid-20th century, metropolitan Rio de Janeiro grew beyond its formerly narrow confines because of migration from other parts of Brazil, as well as a high rate of natural increase. The suburban population more than tripled to some 1.5 million between 1940 and 1960, at a time when the city proper exceeded 3.3 million. Following the transfer of the national capital to Braslia in 1960, Rios rate of growth slowed somewhat, although the suburban population continued to mushroom. By 1980 there were more than 5 million residents in the city and 3.6 million in the suburbs. Although subsequent growth continued at a lesser rate, by the early 21st century the metropolitan population exceeded 11 million, of which nearly half resided in the suburbs.File:Predios em Copacabana.jpg|thumb|right|Buildings in Copacabana.Beginning in the latter part of the 20th century, population growth, real estate speculation, and an amplified dependence on automobiles precipitated a series of changes in the city. The highway system was expanded, with improved access to numerous suburban areas; still higher skyscrapers arose in the Centre; and larger residential towers increasingly replaced small apartment buildings and houses. Landowners, the iindustrial sector, and the financial sector favoured the changes; however, higher rents forced many poorer residents to move from the central city to the periphery or to the rapidly expanding favelas on the steeper hillsides. Meanwhile, many affluent families settled in the southwest, notably in Ipanema and Leblon and at sites farther down the coast.Rio has maintained its status as the second largest manufacturing centre in Brazil, after Paulo. In addition, Rios service sector remains one of the strongest in the country, providing for increasing numbers of jobs in such areas as finance, communications, tourism and entertainment, public and private education, and computer engineering. Rio remains a major centre for cultural exhibitions and international conferences, and many of the more affluent and influential Brazilians keep homes there. Despite desperate conditions in the citys favelas, as well as high rates of violent crime throughout the city, grave levels of air and water pollution, and myriad other problems, Rio de Janeiro is still widely recognized as one of the worlds more beautiful urban centres.urbana de Ro de Xaneiroda cidade do Rio de Janeiro
21769764
Environmental_movement_in_Australia
Image:Bob Brown at 2008 climate change rally DSC 6368.JPG|thumb|right|A change rally in Melbourne on 5 July 2008.Beginning as a movement, the environmental movement in Australia was the first in the world to become a political movement and Australia was home to the worlds first Party.The environmental movement is represented by a wide range of organizations sometimes called organizations. These organizations exist on local, national, and international scales. Environmental NGOs vary widely in political views and in the amount they seek to influence the Policy of Australia and other governments. The environmental movement today consists of both large national groups and also many smaller local groups with local concerns.  There are also 5,000 Landcare groups in the six states and two mainland territories.In Australia, the movement has seen a growth in popularity through prominent Australian figures such as Garrett, Flannery, Brown and Fleay. Scope of the movementAt a political level, the most influential organisation is the Greens.  In recent years the Greens have at times held the balance of power in the Senate.The largest and most influential and active environmental organizations in Australia is Greenpeace, the Conservation Foundation and Wilderness Society (Australia).  There are also a large number of smaller conservation and advocacy groups.  Many of these groups are involved in active acquisition for conservation as non-profit trusts or covenants to protect of environmentally sensitive land against inappropriate use.  The largest of which, in terms of total land area, is Heritage Australia.There is a strong movement in Australia.HistoryThe first European Settlers of Australia had little regard for the environment of the continent and the early focus was to use the abundant resources and convert the environment into a less hostile and European setting to make settlers feel more at home.The first signs of the environmental movement in Australia began with the growing naturalism movement at the turn of the 19th Century.  The first naturalists arrived in Australia very early.  Banks, a botanist and naturalist was a member of voyage of James Cook and the Fleet.  Despite some significant discoveries by botanists such as Maiden it wasnt for many decades and with the rapid deterioration of native habitat and growing understanding of the native environment that the first organised clubs began to form. The Naturalists Club of Victoria was formed in 1880, followed shortly after by the New South Wales Naturalists Club and a similar organisation was established in Tasmania in 1904.  Despite the existence of a strong Victorian era zoological movement, there was little emphasis on conservation or management of the environment and in the early days these naturalists were primarily concerned with cataloguing and academia.In 1908 the Victorian Naturalists Society and the Wilsons Promontory management committee were involved in advocating for the preservation of the Thylacine, a species being hunted to extinction in Tasmania.  Members of that group went on to establish Sanctuary.The environmental movement became mainstream with public outcry following extensive culling of koalas which occurred in Queensland between 1959 and 1919 when over one million Koalas were killed() bringing the species to the brink of extinction.The conservation movement, however took some time to grow.  Vast areas of Australia were set aside as land, however these were seen as areas of potential development and use rather than for conservation.In the 1920s, native fauna advisory committees began to be established to address the concern of rapidly dwindling populations of a number of mammal species.  In 1928, the Tasmanian Advisory Committee for Native Fauna had recommended a reserve to protect any remaining Thylacines, with potential sites of suitable habitat including the Arthur-Pieman area of western Tasmania.  This was also the beginning of a Tasmanian wilderness movement.However the movement was too little to late to save the thylacine from extinction, and the Devil was also hunted to the brink of extinction. The first National Parks The idea of land conservation began 1879, when the National Park in Sydney was proclaimed() .  Previously it had been a recreational area, however it followed the lead of National Park in the United States as a conservation park.As the conservation movement grew, so too did the number of national parks. The Landcare movement The movement in Australia was begun by farmers has its root in the 1960s to combat the growing problem of erosion and salinity which was having an increasing impact in Australia.(http://www.daffa.gov.au/__data/assets/pdf_file/0017/29141/landcare_in_australiaJune08.pdf)  Groups of volunteers were formed for projects which  promoted revegetation and better resource management.  Many of these projects were funded by community groups such as the Services Leagues and International.  Having started locally, the landcare movement gained a national voice in the late 1980s with the foundation of (organisation) and later Australia. Despite increasing awareness of greater environmental issues, however a growing conflict was occurring between conservationists and farmers.(http://www.daffa.gov.au/__data/assets/pdf_file/0017/29141/landcare_in_australiaJune08.pdf pg 4) The anti-litter movement The anti-litter movement also had its roots in the 1960s due to the growing problem in Australia of litter as a form of pollution.  Australia Beautiful was founded in 1969 and became popular in the 1980s with its Do the right thing campaign against littering and its Tidy Towns competition became well known in Australia due to it being a very competitive expression of civic pride. The rise of the green movement The first rumblings of the Australian green movement as a political force came with protests over the Pedder damming project in 1972.  The project caused worldwide publicity and brought the environmental movement to the mainstream in Australia.  The movement escalated with the Dam project and Bob Brown was made a martyr for the cause when he was jailed for environmental activism.The protests included the Tasmania Group who were the precursor to the Tasmanian Greens and are now recognised as the worlds first party. The group that preceded the Wilderness Society - the South West Tasmania Action Committee continued after the flooding.Anti-nuclear movement testing, mining and export, and nuclear energy have often been the subject of public debate in Australia, and the anti-nuclear movement has a long history. Its origins date back to the 197273 debate over nuclear testing in the Pacific and the 197677 debate about mining in Australia.(Jim Green. Australias anti-nuclear movement: a short history Green Left Online, 26 August 1998. Retrieved 15 October 2009.)(Jason Koutsoukis. Rudd romps to historic win The Age, 25 November 2007. Retrieved 15 October 2009.)  Several groups specifically concerned with nuclear issues were established in the mid-1970s, including the Movement Against Uranium Mining and Against Nuclear Energy (CANE), cooperating with other environmental groups such as Friends of the Earth and the Conservation Foundation.(Roy McLeod (1995). Resistance to Nuclear Technology: Optimists, Opportunists and Opposition in Australian Nuclear History in Martin Bauer (ed) Resistance to New Technology, Cambridge University Press, pp. 171-173.) But by the late 1980s, the price of uranium had fallen, and the costs of power had risen, and the anti-nuclear movement seemed to have won its case. CANE disbanded itself in 1988.(Roy McLeod (1995). Resistance to Nuclear Technology: Optimists, Opportunists and Opposition in Australian Nuclear History in Martin Bauer (ed) Resistance to New Technology, Cambridge University Press, pp. 175-177.) About 2003, proponents of nuclear power advocated it as a solution to warming and the Australian government began taking an interest.  Anti-nuclear campaigners and some scientists in Australia emphasised that nuclear power could not significantly substitute for other power sources, and that mining itself could become a significant source of greenhouse gas emissions. Indigenous land An increasing consciousness in Australian culture and the practices of sustainable landcare also contributed to an overall increase in popularity of the environmental movement and concern for indigenous species.  Additionally the Land Rights Act 1976 which granted indigenous people ownership based on traditional occupation, which effectively locked away large tracts of land from over-development. Popularity and government action since the 1980s The environmental movement reached a peak in Australia in the 1980s.  Popular Australian culture began to embrace the environmental messages of rock bands like Oil.The of the Rainbow Warrior in New Zealand polarised the community on the green movement.  Greenpeace became a symbol to many of the entire movement and was seen at once by many in the community as both intrepid and radical.  testing and whaling in the Pacific region had major impacts on the social consciousness of Australia.The environmental movement also became a hot political issue.  The Labor Party, in particular, began to capitalise on the popularity in its election campaigning with a national conservation and soil conservation strategy.In July 1989, Hawke made a famous Our Country, Our Future speech that the Labor Party would plant a billion trees to combat erosion and declared the 1990s the Decade of Landcare.(http://www.newscientist.com/article/mg12316741.900--hawke-calls-up-a-billion-trees-in-the-battle-against-soil-erosion--.html)  This was a widely popular decision vindicated by the environmental movement.  In the same year, the government introduced the Chemicals Notification and Assessment Act 1989, the focus of which was to eliminate the use of Chlorofluorocarbons.  The widening hole in the layer was of high concern due to Australias growing rate of skin cancer incidence.The issue of the environment did not receive as much publicity for over a decade.Howards Liberal Party government was known for its stubborn stance to environmental issues.  Howard refused to meet with climate change campaigner Gore, refused to acknowledge the Kyoto Protocol and his pro-power stance upset many voters.  Opposition leader Rudd called climate change the greatest moral, economic and social challenge of our time and called for a cut to greenhouse gas emissions by 60% before 2050.(Rule of reckless vows The Weekend Australian 27/28 December 2008 page 20)A Newspoll released prior to the federal election, 2007 found that the environment was the fourth most important issue to voters behind Medicare, education and the economy.()On 3 December 2007, as his first official act after being sworn in, Rudd signed the Protocol.() Rudd stated that: Australias official declaration today that we will become a member of the Kyoto Protocol is a significant step forward in our countrys efforts to fight climate change domestically - and with the international community.However, the Rudd government environmental credentials suffered some negative perception from environmental groups when post-Kyoto cuts to emissions were subsequently scaled back(Rudds ETS flip-flop sparks climate chaos by LENORE TAYLOR, NATIONAL AFFAIRS CORRESPONDENT Sydney Morning Herald 29 April 2010) and the fallout of the public embarrassing Efficient Homes Package scheme which included the much criticized insulation and Green Loans programs(Im to blame for the lot in bungled insulation scheme, Kevin Rudd declares Matthew Franklin and Nicola Berkovic from The Australian 26 February 2010). Criticisms of the environmental movement Some key critics of the environmental movement in Australia include former prime minister Howard and media personalities Bolt and Kerr.See also* of Australian environmental booksReferencesExternal links*350 Organisation in Australia
21798139
St._Elmo_(secret_society)
St. Elmo Society is a society at University. It was founded in 1889 as an independent entity for seniors within the nationally chartered fraternity, Phi (), Omicron Chapter (1889-1925). HistoryFounded in 1889, Elmos, as many refer to it, was the third senior society to be established in the Scientific School, which from 1854-1956, was the sciences and engineering college of Yale University. St. Elmos Sheffield predecessors Berzelius (1848) and and Snake (1863) both still exist today. Like the other Sheffield Societies, the building was once populated by admitted members from the sophomore, junior, and senior classes, who maintained separate residential quarters within the tomb. St. Elmo became a secret society in the traditional sense of and Bones (1832), and Key (1841), and Wolfs Head (1883), which had selected its members from the Academic Department (the liberal arts college), in 1965, long after the Sheffield Scientific School had been gradually integrated into Yale College  from the end of War I through 1956.(http://www.conspiracyarchive.com/NWO/Tombs_and_Taps.htm) While some Sheffield Organizations sold their buildings in the 1930s as the residential college system was established in 1933, others, such as St. Elmo, continued to flourish,(http://darkdownhere.com/?p27) incorporating itself as the Rhinelander Trust Association, Inc. St. Elmo also claims it is the sixth oldest senior society on campus, although Elihu (1903) also argues they lay claim to that spot. In fact, St. Elmos change to being senior society in 1965 means it actually is the eighth oldest above-ground senior society. In addition, the Society claims it was the first to admit women into the delegation. Manuscript and Elihu, two other senior societies, and Anthony Hall, a three-year society, both vie for that distinction as well. Furthermore, St. Elmo Society was an unincorporated association within Delta Phi from 1889 until June 1905. While still an entity within Delta Phi, the Society filed with Connecticut Secretary of State to form the St. Elmo Corporation, with the primary purpose of holding the title to the property, the building, and all financial assets. In July 1925, the Omicron Chapter of Delta Phi, and, in turn, the Society, severed its ties with the national fraternity and became an independent organization. At the end of 1956, due to clerical errors, the Corporation lost its incorporation status; however, in 1964, the Society refiled successfully as St. Elmo Incorporated. Architect of the building The Societys original Club House, located at 111 Grove Street, was built in 1895.(http://www.library.yale.edu/mssa/YHO/ExtracurricularandSocialOrganizations.pdf) In 1912, St. Elmo Hall, which was constructed from designs of Kenneth M. Murchison, was erected on the adjacent property of 109 Grove Street.  It is said that aspects reminiscent of an Elizabethan manor house inspired Kenneths architectural details. Beginning in 1945, the University leased the upper part of the building from the Society for dormitory facilities and eventually purchased the Hall from Elmos in 1962.(http://www.facilities.yale.edu/Campus/Building1.asp?lstBldg1715) Yale then leased sizable space to the Society with the understanding that the University would continue to do so because of the Clubs historical significance to the College. However, in 1985, the St. Elmo delegation was denied renewal of the lease by the University, and was left with little time to move out and no relocation site.Today, renamed Rosenfeld Hall, the building is used for residential annex and classroom space. Most unfortunately, the majority of the cryptic and historic areas are now used for furniture storage or have been boarded up.(http://www.gadling.com/2008/05/29/connecticut-journal-inside-yales-secret-societies/)In 1986, St. Elmo reestablished a new location on Lynwood Place. Today, like other landed or above-ground societies that are run by private organizations, St. Elmo Society, Inc. owns the property and continues to improve the tombs architecture. Mission The secret society network is a significant facet of the many traditions on Yales campus. St. Elmo prides itself on being one of the older societies, and one that provides its members with a culture that fosters personal growth. Within its diverse membership, St. Elmo Society embodies principles of family whereby every member, both current and past, are connected through a common experience. Accountability, open-mindedness, and respect are among a few of the copious attributes the Society impresses upon its members to instill in one and other.Delegations are selected from the entire junior class pool based on students scholastic standing, his or her seriousness of purpose, maturity, individuality, and other achievements at the University as well as representation of the different backgrounds and interests in each class.The main goal of the Corporation, as it is also referred to as, is to provide supplementary education to its members through various activities and interactions. It is the hope that these methods will inspire new meaning to the students Yale education. In return, the delegation must commit itself to by-laws, rules, and guidelines set forth by the Corporations Board of Governors. Membership Notable members include:* Harry Valette Day (1895), President, manager, and first member of the Board of Directors of Custer Consolidated Mining Company, which in 1913 merged with the adjacent Tamarack & Chesapeake Mining Company, forming the Tamarack & Custer Consolidated Mining Company(http://books.google.com/books?idjEJAAAAAIAAJ&pgPA38&lpgPA38&dqsheffield+scientific+school+st.+elmo&sourceweb&otsIYifMwbRqc&sigkzrme_YyD3M4itZGM5zTSwe-kPg&hlen&saX&oibook_result&resnum5&ctresult#PPA37,M1)(http://www.lib.uidaho.edu/special-collections/Manuscripts/dmginv/mg246.htm)* James Freeborn (1899), de Guerre recipient for his service in World War I and Captain in the States Army(http://books.google.com/books?ida7gIX6_9DX4C&pgPA26&lpgPA26&dqcharles+freeborn+yale&sourcebl&otslPgVOOsH6e&sigYoYypF8Uf5a6afT2-AkP2oIEX7Y&hlen&saX&oibook_result&resnum6&ctresult)* Hutchinson (1906), President of Proctor & Schwartz Electric Company, which merged with Silex Company to form Silex in 1960; he was also an All-American Football quarterback, 1905(http://freepages.genealogy.rootsweb.ancestry.com/~hutch/HUTCH/GUY/index.htm)* Arthur Harding Bosworth (1908), Founder and President of Bosworth, Chanute, Loughridge & Co, which eventually merged with RBC Wealth Management(http://books.google.com/books?idxkVPAAAAMAAJ&pgPA77&lpgPA77&dq%22st.+elmo%22+society+yale&sourceweb&ots8WpYTHh0dn&sigYxt1wmG2EbdoyihQ1ERS-LBrEiw&hlen&saX&oibook_result&resnum4&ctresult)* Robert Bensen Meyer (1914), Cross recipient for his service in World War I and Lieutenant in the States Navy(http://mssa.library.yale.edu/obituary_record/1925_1952/1951-52.pdf)* James Augustine Farrell, Jr. (1924), Founder of Lines, a shipping company, Son of A. Farrell (President of U.S. Steel Corporation, 1911-1932)* Dudley Willis Dud Rockwell (1935), President of Stanley P. Rockwell Co., his company patented the scale(http://www.asm-hartford.org/rockwelld.htm)(https://www.entrepreneur.com/tradejournals/article/158686675.html)* Fotzhugh Quarrier (1935), Colonel in World War II in the N.Y. Air Defense Wing and assisted Roosevelt in organizing the WAACs(http://query.nytimes.com/gst/fullpage.html?res9807E1DC133DF931A35750C0A9639C8B63)* William Moonan (1939), Senior Vice President Sherwin-Williams, Beta Pi Award winner(http://archive.southcoasttoday.com/daily/04-00/04-30-00/zzzddobi.htm).* Ivan Obolensky (1947), Naval pilot, Prize publisher, Vice President of Shields & Company, long-time financial analyst, son of Prince Obolensky, Russian Prince and Vice Chairman of the Board of Hotels Corporation, and grandson of Jacob Astor IV, great-grandson of Jacob Astor(http://people.forbes.com/profile/ivan-obolensky/83151)(http://query.nytimes.com/gst/fullpage.html?res950DE3DF1631F93AA35753C1A96F948260&sec&spon&pagewantedall)*James E. Fuchs (1950), Olympic medalist, 1948 and 1952, Games medalist, and former record holder, put. President, Chairman, and Executive Director of the Silver Shield Foundation; Chairman and Co-Chief Executive of the Cosamar Group Inc.; former Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of The Grenfox Group Inc.; former senior advisor to the Committee to Encourage Corporate Philanthropy; former CEO of Fuchs, Cuthrell & Co Inc.(http://www.silvershieldfoundation.org/jimbio.html)(http://money.cnn.com/magazines/fortune/fortune_archive/1988/09/26/71046/index.htm)*Alan K. McAdams (1952) Professor at Johnson Business School at Cornell and served as senior staff member of the Presidents of Economic Advisers*Andrew H. Marks (1961) Former President and CEO of Bollinger, Inc.* Morse Crunden (1962), Professor at the of Texas, director of American Studies Department, 1985-1990, member of the History Department as well(http://alumni.yale.edu/classes/yc1962/obituaries/crunden.html)(http://www.utexas.edu/faculty/council/2000-2001/memorials/Crunden/crunden.html)* John Richard Sack (1963), author of The Franciscan Conspiracy, translated into 20 languages and a top-10 bestseller for many months in Germany, Brazil, France, Italy and Holland.* Ashcroft (1964), 79th States Attorney General(http://www.yaledailynews.com/articles/view/15924)* Daniels Parker, Jr. (1965), a judge on the States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit(http://www.aliciapatterson.org/APF001974/Coombs/Coombs02/Coombs02.html)* Hill (1969), All-Pro NFL running back; father of NBA All-Star, Grant Hill(http://research.yale.edu/afam/pagedocs/PROGRAM.pdf)* Dick Caples (1971), Executive Director Lubovitch Dance Company* Gandolfo Vincent DiBlasi (1975), Partner at & Cromwell, recognized as one of the top litigation attorneys in America* Arturo Cazares (1979), Epidemiologist M.D., M.P.H., Program and Executive Research Coordinator at the Institutes of Health, recognized contractor to the Department of Justice.* James L. Shulman (1987), Author and President of ARTstor*Matt McCarthy (2002), Author of Odd Man Out, which was ranked number 21 on the New York Times Non-Fiction Best Seller List in March 2009(http://www.nytimes.com/2009/03/03/sports/baseball/03book.html?_r1)(http://www.yalealumnimagazine.com/yotw/index.html) References  Sources * How the Secret Societies Got That Way* Yale Alumni Magazine 2001* NY Times Article, St. Elmo Hall 1* NY Times Article, St. Elmo Hall 2* New York Times Article, St. Elmo Society* Sheffield Scientific School Recordings* Yale Organizations 1780-1960* Sheffield Scientific School Obituary 1951-1952* Tombs and Taps: An inside look at Yales Fraternities, Sororities and Societies* Buildings & Grounds* Inside Yales Secret Societies* Secret societies: tombs and tradition* Light and Truth* St. Anthony
21813103
Hugh_Matheson_(industrialist)
thumb|right|170px|Hugh MathesonHugh Matheson (c. 1820 - 1898) was a 19th-century Scottish industrialist.  In 1873, he assembled a group of financiers to purchase the Rio Tinto mine from the government of Spain, establishing the mining company that is today the Tinto Group.  Matheson served as the companys first president.()()His original capital came from his share profits from Jardine and Matheson, a family business involved in the opium trade.( )References
21831542
Humphrey_Mackworth
Sir Humphrey Mackworth (Jan 1657-1727) was a British industrialist and politician. He was involved in a business scandal in the early 18th century and was a founding member of the for Promoting Christian Knowledge.(The Welsh Academy Encyclopaedia of Wales. John Davies, Jenkins, Menna Baines and Peredur Lynch (2008) University of Wales Press pg527 ISBN 978-0-7083-1953-6)Early historyMackworth was born in Shropshire to Thomas and Ann Mackworth, his grandfather, also Humphrey Mackworth, was a prominent Puritan soldier and politician in the Civil War. Mackworth was educated at College, Oxford and graduated in 1674. He studied law, entering the Temple in 1675 and was called to the Bar in 1682. Mackworth was knighted by King Charles II in 1683.()As an industrialistIn 1686 Mackworth married Mary Evans of Neath and he moved to Wales soon after. Mary was the daughter of Sir Herbert Evans of Gnoll in Neath and she became the sole benefactor of Sir Herberts estate after the death of her sisters. The Evans family had, for the last two generations, controlled the leases that allowed virtually sole-control of mining rights in Neath. The coal from the area had been used for smelting and Mackworth became interested in working with copper and lead, and may have begun copper smelting in 1695. In 1696, Mary died, leaving Mackworth as the inheritor of the estate, and by 1698 he had branched into controlling interests in Cardiganshire.Earlier, in 1690, rich mineral deposits had been discovered in the Goreddan estate, whose lease was controlled by Sir Carbery Pryce, whose company developed the site. With the dissolution of the of Mines Royal, also in 1690, this estate became very important, and Mackworth acquired Pryces interest after his death in 1694. Mackworth redeveloped the enterprise and in 1704, his Company of Mine Adventures was given its charter. This led Mackworth to begin smelting copper at Neath, but found himself in direct competition with Sir Mansel, who owned coal mining in the neighbouring areas. In 1709, the Company of Mine Adventures became bankrupt, and it was discovered that the financing of the company had been undertaken outside normal legal means. A committee of the House of Commons investigated the matter in 1710 and leveled at Mackworth charges of fraud. No charges were brought after the Whig government fell from power, and Mackworth set up a new company in 1713, the Company of Mineral Manufacturers. This ceased operations in 1719.As a Member of ParliamentMackworth sat in several elections and was successful in four, his affiliations were towards the Tories. In 1701 he won his first seat when he was made a of Parliament for Cardiganshire, but lost it to Pryce at the end of the year. He regained the Cardiganshire seat in 1702, but abandoned it in 1705 to challenge the constituency of Oxford University, which he failed to win. He then successfully sat as one of the two MPs for Totnes which he held from 1705 to 1708. His final period in Parliament was in 1710 when he regained the Cardiganshire seat until 1713.Mackworths eldest son, Mackworth, also entered politics and held the Cardiff seat between the years 1739-1766. His son, Sir Humpreys grandson, was Sir Herbert Mackworth who held the same Cardiff seat after his father, until 1790.Society for Promoting Christian KnowledgeIn 1699, Mackworth was among a group of layman who helped Dr. Bray in the formation of the Society for Promoting Christian Knowledge, an Anglican mission organisation. Through his companies, Mackworth gave financial assistance to create and fund two schools in Wales. He also wrote several religious booksSources*Biography of Humphrey Mackworth The National Library of WalesReferencesMackworthMackworth
21847960
SS_Vienna_(1873)
{|Ship notes The Vienna was downbound with her schooner barge tow, the Matte C. Bell, when she sank.  No lives were lost.|}The SS Vienna was built in 1873 during the era when steamers were built with sail rigging.  She had a 19 year career marked with maritime incidents including sinking when she was just 3 years old.  She sank for her final time in fair weather in Bay in Superior after she received a mortal blow when she was inexplicably rammed by the steamer Nipigon.  Although no lives were lost when the Vienna sank for the last time, more than 100 years later her wreck claimed the lives of 4 divers, the most of all the wrecks in the Point Underwater Preserve that now protects her as part of an underwater museum.  Her wreck was stripped of artifacts that resulted in the Department of Natural Resources seizing her artifacts in a raid on the Lakes Shipwreck Museum in 1992.  Her artifacts are now on display in this museum as loan from the State of Michigan. Career Quayle & Martin built the wooden steamer Vienna with an octagonal house and sail rigging in 1873 for the Cleveland Transportation Company during the era when insurance companies still required ships to carry sails to maintain liability coverage.()()   The Vienna had a series of maritime incidents during her 19 year career.  In August 1876, she  ran ashore at Presque Isle in Huron and was able to get off.  Her luck did not hold in October 1876 when she sank in Lake Superior with a cargo of grain when she was just 3 years old.  She was rebuilt in 1875  1876 as a double-decker with 3 masts and increased tonnage.  In September 1883 she sustained considerable damage when the Willow Street bridge swung into her in Cleveland, Ohio.( )  In 1887, she was assisted by the tug Leviathan when she was stranded on  an uncharted  deep shoal  southwest of  Light in the of Mackinac with $1,800 in damages.(()  In 1889, she was sold to Orient Transportation Company of Rockport, Ohio.  In 1890, her rigging was changed to 2 masts.  She sank for a second and final time in 1892.(Final voyageIn fair weather at 12:25 am on 17 September 1892, the steamer Nipigon was light and upbound in Whitefish Bay in Lake Superior towing the schooners Melbourne and Delaware.   The  Vienna under Captain J.W. Nicholson was downbound from Michigan and towing the schooner Mattie C. Bell.  Both were heavy with a cargo of iron ore.(Gerred, Janice H.  Wreck of the Vienna, Great Lakes Shipwrecks, p.10.  Voyager Press, Grand Maria, Michigan, 1978.  G 525.G74 1978.  )  The Vienna and the Nipigon exchanged signals for the normal port to port passing but the , 626 ton Nipigon suddenly veered and rammed the , 1,006 ton Vienna on the port side.  Both vessels immediately dropped their consorts.((Stonehouse, Frederick (1973). The Great Wrecks of the Great Lakes: A directory of the shipwrecks of Lake Superior, pp. 6870, The Book Concern, Printer, Hancock, Michigan, USA. LCCN 73-75623.).( Wolff, Julius F. (1979, 1990). The Shipwrecks of Lake Superior, p. 67. Lake Superior Port Cities Inc., Duluth, Minnesota, USA.  ISBN 0-942235-01-0.)  The Nipigon tried to tow the Vienna to shallow water but after an hour they were still about  from shore when the ore-laden, mortally wounded  Vienna dove into deep water.((( (1892 September 19.) Sent her to the bottom.  The Mining Journal, p. l.)  No one could explain why the Nipigon rammed the Vienna.   The Vienna was valued at $46,000 but she was only partly insured.(   The Viennas crew and papers were transferred to the lumber hooker Nipigon.    The Nipigons stem and forefoot were badly crushed but she was not leaking much and she was able to proceed on her way.   A tug towed the Bell to Ste. Marie, Michigan.((()Wreck artifactsThe wreck of the Vienna was discovered in 1975 by the United States Fisheries R.V. Kohvo research vessel while setting fish sampling nets.  She was then extensively explored by divers Kent Bellrichard of Wisconsin and Tom Farnquist, Director of the Great Lakes Shipwreck Historical Society (GLSHS) and the Lakes Shipwreck Museum.(  Shipwreck historian Gerred wrote of Bellrichard and Farnquists dives to the Vienna: They had made many trips to the wreck and brought up some interesting artifacts.  Among them were a hand carved eagle atop the pilot house, the wheel, wooden blocks, portholes, a telegraph bell, whistle pull, dishes, crocks, and a large grindstone.  Farnquist, who is an expert on making lamps, book ends, and tables from wreck material, refinished the wheel.  He mounted it against blue velvet with a polished frame of wreck wood.  It is displayed at the Lake Superior College and will be donated to their future marine museum.  The eagle also was refinished and donated to the museum ship, Valley Camp.(Michigans Antiquities Act of 1980 prohibited the removal of artifacts from shipwrecks on the Great Lakes bottomlands.() The Department of Natural Resources and Environment (DNRE) 1992 raid on the GLSHS offices and Great Lakes Shipwreck Museum included seizure of artifacts that were illegally removed from the Vienna.((Storey, Jack, (4 December 1992). Shipwreck artifact dispute simmers. Evening News, p. A1.) Artifacts from the Viennas wreck are on display in the Great Lakes Shipwreck Museum as a loan from the State of Michigan by a 1993 settlement agreement with the GLSHS following the DNRE raid on the museum in 1992.(() The Viennas wreck in now protected by the Point Underwater Preserve as part of an underwater museum.Wreck divingThe Viennas wreck lies in   of water at .  The Viennas wreck is one of the more accessible wreck dives in the Whitefish Point Underwater Preserve because she is about  from shore.( Harrington, Steve (1990, 1998), p. 328.  Divers Guide to Michigan, p. 321, Maritime Press & Great Lakes Diving Council, Inc., St. Ignace, Michigan, U.S.A. ISBN 0-9624629-8-5)  She is known as a blow-off wreck dive because she closer to shore and extended-range divers go to this wreck during high winds and rough seas or when they have limited time.  Her wreck is moored to protect her remains and enhance the safety of divers.(( However, the greater accessibility of the Viennas wreck belies her ability to ensnare even technically skilled, experienced divers.  The 4 diving fatalities on her wreck are the most of all the wrecks in the Whitefish Point Underwater Preserve.  Her remains are intact and upright and divers especially enjoy exploring her intact bow cabins.(In 1994, 102 years after the Vienna sank, an experienced male diver who was a member of the Chippewa County Sheriffs Department died while diving her wreck.((08 August 94).  Sault Man Killed in Lake Accident. Evening News, p. A1.)    In 1995, an experienced male diver died of massive emboli after deeply penetrating the wreck, likely running out of air, and attempting an uncontrolled ascent without staged decompression.()    In 1996, an inexperienced female divers body was recovered from the wreck of the Vienna in  feet of water when her companion diver who was her fianc was unable to rescue her.()  A fourth diving fatality occurred at the wreck of the Vienna in 1998 but details of the accident are not available.  () References  External links*Resource for Great Lakes shipwrecks*Video of the Vienna
21866737
Tagaung,_Mandalay
website Tagaung is a town in Division of Myanmar (Burma). It is situated on the east bank of the River, 127 miles north of Mandalay.( )TransportThe Ayeyarwady remains the principal means to reach Tagaung. It is linked to Mandalay and to State in the north also by the Mandalay-Tagaung-Shwegu-Bhamo-Myitkyina Union Highway.( )HistoryPre-Christian era and first millenniumTagaung is believed to be the very first capital of Burma according to the adage Myanmar asa Tagaung ga (Myanmar starts from Tagaung), and it was the ancient capital of the Pyu, who were the forerunners of the Burmese people.()  Its history is steeped in myth and legend. The city is said to have been founded in 850 BC by King Abhiraja of the Sakya clan from Kapilavastu in India, before the time of the Buddha.()It has a very important place in Burmese culture also for the Tagaung yazawin (Tagaung Chronicle) legends of Maung Pauk Kyaing the dragon slayer, the powerful blacksmith and his sister who became the household guardian spirits known as the Mahagiri Nats, and the blind twin princes  who were sent adrift on a raft down the Ayeyarwady.((()()Although the British historians G E Harvey and D G E Hall had dismissed the Abhiraja origin of the Burmese people, the antiquity of Tagaung itself is not in dispute.(() Ptolemy, the Greek geographer, writing in 140 AD, mentions Tugma Metropolis believed to be Tagaung at a spot in Upper Burma.(()The name Tagaung means drum ferry in the language.((() In 225 AD, the Wei general Chu Ko-liang is said to have usedbronze drums to frighten savages by placing them in torrents to produce the sound of military watchdrums at regular intervals.(According to Chinese annals, Nanchao invaded and plundered the capital of a Pyu kingdom in 832 AD carrying off 3,000 captives. The chronicles of the Dynasty(AD 606-910) describe the land of the Pyu consisting of 18 states and 9 walled towns. In Upper Burma at least seven walled settlements over 200 hectares have been excavated so far.(Second millenniumTagaung has been termed Anya Pagan (Upper Bagan) with its artefacts dating back to the Age.() It was one of the 43 outposts established by King Anawrahta (10441077) of Bagan along the eastern foothills of the Shan plateau in defense of his realm, before he embarked on expeditions west to Bengal and east to Nanchao.( The fortification to the east may reflect the citys location by the Ayeyarwady like Bagan but unlike Bagan its proximity to the frontier with Yunnan along the Shweli and Taping rivers. Tagaung was also within easy reach of miineral resources such as silver from Namtu, rubies from Mogok, jade, copper and iron by the Meza and Uru rivers.()Polo (12541324) was believed to have reached as far as Tagaung in his travels on one of his fact-finding missions sent by Khan.()Southwest Silk RoadA network of three overland routes from Yunnan westward to Bengal existed for shipping bullion between 1200 and 1500 AD. One of them followed the Shweli River, crossing the Irrawaddy at Tagaung, followed the River north and crossed via the Imphal pass to Manipur. In the 1950s tens of thousands of cowries in Yunnan were found in tombs from the ancient past between the States Period (475 BCE221 BCE) and the Han Dynasty (206 BCE9 CE). These cowries came from the Pacific and Indian oceans, especially from the Maldives, most likely along the same route.()Old cityOld Tagaung may have conformed to the tradition of first millennium Pyu cities which were divided into 9 quadrants. There are 3 walls: Wall 1 (19 hectares) around a low hillock on the north, Wall 2 (62 hectares) known as Anya Bagan, and Wall 3 (204 hectares) encompassing the other two. The western wall is missing in all three of them, and believed to have been washed away by the river as it changed its course over time. excavations carried out at Tagaung had yielded age drums, and also votive tablets connected to Anawrahta. More recent finds included urns, decorated roof-tile finials and finger-marked Pyu bricks dated before 800 AD.(((Flora and faunaPheasants, partridge, toucans, pelicans and cranes inhabit around in-gyi seasonal lake and the tall swamp grass areas along with numerous fishin the lakes and streams. Tigers, elephants, banteng (Saing) and gaur were once common along the Shweli, with various kinds of deer around Tagaung.(EconomyTimber, elephants and minerals were transported down from Mogok and the Shweli valley to Tagaung and other nearby river ports at Hsin Hnyat and Kyan Hnyat just south of Tagaung. Panning for gold ia done at Tonnge just north of Tagaung. Seasonal lakes and swamps make it possible to grow winter rice called mayin in addition to other crops producing oils and coriander.(Today Tagaung is a major market for salt produced at Halin, which is used to preserve fish.((China and Burma signed a venture agreement in July 2004 for an $800 million nickel mining project at Tagaung taung (Tagaung Hill), with a 75% stake held by the Chinese. Construction has begun and operations consisting of mining and smelting facilities, designed to produce 85,000 tons of ferronickel and 22,000 tons of nickel per annum, are scheduled to start in 2011.()NotesExternal links*Satellite map: Tagaung GeoNames*Satellite map: Tagaung taung Panoramio*Maung Pauk Kyine Maung Maung Pye, Tales of Burma, 1952, Illinois University*The Story of Maung Tint De, The Strong Man Maung Maung Pye, Tales of Burma, 1952, Illinois University*The Blind Twins and Bedayi Hla Thein, Perspective, April, 2003*The Travels of Marco Polo FullBooks.com*China in Burma Earthrights International, September 2007fr:Tagaung
21888016
Co-processing
Co-processing is the use of waste as raw material, or as a source of energy, or both to replace natural mineral resources (material recycling) and fossil fuels such as coal, petroleum and gas (energy recovery) in industrial processes, mainly in energy intensive industries (EII) such as cement, lime, steel, glass, and generation. Waste materials used for Co-processing are referred to as alternative fuels and raw materials (AFR).Concept of Co-processingCo-processing is a proven development concept that reduces demands on natural resources, reduces pollution and landfill space, thus contributing to reducing the footprint. Co-processing is also based on the principles of ecology, which considers the best features of the flow of information, materials, and energy of biological ecosystems, with the aim of improving the exchange of these essential resources in the industrial world. image:Types_of_Co-processing.gifFigure 1: Types of Co-processingIn summary, the benefits of Co-processing are:* to conserve natural (non-renewable) resources of energy and materials,* to reduce emissions of greenhouse gases in order to slow global warming and demonstrate a positive impact on integrated environmental indicators, such as the ecological footprint,* to reduce the environmental impacts of the extraction (mining or quarrying), transporting, and processing of raw materials,* to reduce dependence on primary resource markets,* to save landfill space and reduce the pollution caused by the disposal of waste, and* to destroy waste completely eliminating potential future liabilities.Co-processing contributes to the industrial competitiveness, is a complementary technology to concepts such as production or recycling and should be considered as a treatment alternative within an integrated waste management concept. Some EII offer co-processing as a sustainable waste management service. It is usually more cost effective to adapt existing facilities of EII than building new waste treatment capacities thereby reducing waste management cost to society.The waste management hierarchy (see figure below) shows that Co-processing is a recovery activity which should be considered after waste prevention and recycling; Co-processing ranks higher in this hierarchy in comparison to disposal activities such as landfilling or incineration.image:Waste_hierarchy.gifFigure 2: Waste Management HierarchyPotential of Co-processingThe global industrial demand for energy is roughly 45% of the total demand and the requirements of the energy intensive industries (EII) are more than half of the total industrial demand, at 27%. Worldwide, wastes suitable for Co-processing have an energy potential equivalent to nearly 20% of the fossil fuel energy used by the EII and coal-fired power plants. By 2030, the thermal substitution rate of waste could rise to nearly 30%. In the EU-25  countries of Europe, the available energy potential in waste currently represents nearly 40% of this demand, and this is expected to rise to almost 50% by 2030.However, in the year 2004 in EU-25, less than 10% of the energy content of the waste that was not being reused or recycled was utilized by the EII and power plants. This figure indicates to which extend the high potential of waste as alternative fuel and a source of materials is being neglected.Roughly 60% of the waste that could be used for Co-processing is biomass and therefore neutral. In this way Co-processing offers a significant potential for the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions from fossil fuels. Furthermore, diverting industrial waste streams from landfills and incinerators without energy recovery contributes to reducing overall CO2 emissions when used to substitute fossil fuels through Co-processing (as illustrated in the figure below).image:Reduction_of_Emissions_through_Co-Processing.gifFigure 3: Reduction of Emissions through Co-processingOther factors that must be considered when Co-processing waste include product quality standards, permitting aspects, and transparent communication in order to gain public acceptance.Examples of waste that can be co-processedImage:Used tires.jpg|Used tiresImage:solid waste in plastic barrels.jpg|Various solid waste in plastic barrelsImage:Shredded solid waste.jpg|Shredded solid wasteImage:Contaminated paper.jpg|Contaminated paperImage:medical waste.jpg|Medical waste (pharmaceutical phial)Image:rice husk.jpg|Rice huskImage:Contaminated glass bottles.jpg|Contaminated glass bottlesImage:sludge impregnation.jpg|Impregnated sludgeImage:waste paint.jpg|Paint sludgeSee also*Waste-to-energyExternal links* Co-Processing Waste Materials in Cement Production On this website you will find various digital documentations related to the topic Co-Processing Waste Materials in Cement Production.* The Deutsche Gesellschaft fr Technische Zusammenarbeit fosters the international collaboration for sustainable development. * The World Business Council for Sustainable Development provides a platform for companies to explore sustainable development, share knowledge, experiences and best practices, and to advocate business positions on these issues in a variety of forums, working with governments, non-governmental and intergovernmental organizations.*The Cement Sustainability Initiative (CSI) was formed to help the cement industry to address the challenges of sustainable development. The business leaders of a group of major cement companies lead the initiative.*The United States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) leads the nations environmental science, research, education and assessment efforts. The mission of EPA is to protect human health and the environment.*Energy from Waste Production of energy through the incineration of wasteDownloads*http://www.coprocem.com/literature-var-2 Literature on various aspects of Co-processing in EII*http://www.coprocem.com/trainingkit/pages/home.html A training kit on Co-processing waste materials in cement productionVideos *CBS: http://www.kutv.com/content/news/local/story.aspx?content_ida27e9417-f361-46ac-8f2e-fad9c5fce1d6*NBC: http://www.ksl.com/?nid148&sid4299008 *Fox: http://www.myfoxutah.com/myfox/pages/Home/Detail;jsessionid75B311F6BF641601B9E01B42BE94CA24?contentId7467388&version4&localeEN-US&layoutCodeVSTY&pageId1.1.1&sflg1
21906888
Selcuk_University_Department_of_Geological_Engineering
Geological Engineering Department of Selcuk University, University Faculty of Engineering and Architecture what is an optional section. Engineering Department is located on the Afyon way to 20th km in Keykubat Campus. Tram and bus transportation between campus and city center are provided with. Geological Engineering Department authorized staff and more than 34 years of knowledge has grown continue to add new ones to 1500 engineers. History First, the Selcuk University Faculty of Science Department Science has started education at the 1976-1977 school year. In 1982 with the name of Geological Engineering have been connected to the Engineering and Architecture Department.  Academic Structure *General Geology*Mining Bearings-Geochemistry*Mineralogy-Petrography*Applied Geology Heads of Department * Prof.Dr. Mehmet Ayan* Prof.Dr. Fikret Kurtman* Prof.Dr. M.Esat Baskan* Prof.Dr. Hukmu Orhan* Prof.Dr. Halil Bas* Prof.Dr. Yuksel Aydin* Prof.Dr. Muazzez Celik Karakaya* Prof.Dr. Huseyin Kurt (still)External links*Site of Selcuk University Department of Geological Engineering *Blog of Department*Prof.Dr.Hukmu Orhans Site*Prof.Dr.Fusun Alkayas Site*Prof.Dr.Yasar Erens Site*Ass.Prof.Dr. Guler Gocmezs Site*Ass.Prof.Dr.Ferhat Bayrams Siteniversitesi Jeoloji Mhendislii Blm
21923554
Operation_Fritham
Operation Fritham was a Norwegian operation with the goal of securing the rich mines on Spitsbergen and denying its use to Germany.(Andre Verdenskrig p Svalbard (Svalbard Museum))The missionOn 30 April 1942, 82 men from the Scottish Brigade sailed from Greenock heading for Svalbard. They sailed aboard the ships SS Selis and SS Isbjrn. On 14 May, the two transport ships the men used were sunk by Luftwaffe Focke-Wulf Fw 200 Condor long-range patrol bombers. Twelve men were killed and 15 wounded.The operations commander was Sverdrup who died on the mission. Sverdrup had been the CEO of the Norske Spitsbergen Kulkompani, a Norwegian coal mining company based in Svalbard.(Edvard Sverdrup (Store norske leksikon))File:Bundesarchiv Bild 101I-432-0796-07, Flugzeug Focke-Wulf Fw 200 Condor.jpg|thumb|left|DS Selis and DS Isbjrn were sunk by four Focke-Wulf Fw 200 Condors of the Luftwaffe.Aftermath of the air attackThe surviving soldiers managed to get to Barentsburg. The survivors were on their own until May, when they were spotted by an Allied plane, following which they were supplied by air-drop. On 2 July the force were re-supplied by sea, an operation code-named Gearbox. They survived isolated on Spitsbergen until reinforcements arrived. Air raids continued against the Fritham force during this period and therefore Operation Gearbox equipped them with aircraft guns.ReferencesFritham
21930169
Orion_Clemens
professionjournalistOrion Clemens (18251897) was the first and only Secretary of Nevada Territory. He is best known through his relationship to his younger brother Samuel Langhorne Clemens, known by the name Mark Twain.Early lifeBorn in Tennessee, Orion Clemens was the oldest of seven children. Four of his six siblings died before reaching the age of twenty, leaving only his brother Samuel (18351910) and their sister Pamela (18271904). In 1839, the Clemens family moved to Missouri,() a port town on the River which was to eventually inspire some of his brother Sams stories.As a young man, Clemens worked in his fathers general store, and later as an apprentice at a local newspaper, before moving to Louis, Missouri. In St. Louis, Clemens began studying law under attorney Bates, who later served as Attorney General for President Lincoln. After his fathers death in 1847, Clemens returned to Hannibal and purchased the local newspaper, then became the owner of The Hannibal Journal in which Samuel worked for him. Unable to make a successful living as a journalist in Hannibal, Clemens relocated to Iowa in 1853 and to Iowa in 1854.(twainquotes.com, The Lost Autobiography of Orion Clemens.)Political careerFollowing Republican Abraham Lincolns election as President in 1860, Clemens was appointed Secretary to the new government of the Territory of Nevada at a salary of $1,800 a year. His younger brother Sam accompanied Clemens to Nevada Territory in the summer of 1861. Sam would later write about this journey in his semi-autobiographical book, It.(Twain, Mark, Roughing It, 1872. ISBN 0-7434-3650-4.) Sam drifted into mining and newspaper work, while his brother served as Territorial Secretary and often as acting Governor when W. Nye was outside the territory. It was while acting as temporary Governor that Clemens gained political popularity by avoiding a Sagebrush War with California over disputed state boundary lines.(Fanning, Philip Ashley, Mark Twain and Orion Clemens: Brothers, Partners, Strangers. The University of Alabama Press, 2003. ISBN 0-8173-1310-9.) Clemens built a home in Carson City and brought his wife, Mollie, and young daughter, Jennie, to Nevada a year after his arrival. Jennie would die there in February, 1864. Clemens offered strong support of the newly-formed government in Carson City, paying out of his own pocket for the printing of the House and Senate Journals and to furnish the two territorial legislative chambers.(The National Park Service, Three Historic Nevada Cities.)In 1864, as Nevada gained statehood, he sought unsuccessfully to be nominated as a candidate for Nevada Secretary of State. The following year, he served a brief time as an elected state assemblyman. However, the meager salary of a legislator and his inability to develop a successful law practice led him to leave Nevada in 1866.Later lifeAfter leaving Nevada, Clemens lived for some time in the eastern United States, again attempting to pursue a career in journalism, before finally relocating once again to Keokuk, Iowa in the mid-1870s, where he lived for the remainder of his life. In Iowa, Clemens at times practiced law, farmed chickens, and worked at inventing various gadgets. He also worked extensively on an autobiography. Unfortunately, his writing efforts and other endeavors were largely unsuccessful, and his main source of income was provided by Sam, who visited Clemens often. Clemens died December 11, 1897.References
